Summary
"A substantial and elegant Victorian townhouse in a commanding position on this ever popular and highly sought after location, with flexible accommodation set over 4 floors, in need of some sympathetic improvement and updating and is currently used as a house of multiple occupancy. One of four ava..."
Substantial property with annexe & walled gardens.
Stunning substantial home on popular road in the city.
"This multi-award-winning, high specification eco-house was designed by the acclaimed architect Meredith Bowles of Mole Architects in 2011. It occupies a quiet and secluded position on Madingley Road, in the western section of the Conservation Area of Cambridge, and extends to over 2,460 sq ft. Th..."
"Detached mid-century family house in need of refurbishment, situated in fabulous gardens along one of Cambridge best roads"
"**TAKE THE STRESS OUT OF MOVING - PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE** A stylish, modern home, built to a high specification, offering over 3,000sq ft of living accommodation, with a good sized garden, garage and private terrace."
AVAILABLE WITH PART EXCHANGE** The Trinity Villa offers an array of SUSTAINABLE FEATURES. Large private REAR GARDEN & 2ND FLOOR TERRACE. FULLY FITTED KITCHEN & SEPARATE UTILITY ROOM. Family bathroom & 3 EN-SUITES. GARAGE & PARKING. Close to the UNIVERSITY OF CAMBRIDGE PRIMARY SCHOOL.
"An exceptional Edwardian house providing extensive and individual family accommodation with the rare addition of a detached double garage with versatile accommodation above, occupying a generous corner position with large walled gardens in the highly sought-after De Freville conservation area."
A highly prized opportunity in central Cambridge comprising a three storey townhouse and two adjoining duplex apartments in addition to the freehold interest of three neighbouring apartments. Offering a strong potential return in this rapidly expanding district just a short walk from the city cen...
Final property remaining on this exclusive development of just two high-end homes. A rare opportunity to acquire one of a pair of brand-new substantial detached contemporary properties situated in this most sought-after location just off Hills Road and close to Addenbrookes Hospital and Biomedica...
"** SHOW HOME OPEN ** An individually designed four bedroom home on this private development. Occupying the corner plot, and with a generous garden to the rear this stunning home offers open-plan living space, and driveway parking for several cars."
"Exceptional, modern townhouse, situated in a rather unique settling with superb access to schools & colleges, railway station and Addenbrooke's Hospital."
"**ONLY TWO PLOTS REMAINING OF THIS THREE STOREY HOME ** A stunning detached family home, with LARGE INTEGRAL GARAGE with EV charging point, dedicated utility room, 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, 4 bathrooms, open-plan kitchen/dining room and a private garden to the rear."
An imposing and substantial Victorian bay fronted four storey town house occupying a commanding and prominent location enjoying a wonderful vista and stunning views over Jesus Green and the River Cam and just a short walk from Midsummer Common and city centre.
"A superb, bay fronted Victorian townhouse with beautifully presented accommodation throughout, delightfully situated in this sought after residential location. NO ONWARD CHAIN"
A unique opportunity to buy a semi-detached Edwardian house with a self-contained separate three bed annexe.
A stylish and immaculately presented Georgian townhouse in a premier central city location.
"A fine and substantial Victorian townhouse with garage, off-street parking and south-facing walled garden situated in a prime central location within easy reach of Cambridge Station and the historic centre."
"Imposing period town house, situated in a particularly central location, adjacent to Parkers Piece."
"Hockeys presents this impressive five-bedroom, detached property in CB1, Cambridge. Built in 2010, the home offers stunning east-facing gardens and is set over three spacious storeys. Communal parking is provided for the properties on the development, with two allocated spaces. The home is conven..."
"*NEW RELEASE* Modern five-bedroom end-of-terrace family home set across three floors - Highly sought-after EDDINGTON location, close to all AMENITIES & the UNIVERSITY OF CAMBRIDGE PRIMARY SCHOOL. Features include Triple glazing, UNDERFLOOR HEATING & Kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. FIND OUT MORE"
"The Bennett is expertly designed with modern specification throughout, spread over three floors, with two good size terraces, garage and parking."
"Substantial and extended, detached 1930’s bay fronted residence with accommodation arranged over three floors extending to about 349 sqm (3757 sqft) occupying a desirable location towards the city end of Milton Road with its own generous enclosed gardens as well as driveway and garaging."
"A rare opportunity to acquire a modern block of six self-contained flats arranged over four floors. This wonderful investment opportunity comprises of a collection of studio, one bedroom and two bedroom units. The property which was completed in 2018 is situated just a short distance from the h..."
"A substantial & imposing semi-detached property in a prominent position on the corner of Highworth Avenue and Milton Road. Currently arranged as 3 self contained apartments ( 2 x one bed; 1 x two bed) achieving a combined rent of £3190 PCM, on a generous plot with parking for multiple ca..."
"A beautifully presented and well-proportioned, modern 1 bedroom apartment, conveniently situated within walking distance of Cambridge mainline railway station, the city centre and Addenbrooke's Hospital/Biomedical Campus, all while enjoying the benefits of a concierge, swimming pool and gym exclu..."
"A bright and improved Townhouse of 106 sqm / 1150 sqft, with a carport and 2 parking spaces. The property is close to the A14 / M11 road networks and is for sale with no chain."
"An established detached home, set in a generous plot of almost 1/5th of an acre, with private gardens and off road parking. The property is ideally located for access to Addenbrooke's, the railway station and the city centre."
"Built as part of a small exclusive development in 2009 on the site of what had been a farm, this delightful five bedroom, two storey barn-style house stands on a generous plot. Sitting within beautiful gardens the current vendors have made numerous additions including a store room in the car por..."
"*NEW RELEASE- 12 MINS CYCLE FROM CITY* The Sidgwick provides GARAGE with DRIVEWAY, 1st-floor TERRACE, EN-SUITE & FITTED WARDROBES to principal bedroom, FULLY FITTED kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES & CAESARSTONE WORKTOPS, UTILITY ROOM, UNDERFLOOR HEATING to ground floor. Move in late spring 2023"
"Substantial Grade II listed end of terrace Georgian residence with versatile and well proportioned accommodation over three floors, forming part of this elegant Georgian terrace in this prestigious central city location close to Botanical Gardens, Lammas Land, private schooling and the Grand Arca..."
"A well-proportioned 6 bedroom detached family house, set in a corner plot with the benefit of a self-contained Annexe, with wonderful open views."
"*AVAILABLE TO RESERVE NOW* Over 2000sqft, with host of sustainable features, within walking distance of the University of Cambridge Primary School."
"NEW RELEASE Modern four-bedroom family home with expansive living spaces - Highly sought after EDDINGTON location, close to all AMENITIES & the UNIVERSITY OF CAMBRIDGE PRIMARY SCHOOL. Features include Triple glazing, UNDERFLOOR HEATING & Kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES."
"Victorian townhouse, transformed into a flexible spacious home with large private garden and heated garden studio/home office. Knight Frank is proud to present this Victorian townhouse, which has undergone an extensive updating, modernisation and extension programme whilst retaining as much cha..."
"Plot 188, The Chadwick C type offers kitchen/ dining room with FULLY FITTED KITCHEN & INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, UTILITY ROOM, 1st floor LIVING ROOM with access to THREE TERRACES and a spacious master bedroom with EN-SUITE, BUILT IN WARDROBES and PRIVATE TERRACE. Plus a INTEGRAL GARAGE. MOVE IN THIS ..."
Five bedroom family home with views of the nature reserve.
"A stylish, modern townhouse with an excellent, self-contained Studio situated in an outstanding location close to Addenbrooke's Hospital/Biomedical Campus."
"Plot 191, The Annex offers kitchen/ dining room with FULLY FITTED KITCHEN & INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, UTILITY ROOM, 1st floor LIVING ROOM with access to a PRIVATE TERRACE and STUDIO over the SEPERATE GARAGE. 2nd floor spacious principal bedroom with EN-SUITE and BUILT IN WARDROBES. MOVE IN AUTUMN 20..."
"An attractive bay-fronted Edwardian residence of 1192 sqft / 110 sqm, enjoying an enviable position on the south side of Newnham Croft, a short walk from the River Cam."
"Impressive period family home, situated in a most convenient south city location, with the advantage of private driveway parking."
Fancy living in this fantastic extended three storey townhouse close to the city centre in the award winning Aura development?
"FINAL RELEASE OF HOMES - Beautiful new home, offering 1,731 sq ft of accommodation, FULLY FITTED KITCHEN with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, Underfloor heating to the ground floor, GARAGE and DRIVEWAY. Located in a sought-after area just 10 minutes cycle from the city. MOVE IN THIS SPRING."
Substantial townhouse for refurbishment with two flats.
"Stunning NEW HOME in the sought after EDDINGTON location, close to all AMENITIES & the UNIVERSITY OF CAMBRIDGE PRIMARY SCHOOL. Features include Triple glazing, UNDERFLOOR HEATING & Kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. Ready to move into Winter 2023"
"A wonderful opportunity to purchase this unique detached family home with a large south facing rear garden and detached double garage. The property is located within the eagerly sought after De Freville Estate offering easy access to the city centre, Midsummer Common and the river."
Beautifully presented and sympathetically improved early Victorian townhouse delightfully located in traffic free lane close to Parker's Piece in the heart of the city together with vehicular access to the rear and garage/parking.
A modern end of terrace house with integral garage.
"An impressive four bedroom detached family home offering spacious and versatile accommodation, positioned in a highly regarded cul de sac location, ideally placed for access to the City."
Stylish contemporary four bedroom house in favoured development.
Fine & Country Cambridge are delighted to bring to market this excellent 4 bedroom extended semi detached house in the extremely popular CB2 postcode.
"A unique opportunity to purchase this established four storey Victorian family residence, in need of sympathetic improvement and updating, offering well-proportioned and versatile accommodation in this highly sought after location, over looking Jesus Green and the River Cam to the front while off..."
A substantial bay fronted Victorian 4 storey town house currently used as 8 lettings rooms with their own kitchenette and shared bathroom facilities occupying this sought after location just to the north of Midsummer Common and the river. The property has a enclosed courtyard garden with rear gat...
"A Victorian townhouse with accommodation arranged over 4 floors in this convenient, central city location close to Jesus Green, Midsummer Common and the River Cam."
"An attractive and imposing bay-fronted, four-bedroom detached family home, offering circa two-thousand square feet of generous living accommodation across two floors and residing on the attractive Perne Road, CB1. The property is set back from the roadside via a good size front garden ..."
A charming well presented four storey period town house of about 1200sqft in this rarely available location close to the historic centre of the City. The property is currently split into two one bedroom apartments attracting a premium rent. The owner will reconfigure to its original three bedroom...
Superb Victorian bay fronted semi detached property.
"A superb four bedroom townhouse within a select gated development off Riverside, close to Midsummer Common and the City centre."
"A beautifully refurbished, extended, bay fronted, 4 bedroom Victorian house of 1353sq ft in a lovely position This Victorian home has been refurbished throughout by the current owners and now provides excellent family accommodation across 3 floors which includes: An entrance hall with o..."
"We are excited to offer this impressive three bedroom duplex apartment located in the heart of Cambridge. The property is an easy walk to the city centre, where you will the Grand Arcade shopping centre as well as the whole host of restaurants and shops that the city has to offer."
A classic bay-fronted Victorian house providing stylish and extended accommodation approaching 1200 sq ft with a west-facing rear garden close to Castle Hill and Jesus Green.
"An impressive family townhouse of excellent proportions of around 160 sqm / 1726 sqft, located and conveniently positioned just off Long Road. It is within walking distance to nearby schools and a 6 minute cycle to the Addenbrooke's Campus."
"An elegant Victorian townhouse providing characterful accommodation approaching 1200 sq ft with the benefit of an internal courtyard, west-facing walled garden and double garage. The property occupies a privileged position along Ferry Path, moments from the river and Midsummer Common."
"The Caxton is a spectacular five bedroom home benefiting from an additional 333 SQ FT STUDIO OVER THE DOUBLE GARAGE. £60,000 contribution*"
"RECEIVE A £60,000 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS EITHER YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING COSTS. Only two of these superb homes remaining, both offer a self-contained studio which occupies the space above the garage."
"RECEIVE A £60,000 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE. PLUS A FULLY INTEGRATED KITCHEN AND FLOORING THROUGHOUT AS STANDARD, INCLUDING AMTICO TO SELECTED ROOMS. Semi-detached 1867 square feet home spread across three floors benefitting from a SELF CONTAINED STUDIO ABOVE YOUR DOUBLE GARAGE. Open-pla..."
"An extended 1920’s semi-detached family home with four bedrooms, four reception rooms and a self-contained annexe, offering a comfortable and spacious living accommodation located north of Cambridge in the highly sought-after school catchment"
"A rather stylish, sympathetically improved and extended bay fronted Victorian town house of immense character, providing exceptionally versatile accommodation over three storeys and occupying an enviable and most desirable position in a highly sought after residential street, just off Mill Road."
A unique opportunity to acquire a bay fronted residence with a pair of adjoining single garages with potential subject to planning for redevelopment in an outstanding prime south city position together with an enclosed garden and useful outbuildings.
"A four storey semi detached Victorian town house in this popular City location, with large rear garden and off road parking."
"This five-bedroom home, built in 2021, boasts a high standard of construction and design, with attention to detail evident throughout the property. The main bedroom is a true master suite, featuring ample space and privacy, with a large walk-in wardrobe and en-suite bathroom. The en-suite bathroo..."
"Attractive bay fronted city home with private garaging, situated in a highly desirable residential address, just North of the city centre."
"A wonderful chain free Grade II Listed period home in a prime central location, providing spacious and well proportioned rooms, benefitting from a number of fine original style features including high ceilings. Comprising three bedrooms, two spacious reception rooms & generous front & rea..."
Attractive detached Victorian house in a secluded city position.
"An established and extremely versatile semi-detached property, offering flexible accommodation alongside a low maintenance rear garden as well as a wealth of off-road parking, all situated in a tucked away position at the end of this quiet residential development and so well placed to access a we..."
"Detached four bedroom home with driveway parking for two cars. Inside you have an open-plan kitchen diner with french doors onto your south facing garden, adjoining utility room, bay-fronted lounge and a private home office. Upstairs you'll find four double bedrooms, your main with an en suite. A..."
"A bright and spacious detached family residence with double garage and off-street parking, occupying a corner position with south-facing rear garden in a secluded cul-de-sac close to Addenbrooke’s Hospital and excellent schools."
Plot 2 is a spacious four bedroom detached house with study and single garage
"Plot 2, The Hazel is a 4 bedrooms detached home with separate study, set within 1,688sqft of living accommodation over 3 floors."
"An impressive and well proportioned home with off street parking and a private south east facing garden, enjoying a quiet near central position within striking distance of the City centre."
"Located on the edge of Cambridge in Fen Ditton is this spacious detached house of 171 sqm / 1841 sqft in need of improvement, set back from the road with a generous 30m / 98ft rear garden."
"A charming bay-fronted Edwardian residence with a private west-facing garden, situated just north of the river in the heart of De Freville and available with no onward chain."
"Nestled in the heart of the charming city of Cambridge, 52 Gwydir Street is a true gem that seamlessly blends Victorian charm with modern updates. The property is located off Mill Road, just 0.8 miles to the rail station. This double-fronted end terrace was constructed around 1900 using Cambridge..."
"A stunning Victorian terrace house extended and sympathetically improved, set within beautiful landscaped garden with panoramic views over the River Cam"
"A substantial semi-detached, current house of multiple occupation available to the North of the Cambridge City Centre. All rooms are currently tenanted, with the current owner benefitting from a strong yield, making this a delightful proposition for any investment. The property is bei..."
Stunning 3 bedroom apartment with panoramic views of Cambridge's Parker's Piece. Situated in the tower portion of the Parkside Place development.
"A characterful Victorian townhouse, situated in one of the most highly sought-after streets in the Kite, a stone’s throw from an extensive range of amenities and available with no onward chain."
Plot 25 is a spacious four-bedroom detached house with private rear garden and single garage and allocated parking space
"A beautifully presented home with the benefit of full planning permission for a ground floor rear and three story side extensions and a loft dormer bedroom with en-suite in a sought after location just a short walk from the mainline railway station and within easy reach of the city centre, Addenb..."
"A Modernist townhouse with a west-facing garden, garage and parking. The property enjoys a peaceful position in the ever-popular Newnham district"
"A superb investment opportunity located within a short walk to the historic Cambridge City Centre, in the form of a fully compliant and managed HMO, on Elizabeth Way, Cambridge, adjacent to the De Freville conservation area. Providing a strong annual rental yield after costs, with fur..."
"An outstanding, modern three storey townhouse situated at the end of a cul-de-sac, overlooking allotments, located within this highly regarded development off Milton Road."
"A well-positioned and imposing detached bungalow set within a large plot just to the south of the Cambridge city centre on Coldhams Lane, Cherry Hinton. This immaculately presented home boasts four-bedrooms, two bathrooms, including an en-suite to master, off-road parking for several vehicles and..."
"An outstanding, 4-bedroom townhouse, overlooking Silva Park, conveniently situated within the Great Kneighton development on the south side of the city."
"An attractive bay-fronted Edwardian home with driveway, parking and a private garden, situated in the ever-popular Hurst Park Estate, within striking distance of the river and City Centre."
"A spacious 1930's semi-detached property, situated in a prominent north city location and within easy reach of the city centre and local transport links."
"A charming and extended period home of 105 sqm / 1125 sqft, enjoying a convenient position within walking distance of the river, for sale with the benefit of no onward chain."
An immaculately presented and well-proportioned semi-detached residence forming part of this small select development just off Milton Road in a most convenient setting for access to the science park and Cambridge North station.
HIGH SPECIFICATION AS STANDARD I ELECTRIC CAR CHARGING POINT I Link-detached 4 bedroom home with drive through car port parking. Inside you have an open-plan kitchen diner with French doors onto your rear garden and a spacious lounge to the front of your home. Upstairs you'll find four double bed...
"A well presented duplex apartment in a central location close to the historic city centre and railway station with one bedroom, living room, shower room, kitchen and roof garden."
"Plot 41, The Gibson is a 4 bedrooms semi - detached home with garden, single carport and driveway parking."
Plot 41 is a spacious four bedroom semi-detached house with private rear garden and single garage and allocated parking space
"Welcome to Seymour Street, Cambridge – based just off Mill Road in the ever-popular central hub of the city and just over one mile to the rail station, ideal for commuters. Other close-by amenities include shops, supermarkets and schooling, making this an ideal location for young families and fir..."
"A bay-fronted, Victorian townhouse that is beautifully proportioned and is situated within a highly sought-after area on Trafalgar Road within a stone's throw of the River Cam, Midsummer Common and Jesus Green, as well as an array of local amenities. The home provides two large reception rooms wi..."
"A three-bedroom semi-detached Edwardian period property arranged over three floors, with off-road parking and an insulated summerhouse, ideally located to the city centre, North train station and within walking distance to the River Cam, Jesus Green and Midsummers Common"
"A thoughtful and beautifully appointed bay-fronted house with parking and a west-facing garden, enjoying a cul-de-sac position in this secure development close to the heart of Romsey."
"RECEIVE A £36,000 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS EITHER YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING COSTS. PLUS A FULLY INTEGRATED KITCHEN AND FLOORING THROUGHOUT AS STANDARD, INCLUDING AMTICO TO SELECTED ROOMS. Link-detached 4 bedroom home with drive through car port parking. Open-plan kitchen diner with French door..."
"SOUTH WEST FACING GARDEN I RECEIVE A £34,000 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS EITHER YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING COSTS. PLUS A FULLY INTEGRATED KITCHEN AND FLOORING THROUGHOUT AS STANDARD, INCLUDING AMTICO TO SELECTED ROOMS. The Oakington is designed over three floors creating a home for flexible modern..."
* REGISTER YOUR INTEREST* Flexible three storey living with open plan kitchen with family and dining area and doors to the garden.
"End terrace townhouse with 1,306 sq ft of accommodation over 3 floors."
The Hurst is a delightful home which has plenty of flexible living space for all the family. All homes come with an electric car charging point and upgraded specification as standard.
"RECEIVE A £24,000 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS EITHER YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING COSTS. PLUS A FULLY INTEGRATED KITCHEN AND FLOORING THROUGHOUT AS STANDARD, INCLUDING AMTICO TO SELECTED ROOMS. The Oakington is designed over three floors creating a home for flexible modern living. Your ground floor ..."
"***HIGH SPECIFICATION***. RECEIVE A £34,000 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS EITHER YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING COSTS. PLUS A FULLY INTEGRATED KITCHEN AND FLOORING THROUGHOUT AS STANDARD, INCLUDING AMTICO TO SELECTED ROOMS. Discover flexible three storey living. Featuring a spacious open-plan kitchen wi..."
"Link detached townhouse with 1,306 sq ft of accommodation over 3 floors."
"RECEIVE A £36,000 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS EITHER YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING COSTS. PLUS A FULLY INTEGRATED KITCHEN AND FLOORING THROUGHOUT AS STANDARD, INCLUDING AMTICO TO SELECTED ROOMS. The Thorney is a four bedroom home designed across three floors. The open-plan kitchen features dining and..."
"A flexible three storey home with 4 bedrooms, open plan kitchen/dining/family area and separate living room. CONTACT BIDWELLS FOR FURTHER INFORMATION."
Plot 45 is a spacious four bedroom semi-detached house with private rear garden and single garage and allocated parking space
"An attractive 4 bedroom house of over 1400 sqft / 130 sqm. The property occupies a delightful position on the edge of the development and has a west-facing rear garden, coupled with parking for 2 vehicles."
"A highly sought after two bedroom, two bathroom modern apartment, with views over the river in central Cambridge. The property features an entrance hall, leading to an open plan living space, with a wrap around balcony overlooking Midsummer common and the River Cam. The open plan kitche..."
"Impressive 2 bedroom third floor apartment with river views, situated in this highly sought-after development just a short distance from the city centre."
"An impressive 3 bedroom, first floor apartment providing stylish and spacious accommodation. The property further benefits from two large balconies as well as a secure under croft parking space."
House to sell? We could be your CASH buyer. Ask us about our Part Exchange Guarantee scheme. Open-plan kitchen with dining space with an adjoining utility area. French doors onto your rear garden. Lounge with over-sized window. Two double bedrooms - Main bedroom with en suite. Single bedroom or f...
"*RESERVING NOW* The Wilburton features open-plan living, 3 bedrooms, 2 bath/shower rooms (1 en suite). CONTACT BIDWELLS FOR FURTHER INFORMATION."
"RECEIVE A £24,000 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS EITHER YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING COSTS. PLUS A FULLY INTEGRATED KITCHEN AND FLOORING THROUGHOUT AS STANDARD, INCLUDING AMTICO TO SELECTED ROOMS. Open-plan kitchen diner with French doors onto your rear garden. Kitchen with adjoining utility cupboard. ..."
An excellent opportunity to purchase this recently refurbished and well-proportioned ground floor apartment in this retirement development offering a wealth of communal opportunities for residents while be ideally located to access a wealth of local amenities and the city centre.
VISIT OUR SHOW HOME - Plot 25 is a spacious three bedroom home with single car port for parking. Click through to find out more!
"A brand new 3 bedroom detached house boasting 1,217 Sq Ft of living accommodation, set within a vibrant new community. With garden and parking space."
An exceptional detached eco family home with solar panels in a new community situated East of the City of Cambridge. 
"Impressive 3 bedroom modern apartment, situated just off Hills Road within the prestigious, gated Marque House development."
"RECEIVE A £34,000 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS EITHER YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING COSTS. PLUS A FULLY INTEGRATED KITCHEN AND FLOORING THROUGHOUT AS STANDARD, INCLUDING AMTICO TO SELECTED ROOMS. This four bedroom home townhouse has an open-plan kitchen with French doors onto your garden. On the groun..."
"Flexible three storey living with open plan kitchen, diner and seating area."
"A modern three storey semi-detached townhouse in a highly regarded location close to supermarkets, schooling, the Addenbrookes hospital biomedical campus and the M11. This well appointed property features 4 bedrooms and 2 bathrooms in addition to a large garage. Sold with the advantage of no upwa..."
A well-presented and enlarged inner terrace bay fronted townhouse with enclosed facing garden
"This beautifully modern, newbuild terraced house benefits from an expansive open plan design to incorporate modern family living."
"A well presented, 1930's 3 bedroom, semi detached house, situated for easy access to Cambridge city centre and the mainline railway station."
"A unique opportunity to purchase this end of terrace three storey townhouse, ideal for renovation, positioned just off Barton Road in the highly desirable Newnham district of the city."
A contemporary five bedroom townhouse offering flexible and spacious accommodation arranged over three floors with the added benefit of a car port and garage and overlooking a pleasant green area incorporating a play park within this popular residential area
"A handsome and imposing four-storey Victorian townhouse with a generous south-east facing rear garden and brick-built outbuilding, situated in a highly regarded residential area off Huntingdon Road"
"***SAVE £34,000*** I SOUTH WEST FACING GARDEN. RECEIVE A £34,000 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS EITHER YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING COSTS. PLUS A FULLY INTEGRATED KITCHEN AND FLOORING THROUGHOUT AS STANDARD, INCLUDING AMTICO TO SELECTED ROOMS. Your ground floor has a modern open-plan layout and feature..."
"OVERLOOKING ALLOTMENTS I HOUSE TO SELL? VISIT US TODAY AND ASK ABOUT OUR PART EXCHANGE GUARANTEE SCHEME. The Stambourne is a three storey townhouse. Your ground floor has a modern open-plan layout and features a kitchen, dining and family area with french doors that open out onto your rear garden..."
The Stambourne is a three storey townhosue with kitchen and living/dining room with doors to teh garden. Impressive main bedroom suite on the top floor.
Plot 251 is a spacious three bedroom home with single car port for parking. Click through to find out more!
"SAVE £32,000 ON YOUR MOVE, PLUS FLOORING (T&Cs Apply) The Stambourne is a three storey home. Your ground floor has a modern open-plan layout and features a kitchen, dining and family area with French doors that open out onto your rear garden. Completing your ground floor is a WC and spacious unde..."
"SAVE £32,000 ON YOUR MOVE, PLUS FLOORING (T&Cs Apply) The Stambourne is a three storey home. Your ground floor has a modern open-plan layout and features a kitchen, DINING AND FAMILY AREA WITH FRENCH DOORS THAT OPEN OUT ONTO YOUR REAR GARDEN. Completing your ground floor is a WC and spacious unde..."
"SAVE £32,000 ON YOUR MOVE, PLUS FLOORING (T&Cs Apply) The Stambourne is a 3 bedroom home. The ground floor consists of a separate kitchen, WC & lounge/dining area with French doors leading to the fully turfed rear garden. The first floor consists of two double bedrooms and the family bathroom. Th..."
** NOW OPEN THURSDAY TO MONDAY - CONTACT BIDWELLS TO BOOK YOUR APPOINTMENT ** A three bedroom three storey house with study and garage.
"SAVE £32,000 ON YOUR MOVE, PLUS FLOORING (T&Cs Apply) This three bedroom home offers a light and spacious open-plan kitchen with French doors opening onto the garden. On the ground floor there is also a cloakroom, storage cupboard and a study/4th bedroom, perfect for working from home. On the fir..."
"An extended house of 124 sqm / 1325 sqft with driveway parking, a generous garden and a useful workshop, situated in a peaceful cul-de-sac in East Chesterton and for sale with no onward chain."
4 Perne Avenue is an established bay fronted semi-detached house which has been sympathetically updated and extended in more recent times and provides exceptionally well presented and versatile living accommodation together with a delightful long rear garden and driveway/parking area to front.
"Charming Grade II listed detached cottage, situated in the highly desirable village of Fen Ditton."
REQUEST YOUR VIRTUAL TOUR! A stylish and beautifully presented third floor apartment situated off Hills Road within this highly regarded development.
"Bay-fronted Edwardian home within the popular city of Cambridge. This home has been renovated to a good standard and would make a lovely home given its well-proportioned accommodation arranged over two floors, and an enclosed rear garden with gated access. **Please note: Viewings only availab..."
"Introducing Phoenix, a brand new development of just 13 apartments located off Newmarket Road in Cambridge."
A charming two-bedroom Victorian cottage located in central Kite providing 750 sq ft of characterful accommodation and a delightful courtyard rear garden.
"*NEW RELEASE* Fantastic THIRD FLOOR two-bedroom apartment in EDDINGTON with UNDERFLOOR HEATING, Fully fitted KITCHEN with INTEGRATED appliances, SECURE basement PARKING, Industrial style TRIPLE GLAZING, SUSTAINABLE features, Private BALCONY."
"A stylish and refurbished, 3-bedroom Victorian home, extended at the rear and including a loft room, located just 300m from Jesus Green Lock. This bay-fronted Victorian terrace house has been refurbished by the owners and now provides open-plan living with a blend of contemporary finishe..."
"A rather unique and peacefully positioned Victorian house with parking and a west-facing courtyard garden, located down a private lane just north of the river."
"Positioned on the edge of this highly acclaimed development to the South of the city and nestled in a peaceful cul-de-sac location, is this bright, spacious and welcoming, three bedroom modern family home, which boasts accommodation arranged over two floors approaching 1100 sq ft. Your attenti..."
"Detached three bedroom home with private driveway with space for two cars. Inside you have a spacious lounge and an open-plan kitchen diner. Upstairs you will find two double bedrooms, your main with an en suite. One single bedroom or the ideal home office and a modern bathroom."
Plot 9 is a spacious three bedroom semi-detached house with private rear garden and two allocated car parking spaces.
"Argyle Street is located off the popular and vibrant Mill Road in the Romsey Town area. The Romsey Town area has a unique atmosphere and offers many local facilities including a wide range of retail shops and services, a number of parks and schooling for most ages. Mill Road is conveniently situa..."
Unique modern two storey two bedroom maisonette.
"An impressive and substantial three / four bedroom house located to the east of the city centre, benefitting from a garden and off street parking. This property is situated in a quiet yet central location, with easy access to the city centre and the A14. "
A Five Bedroom HMO located in Fen Ditton. Includes a spacious kitchen and two bathrooms with a large rear garden. Offering a great investment opportunity. 
"A well presented bay fronted 1930's semi detached residence with a generous rear garden and benefit of planning permission for construction of loft conversion with rear dormer situated in this sought-after location on the favoured south side of the city with good access to railway station, local..."
"A well-proportioned and recently renovated Victorian home of 1025 sqft / 96 sqm, situated in the desirable Kite Area. The property has residents parking for 2 vehicles, a west-facing garden and is available with no chain."
MODERN THREE BEDROOM HOUSE CLOSE TO THE CITY CENTRE situated in the heart of Cambridge. Walking distance of the City Centre and the Beehive Centre retail park. This property is spread across four floors with the kitchen/ dining area and WC on the ground floor and living room and utility area on t...
"** NOW OPEN THURSDAY TO MONDAY - BOOK YOUR APPOINTMENT ** The Mews has a spacious open-plan kitchen/dining area, two double bedrooms and parking space."
"SAVE £29,000 ON YOUR MOVE, PLUS FLOORING (T&Cs Apply) The Mews is a 2 bedroom home. The ground floor focuses on the open-plan kitchen/dining area. The first floor features two double bedrooms, the main bedroom with en suite, family bathroom & a triple-aspect lounge with French doors leading to th..."
"SAVE £29,000 ON YOUR MOVE, PLUS FLOORING (T&Cs Apply) The Mews is a 2 bedroom home with a spacious open-plan kitchen/dining area. The first floor features two double bedrooms, the main bedroom with en suite, family bathroom & a triple-aspect lounge with French doors leading to the large terrace a..."
"** INVESTORS ONLY ** Stylish two bedroom ground floor apartment, with private courtyard garden, situated within striking distance from Cambridge Railway Station."
"Forming part of the award winning Accordia development, constructed in 2010, is this stunning two-double bedroom first floor apartment, within the highly acclaimed Copper Building, providing circa 930 square feet of light and airy accommodation, providing any buyers with good access to local amen..."
An established 1930’s semi-detached house with a 65ft south-east facing garden. The property enjoys a peaceful position just off the Huntingdon Road and is available with no onward chain.
"A newly renovated and updated 2/3 bedroom end of terrace home, available with no onward chain. The property features, an entrance hall, leading to a good sized lounge with bay window and fireplace. There is an extra reception room, currently used as a bedroom but would also be suitable for a..."
"A well presented, 1930s terraced house, situated in this central location and benefitting from easy access to the city centre, Cambridge Science Park and Cambridge North Railway Station. NO ONWARD CHAIN"
"Ideally located for Cambridge City Centre, apartment one is a 3 bed ground floor apartment benefiting from two patio areas, off street parking and will be finished to a high specification."
An extended three bedroom semi-detached house enjoying a highly popular and sought after location within a short walk of the railway station.
"A modern three bedroom, two bathroom semi-detached property situated within the development of Darwin Green, ideally located to the A14 and M11 road networks and within nearby reach to Cambridge North Station, Guided Busway and Business Parks"
"A spacious and modern semi-detached family home within the recently formed development of Darwin Green, Cambridge, CB3 on the well regarded Beagle Road. The accommodation boasts circa 832 square feet of bright and airy accommodation, with off-road parking for multiple cars to the front and an enc..."
"A spacious 1930's house with a generous south-east facing garden, enjoying a non-estate position close to the heart of Cherry Hinton and for sale with no onward chain."
"Vincent Shaw have pleasure in offering for sale this Victorian terraced home, situated on a sought-after residential road on the city side of Mill Road bridge and within walking distance of the centre and the railway station. The property has a charming feel, has many original features and viewin..."
A wonderful opportunity to own a modern and extremely versatile four bedroom mid terrace property located in the desirable south of Cambridge. The property is being sold with the advantage of no onward chain
An immaculately presented Grade II listed 2 bedroom house situated in the highly sought after Kite conservation area in central Cambridge.
"A 1930’s bay-fronted house with a wonderful kitchen/dining room extension, loft room and contemporary garden studio situated off Milton Road and conveniently placed for the Science Park and Cambridge North Station."
"
This attractive 3 bedroom semi detached property is new to market, offering an open plan kitchen and dining area and decorated to a high standard. Also a handy downstairs w/c, a kitchen with matching wall and base units, and a well kept conservatory for that extra reception space. Looking out ..."
"An extended and renovated house with a south-west facing garden and large driveway, a stone’s throw from the Outstanding Ofsted rated St Bede’s Inter-Church School and for sale with no chain."
"Located in the highly sought after Aura Development on the south side of the City Centre, this Three Bedroom Family House is available on a Shared Ownership basis."
"A contemporary three bedroom mid terrace property situated in a gated development close to a wealth of amenities and walking distance to the railway station, sold with the advantage of no onward chain"
Plot 256 - A brand new TWO BEDROOM TERRACED HOUSE ready to move in early 2023 in the growing community at Marleigh. Over 80% Sold
"A brand new 2 bedroom terraced house boasting 898 Sq Ft of living accommodation, set within a vibrant new community. With garden and parking space."
This two bedroom maisonette located in Central Cambridge spread across approx 932 sq ft and offers two double bedrooms and a private terrace.
"A 2 bed maisonette with off street parking located in CB1. Built by award winning developer Hill Residential, this brand new home also comes with a private terrace."
An immaculately presented Victorian mid terraced home having been completely refurbished by the current owners. This fine city home retains many character features alongside modern fittings and is offered for sale with no upward chain. An internal viewing is absolutely essential.
"REQUEST YOUR VIRTUAL TOUR! A stylish terraced house, well situated in the highly acclaimed Trumpington Meadows development, conveniently placed for access to the M11 and Addenbrooke’s Hospital/Biomedical Campus."
"Just launched - a brand new collection of 3 bedroom Shared Ownership houses in Cambridge. Register your interest to find out more! Full market value £532,500. Prices start from £159,750 for a 30% share. "
"A recently renovated three bedroom family home, set within ever popular Spinney School catchment and boasts a generous rear garden with single garage. No Forward Chain."
"Introducing to the market, a 3/4 bedroom home, available with no onward chain. The property features, an entrance hall, leading to a good sized reception room, currently being used as a bedroom, open plan lounge/ dining area, fitted kitchen and conservatory. Upstairs, there are three be..."
"An extended and well-presented three bedroom semi-detached house sold with no onward chain situated in this quiet, sought-after residential area just south of Cambridge city centre offering excellent access to Addenbrookes Hospital & Biomedical Campus, Cherry Hinton Hall Park, local amenities..."
A practical and spacious semi-detached home providing extensive and versatile accommodation within the catchment area for the Spinney primary School and easy reach of the high street and Cambridge city centre.
"An extended and very well-proportioned three bedroom semi-detached family home situated on the edge of the sought-after village of Girton, offering excellent access to village amenities plus transport links into Cambridge via-Huntingdon Road."
"An immaculately presented three-bedroom semi-detached family home offering two bathrooms, ample parking and a summerhouse equipped with power, set in a quiet neighbourhood in CB1 just moments from Cherry Hinton high street, schooling and amenities"
"A light and airy, four bedroom semi detached property offering a practically designed family home set over three floors. The property forms part of the desirable Orchard Park development ideally located to the A14, Science Park, and sold with the benefit of no onward chain"
"A well presented and improved, two bedroom first floor flat with spacious accommodation throughout. Located within this established development in the heart of Newnham, with communal grounds and a single garage."
A beautifully refurbished three bedroom semi-detached home located within in the heart of Trumpington putting you in easy reach of all the local amenities and access to Addenbrooke’s. The home also offers further potential to extend (STP) due to a generous side access. The home i...
Presented with no onward chain is this Four bedroom property occupying approximately 1230 sq ft of accommodation across three floors in the popular Orchard Park development of North Cambridge.
"A very well-presented, three-bedroom, mid-terraced home located on Union Lane. The property offers great transport links, being situated just 2 miles from Cambridge North rail station and equidistant to the city centre. The brick-built home has great character, with a gravelled front driveway as ..."
Delightful and characterful two bedroom flat with communal gardens and parking situated in one of the City’s prime residential areas. The property is offered with no onward chain. 
A charming two/three bedroom mid-terraced Victorian residence enjoying a near central city location central.
"A superb two bedroom duplex apartment, completed to a high specification offering spacious and bright accommodation with a south facing balcony to the rear and secure off street parking. No chain."
"A semi-detached two/three bedroom house, in a central location just off Newmarket Road. Comprising open-plan kitchen/living room, bedroom 3/study, cloakroom, two double bedrooms with en-suite to master and family bathroom. Allocated parking for two cars."
"A sophisticated and immaculately presented two bedroom first floor apartment with a wraparound balcony and secure underground parking, located south of Cambridge with excellent links to the M11, Addenbrookes hospital and mainline railway station"
READY TO MOVE INTO! A 2 bed first floor apartment located on the first floor with private balcony built by award winning developer Hill Residential.
A well represented 2 bedroom apartment in this prime central city location.
PLOT E21 - TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT READY TO MOVE INTO NOW IN THE HEART OF CAMBRIDGE
"Buy with a 5% deposit with Deposit Unlock - Plot D16 is a two bedroom second floor city apartment, ready to move in Spring 2023, in the heart of central Cambridge"
"Three-bedroom detached family home with a garage, carport and off-road parking, ideally located to Addenbrookes Hospital, ARM and within the school catchment to Spinney School rated ‘outstanding’ by Ofsted. The property further benefits from sale with no onward chain"
"A well-presented three bedroom semi-detached home situated in the favoured King's Hedges location offering excellent access to local amenities, the Science & Business Parks, Cambridge North station, and the city centre."
"A well presented, two bedroom first floor apartment with modern, spacious accommodation throughout, a large linear balcony enjoying a sunny aspect and allocated, secure parking. Offered with no chain."
"An attractive period home, offering spacious accommodation, on street parking and garden, located just off Mill Road nearby an ambiance of local amenities, the train station and the city centre."
"Three bedroom end of terrace property set over three floors with off-road parking, a spacious L-shaped garden and a large summerhouse equipped with power, situated north of Cambridge within close proximity to the Business and Science Parks, North Station and the city centre"
"Contemporary two double bedroom apartment with two bathrooms and private balcony situated within this highly regarded Magna development, standing in a most convenient south city location. Available to investors only."
"In arguably one of the most pleasant locations in the City over looking meadowland and the River Cam, just under two miles from the City centre, with Cambridge North railway station one and a half miles away. The property features a balcony taking in the peace and quiet the location brings, with ..."
"A rather unique Victorian home with a 67ft garden and a useful outbuilding with power and lighting, enjoying an enviable position in Petersfield, a short walk from Cambridge Station."
"An immaculately presented three bedroom detached home in a condition ready to move in, benefiting from off-road parking and a garage equipped with power and lighting, offered for sale with the advantage of no onward chain"
"A smartly presented and spacious two bedroom apartment, occupying a prominent position on the 3rd floor of this high specification development."
"A spacious and well-presented, three-bedroom, semi-detached property is a perfect family home, situated conveniently close to the Science Park, North Train Station, and City Centre. Upon entering the property, you are welcomed into a bright and inviting hallway leading to two well-proportioned re..."
A fourth floor 2 bedroom apartment within 790 sqft of living accommodation located within The Walnut Tree Building at Timber Works. Built by award winning developers Hill Residential.
"Buy with a 5% deposit* - Plot D34 is a two bedroom fourth floor city apartment, ready to move in Spring 2023, in the heart of Cambridge"
A light and airy 3 bedroom townhouse enjoying a convenient and popular location just off Milton Road
"A well presented first floor apartment offering spacious accommodation throughout with two generous double bedrooms, master with en-suite, Beautiful high ceilings, wrap around south/west facing balcony and under croft parking."
"A beautifully presented two-bedroom two-bathroom second floor apartment located a stone’s throw from Stourbridge Common, boasting tranquil views from the balcony which overlook the meadowlands and the River Cam. The property benefits from sale with the advantage of no onward chain"
"New to the market, a two bedroom, two bathroom modern apartment offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The property features, an entrance hall, leading to a light and spacious, open plan living space, with a modern fitted kitchen. There is a large, private balcony looking out onto greenery and trees...."
"A well-appointed three bedroom semi-detached house requiring some general improvement situated on Gilbert Road, a sought-after residential road offering convenient access to local amenities and into Cambridge city centre."
"A superbly presented two double bedroom duplex-apartment within the heart of the CB1 postcode, in the attractive and modern development of Flamsteed Close. The property would suit any investor, with tenants currently in situ and a good rental income being achieved. Offering 784 square feet of bri..."
"A Victorian terraced home in a quiet residential cul-de-sac in the heart of Romsey, just a short walk to all the independent shops and cafes of Mill Road. Accommodation includes 3 bedrooms, 2 reception rooms, kitchen/breakfast room and first floor shower room with the property benefiting from a d..."
A ground floor 2 bedroom apartment within 791 sqft of living accommodation located within The Walnut Tree Building at Timber Works. Built by award winning developers Hill Residential.
"A modern 3 bedroom family house with driveway and gardens, occupying a quiet cul-de-sac location in this popular modern development off Milton Road, close to the Science Park and Cambridge North Station. The property is sold with the advantage of no onward chain."
"Buy with a 5% deposit* - Plot D43 is a two bedroom fifth floor city apartment, ready to move in Spring 2023, in the heart of Cambridge"
An extended and significantly improved bay fronted terraced house in a well regarded location within easy reach of the city centre . The property is beautifully presented throughout and benefits from a large garden and driveway parking.
A three/four bedroom property with the added benefit of a recently built annex/studio in the Kings Hedges area of North Cambridge.
A two/three bedroom Victorian residence enjoying a particularly good position within this popular and near central city location
"A highly versatile, three-storey- townhouse situated within the Orchard Park development on the northern side of Cambridge with excellent access to the Cambridge North Station, Science Park and A14. The properties accommodation comprises five bedrooms with two having an en-suite, a large L shaped..."
"A three-bedroom, semi-detached house, located in a quiet cul-de-sac on the south-east side of the city. The property is just a short walk from Cherry Hinton High Street, making it an ideal location for those who want to be close to amenities. This home has been improved by the current owners and ..."
"A delightful, modernised semi-detached Victorian cottage, offering contemporary accommodation, situated just a short walk from Cambridge City Centre via the historic Jesus Green park"
"In central Cambridge is this smart first floor flat, part of a development with dedicated parking and a communal garden. Located close to the Common, River Cam and Jesus Green, it is the perfect place from which to walk or cycle to work. Immaculate within, it has one reception room, one bathroom ..."
"A 2 bedroom Victorian house providing nicely presented accommodation with a west facing garden, in the heart of Romsey Town within easy walking distance of the train station and city centre and Addenbrookes hospital biomedical campus."
"A fantastic modern maisonette arranged over two floors, offering open plan living, a spacious balcony and communal gardens, in this sought-after south city location."
"A 3 bedroom semi-detached property in a popular location and conveniently placed for access to the railway station, science parks and the city centre."
"A spacious two bedroom apartment situated within a short distance of the City Centre, mainline railway station and Addenbrooke’s Hospital."
"A substantial three-bedroom semi-detached home lying within the heart of the Chesterton Community College catchment, to the north of the Cambridge city centre. The property requires modernisation throughout, though offers superb potential and the opportunity to re-work and extend to the side, the..."
"An established 1930s two bedroom residence offering a well planned and a well presented accommodation in a sought after Romsey Town location close to all the facilities Mill Road has to offer and conveniently placed for access to the city centre, mainline train station and Addenbrookes hospital b..."
"An extended semi-detached house in a popular cul-de-sac close to the city centre and village amenities with three bedrooms, two reception rooms, large garden, garage and parking. Sold with the advantage of no upward chain."
"A large two bedroom duplex apartment located in central Cambridge, minutes away from Cambridge City Station with PARKING!"
"Hockeys are proud to present this beautifully upgraded three-bedroom terraced property located in the North of Cambridge. Ideal for families or as an investment opportunity, this property offers convenient access to the city centre,"
"A modern, well presented, two bedroom house off Addenbrooke’s Road providing great links to the south side of the city, Addenbrooke's and the A10/M11."
"Offered with the benefit of no onward chain, a three bedroom semi-detached house with a single garage, located on Brownlow Road. The property features, an entrance porch, leading to a large L-shaped open plan lounge/diner, and a fitted kitchen with access to the garden. Upstairs, there ..."
PLOT E03 - TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT READY TO MOVE INTO NOW IN THE HEART OF CAMBRIDGE
Built by award winning developer Hill Residential is this 2 bed ground floor apartment which is ready to move into !
A third floor 2 bedroom apartment within 774 sqft of living accommodation located within The Walnut Tree Building at Timber Works. Built by award winning developers Hill Residential.
"A two bedroom mid terrace property ideally located to the major retail parks, an excellent range of amenities and the city centre. The property is being sold with the advantage of no onward chain"
"A newly refurbished bay-fronted house, offering gardens and driveway parking in this highly sought-after central location. Available with no onward chain."
"A large, light, top floor apartment, in what must be one of the best locations on the Trumpington Meadows development, with a lovely outlook from the main rooms to historic the Anstey Hall and the Parish Church. Offered with no chain."
"A stylish and modern, 2 bedroom apartment, situated in a popular and sought after development, conveniently placed for easy access to Addenbrooke’s Hospital/ Biomedical Campus and Cambridge city centre."
"A third floor modern two bedroom apartment, located in the popular development of Glenalmond Avenue. The property comprises of entrance hallway with two large storage cupboards. There is a large double bedroom with built in storage space, a second double bedroom and a family bathroom with a showe..."
"Buy with a 5% deposit with Deposit Unlock - Plot D13 is a two bedroom first floor city apartment, ready to move in Spring 2023, in the heart of central Cambridge"
"A superbly renovated and much improved turn of the century semi detached home, set in the heart of Cherry Hinton, close to numerous shops and amenities. With off-road parking to the rear."
"A bright late Victorian house with a private south-facing rear garden, situated on a no-through-road in the ever popular Petersfield wards and for sale with no chain."
"A two bedroom bay-fronted end of terrace house with a second-floor loft room and enclosed rear garden, located off Mill road and only a short walk to Cambridge Railway Station and excellent facilities."
"This property has been completely refurbished to a very high standard, this spacious, bright and modern home has the added benefit of a superb garden office/studio. As soon as you walk in you get a real sense of the quality of the accommodation and the space. From the hall, with wood flooring t..."
"A stylish & well presented unfurnished two bedroom apartment, situated on the 1st floor of a modern development in Trumpington and benefiting from high-spec fixtures and fittings, a stylish and well-equipped kitchen, a good sized private balcony, video entry system, and off street parking."
"*Best and Final Offers by 13:00, Tuesday 21st March* A three-bedroom, end of terrace situated within a popular cul-de-sac of homes close to excellent schooling and is situated on a corner plot just over 3.5 miles to Cambridge North Station and the Science Park making it a perfect property for ..."
"A stylish and contemporary fourth floor, one bedroom apartment, located in the coveted Newnham area on the west side of the city of Cambridge."
"A modern and beautifully presented two bedroom detached bungalow. The property features an entrance hall, leading to a large, open plan living space, with a modern fitted kitchen and bi-fold doors opening to a low maintenance courtyard garden. There are two bedrooms, both of which are double..."
"This spacious and very well proportioned three bedroom house is located in the popular suburb of Cherry Hinton and gives easy access to local amenities, Cambridge City Centre, as well as the A14 & M11 commuter routes, and is being sold with no ongoing chain. "
"Placed within an ideal location, close to a variety of amenities, the popular Leisure park development, complete with an IMAX cinema, bowling alley, a variety of restaurants and just a five-minute walk to the central Cambridge station, offering a commuting time to central London in under an hour,..."
"A recently refurbished bay-fronted house, offering gardens and driveway parking in this highly sought-after central location. Available with no onward chain."
"*AVAILABLE WITH DEPOSIT UNLOCK* Stunning apartment with UNDERFLOOR HEATING, Fully fitted KITCHEN with INTEGRATED appliances, SECURE basement PARKING, Industrial style TRIPLE GLAZING, High ceiling heights, Private TERRACE, COMMUNAL CO-WORKING SPACES to building. READY TO MOVE INTO MAY 2023"
"A bright and well-presented 2-bedroom mid-terrace house with the benefit of a garage, off-street parking space and south-facing rear garden, located just north of the river, in Old Chesterton."
A spacious second floor apartment within the Highsett development overlooking 'parkland' gardens close to the centre of Cambridge.
A well proportioned 3 bed semi-detached house situated close to the village centre amenities which would benefit from cosmetic updating throughout. Sold with no upward chain and offering significant scope to extend and improve.
"A well-presented ground floor apartment located within Pym Court, Cambridge and benefitting from two bathrooms and its own garden. This ground floor apartment is located on the fringes of the City Centre off Cromwell Road in Cambridge. The property comprises of a divide between the co..."
"We are proud to offer this Two Bedroom Ground Floor Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. **GUIDE PRICE - £415,000 - £430,000**"
"A modern two bedroom two bathroom ground floor apartment set in the up and coming development Darwin Green located off from Huntington Road, benefiting from allocated parking, an outdoor terrace and close proximity to the A14/M11 road network"
"Three bedroom mid terrace property situated in Cherry Hinton, conveniently located to Addenbrooke's Hospital and the city centre, with the ARM and local amenities available within walking distance. The property is offered for sale with the advantage of no onward chain"
"We are pleased to offer this well-presented 2 Bedroom ground floor apartment on a popular side of the city, within walking distance to Addenbrookes Hospital and a 10 minute drive to the train station. Comprising of 2 Double Bedrooms, with an Ensuite, fully fitted kitchen and views over the gre..."
A sixth floor 1 bedroom apartment within 570sqft of living accommodation located within The Walnut Tree Building at Timber Works. Built by award winning developers Hill Residential.
"A rare opportunity to acquire a modern 2 bedroom semi-detached family home, providing beautifully proportioned living accommodation, situated in a popular north city location. Built at the end of 2015 (still under NHBC warranty) 2 double bedrooms, 2 bathrooms (recently renovated), a livin..."
Spacious 2 bedroom first floor apartment situated within walking distance of the Grafton Centre & Anglian Ruskin University.
"A light and spacious top floor, one bedroom apartment with views over the River Cam, just a short walk into the City Centre along the River Cam."
"A much improved and beautifully presented home with a private south-west facing garden, tucked away in a traffic-free location, a short walk from Cambridge North Station."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain, this semi-detached home is located within a generous sized corner plot. Originally a three bedroom semi-detached home, the current owner converted the third bedroom to create two bathrooms/shower suites to the first floor. The ground floor compri..."
"This two-bedroom, Victorian end-of-terrace house offers good potential for updates and development (subject to the required consent) and is currently being sold with no onward chain. It is located off Newmarket Road and provides convenient access to the City Centre. The house is a blank canvas fo..."
"A well-presented three bedroom family home allowing easy and convenient access to City Centre, with local schooling, amenities and convenient transport links to A14, M11 and A11"
"A spacious modern apartment situated on the second floor of this purpose built block on the highly sought after ""Vie"" development. This beautifully presented home benefits from a refitted kitchen and bathroom. Offering easy access to the river, city centre and both Cambridge train stations along ..."
"Tucked away near the end of a cul-de-sac, is this smartly presented, two bedroom semi-detached bungalow with a detached garage, off road parking and no onward chain."
"Just launched - a brand new collection of 3 bedroom Shared Ownership houses in Cambridge. Register your interest to find out more! £399,375 for a 75% share. Full market value £532,500. "
"Radcliffe & Rust Estate Agents Cambridge are delighted to offer to let this attractive three-bedroom terrace property in the popular Arbury area of Cambridge City. Located directly between Milton Road and Histon Road, this property enjoys a fantastic position close to a wealth of amenities, inclu..."
A well presented and improved first floor apartment located within this favourable development designed by architect Peter Boston in the late 1960s. The property offers bright and spacious accommodation throughout overlooking the beautiful communal gardens and benefits from a single garage. No chain
An extended mid terraced property enjoying a convenient and popular location to the north of the city.
"Three bedroom terraced family home situated in the CB4 region of Cambridge, conveniently placed for access to the city centre and a short cycle ride to North Railway Station and both Science and Business Parks"
Available to purchase with no onward chain is this delightful top floor apartment located within the highly regarded development of Trumpington Meadows; Situated within a short cycle of the Historic City of Cambridge. Measuring 75m2 this large two-bedroom apartment is perfect for first...
"A well-presented, modernised Victorian build with two bedrooms, located on Newmarket Road just 1.5 miles from central Cambridge and 1.3 miles to Cambridge rail station. The property is a mid-terraced home that has been lovingly cared for by the current owners. Totalling approximately 68.2 square ..."
Sixth floor apartment with a private WINTER GARDEN and set around a central green open space
"A well presented, modern two bedroom top floor apartment offering spacious accommodation throughout. Enjoying far reaching southerly views with a sunny balcony. Allocated parking. No chain."
"We are proud to present this Two Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £380,000 - £410,000*"
"A beautiful apartment with INDUSTRIAL style floor-to-ceiling windows, private balcony, underfloor heating and contemporary bathrooms with MATT black sanitary ware."
"An immaculately presented, modern two-bedroom apartment with a south facing patio, located within minutes of Trumpington Meadows country park whilst providing great links to the south side of the city, Addenbrooke's and the A10/M11."
"Welcome to this stunning ground floor apartment, located in the heart of central Cambridge. This beautiful two-double bedroom apartment is a superb example of a Victorian terraced house conversion that has been extended to the rear, providing additional living space. Positioned conveniently close..."
A modern and very well presented two bedroom apartment occupying an enviable upper floor position in this conveniently located development close to the city centre and the railway station. With parking and lift access. Ideal investment.
"COMPLETION EST MID JANUARY 2023! Do not miss one of these two brand new, 1 bedroom, semi detached & freehold properties located on Garden Walk! "
A ground floor 1 bedroom apartment within 570sqft of living accommodation located within The Walnut Tree Building at Timber Works. Built by award winning developers Hill Residential.
"If you are looking for a home, set in a great location with stunning views out to parkland. This property offers spacious living, a modern kitchen and bathrooms, a sunny courtyard garden, and a large garage."
"*Sold by Modern Auction (T&Cs apply) *Subject to Undisclosed Reserve Price *Buyer Fees Apply New to the market, a two bedroom, two bathroom top floor apartment within a stone’s throw from Cambridge's mainline train station. The property features, an entrance ha..."
"SHOW HOME FOR SALE** Stunning GROUND FLOOR suite at Rubicon, Eddington. Offering UNDERFLOOR HEATING, private TERRACE, basement PARKING SPACE & FLOORING included. Plus access to unique CO-WORKING SPACE. Expertly designed and fully furnished - Ready to move into now!"
"A bright two bedroom end terrace home situated on a quiet cul-de-sac in the popular neighbourhood of Cherry Hinton, with easy access to Addenbrookes and Cambridge city centre. The property has been well looked after by the current owners."
"A stunning and spacious ground floor apartment with a floorspace of approximately 71 square metres situated within a prestigious development to the south of the city centre, a short walk from the railway station and near to local shopping and leisure amenities. Living accommodation comprises: two..."
An individual light and spacious 2-bedroom top floor apartment within a striking contemporary building providing allocated parking and mature communal gardens located off Cherry Hinton High Street.
"A well presented first floor two bedroom apartment in the Kaleidoscope development, well situated for access to the city centre, mainline railway station and Addenbrooke's Hospital/Biomedical Campus."
"An exciting opportunity to acquire this well-appointed 2-bedroom apartment, situated just moments from the River Cam and within easy reach of nearby amenities and Cambridge city centre. "
"Sought-after EDDINGTON location, SUITE offering UNDERFLOOR HEATING, fully fitted KITCHEN, TRIPLE GLAZING, SUSTAINABLE features, private BALCONY, secure underground PARKING, access to CO-WORKING SPACE. VIEW OUR SHOW HOME TODAY!"
"A spacious three bedroom family home, located within close proximity to Cherry Hinton High Street and is offered with No Forward Chain - Benefits also include a private enclosed rear garden, generous bedrooms and off road parking."
"A three bedroom end of terrace house, offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The property features an entrance hall, leading to a good sized lounge, a fitted kitchen/diner and downstairs WC. Upstairs, you will find three good sized bedrooms, two of which are doubles, and a family bathroom with a..."
"** CENTRALLY LOCATED ** 1 Bedroom Apartment, in Hills Road, Neutral Decor Throughout, 5mins Walk to Train Station and City Centre. Double Glazing and Gas Central Heating"
"**NO CHAIN** Ready to move into yet with the potential to make your own, this two double bedroom, terraced home situated within the northern part of Cambridge only 1.5 miles from Cambridge North Station and the Science Park. Crathern Way is located between Campkin Road and Northfield Avenue w..."
"A bright and well cared for share of freehold apartment with a garage, surrounded by well-tended communal gardens and offering views over Trinity Hall Sports Ground, for sale with no chain."
"A superb opportunity to purchase this centrally located split level maisonette located moments from Parkers Piece and the Grafton Centre. Accommodation includes entrance hallway, kitchen, lounge/diner, two bedrooms and shower room. Ideal as an investment property, for sale with no onward chain."
"A well-presented & modern one-double bedroom end of terrace home within the heart of the CB4 postcode, on Austin Court, adjacent to Arbury Road and on a private no through road development. The property is ideally suited to investors, with a tenant in situ until October 2023 and is being sold..."
"A well presented 1 bedroom, ground floor apartment, situated in this convenient south city location, providing easy access to Addenbrooke's Hospital/ Biomedical Campus and the city centre."
"*Best and Final Offers by 13:00, Thursday 16th March * A mid-terrace home that offers extended living accommodation throughout the ground floor with a spacious open plan living area to the rear and three bedrooms along with the family bathroom on the first floor. The property is well positioned ..."
"A ground floor apartment set in established grounds on the southern side of the city, convenient for access to Addenbrookes Hospital, the railway station and the city centre. The property is offered for sale with no upward chain and viewing is highly recommended. EPC Rating Band D."
"A modern and spacious one, double bedroom apartment, located within the Kite area of the Cambridge City centre. The property is ideally placed for amenities within the city centre, as well as the nearby Newmarket Road. There are also a number of highly regarded public houses nearby, with local re..."
"Offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN, a two double bedroom end of terrace house within easy reach of Cambridge North train station. The property features an entrance hall, leading to a good sized lounge and large kitchen diner with access to the garden. Upstairs, there are two large double bedr..."
"A beautifully appointed one-bedroom ground floor apartment within a close proximity of the historic Cambridge City Centre. The apartment boasts 484 square feet of modern, easy to maintain accommodation and comes with the benefit of street-side access, a secure courtyard garden and dedicated under..."
"PURCHASE WITH JUST A 5% DEPOSIT USING DEPOSIT UNLOCK** Stunning GROUND FLOOR suite at Rubicon, Eddington. Offering UNDERFLOOR HEATING, private TERRACE, basement PARKING SPACE & FLOORING included. Plus access to unique CO-WORKING SPACE. Ready to move into now!"
"Stunning first floor suite offering open living space and private terrace, located 1.9 miles from Cambridge City Centre."
"Final 2 bed apartments remaining in our current release. Register your interest to book an appointment today! Full market value £340,000. Prices start from £85,000 for a 25% share of a 2 bedroom apartment. "
"**Available to purchase using the DEPOSIT Unlock scheme** A stunning suite, ready to move into, finished to a high specification, with basement parking and electric car charging points. CALL TO VIEW TODAY!"
"This modern apartment within Rubicon is a stunning ground floor suite that is expertly designed, offering underfloor heating, triple glazed windows, floor to ceiling windows and BASEMENT PARKING."
"Stunning apartment with UNDERFLOOR HEATING, Fully fitted KITCHEN with INTEGRATED appliances, SECURE basement PARKING, Industrial style TRIPLE GLAZING, High ceiling heights, Private TERRACE, COMMUNAL CO-WORKING SPACES to building. READY TO MOVE INTO SPRING 2023."
"A top floor, two bedroom apartment with en-suite shower room and separate bathroom, and no onward chain."
"Tucker Gardner are delighted to present this immaculate three bedroom, first floor apartment located within Thornton Court, a highly regarded and sought after development situated off Huntingdon Road in Girton. Available CHAIN FREE, the flat is positioned within easy reach of all local amenities ..."
"A bright and immaculately presented, three bedroom, ground floor apartment with well proportioned living space and the benefit of a garage in a nearby block, located off Huntingdon Road, ideally placed for access to Cambridge City Centre and the M11/A14 road networks. The block was constructed in..."
** SHOW APARTMENT AVAILABLE TO VIEW BY APPOINTMENT **
"A 2 bedroom, ground floor maisonette with lots of unique and appealing features and a large private garden, together with the benefit of a share of the freehold. This lovely maisonette is located in a popular spot between Victoria Road and Gilbert Road. The accommodation is charming and ..."
"AVAILABLE AT £330,000 - Freehold two floor end of terrace house,TO SELL YOUR PROPERTY IN OUR NEXT AUCTION CALL US NOW"
"Charming two bedroom top floor apartment with pitched ceilings, exposed beams and brickwork throughout. The accommodation is accessed via a spiral staircase in the main lobby. Upon entry, the hallway provides a home for shoes and coats. The living area is a bright and airy space with two windows ..."
"Presented to the market is this bright and spacious, detached two double bedroom coach house in the popular Orchard Park development."
"Radcliffe & Rust Estate Agents Cambridge are delighted to offer for sale this modern and contemporary two bedroom apartment in Ferndale House, CB5. Located on the ground floor, the apartment sits within an attractive development of just eight units set away from the road with parking immediately..."
A stylish 1 bedroom terraced house with off road parking and a private garden located off Hartington Grove and around an 8 minute cycle to the Addenbrooke's Campus and Cambridge Train Station.
"This first floor duplex apartment offers modern accommodation in a convenient location, within a walking distance to local amenities and the nearby North Cambridge Academy. The ground floor of the property consists of a living/dining room and well-appointed kitchen. Upstai..."
"A superb spacious first floor apartment forming part of a Victorian conversion with planning consent, situated in a convenient location giving easy access to the city centre"
"Modern two bedroom top floor city apartment with beautifully appointed accommodation and two private balconies forming part of a small scheme located on Newmarket Road, within easy walking distance of the city centre and the train station. In addition to wall mounted electric radiators throughout..."
"A stylish apartment with beautifully presented accommodation, allocated parking, concierge service and residents' leisure complex, situated in a vibrant area of the city just a short walk from a mainline railway station and range of leisure facilities."
"
A spacious 2 bedroom apartment with 2 bathrooms in a convenient and popular location ideal for commuters. Cambridge North Station is only a few minutes away with a line into London Liverpool Street. Within 5 minutes walking distance to bus stop, shops and amenities. Offered with no onward chain. "
"A modern 2 bedroom terraced house with garden and parking for 2 cars. There is no chain and the house would be ideal for a first-time buyer or for investment. This staggered terrace house is in a quiet cul-de-sac. The accommodation includes a porch with a storage cupboard, an entrance ha..."
"Ideal for first time buyers or investors is this spacious two double bedroom duplex maisonette with its own terrace in need of modernisation located close to Shire Hall and within easy access of central Cambridge, with the added benefit of two parking permits."
"A well presented, top floor apartment forming part of this excellent development with accommodation exceeding 54sqm/581sqft with easy access to all local amenities and the Country Park."
"Light and airy, one bedroom apartment situated in a convenient spot, just a short distance from Cambridge city centre."
"Situated north of Cambridge in a quiet residential street, features a mid-terrace home with two double bedrooms and a well sized garden. The accommodation is conveniently placed for access to the city centre and a short cycle ride to North Railway Station and both Science and Business Parks"
"Fully renovated Share of Freehold Private parking Close to station Secure bike storage Positioned at the end of a quiet no through road, this first floor one bedroom flat boasts a private parking space and Share of Freehold. Having undergone major refurbishment by the current ow..."
** SHOW APARTMENT AVAILABLE TO VIEW. CALL TO MAKE AN APPOINTMENT **
"An immaculately presented, top floor apartment providing bright, open plan living within the heart of Trumpington, positioned within easy reach of Addenbrooke's and the city centre."
A well presented 3rd floor one bedroom apartment located in the popular Glenalmond Avenue development. Open plan kitchen/living area and balcony accessible from the living room. The entrance hall leads to a double bedroom with two large double wardrobes and a bathroom with bath and separate doubl...
A stylish first floor maisonette offering well presented accommodation forming part of this convenient near central development only a few minutes walk from the train station and a wide range of amenities on Mill Road. The property which benefits from off-street parking features refitted shower r...
"Radcliffe & Rust, estate agents Cambridge, are delighted to present to the market this fantastic ground floor flat located in Enniskillen Road, Cambridge, CB4. Situated close to Chesterton High Street, Enniskillen Road is approximately two and a half miles from the City Centre, well placed for a..."
"A spacious two-bedroom upper floor apartment occupying a superb location just to the south of the Historic Cambridge city centre, within the popular Cherry Hinton Village. Boasting bright and airy accommodation, this apartment could be perfect for any investor, with tenants currently in situ, tho..."
"A two-bedroom, first floor apartment that has been completely refurbished. Less than 15 minutes to Cambridge City Centre, Cambridge North Train Station and Cambridge Science Park."
"An end of terraced house sold with the benefit of no upward chain, situated on a sought-after residential road to the south of the city centre, conveniently positioned for access to the station and Addenbrookes Hospital. The property requires some modernisation and would make an ideal first time ..."
"Welcome to this bright and spacious one-bedroom first-floor apartment located in the heart of Cambridge. As you step inside, you will be greeted by an open-plan living area with a modern kitchen that offers plenty of space to entertain guests or simply relax after a busy day. The living area meas..."
"An excellent ground floor maisonette in a popular, convenient & pleasant location backing on to Ditton Meadows with the river beyond, comprising two bedrooms and providing spacious, well proportioned and well presented accommodation with the significant additional benefit of a private garden. "
A deceptively large 2 bedroom first floor maisonette with private rear garden and off road parking just a short walk away from Cambridge North Railway Station and Cambridge Science and Business Parks.
*Best and Final Offers by Tuesday 7th March* A fantastic first home or investment located in a quiet cul-de-sac of similar homes has been modernised by the current owner to create a stylish and comfortable living space. All of the rooms lead off the entrance hall with the sitting/dining room is ...
"A spacious and well presented two bed, two bath ground floor apartment on the Orchard Park development, giving quick & easy access to the A14, the Science Park & Cambridge city centre. This excellent property has modern décor & carpets and benefits from allocated off street parking."
"A stylish and well presented, 1 bedroom apartment, conveniently placed for access to Cambridge city centre, Mainline Railway Station and Addenbrooke’s Hospital/Biomedical Campus."
"A beautifully presented studio apartment located in the prestigious Lovell Lodge development to the north of the city. This property offers modern living located close to the train station, science park and A14. The property comprises of an entrance hall leading to an open plan living area with l..."
"A superb third floor studio apartment offering stylish, contemporary accommodation located in this well-served development on the edge of the city."
"A bright, immaculately presented apartment enjoying open plan living/dining room and a large balcony, conveniently positioned within easy reach of Addenbrooke's and the city centre."
"An extremely well presented top floor apartment, located within the ever popular Orchard Park development. Internal accommodation offers open plan living, modern bathroom and a private balcony bay. Further benefits include allocated parking with fantastic access links into Cambridge, A14 and M11."
"A modern ground floor apartment, located within easy reach of the city centre and the railway."
"A ground floor one bedroom apartment sitting comfortably in this established retirement development suitable for over 60s, offering use of a wide range of communal areas alongside resident management staff and Careline alarm service, all situated in this highly popular central location."
"A well present ground floor maisonette, nestled within a quiet cul de sac, close to amenities and Cherry Hinton Hall Park. This property is an ideal first time purchase or investment, with benefits to include residents communal parking and gardens."
A well proportioned two bedroom apartment with an en suite shower room to the main bedroom and parking to the rear
A ONE BEDROOM TOP FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT BENEFITING FROM OWN BALCONY OVERLOOKING FRONT OF THE DEVELOPMENT Epworth Court is in the centre of Cambridge. Across the road is a parade of local shops including Post office and a bus stop. Supermarket along with the Grafton Shopping centre is a sh...
"A beautifully presented first floor flat, with views to Midsummer Common and the River Cam, in this sought after and centrally located scheme adjacent to Christ's Pieces"
"An updated two-bedroom ground-floor apartment that enjoys pleasant views overlooking the established residential garden, conveniently located minutes from the riverside, Stourbridge Commons and a short cycle ride to the city centre"
"A recently redecorated two bedroom first floor apartment in an immaculate condition, benefiting from tranquil views overlooking the green and close proximity to Cambridge North Station, the Guided Busway and both Science and Business Parks, sold with the advantage of no onward chain"
Superb city apartment with parking included. READY TO MOVE INTO!
"Just launched - a brand new collection of 3 bedroom Shared Ownership houses in Cambridge. Register your interest to find out more! £266,250 for a 50% share. Full market value £532,500. "
"This modern, well presented, two-bedroom ground floor apartment, within the popular development of Orchard Park, on the outskirts of the city of Cambridge, places well as either a first-time buy or investment opportunity, within a stones throw of local amenities and transport links from the North..."
Ideal for first time buyers or investors is this well presented two double bedroom first floor flat in Orchard Park offered with no onward chain.
"A spacious well proportioned and very well presented 2 bed, 2 bath apartment in Orchard Park development, giving quick & easy access to the Cambridge Science & Business Park, the A14, the city centre and Cambridge North station. Benefits include gas central heating & a Juliette balcon..."
"A well-presented first floor flat located in a cul de sac position on the east side of Cambridge, within easy access of the city centre and the A14/M11. The property is offered for sale with the benefit of no onward chain."
"Second floor, two-bedroom apartment is located in a quiet and exclusive development just off Woodhead Drive in the North of Cambridge."
"This ground-floor apartment at St Matthew's Gardens is a modern purpose-built property extending over approximately 444 sq ft. The apartment is built in a Victorian style with light brick elevations and double-glazed windows, situated in a popular scheme of townhouses and apartments. Most of the ..."
"A superb investment or first-time purchasing opportunity to the North-East of the Cambridge City centre, in Meadowlands Road, CB5. This two-bedroom cluster house benefits from a wealth of natural light, as well as being sold with two incentives, one being the ownership of the freehold to this pro..."
"Final 2 bed apartments remaining in our current release. Register your interest to book an appointment today! £255,000 for a 75% share. Full market value £340,000. "
"A two bedroom, ground-floor apartment situated within a quiet cul-de-sac that provides easy access to the A14/M11 and backs onto field views. The property inside is spacious and bright with the main hub of the home being the open plan living room/diner that is positioned off the kitchen. In addit..."
** CALL BIDWELLS TO BOOK IN A VIEWING FOR THIS SUPERB APARTMENT **
"A one-bedroom, ground floor maisonette with off street parking and private garden set in a convenient location less than 2 miles from Addenbrooke's and the city centre."
"Lovely one-bedroom flat located on the highly desired Hills Road in Cambridge.   The Share of Freehold flat is based over two floors, with a private roof terrace offering far-stretching views across the CIty.   The location of the home offers superb ac..."
"A recently refurbished first-floor apartment, offering spacious accommodation, driveway parking and communal garden, located only a stones throw from the river Cam"
A particularly spacious ground floor one bedroom apartment available as a 75% or 100% share with the added advantage of a private enclosed garden and parking space.
"A superb one-bedroom apartment, ideal for investment, residing to the North-west of Cambridge City on Histon Road, CB4. The property currently benefits from a sitting tenant and is being sold with no upward chain. The accommodation comprises of an open living and dining area, kitchen, ..."
"The property is a STUDENTS ONLY let. The current tenant is paying £1,050 per calendar month plus bills, on an Assured Shorthold Tenancy contract that expires in June 2023. We present a modern one bed flat from an award-winning 2014 residential development. It is a rare investment opportunity i..."
** CALL TO ARRANGE A VIEWING TODAY ** Superb opportunity to purchase a 1 bedroom apartment inclusive of parking and finished to high standard.
"A deceptively spacious two bedroom retirement apartment, situated within the sought after Brooklyn Court development on Cherry Hinton Road, close to amenities and transport links. Further benefits include 24 hour emergency care, communal areas and is offered with no forward chain."
"Located in the highly sought after Aura Development on the south side of the City Centre, this Three Bedroom Family House is available on a 40% Shared Ownership basis."
A ground floor 2 Bedroom apartment for occupiers over the age of 55 situated in a secluded position at the rear of an attractive scheme close to local facilities.
"A TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT ACCESS TO OUTSIDE FROM LIVING ROOM. Alder Court is conveniently situated across the road from Post Office and hairdressers, bus stop is outside which provides easy bus access to shops and doctors. Alder Court was constructed by McCarthy &..."
"This stunning ground-floor one-bedroom apartment offers a bright and well-proportioned living space, making it an ideal choice for those seeking easy access to Cambridge North Railway Station, the City Centre, and Science Park. The apartment is accessed via a secure telephone entry system, ensuri..."
A well-presented and very well-proportioned two bedroom ground floor retirement property situated in this popular development in Cambridge.
"A superb investment or first-time purchasing opportunity to the North-East of the Cambridge City centre, in Meadowlands Road, CB5. This one-bedroom cluster house benefits from a wealth of natural light and lies within a prominent location close to key road-links on the M11 and A14. Up..."
"An opportunity for investors to acquire a contemporary self-contained studio apartment set in the exclusive development of Mallory House, designed as a purpose built space for students with ease of access to all University of Cambridge Colleges and a short walk to Anglia Ruskin University"
"A well-presented and well-maintained one bedroom first floor situated just off Wadloes Road, offering easy access to a great range of local amenities, the city centre and A14 road network"
This is your chance to purchase this luxury studio apartment boasting contemporary styling and interior design. This property is set within a superb development located close to the railway station (Station Road) and enjoying proximity to the city centre. It comprises a separate shower room and a...
"A superb opportunity to purchase this spacious one bedroom apartment located close to Cambridge Science Park with fantastic access links into Cambridge, A14 and M11. Ideal as an investment property, for sale with no onward chain."
"A very well proportioned, three double bedroom house with a first floor sitting room, sizable kitchen / dining room and a south-east facing garden. This property is available as a 35% share."
"A well presented and improved, two bedroom first floor apartment located within this popular development for over 60s off Cherry Hinton Road, with communal grounds and parking area. The block has recently had all the windows changed to Upvc double glazed units."
"An opportunity to acquire a well presented one double bedroom ground floor apartment forming part of the Haig Court retirement development for ages over 60, situated within the ever popular village of Chesterton"
"Three bedroom link-detached home on 35% Shared Ownership with opportunity to staircase to 100%, located south of Cambridge within the highly regarded Trumpington Meadows development with excellent transport links M11, A10 and a short walk to Addenbrookes Hospital"
"A well presented first floor apartment in a convenient North City location close to the A14, Science Park and Cambridge North Railway Station."
"Available Now: 2-bedroom first floor maisonette in Chesterton, Cambridge"
"Two bedroom two storey apartment with a balcony and allocated parking, sold on a 50% Shared Ownership scheme and with no onward chain. Conveniently located close to various local amenities, the river and the city centre"
"RM0398 We are delighted to introduce on the market this beautiful studio flat located in Cambridge. If you are looking for a very well-presented studio flat as a great investment opportunity or as your first home, then this is the property for you.
"
"An ideal opportunity for first time buyers or investors alike, located north of Cambridge and benefits from local amenities and convenient access to the North Station, Business Parks and A14 road network"
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY CASH BUYER ONLY. EXCLUSIVE AND WELL PRESENTED STUDENT ACCOMMODATION CURRENTLY LET FOR IN EXCESS OF £900 PCM. Delightfully presented studio apartment, situated in a quiet no through road, with a leafy outlook, cycle store and communal garden space.  I..."
"Final 2 bed apartments remaining in our current release. Register your interest to book an appointment today! £170,000 for a 50% share. Full market value £340,000. "
"Rarely available Ground floor studio apartment located within a short distance from Cambridge North train station and Science and Business Parks. Ideal as an investment purchase or for first time buyer. The property comprises of a lounge/bedroom, separate kitchen and good size bathro..."
A first floor one bedroom retirement apartment situated at the front of the block in a convenient and central Romsey Town location close to shops and amenities and sold with the advantage of no upward chain.
A well presented third floor studio flat overlooking attractive landscaped grounds in near central location close to the river.
"Burling Court is positioned off Cherry Hinton Road, a very popular residential area of Cambridge. Cherry Hinton Road takes you from the City/Hills Road turning to the village of Cherry Hinton. The road itself has an excellent array amenities, including nearby doctors & dental surgeries, convenien..."
"A well-presented one bedroom first floor apartment, ideally located to the city centre, Mill Road and the mainline train station. The property is being sold with the benefit of no onward chain"
"A two bedroom first floor retirement apartment situated in a popular development within a short walk to all the local facilities located on Cherry Hinton Road including Co-Op supermarket, doctors surgery and bus stop. The age restriction for occupiers is 55 years and over and sold with the advant..."
A fully modernised one bedroom retirement apartment with re-fitted kitchen and shower room quietly positioned overlooking delightful communal gardens in a convenient Romsey Town location close to shops and amenities.
A second floor one bedroom apartment located in CB4. The property is an ideal first time purchase for a buyer starting out on the property ladder
"Just launched - a brand new collection of 3 bedroom Shared Ownership houses in Cambridge. Register your interest to find out more! £159,750 for a 30% share. Full market value £532,500. "
A one bedroom top floor apartment with L shape living room and refitted kitchen and shower room in an attractive and well appointed residential scheme for the over 60s just over 1 mile north of the City Centre.
"A beautifully presented apartment set in a luxury retirement complex for which the vendors will pay the first 2 years of the service charge. Fantastic facilities include an indoor swimming pool, spa, cinema, and restaurant located to the western edge of the city."
"Available now! 2 bedroom apartment in Trumpington, Cambridge, available to purchase through the Shared Ownership scheme."
"A ground floor retirement apartment in this well regarded complex available to those over the age of 60. The property is well presented throughout with accommodation comprising entrance hallway, sitting/dining room, fitted kitchen, one double bedroom and recently re-fitted bathroom suite. The dev..."
A very well presented one bedroom ground floor apartment in this well regarded and near-central retirement development for the over 60's.
"A second floor spacious and well maintained retirement apartment forming part of a highly regarded scheme available to those over the age of 60. The property offers well planned accommodation comprising one generous bedroom, sitting/dining room, fitted kitchen and shower room. Benefiting from wel..."
"A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT PROPERTY ON THE FIRST FLOOR. THE PROPERTY HAS A SOUTH/WEST ASPECT WITH NO CHAIN Alder Court is conveniently situated across the road from Post Office and hairdressers, bus stop is outside which provides easy bus access to shops and doctors. Alder Court was construct..."
A bright and well presented one bedroom apartment in this popular and well located residential scheme for the over 60's.
Available Now! 2 bedroom apartment in Cambridge. Available to purchase through the Shared Ownership Scheme.
"A bright, immaculately presented apartment enjoying open plan living/dining room and a large balcony, conveniently positioned within easy reach of Addenbrooke's and the city centre. The flat is for sale as 45% shared ownership for £130,500. A monthly rental of around £389.24 is payable."
"Available Now! 1 bedroom fourth floor apartment in Trumpington, Cambridge.Available to purchase through the Shared Ownership Scheme"
"A simply stunning much improved, redecorated and refitted ground floor one bedroom retirement flat presented to exceptional standards just off Arbury Road, available with the distinct advantage of no upward sales chain."
***** SHARED OWNERSHIP AVAILABLE FROM 40% SHARE***** A well presented two Bedroom Ground Floor Apartment with allocated parking situated in the desirable location of Girton. 
"We are pleased to offer a 30% share on this well-presented 2 Bedroom ground floor apartment on a popular side of the city within walking distance to Addenbrookes Hospital and a 10 minute drive to the train station. Comprising of 2 Double Bedrooms, with an Ensuite, fully fitted kitchen and view..."
"A welcoming and well proportioned one bedroom first floor retirement property which forms part of the Havenfield development, offered for sale with the advantage of no onward chain"
"Beautifully refurbished and well-appointed over 60s apartment, available now, in sought after development close to local amenities and Cambridge city centre."
"AVAILABLE NOW - Two bedroom ground floor apartment at Trumpington Meadows, Cambs"
50% Shared Ownership. A bright and well maintained one bedroom flat with excellent transport links.
"A very well-presented one bedroom ground flat apartment, in this highly desirable location just off Addenbrookes Road, Trumpington. The property is offered for sale on a 35% shared ownership basis and offers an excellent opportunity to get a first step on the property ladder."
"A very well-presented two bedroom apartment with its own private balcony, in this highly desirable location just off Addenbrookes Road, Trumpington. The property is offered for sale on a 30% shared ownership basis and offers an excellent opportunity to get a first step on the property ladder."
A spacious over 60s apartment close to various amenities and located in the popular Havenfield development
A well presented one bedroom 2nd floor retirement apartment situated within this purpose built complex with excellent local facilities and easy access into the city.
"A larger than average one bedroom first floor corner apartment in a popular retirement scheme, conveniently located to the North side of the city with plentiful amenities nearby."
A purpose built first floor retirement flat in this convenient position with views over the communal gardens located near regular public transport links to the city centre and Addenbrookes - available for viewing with the distinct advantage of no upward chain. Note. This property must be sold. 
"A first floor flat in a highly regarded over 55's development with views over the communal gardens. Conveniently located to the south of the city, near regular public transport to the city centre and Addenbrookes. The property offers well-proportioned accommodation and is offered with no upward c..."
"One-bedroom first-floor retirement apartment in the popular Havenfield retirement development located north of Cambridge with plenty of local amenities, offered for sale with the advantage of no onward chain"
"Placed well within an ideal location and adjacent to the popular Hills Road and its’ many amenities, is this one double-bedroom apartment, within the development of Homerton House, complete with modern fittings throughout. The property is offered for sale as a 30% share, as part of a shared..."
"Final 2 bed apartments remaining in our current release. Register your interest to book an appointment today! £85,000 for a 25% share. Full market value £340,000."
"For Sale By Online Auction. Starting Bids £80,000. Terms and Conditions Apply. A ground floor one bedroom retirement apartment forming part of this popular scheme in the heart of Romsey town just a short walk from all the facilities Mill Road has to offer."
A ground floor one bedroom retirement apartment forming part of this popular scheme in the heart of Romsey town just a short walk from all the facilities Mill Road has to offer. Millcroft Court is a purpose built retirement complex of similar homes set within beautifully kept communal garden a...
"Parking space on Victoria Street, Cambridge For Sale by Public Auction on Offers starting at £20,000
*Guides are provided as an indication of each seller's minimum expectation. They are not necessarily figures which a property will sell for and may change at any time prior to the auction. E..."
"Designed exclusively for the over 60s, developed by McCarthy & Stone, Freeman House is a stunning example of luxurious living with all the comforts and security one could wish for. The development offers a selection of 1 and 2 bedroom Retirement Living Apartments with a dedicated House M..."
"A rare opportunity to buy the FREEHOLD of two blocks comprising a total of ELEVEN APARTMENTS. Close to Canterbury City and train station, the properties include NINE FULLY LET apartments offering a great yearly income and two privately owned apartments with leaseholds."
*COMING SOON* An outstanding 5 bedroom family house with triple detached garage and views over Kentish orchards to the rear.
"Bairstow Eves are delighted to offer for sale this exceptional new build five bedroom detached family home with triple detached garage and views over Kentish orchards to the rear. Currently under construction, this fantastic residence is due to be completed in 2023. The house off..."
"Steeped in history, this fascinating Grade ID listed detached house was transformed by the current owners in 2015. With a stylish, modern high end finish and incredible attention to detail, it truly is one of the most awe-inspiring and uniqueness family homes you will see."
"One of Canterbury’s finest and historically important Georgian houses, lovingly and sympathetically restored with integrity and style, and offering superb family accommodation"
"Description Orwell, is a substantial detached house which sits proud within just under an acre plot and is set back off the main road, the property we believe dates from 1936 and was named Orwell, after a famous Golden-haired colt race horse, who won the 2000 Guineas at Newmarket in 1932. "
"A substantial late Victorian family home in an elevated position within one mile of the City centre, from where it commands far-reaching views. ‘Hillmead’ occupies a generous plot totalling a little over half of an acre and was built circa 1900 by Walter Cozens, a prominent local builder who ..."
Located in the sought after Canterbury city centre this is a unique opportunity to purchase a home and additional investment opportunity all in one!
"A substantial detached Neo-Georgian style modern family home situated in one of Canterbury’s most sought-after locations, within a short walk of Canterbury West railway station and the city centre."
"Guide Price £1,000,000 - £1,100,000. Fantastic investment opportunity to own this 8 bedroom freehold rental property that includes The Longport Cafe. Prime central location with awe inspiring views of the Cathedral"
"Mann Countrywide are delighted to offer to the market this fantastically extended, five bedroom detached home in the sought-after village location of Blean. The property has been renovated throughout and has had a double storey extension as well as a loft conversion, creating ample living a..."
"A substantial detached house occupying a generous plot of approximately 0.35 of an acre, with a frontage to Puckle Lane of 111 ft (38.83m) and an overall depth of 181 ft (55.17m). ‘Augusten’ is ideally positioned moments from the City centre, which offers an excellent range of shopping..."
"Mill House is superbly located, being only a short distance to the High Street & King’s Mile with shopping, restaurants, cafes, Marlowe Theatre, Curzon Cinema, Beaney House of Art & Knowledge and a stone’s throw from the historic Cathedral. The property was built a..."
Virtual tour: A stylish Grade II Listed townhouse with good access to the river and city centre
"A charming four-bedroom detached property offering beautifully appointed accommodation, and includes a double garage and a sizable, south facing rear garden. The property has undergone a significant number of improvements by the current owner who has an eye for detail which is reflected in t (cont.)"
A fantastic residential development opportunity within walking distance of Canterbury's City Centre and University. The commercial property benefits from an issued consent to convert into 6 residential units under permitted development rights
"An exquisite Georgian residence in the desirable village of Harbledown, within walking distance to Canterbury West Station and the City Centre. Sold with no forward chain, this grade two listed townhouse exhibits stunning period features throughout and offers four generous double bedrooms. NO CHAIN."
Virtual tour: A beautiful Grade ll Listed property with wonderful riverside views close to Canterbury West station
"Ideally located for the shops, amenities and train station with high speed links to London, is this newly refurbished Grade II listed terraced house. Combining modern and period features it is a luxurious city centre home."
"Virtual tour - An elegant Grade II Listed Georgian townhouse, set in a prime position just moments from Canterbury city centre and Canterbury West station."
"** PRICE RANGE £800,000 - £900,000 **Step in to this wonderful 1920’s detached house, boasting spacious downstairs accommodation with generous extensions and a beautiful and private rear garden."
A very well presented 5 bedroom detached family home with bright and spacious rooms situated in the sought-after Puckle Lane just half a mile from the city centre. •5 Bedroom Detached Family Home •Bright & Spacious Accommodation •Well Presented Throughout •2 Bathrooms •...
Built in the late 1980's this attractive home would be perfect for families with its spacious accommodation throughout and driveway parking.
"The property is situated within a quiet location in the popular St Stephens area of Canterbury, this unique spacious five-bedroom detached house has been converted to give a very generous space for a growing/large family."
"Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this two double bedroom apartment which is situated on the first floor of this much sought after development, Abbots Lodge. The apartment offers deceptively spacious accommodation and is located in a convenient position, a short distance fr..."
A bright and spacious detached family home with four/five bedrooms situated in popular Nunnery Fields on the sought-after South side of the city offered for sale with NO CHAIN. The property has been tastefully decorated and greatly modernised in recent years to include all new bathrooms...
A beautifully presented four bedroom detached house set in the popular location of The Mount.
"This sumptuous and sizeable family home is ready to move straight into. New double-glazed windows throughout, a new boiler and central heating system, new flooring and a new bathroom with UFH, and solar electric, all contribute to a perfectly presented property with Cathedral views. The location ..."
"Guide Price £750,000 - £800,000. Virtual tour available - An elegant Grade II listed townhouse within Canterbury’s historic city wall, with flexible accommodation."
"*Guide price £750,000- £775,000* Mann Countrywide are delighted to present this immaculately presented, five double bedroom detached family home set in the very desirable and prestigious location of Harkness Drive. This home is situated on a corner plot and is pristine, having b..."
"* Guide Price £750,000 - £800,000 * Mann Estate Agents are delighted to bring to market this fantastic Executive family home to the market in a desirable Homersham location. Situated on a generous corner plot with a beautifully landscaped front and rear garden, ..."
"A four bedroom detached, executive home with spacious accommodation and cathedral views, making the perfect family home."
"This very generous six bedroom detached house is in a desirable location, close to Canterburys vibrant city centre, with an excellent choice of schools, local amenities, leisure facilities and transport links making it the perfect family home."
"Located on a gated development, this delightful modern terraced house was finished in 2019 to a high specification. Thoughfully designed to reflect the impressive location, with a rear terrace backing onto the grounds of the historic St Johns Hospital."
"Situated in an elegant residential street yet close to the town centre, this handsome Grade II listed Georgian townhouse is perfectly placed to enjoy all that Canterbury has to offer. Situated over four floors, this property has been strikingly renovated by the current owners and conveys a fresh,..."
"Five bedroom detached executive style home in Ealham Close, Canterbury.A very popular South Canterbury location a short distance to the city centre, two grammar schools and the hospital, this family home has so much to offer."
"Three-bedroom detached bungalow in Abbots Barton Walk, Canterbury.A substantial home occupying an impressive plot with ample off-street parking, garaging and just a short stroll into the city centre."
"A well-located detached family house having undergone rear extension and reconfiguration works to provide extensive and versatile accommodation. On the ground floor is impressive open-plan living accommodation featuring a large kitchen/breakfast room, with solidtimber worksurfaces, which adjoins ..."
"Mann Estate Agents are delighted to welcome this three double-bedroom detached bungalow for sale in the very desirable location of Abbots Barton Walk, Canterbury. Situated on a generous plot surrounded by a landscaped mature garden, this bungalow offers plenty of potential and versatile accommoda..."
"The Holden is a charming four bedroom home, ideal for growing families. Inside is designed very much for modern family living. A beautiful glazed bay leading to the garden makes the open-plan kitchen, family and dining areas exceptionally bright and airy. 
A separate utility also has access to th..."
"Guide Price £600,000 - £650,000. Fantastic 4 bed family home located in the highly desirable Harkness Drive. Spacious living/dining room & country style kitchen. 3 double bedrooms, 1 single plus family bathroom. Private rear garden. Detached garage & driveway parking. No onward chain."
"Spacious detached four bedroom home, built in the 1970's with driveway parking and a quiet cul-de-sac location."
"* Guide Price £600,000 - £650,000 * Mann Estate Agents are delighted to welcome this three double-bedroom detached bungalow for sale in the very desirable location of Cherry Avenue, Canterbury. Situated on a generous plot surrounded by a landscaped mature garden, this 1920'..."
Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this beautiful three bedroom detached property situated in Raymond Avenue.
"Four bedroom detached home in Kings Park, Canterbury.Tucked away in small leafy development close to the city centre and a short walk to the train station with high speed links to London, Kings Park is a highly desirable location."
"THIS FAMILY HOME PROVIDES PLENTY OF FLEXIBLE LIVING SPACE. The Avondale's generous open-plan kitchen has a dedicated dining area with an attractive bay window, and a SEPARATE UTILITY ROOM. A large TRIPLE-ASPECT LOUNGE leads to the garden via French doors and a separate study provides a quiet spac..."
A most impressive contemporary townhouse occupying a corner setting with a return frontage to Tannery Way South and Creine Mill Lane South. The property has undergone significant refurbishment works over recent years and is now beautifully presented with a high specification and exacting attentio...
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this rarely available detached home in a sought after, cul de sac location just off Old Dover Road."
‘Farmhouse Cottage` is an utterly charming grade two listed cottage with beautiful wrap-around gardens and off-road parking in desirable South Canterbury. Offered to the market with no forward chain.
"* Guide Price £575,000 - £625,000 * FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOME I DOUBLE GARAGE I PRETTY REAR GARDEN I THREE RECEPTION ROOMS I SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION IN SOUTH CANTERBURY Mann Estate Agents have the privilege to bring to the open market, the most attractive four bedroom ..."
"Offered to the market is this three bedroom, semi detached, family home set in a sought after location on the edge of Canterbury City. The property is set over four floors comprising open plan kitchen dining room with utility room, large lounge with bay window, family bathroom and en suite to master"
"GUIDE PRICE £575,000 - £625,000 FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOME I DOUBLE GARAGE I PRETTY REAR GARDEN I THREE RECEPTION ROOMS I SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION IN SOUTH CANTERBURY Bairstow Eves have the privilege to bring to the open market, the most attractive four bedroom det..."
Looking for your next family home? Look no further. This extended four-bedroom detached home in the popular location of Wincheap has plenty to offer and comes to the market for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN.
TWO VERSATILE STUDY ROOMS! The Bradgate is a beautifully presented three-bedroom home. Downstairs you can enjoy an open-plan kitchen/dining/family area with a large glass French doors letting in lots of natural lights and access to your garden. There is also a cosy lounge compete with a bay windo...
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS – YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £28,500, PLUS WE’LL INCLUDE FLOORING! The Bradgate is a beautifully presented three-bedroom home. Downstairs you can enjoy an open-plan kitchen/dining/family area with a la..."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this superb three bedroom, period Victorian home, with two reception rooms and spacious accommodation."
"A SUPERB, SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY LOCATED IN ROUGH COMMON HAS BECOME AVAILABLE TO VIEW! Your Move are proud to offer this spacious property which is a true family home coupled with a superb location that will attract a lot of interest! An internal viewing is simply essential! EPC Grade D. "
"Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this beautiful Three Bedroom Mid-Terrace Property, located in Harcourt Drive just off Whitstable Road."
"**IMMACULATE DETACHED HOUSE ** THREE BEDROOMS, THREE EN-SUITES ** GARAGE AND DRIVEWAY ** LARGE KITCHEN/DINER ** Bairstow eves are delighted to offer for sale this exquisite Art Deco-inspired three bedroom detached home at Saxon Fields. Built by Pentland Homes, who are renowned for buil..."
Substantial family home set in a sought after village location. The property offers flexible accommodation to the ground floor with spacious lounge area and further rooms that can double as dining room or bedrooms. Ample parking and generous rear garden. Offered to the market with no onward chain.
"Your Move are proud to offer this superb semi detached family home. Wonderfully presented throughout, this character home offers the space and modern flourishes buyers demand from their property. This will gain a lot of interest, do not miss your chance to view! EPC Grade D."
"Situated in a desirable location on the South side of Canterbury city centre, this handsome semi-detached Victorian property offers accommodation over four floors and is offered with no onward chain. On the ground floor is an attractive tiled hallway with decorative arching, stairs rising to the ..."
"This substantial, four bedroom, end of terrace home would make an ideal family home with flexible accommodation, off road parking for two cars, two bathrooms, beautifully presented gardens and within easy reach of local amenities and fast link to Lodon transport services."
"An Ideal family home with three bedrooms and off street parking and is located a short walk from schools, shops, and the city centre. This home offers plenty of scope for development with its large side and rear gardens"
Miles and Barr are delighted to present to the market this charming bay-fronted home dating back to the early 1900s.
A stunning rooftop purpose-built apartment set in the very heart of Canterbury City centre enjoying spectacular views of the Cathedral and over the City roofscape. The property provides spacious accommodation of impressive proportions and is attractively presented. There is a large dual aspect pr...
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN ***Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this great investment property, originally the property was a four bedroom detached however it has been converted into a six bedroom detached."
"A fantastic, large semi detached family home located in a popular Cul de Sac."
"This well presented, detached four bedroom bungalow is now available to the market. This spacious property can be viewed via Your Move for a new owner to love & enjoy. The current owner has enjoyed its size & position but now feels it is time to find a smaller property. Council tax band E"
Exquisite three bedroom semi detached house with driveway in a sought after cul-de-sac in South Canterbury. This home is finished to the highest standard and is not to be missed!
The Hollinwood is a traditional family home. Inside the home is designed very much for a modern family life. An attractive glazed bay leading to the garden creates a light atmosphere in the open-plan kitchen with flexible dining and family space. The kitchen also has an adjacent utility room. The...
Substantial three bedroom detached home with garage en bloc and driveway within 1 mile walk of Canterbury Cathedral!
"This handsome and generously proportioned period home sits along the cobbled streets of historic Canterbury inside the City Walls, and displays a wealth of characterful features. Timber beams, original fireplaces and an antique Victorian cast iron stove all give a nod to another era, but with com..."
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN **Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom semi detached bungalow with no onward chain, positioned at the top of a quiet road in Canterbury."
"Restorer’s Cottage, situated in a prime location within the city walls, is an attractive period home dating, we believe, around 1830, and having been updated and refurbished by the current owners, creating a charming characterful home. The property is arranged over three floors with an ope..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £495,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £750,000"
"Stunning detached bungalow situated in a very desirable village of Broad Oak, Canterbury is beautifully presented throughout with modern fitted kitchen and bathroom suite, great size rear garden and ample of driveway parking. This three bedroom detached bungalow is simply stunning, both inside a..."
"Superb, large family home or investment opportunity."
Picturesque double fronted period property totally refurbished and conveniently situated in the popular and vibrant St Dunstan's area of Canterbury.  
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this stunning three bedroom ground floor apartment, immaculately presented throughout with its own gated parking."
"A luxury two bedroom retirement apartment, exclusively for residents over 60 years of age and located in the exceptional Freeman House development. At over 950 sq ft, the property offers very spacious and light accommodation, all of which has a south-westerly aspect and spectacular views ove (cont.)"
A beautiful three bedroom home offering you open-plan living spaces. The ground floor comprises a kitchen/family/dining area with French doors leading to your garden and a separate lounge. On the first floor you’ll find two double bedrooms and a single with the main bedroom complete with a luxury...
CHAIN FREE! Situated on the banks of the river Stour this beautiful town house with ample room for your family to grow and with a short walk of the amenities you could need
"Location, Location, Location!  Situated within the city of Canterbury''s ancient walls with views of the River Stour, Cathedral and the Marlowe Theatre!  This beautiful home was built circa 2013, only 60 seconds walk into the town centre and offers high quality fixtur..."
*Stunning family home located in a popular cul de sac*
"** FLEXIBLE ACCOMMODATION ** INVESTMENT OR FAMILY HOME ** CURRENTLY LET AND HMO LICENCE IN PLACE ** Bairstow Eves are privileged to bring to the open market an exquisite semi-detached home built in 2006, set considerably back from the road and located in the highly sought after loc..."
"A charming 1930`s home with a detached garage and attractive gardens. Located on Canterbury`s desirable south side, the property is walking distance to both Langton grammar schools, Kent & Canterbury Hospital and the cricket ground."
*IMMACULATE CONDITION THROUGHOUT!*Miles and Barr are delighted to be offering to the market this well presented and unique three bedroom terrace family home located just a stones throw away from Canterbury City Centre and within walking distance to Canterbury West.
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer, for the first time ever to the market, this three bedroom detached bungalow in Hales Drive, Canterbury.A highly desirable spacious bungalow with lots of potential."
"An entrancing two bedroom Grade II Listed semi-detached house built around 1867 with private garden, parking and located in the sought after St. Dunstan’s, close to Canterbury West station and the City centre. There is no onward chain. This delightful home with tall ceilings and ..."
The Trusdale is a traditional double fronted 4 bedroom home perfect for families.
"A charming three bedroom terrace house with garage in a peaceful and sought-after location, close to the city centre and station "
"GUIDE PRICE £450,000 - £475,000 ** FLEXIBLE ACCOMMODATION ** INVESTMENT OR FAMILY HOME ** CURRENTLY LET AND HMO LICENCE IN PLACE ** Bairstow Eves are privileged to bring to the open market a substantial semi-detached home built in 2006, set considerably back from the ro..."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom cottage is situated within the heart of the city but set back from the high street, through a private gate, far enough to feel secluded from the thriving city centre."
Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this stylish four-bedroom townhouse set within the popular area of St Dunstan’s. Situated in the p...
"This quirky Grade II listed property with its distinctive facade, is situated in the heart of the city centre and just a short walk to both Canterbury East and West railway stations. The property has many period features and is lovely and light courtesy of having a dual aspect to the majorit (cont.)"
"**Let out to end of June with annual income of £32,250**Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the open market a substantial 5/6 bedroom semi detached home, measuring over 1500 square feet offered with no chain.Set back from the no through road, the property benefits from both a front garden an..."
"A superb Grade II listed town house providing deceptively spacious accommodation over three floors with a wealth of charm and character. The property includes an elegant sitting room to the front, attractively fitted kitchen and conservatory to the rear overlooking and opening on to the garden. ..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £450,000 - £475,000 *** Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this graceful and alluring Edwardian home built in 1905..."
Large town house on the popular Old Tannery Development with no onward chain.
"Refurbished to an excellent standard, this stunning three bedroom semi detached property has The River Stour at the end of the garden and is just a stones throw away from the hustle and bustle of the city- It is an absolute must see. Whether you are searching for that exciting first home or are ..."
A stunning contemporary two bedroom detached residence situated on an exclusive new development just outside of the Cathedral City of Canterbury. A striking exterior twinned with simple lines and minimalistic interior is the perfect combination for modern living. This particular plot (cont.)
"Mann Estate Agents are delighted to bring to market a spacious three bedroom detached house located on Salisbury Road, Canterbury. Situated on a generous corner plot, with a driveway to the front and rear plus space to apply for a double storey extension, making this an ideal family home. U..."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this three bedroom detached home in Salisbury Road, Canterbury.Occupying a spacious corner plot with ample off street parking with the correct permissions this home would be perfect to extend.The accommodation in brief consists of - entrance porch, open plan ..."
"The Huxford is a 4 bedroom home, ideal for growing families or professional couples"
**PERIOD TERRACE IN CENTRAL LOCATION **Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this wonderful property with versatile use.
"Situated in an attractive cul-de-sac location away from passing traffic yet with the convenience of a selection of retail amenities and countryside walks nearby, this thoughtfully extended and deceptively spacious four-bedroom home offers versatile and extensive accommodation. A good siz..."
"Substantial bungalow with off road parking and garage, minutes walk from the city centre and major shops."
"PRICE RANGE £425,000- £475,000**NO ONWARD CHAIN**Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this executive style living accommodation in the heart of Canterbury's thriving city centre is this three bedroom FURNISHED duplex apartment."
"This generously proportioned three bedroom detached bungalow is positioned in a quiet cul-de-sac on the outskirts of Canterbury City Centre benefiting from light and airy accommodation incorporating entrance hall leading to the kitchen, lounge, dining room with doors to the conservatory and three..."
"Situated in an ideal location just on the outskirts of Canterbury City Centre, this three double bedroom detached bungalow offers great potential for the new owner to put their own stamp on the property. As you enter the home you are greeted by a large entrance hall leading to the three double be..."
A large ground floor apartment set in a highly sought after gated development on the edge of Canterbury City centre close to the City's pedestrianised shopping areas and the main amenities. The property has attractively presented accommodation and includes a large triple-aspect sitting/dining roo...
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this three bedroom semi detached home in Merton Lane, Canterbury.A former police house occupying a really good plot, this home has lapsed planning permission to develop a ground floor extension which would provide annex style accommodation.The accommodation i..."
"Extended, four bedroom, semi detached house in the sought after location of Rough Common with a driveway for several cars!"
"Chain Free! This charming period semi detached cottage displays a wealth of character features, including exposed beams and timber windows. A wonderful blend of new and old, underlined by spacious open plan living with double doors opening to a secluded walled garden with driveway."
"Your Move are proud to offer this wonderful apartment located within the city walls of Canterbury. It's 'hidden' rooftop location is found within the Whitefriars location of Canterbury and is on the doorstep of Canterbury's many shops, restaurants and transport. A location and home to be proud of..."
Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this three/four bedroom terraced property on Station Road West in the busy City of Canterbury.
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this deceptively spacious three/ four bedroom end of terrace home, with a garage and sunny rear garden."
"* Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000 * Mann Estate Agents are delighted to welcome this three storey townhouse in the very desirable location of New Street St. Dunstans. This home has versatile accommodation and an abundance of character and charm. On the ground fl..."
"Set on the edge of Canterbury town, this plot of land is offered to the market as an ideal investment opportunity with pre planning advice development of 12 apartments. Access to the site is available via Warwick Road with the main site being located on Windmill Road."
A wonderful duplex apartment forming part of a prestigious gated development built by Rogate Homes in 2006. The apartments were designed to a very high specification and are situated in South Canterbury approximately half-a-mile from the city centre. The development benefits from beautifully (cont.)
**DETACHED TWO BEDROOM BUNGALOW**Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this two-bedroom detached bungalow in a secluded private drive with only two properties.
"A superb semi-detached home located in a peaceful cul-de-sac off New House Lane, an area surrounded by countryside and lovely scenery on the outskirts of Canterbury. Garage and driveway, beautiful private garden backing onto orchards. No forward chain."
"Miles & Barr are delighted to be offering this ""one of a kind"" three bedroom retirement apartment located in the desirable Deans Mill Court in central Canterbury and overlooking the River Stour."
Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this three bedroom end of terrace property on Hanover Place.
A FABULOUS OPPORTUNITY TO ACQUIRE ONE OF CANTERBURY'S FINEST APARTMENTS ...
"Abode Sales & Lettings are delighted to offer this attractive four bedroom home, which would make an ideal family home or investment property. The accommodation comprises of a bright hallway leading to a well proportioned living room with a large bay window letting in an abundance of (cont.)"
"Simply enchanting, this charming two bedroom property is found at the end of a tiny and almost hidden, gated pathway. Tucked away off the beaten track, yet lying in the heart of Canterbury, this charismatic home offers a private, quiet and secure retreat from the hustle and bustle of the City Cen..."
"A spacious modern four bedroom family home located in a popular development to the South of the city centre and within walking distance of local shops, schools and amenities. The property is offered with no onward chain and, whilst requiring some cosmetic improvement, has light and generousl (cont.)"
"A BRIGHT THREE BEDROOM HOME, The Archford has a stylish, OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN and dining area, with French doors opening out onto the rear garden - creating the option for even more living space in good weather.
A lobby separates the kitchen and the SPACIOUS LOUNGE, with stairs leading to the first ..."
"A bright two bedroom home, The Chilham has a stylish open-plan kitchen and dining area. French doors open out to the rear garden - creating the option for more living space in good weather. Upstairs you'll find the main bedroom comes complete with a stylish en suite. A single bedroom, study, and ..."
"*WELL PRESENTED MODERN HOME CLOSE TO THE CITY CENTRE* Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom, double fronted terrace house, with en- suite bathroom and walk in wardrobe to the master bedroom."
"This beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached home is located on the Homersham Development in Wincheap, which is situated within close proximity to the city centre and Canterbury East Train Station"
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this three/four bedroom Victorian end of terrace home in Pound Lane, Canterbury.A handsome property typical of the architecture of this area in the city, well maintained by the current owner, to the front decorative brickwork, the bay window and covered porch..."
"Spacious , Three Bedroom Property with Off Road Parking and Cathedral Views!"
"Chain Free! This charming mid terrace property set in one of the most popular locations in Canterbury offers so much to potential buyers. The city centre is a short walk away for anybody who is looking to enjoy all Canterbury has to offer, along with the added benefit of the high speed train bein..."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this beautiful presented three bedroom townhouse in the popular location of Realmwood Close, Canterbury.Situated just a short distance from the city centre and the local amenities the property is very well kept by the current owner."
Lovely Victorian house in a tucked away location with NO CHAIN
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN** Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom 1930's home located in a sought after residential location, close to University of Kent and the City Centre."
Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom terrace house with spacious living accommodation and a single garage.
ATTENTION INVESTORS! Spacious end terrace property within the city walls with tenants in situ and tenants sourced for the next academic year!
"A handsome Grade II listed period house in an enviable setting within the City walls. It is close to the picturesque River Stour and within easy walking distance of central Canterbury, the Cathedral Precincts, The Marlowe Theatre and Canterbury West railway station. The property enjoys well propo..."
"An excellent chain free home on a popular development located between the city of Canterbury and the coast. Spacious accommodation, driveway parking and a lovely rear garden, which rarely for a newer home isn't particularly overlooked."
"Guide price £375,000 - £400,000. Wonderful 3 bedroom family home with versatile accommodation, set over 3 floors situated on the south side of Canterbury close to schools, the city centre & the hospital. 3 double bedrooms, 2 receptions, 3 bathrooms, allocated parking & chain free."
"A striking detached contemporary two-bedroom spacious coach house mews with its own entrance, situated on an exclusive new development just outside of the Cathedral City of Canterbury. A smart exterior twinned with simple lines, excellent energy efficiency and minimalistic interior is the pe (cont.)"
"GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000 ** AMAZING VIEWS OVER HAMBROOK MARSHES** THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH GARAGE ** Bairstow Eves are delighted to be offering to the market this three bedroom semi-detached home with countryside and river views. Set with..."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom newly built home, with only one previous owner, this property provides modern living."
Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this two/three bedroom bungalow on St.
"Guide Price £375,000 to £425,000 Mann are delighted to bring to the open market this fantastic three-bedroom semi-detached family home in the sought after Rough Common Road, Canterbury. Upon entry you will find a welcoming entrance hallway, giving access to the k..."
NO CHAIN. Whether you are looking to put those exciting first steps on the property ladder or are search for a solid long term investment this four bedroom town house is a must see. At only 15 years old the property has been lovingly maintained and has a new kitchen and bathroom meaning you can ...
"Abode Sales & Lettings are delighted to offer this IDEAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY to the market, situated in one of the most desirable areas of the City, and a prime location for UKC students. Rushmead Close is in a quiet residential area just a short walk from St Dunstans, Canterbury (cont.)"
"A luxurious Penthouse apartment forming part of a prestigious development of 8 townhouses and 6 apartments, built in 2018 by highly respected local developers, Rogate. St Thomas Place is conveniently positioned within walking distance (0.5 miles) of the vibrant centre of this historic Cathedral C..."
Miles & Barr are delighted to be offering to the market this lovely four bedroom property on the edge of the city centre and within walking distance to Christ Church University and both train stations.
"Vacant , compact , 3 bedroom modern semi detached house tucked away from the main road , in a cul- de -sac just off Tudor Road in Wincheap . Local shops and industrial park close to hand with access to the City of Canterbury . Benefits from gas central heating and approx 3 year old double glaz..."
Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom period home located within Canterbury's city walls in the ever popular King Street.
** NO ONWARD CHAIN**Miles & Barr are delighted to be offering this lovely three bedroom detached family home located in Green Cloth Mews and within walking distance to the city centre and Canterbury Christ Church University.
"A delightful and beautifully presented two bedroom property, rarely available in this popular street. Ready to move straight into as it has been kept updated by the current owner and in a desirable location on the South edge of Canterbury City Centre."
** Close To City Centre ** Gated Rear Parking ** Stunning Family Home **Miles and Barr are delighted to be offering to the market this stunning two bedroom character terraced property providing spacious accommodation throughout and within walking distance to Canterbury City Centre.
"Penthouse Apartment | Generous Balcony With Rooftop Views | Sought After City Centre Location Mann Estate Agents are excited to offer this stunning and immaculately-presented, penthouse two double bedroom flat located in the heart of the historic Cathedral City of Canterbury. "
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN***Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this characterful, Grade II Listed Five Bedroom Semi Detached Property located in the popular area of Wincheap."
Charming end terrace cottage within walking distance of city centre with character features throughout and NO FORWARD CHAIN!
"ATTENTION INVESTORS - GENERATE INSTANT INCOME ON THIS TENANTED INVESTMENT PROPERTY! A fully licensed 6 bedroom property in a popular student neighbourhood in Canterbury, Kent. Enquire today."
Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this beautiful three/four bedroom Terraced property situated in Somner Close.
"A plot of land for sale, planning permission. Located in Broad Oak, Canterbury. Don't miss out call us today."
Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom semi detached family home with spacious accommodation and off street parking.
"* Guide Price £350,000 - £375,000 * Mann Estate Agents are privileged to bring to the open market a beautiful, two-bedroom Grade II Listed cottage over three floors, with an abundance of character features and situated within the city walls of the historic city of Canterbur..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £275,000 - £300,000 ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ***LARGE TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT WITH LOVELY VIEWS!*Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this large two bedroom apartment situated in a highly sought after South Canterbury location."
** PLEASE NOTE THE GARDEN HAS BEEN SPLIT AND ONLY OFFERED TO THE FIRST FENCE LINE **Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this four bedroom 1930's semi-detached home situated in the city of Canterbury and within close proximity to all local amenities and transport links.
"A stunning and immaculately-presented two double bedroom flat located in the heart of Canterbury City Centre, in a secure and private location and within walking distance to Canterbury West and East train stations and the City Centre."
"Chain Free! Situated just outside the City Centre, this excellent modern detached house offers light and spacious accommodation throughout, and plenty of parking to the front."
"Chain Free! Current layout is only suitable for investors wishing to purchase for use as a Home of Multiple Occupancy, subject to a Home of Multiple Occupancy licence being granted. The property boasts ample square footage and has potential to be converted back into a family home. The conservator..."
"Your Move are delighted to offer this detached home located in the heart of Canterbury. Requiring modernisation, this home is offered with no forward chain, an internal viewing is essential! EPC Grade D. Council tax band D."
"A beautifully presented, gated, purpose built two bedroom apartment situated on the banks of the river Stour in a tucked away position in the heart of Canterbury City centre. This first floor apartment offers an entrance hall, beautifully appointed kitchen with white quartz worktops, m..."
"A superb three bedroom family home, located in a sought-after cul-de-sac just five minutes' walk from Canterbury West railway station and within easy reach of St Dunstans, the city centre and highly regarded primary and secondary schools. The property has sensibly arranged, well-proportioned (cont.)"
"Abode are pleased to offer for sale this well maintained 3 double bedroom property in the sought after location of St Michaels Place. The property comprises of a newly fitted, modern kitchen, downstairs cloakroom and utility area, large living room with a sunny aspect looking onto the ga (cont.)"
"A highly specified two bedroom penthouse apartment, built by respected builders Rogate in 2006 and situated in a gated development within half a mile of the city centre. The property is beautifully designed and finished with spacious accommodation comprising a 20' living room, a circular stu (cont.)"
"Chain Free! This modern terraced house set across three floors, offers space for everyone with open plan living downstairs and generously sized bedrooms upstairs, one with en-suite. A private garden can be enjoyed at the rear, whilst a short walk will take you to the river Stour and scenic rivers..."
"**SOLD VIA MODERN METHOD – BUYERS FEE’S APPLY** Bairstow Eves are delighted to bring to the open market this fantastic four bedroom semi-detached family home with off road parking and lovely sized rear garden. On entry, through the spacious porch, you are greet..."
"Guide Price £325,000 - £350,000 Mann Estate Agents are delighted to welcome this three double-bedroom townhouse situated over three floors. On the ground floor there is a large lounge and separate dining room both with a superb feature fireplace. The galley-style kitc..."
"Believed to originally date back to the 14th and 15th Century, this centrally located Grade II listed property is probably one of the oldest cottages in Canterbury and retains many original features, giving an atmospheric charm.The property benefits from accommodation over three floors and has re..."
"Sold with no onward chain, this four bedroom end of terrace house is set in a very convenient location within easy walking distance of Canterbury town and East train station. The property has four bedrooms, two bathrooms, kitchen with utility room and rear garden along with its own garage"
"Are you looking for a family home with a large garden? If you are, look no further as Peepal Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this spacious three bedroom semi-detached property with large garden, open plan lounge/diner, and parking spaces at front."
"**NO CHAIN** GENEROUS GARDEN ** THREE BEDROOMS ** UPSTAIRS BATHROOM ** DOWNSTAIRS WC ** Good size three bedroom semi detached house in Devon Road. This property would make a fantastic family home. The accommodation comprises of; entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, ..."
"PRICE RANGE *** £325,000 - £350,000 *** Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this beautiful two bedroom executive apartment located..."
"Guide Price £325,000 - £350,000. 3 bedroom semi-detached chalet bungalow on a quiet residential area. Sold with tenants in situ until July 2023. Generous living/dining room & additional reception room. Garden, garage & driveway."
"Guide Price £325,000 - £350,000. Striking, modern 1st floor apartment with balcony & allocated parking within exclusive gated development. Located in prime position in the city centre with Canterbury West Station within easy distance.."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this three bedroom semi-detached home in Devon Road, Canterbury.A popular residential area just a short walk to the city centre with its wealth of amenities and fast train links into London ,this home occupies a good plot and has spacious rooms, plus is offer..."
"A very well presented six double bedroom detached licensed HMO, let until June 2024 and offered to the market with no onward chain. The rental figures being achieved are impressive at £2952pcm (inc. bills) for the 22-23 academic year and £3348pcm (inc. bills) for the 23-24 academic year. The (cont.)"
"***Investment Opportunity or Family Home *** Martin and Co are delighted to offer this fantastic mid terraced three double bedroom property to the market with tenants in Situ until June 2024, an annual rental income of approx £1,400pcm and Council Tax Band C.
The property benefits from thre..."
"Guide Price £325,000 - £350,000. A modern 3 bedroom 1st floor apartment close to the city centre with balcony & delightful river views. Open plan living room/kitchen, en-suite shower room to the main bedroom plus modern bathroom with shower over the bath & allocated parking for 1 car."
Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this beautifully presented two bedroom semi-detached bungalow on Sturry Road.
"A handsome three bedroom Grade II listed Georgian terrace house, offered to the market with no onward chain and located in a quiet residential street in St Dunstans within walking distance of the city centre and Canterbury West railway station. The property is currently let as an HMO to thre (cont.)"
**WATCH OUR NARRATED VIDEO TOUR** Kent Estate Agencies are proud to offer this beautifully presented executive two bedroom first floor flat to the market in Canterbury. The property has been owned from new by the current owners and has been maintained to a high standard offering you the oppo...
Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this end of terrace property situated in Edward Road.
"A fantastic three bedroom family home enjoying an elevated position in a quiet residential cul-de-sac within walking distance of the city centre, local shops and schools. The property is presented to an excellent standard throughout and the accommodation is well laid-out with large windows g (cont.)"
"No Chain, Garage and Off Road Parking!"
"If you are seeking a two bedroom house, that`s ready to move into and close to Canterbury Town Centre, then this is one to view immediately!"
Fantastic 2 bedroom apartment with views to the Cathedral and Marlow theatre.
"Your Move are proud to offer this wonderful retirement apartment located next to the Kent Cricket Ground. Well presented throughout, this terrific home needs to be viewed to appreciate the apartment and its sought after location. Do not miss your chance to view! EPC Grade B Council Tax band C ..."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this spacious and versatile town house located a stone`s throw from the city walls, a short walk to both Canterbury West and East train stations."
STUNNING 2 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME LOCATED IN THE POPULAR AREA OF WINCHEAP!
"A handsome three bedroom Edwardian semi-detached house, currently being used as a four bedroom HMO and offered to the market with no onward chain. The property is let until June 2023 so would make an ideal ongoing investment whilst also appealing to owner-occupiers. The accommodation is very (cont.)"
"IDEAL FUTURE FAMILY HOME or INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY offered to the market WITH TENANTS IN SITU. A very spacious and well presented FIVE BEDROOM, END OF TERRACE BUNGALOW located in an IDEAL POSITION close to both Kent and Christchurch Universities. Offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN!"
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS – YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £15,750, PLUS WE’LL INCLUDE FLOORING! An attractive first floor home with GARAGE below, The Stevenson provides flexible space for modern living. The spacious OPEN-PLAN loun..."
"This very well presented TWO BEDROOM mews style property is offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The home is ideally situated for local shopping and leisure facilities as well Canterbury West train station. The property enjoys open plan living, two double bedrooms and allocated parking."
"***Ideal First Time Buyer or Investment Opportunity**** This beautiful two double bedroom property is conveniently located inside of the City Walls and benefits from allocated parking, Double aspect Lounge/Diner, Fitted Kitchen and bathroom! The apartment has tenants in situ until July 2023, is ..."
"VERY STYLISH second floor apartment with ALLOCATED UNDERCOVER PARKING, located by the River Stour within the exclusive development of Kingsbrook Park. The property offers good space with TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS & an open plan lounge/diner/kitchen area with balcony."
Two bedroom mid terrace house in popular South Canterbury with no forward chain!
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this four bedroom home in South Street, Canterbury.Situated off of Sturry Road close to local shops and amenities plus just a short distance to the city centre this surprisingly spacious family home is being offered end of chain.The accommodation in brief con..."
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000 *** EXTENSIVE REAR GARDEN *** TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS *** TWO BATHROOMS *** WALKING DISTANCE TO THE CITY CENTRE *** DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS **** Bairstow Eves are privileged to bring to the market a superb two double bedroom, two bathroom..."
Four bedroom terraced house with no forward chain within walking distance of Canterbury City Centre!
"Bairstow Eves are privileged to bring to the open market a superb three bedroom, two bathroom end of terrace home offered with NO CHAIN. The property is nestled within a cul de sac in the popular area of Wincheap. The property is deceptively spacious and must be viewed to appreciate the acc..."
"This delightful cottage situated in the highly sought after village of Rough Common has two bedrooms with loft room, a spacious lounge and dining room. You are situated a moments walk from the iconic Blean Woods and nature reserve"
"FABULOUS TWO BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE WITH ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE, LOVELY GARDEN AND AN ADDITIONAL GARDEN THAT COULD BE PERFECT FOR A SIDE EXTENSION (subject to any required consents)
"
"** RIVER VIEWS ** BALCONY ** WELL PRESENTED ** PARKING ** Bairstow Eves are delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom, two bathroom apartment over looking the River Stour. This well appointed and contemporary riverside apartment is situated on an exclusive development within the city wa..."
"*** End of Chain ***Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this two bedroom split level apartment in New Dover Road, Canterbury.The entrance to the accommodation is via a communal lobby."
"Guide Price £300,000 For sale by public auctionunconditional online auction.
. Town & Country Property Auctions are delighted to offer for sale by public auction this Beautiful Town House in Love Lane, Canterbury, Kent, CT1 1TZ. The property has been well maintained by its current o..."
"Chain Free! Located in Canterbury's one of the most sought after locations. Just a stone's throw away from the lively city centre. For those wanting to put their own stamp on a new home, look no further as this is the perfect property, bursting with character and with bright and spacious accommod..."
"A very rare development opportunity in a semi-rural location with planning permission for the conversion of a traditional timber framed barn into a residential dwelling. The former farmyard is located to the north of the Village of Preston, approximately 3.0 miles from Wingham. Preston ..."
"*** PRICE RANGE £300,000 - £325,000 ***Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this three bedroom end of terrace Victorian home in Martyrs Field, Canterbury.A popular residential area with attractive period buildings just a short walk to the city centre with the wealth of amenities, pubs eateries a..."
"This ideal family home has three bedrooms, garage, sunny private garden, conservatory and off-street parking. The property is situated in a quiet cul-de-sac on the outskirts of the city centre"
Ideally located for city centre & nearby commuter links. Neutrally decorated throughout & ready for its next owner to move into
"NO CHAIN!Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this end of terrace two bedroom bungalow just off Harkness Drive, conveniently situated within walking distance to the town centre and bus routes."
"*** Price Range £300,000 - £325,0000 ***** POTENTIAL TO EXTEND SUBJECT TO PLANNING PERMISSION - GREAT SIZED GARDEN **Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this lovely two bedroom end of terrace home with high ceilings and exposed beams throughout, the property is full of character."
"**SHORT WALK TO CITY CENTRE**Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this large two bedroom apartment situated within the city walls and just a short two minute walk, to the main high street."
"Your Move are proud to offer this semi detached home, offered as an investment opportunity. Let through Your Move, Canterbury, the home is let for £1300pcm. This great buy offers a terrific space for tenants to enjoy and offers a location that will work for many. Call Your Move today! Counc..."
"Situated in an area now undergoing significant regeneration, this spacious end of terrace property was previously let to students but would now make an excellent home or perhaps continue as a functioning buy to let. No onward chain complications."
This superb home is less than a 10-minute walk from the West Station and Canterbury`s bustling high street. Garage and south-facing rear garden. No forward chain.
"No Chain, Close To Centre, Courtyard Garden"
"Connells are pleased to welcome to the market this chain free, five bedroom terraced home which is located within close proximity to the city centre and Canterbury east train station. This home boats versatile accommodation throughout and would therefore make an ideal family home or BTL investment!"
"A quirky two-bedroomed Grade II listed building, a stone's throw from the City Centre, Kent & Canterbury Hospital and excellent transport links for commuters and travellers, comes to market with a Guide Price of £290,000. This 3-storey living property has huge potential for a first-time buy..."
"Guide Price £290,000 - £310,000. Impressive first floor apartment within walking distance of the high street & Canterbury West train station. Stunning open plan living space, 2 double bedrooms & 2 bathrooms. Allocated parking & bike store."
This superb purpose built first floor flat is located just yards away from the St Lawrence Cricket Ground ***Share of Freehold***
"** NO CHAIN ** TWO RECEPTION ROOMS ** THREE BEDROOMS ** NICE SIZE GARDEN ** OPPORTUNITY TO PUT YOUR OWN STAMP ON THE PROPERTY ** Bairstow Eves are pleased to bring to the open market a three bedroom semi detached home in the desirable location of Heaton Road, Canterbury. **..."
This characterful property boasts ample square footage and living space all within a bright and airy environment owing to its double frontage with its large windows. Outside there is a low maintenance paved garden area for you to enjoy in private. An ideal first time buy or investment.
"* Guide Price £290,000 - £300,000 * Mann Canterbury are delighted to welcome to the market this chain-free, three bedroom 1930's end of terrace home, situated in a brilliant position of St Stephens, within walking distance of Canterbury City Centre, Kingsmead Leisure Centre..."
"Abode Sales & Lettings are delighted to present this immaculate two double bedroom townhouse in the popular Bingley Court Development, which would make an ideal City Centre home or investment property. The accommodation comprises of it's own entrance, leading to a spacious internal ha (cont.)"
"A charming grade two listed home in a prime Canterbury location, close to the West Station. The property is a stone`s throw from the bustling high street and stunning Westgate Gardens. Currently undergoing refurbishment and sold with no forward chain."
"A fantastically sized chain free, end of terrace property, located a short walk to the city centre. The property is a great first time buyer purchase to put their own stamp on! Boasting plenty of storage, a downstairs cloakroom and a garage!"
"This ground floor contemporary apartment offers ample living space with a large double fronted lounge, spacious hallway and double bedrooms. The stylish interior compliments the attractive building which was once one of Canterbury's famous River Stour mills."
A very attractive two bedroom house forming part of the conversion of an Edwardian warehouse and located in a central location within walking distance of the city centre and both Canterbury East and West stations. The property is offered to the market with no onward chain and has some lovely (cont.)
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this grade II listed home in Ivy Lane, Canterbury.This quaint cottage is set down a quiet lane just a few minutes walk from the city centre with its wealth of amenities and train station with high speed links back to London.The accommodation in ..."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom split level apartment, with two bathrooms and a homely feel."
"This characterful semi detached house has been vastly improved by the current owner creating a warm and welcoming home ready to move straight into. With polished timber floorboards, exposed brick work and sumptuous carpet upstairs, this inviting property will be popular."
"Close to Town, No Chain, Off Road Parking!"
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this three bedroom end end of terrace home in Reed Avenue, Canterbury.Extended and situated on a corner plot this family home has so much potential for development."
**NO CHAIN ** THREE BEDROOM ** CUL DE SAC LOCATION ** Bairstow Eves are delighted to offer this spacious three bedroom home in Cambridge Way. This spacious home offers comfortable accommodation in a quiet cul-de-sac setting on the edge of Canterbury. We highly r...
"* Guide Price £280,000 - £300,000* Mann Countrywide are excited to offer this stunning and immaculately-presented two double bedroom flat located in the heart of the historic Cathedral City of Canterbury with off road parking. This apartment has been decorated to a meticulou..."
"Guide Price £280,000. A 5 bedroom terraced house on the popular London Road development with easy access to the city centre. Currently let as a HMO with a possible rental income of £1820 PCM. No onward chain."
*** NO CHAIN ***Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom end of terraced property.
This two bedroom terraced house enjoys a lovely setting in a quiet side road off Westgate Court Avenue looking out onto a leafy green. 25 Runcie Place comprises of a separate entrance hall leading into an open plan lounge/diner and kitchen area. French doors from the living room overloo (cont.)
"*CHARMING COTTAGE IN CENTRAL CANTERBURY IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS* Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this fully refurbished two bedroom cottage situated in a sought after central Canterbury location, just a short walk to cafes, restaurants and retail therapy!!"
"Your Move in Canterbury would like to introduce you to this character, end of terraced home located in the heart of Canterbury. Currently let, this terrific home offers so many options to a buyer whether you are looking for a home or an investment. Call Your Move today for more information on thi..."
"NO ONWARD CHAINMiles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom terrace home, with driveway parking for two cars and no onward chain."
This substantial five bedroom mid terrace house is offered to the market with no onward chain and is now fully let for the 2022 to 2023 academic year. The property is ideally situated for both Kent and Christchurch Universities along with local amenities and superstores.
An impressive purpose-built apartment set in an attractive development close to Canterbury West train station and enjoying views over The King's School sports fields towards the City centre and Canterbury Cathedral. The property is attractively presented and provides very comfortable accommodatio...
A delightful two bedroom semi-detached bungalow with a wonderful garden backing on to the river Stour situated just a 10 minute walk from the City centre and Canterbury west railway station and is offered for sale with no forward chain. The front door opens to the entrance hall with do...
A Grade II listed spacious apartment with comprehensive and versatile accommodation arranged over two floors set close to the city centre. The property is well presented throughout with atmospheric period features. The property has a private front door leading up stairs to a part galleried dining...
"Sold with no onward chain, this three bedroom, semi detached home is set within a popular residential location within easy reach of Canterbury City. The property offers convenient access to amenities including schools and local newsagents. Also benefits driveway to the front and rear garden."
"This well presented, TWO BEDROOM mid terrace home is sold with a TENANT IN SITU making it an ideal investment opportunity. The property is ideally situated providing easy access to Canterbury City Centre and train stations and also benefits from a decent rear garden and off road parking to the rear."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £271,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £410,000"
Four bedroom bungalow offering a strong investment opportunity with tenants in situ!
"Abode Sales & Lettings are delighted to present this City Centre prime location 3 bed terraced townhouse full of potential, with no forward chain. This would be well suited to a family or as an investment and has previously been successfully let for £1200pcm and is currently tenanted (cont.)"
"GUIDE PRICE £270,000 - £290,000 ** NO CHAIN ** GARAGE ** HMO LICENCE ** This spacious house offers flexible accommodation and would be a suitable property for a first time buyer, family or as an HMO investment. The property consists of entrance hall..."
"Your Move are delighted to offer this terraced house currently let and arranged as three bedrooms. Please note the seller is placing this and number 13 (located next door) onto the market. If you an investor, a first time buyer or anyone looking for an affordable home, call to arrange your viewin..."
"Your Move are delighted to offer this terraced house currently let and arranged as four bedrooms. Please note the seller is placing this and number 14 (located next door) onto the market. If you an investor, a first time buyer or anyone looking for an affordable home, call to arrange your viewing..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £270,000 - £290,000** Bairstow Eves are pleased to bring to the market this semi-detached bungalow with off road parking, good sized enclosed garden and huge amount of potential. On entrance through the front door, you are met by a welcoming entranc..."
"£270,000 - £290,000 Bairstow Eves are pleased to bring to the open market this four bedroom terraced home in Tenterden Drive. Downstairs accommodation comprises of an entrance porch, a downstairs bedroom or study/additional reception room, a large open plan livi..."
"Guide Price £260,000 - £270,000. A spacious 3 bedroom end of terrace family home within close proximity of Canterbury West train station, the city centre & the university of Kent. Fantastic investment opportunity. No onward chain."
"Amazing Investment Opportunity - Three Double Bedroom City Centre Apartment Offering an impressive yield of 6.46% and tenanted until the end of August 2023, this ground floor apartment benefits from a modern fitted kitchen, brand new bathroom and open plan living. There are three dou (cont.)"
"Close to University, Three Bedrooms, No Chain!"
"***Fantastic Investment Opportunity*** Three Double Bedrooms Apartment which benefits from a modern fitted kitchen, open plan living accommodation, En suite to the master bedroom, large balcony and allocated parking. It is being sold with tenants in situ until July 2023. A fantastic investment ..."
"A semi detached family home with a long drive way, detached garage and large garden. Do not miss out, arrange your viewing today."
"This top floor apartment is located in the popular Bellflower Mews development, just off the New Dover Road and within half a mile of Canterbury city centre."
INVESTMENT BUYERS ONLY. Currently tenanted until 27/7/2024.
"The house sits on a large corner plot and has been renovated to a high standard with fresh neutral décor and newly laid carpet or wood effect flooring throughout. The property is tucked away at the end of a row of terraces, hidden by tall fences and shrubbery and is not overlooked. "
"Connells of Canterbury offer this FOUR BEDROOM mid terrace house. It is an ideal investment for student accommodation in a popular residential location. Close to the Universities in Canterbury and local amenities, the property also consists of a lounge, modern kitchen and family bathroom. NO CHAIN."
"Mann Estate Agents are delighted to bring this chain-free, well-presented, first-floor retirement flat, a stone's throw from Canterbury West Rail Station and walking distance from Canterbury City Centre. On entry, the hallway leads through to a spacious open plan lounge/dining room. There is..."
Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this mid terrace bungalow in Hales Place.
OPEN HOUSE SATURDAY 18TH MARCH 2023 - by appointment only. Chain Free! This semi detached house would make an ideal first time buy or family home. The property was previously rented out and the landlord has given the whole house a make over including new carpets throughout and complete re-decorat...
"This pretty Victorian end terraced cottage, over three floors with versatile accommodation. Situated just a short walk to plenty of shops, supermarkets, primary schools, the city centre and transport links such as Canterbury East Station"
"Buyers Fees apply - see brochure for details. A blank canvass ready to put your own mark on, this end of terrace property could make an ideal investment purchase or become a lovely family home with some TLC! Offered chain free, with gardens to the front and rear, plus an integral garage with driv..."
A fantastic two bedroom apartment within an exclusive purpose built complex.
** No Onward Chain ** Grade II Listed Building **Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this two bedroom first floor apartment on Marlowe Avenue situated in the busy city of Canterbury.
"Buyers Fees apply - see brochure for details. Chain Free! Block viewings by appointment Saturday 11th & 18th March. Semi detached home for refurbishment in a sought after part of the City close to the University of Kent, St Edmunds private school, Canterbury West train station and the historic Ci..."
"Chain Free! This unique first floor apartment offers versatile accommodation for individuals or a family. The current owner has installed an additional shower room, and small kitchenette area in the large reception room. A real money earner if rented or space for all the family."
"PUBLIC NOTICE – 184 PINE TREE AVENUE, CANTERBURY, CT2 7SZ - WE HAVE RECEIVED AN OFFER OF £250,000. ANY INTERESTED PARTIES MUST SUBMIT ANY HIGHER OFFERS IN WRITING TO THE SELLING AGENT BEFORE EXCHANGE OF CONTRACTS TAKE PLACE. - EPC RATING E ** CASH BUYERS ONLY ** CORNER PLO..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £248,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £375,000"
"This spacious self contained, two bedroom first floor apartment is an ideal investment opportunity sold with long term tenant in situ. The property comprises a lounge dining room, kitchen and bathroom. The property also enjoys a rear garden area and is set in a convenient location."
"Miles & Barr are delighted to be offering this well presented, modern, two bedroom apartment located within desirable South Canterbury and just a 10 minute walk from the city centre."
"* Guide Price £240,000 - £260,000 * Mann Estate Agents are delighted to bring to market a modern two bedroom, first-floor apartment for sale on the sought-after Stonebridge Road in Canterbury. The apartment benefits from a light and airy open-plan living area, which fe..."
"Close to Town, Garage and Off Road Parking, No Chain!"
"Fantastic Investment Property - Three Double Bedroom City Centre Apartment Offering an impressive yield of 7% and tenanted until the end of July 2023, this ground floor apartment currently achieves £1400 rental and benefits from a modern fitted kitchen, contemporary bathroom and open (cont.)"
Abode Sales & Lettings are delighted to present this stylish three double bedroom apartment in the popular St Andrews Close Development. Fantastic Investment Property - Three Double Bedroom City Centre Apartment Offering an impressive yield of 7% and tenanted until the end of J (cont.)
**FIVE MINUTE WALK TO HIGH STREET**Ground Floor | Allocated Parking | En-Suite To Master Bedroom |Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom apartment situated within a short stroll to the city centre.
"* Guide Price £240,000 - £260,000 * Mann Countrywide are excited to offer this stunning two double bedroom flat found in this historic building located in the heart of Canterbury City High Street. Decorated to a meticulous standard there are numerous benefits that will..."
*** TENANT IN SITU UNTIL AUGUST 2023 ***MODERN POPULAR DEVELOPMENT* Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this well presented two double bedroom second floor apartment.
"GUIDE PRICE £235,000 - £255,000 ***TWO BEDROOMS, TWO BATHROOMS ***ALLOCATED PARKING AND GARAGE***GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT***READY TO MOVE INTO WITH NO CHAIN***IDEAL INVESTMENT OR HOME*** Bairstow Eves are privileged to bring to the open market a superb two double b..."
"A superb two bedroom ground floor apartment situated in an exclusive river-side development within walking distance of the city centre and local shops and amenities. The property is offered to the market with no onward chain and the accommodation is well presented, light and spacious through (cont.)"
"This very well presented two bedroom first floor apartment is offered to the market with no onward chain. Set within Canterbury's famous City Walls, this property offers convenient access to Canterbury City and train stations. Offering ample living space in the open plan area and two bathrooms."
"No Forward Chain, two bedroom split level apartment with allocated parking within the city walls!"
Spacious Ground Floor Two Bedroom Apartment in Exclusive Gated Development with Allocated Parking and No Forward Chain!
Ideal Investment | Tenants in Situ | Underground Parking | Fully Refurbished Throughout | Five Min Walk to City Centre | Double Bedrooms |Miles and Barr are delighted to be offering to the market this trendy large two bedroom apartment situated in the Old Tannery development.
"Charming, two bedroom apartment located in South Canterbury with allocated parking!"
"Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this two double bedroom terraced home to the market. Situated in a South-Canterbury fantastic city centre location, this home would make an excellent first-time purchase or investment venture. The downstairs accommodation currently comprises of a living r..."
"Offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED, TWO BEDROOM, SECOND FLOOR apartment with ALLOCATED PARKING set within Canterbury City walls and within a short walk of shopping amenities and Canterbury East train station."
"This spacious recently renovated two bedroom first floor apartment would be an ideal first time buy or investment. The property boasts two bathrooms, parking, lift access and is a short walk to the town centre and Canterbury East station."
This 2 bedroom ground floor apartment with an allocated parking space is ideal for first-time buyers and downsizers alike.
"Your Move are proud to offer this great buy located within Flagstaff Court. Currently let through Your Move, the seller is offering the property with a tenant in situ - the apartment currently lets for £1200 pcm including water bills. For more information please contact Your Move in Canterb..."
"A 2 bedroom second floor apartment with an allocated parking space, ideal for first time buyers"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £225,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £340,000"
"If you are looking for a slick modern city centre apartment a stones throw away from canterbury West train station with secure underground parking, then look no further. Ideal as a first time buy or as an investment opportunity."
Mulberry Court is a very popular and attractive development of retirement apartments located in a particularly convenient ‘tucked away’ position in Stour Street. This beautifully presented ground floor apartment looks over the river Stour and is within a couple of minutes walk of the High Street...
"A superb two bedroom first floor apartment located in an exclusive, sought after development within walking distance of the Kent and Canterbury Hospital and the city centre. The property is presented to a good standard, has high ceilings and is light and well proportioned throughout. There i (cont.)"
"This inviting modern 2 bedroom apartment is really spacious and takes in lots of light due to it's dual aspect. You can enjoy beautiful views from your Juliet balcony down onto the picturesque gardens, and stroll along the river into the historic City centre of Canterbury, beautifully presented t..."
"**IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT**Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this stunning two double bedroom top floor apartment, overlooking woodland, located within walking distance of Canterbury City Centre, in the popular Homersham development."
"Pure investor brings to the market this 2-bed 4th floor (top floor) apartment in Flagstaff Court, Canterbury CT1 3HA. The property is being sold with tenant in situ!"
"This stunning first floor apartment is ready to move straight into or let out, within close proximity to the city centre and riverside walks, in an area undergoing significant regeneration. The modern open plan living space is extremely sociable and good for entertaining, and there is an allocate..."
"Guide Price £220,000 - £230,000. Modern 2 bed 2nd floor apartment located in popular development close to the city centre. Open plan living room/kitchen with balcony. 2 double bedrooms with en-suite shower room & fitted wardrobes to main bedroom. Allocated parking for 1 car & no onward chain."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £218,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £330,000"
*SPACIOUS TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT WITH TENANTS IN SITU!*NO ONWARD CHAIN!
"This spacious first floor coach house style apartment is located in the prestigious Kingsbrook Park development within walking distance of Canterbury West Train Station and only a short walk from the city centre! Self contained and very well presented throughout, benefits own allocated parking space"
"An exciting new development of high quality one and two bedroom apartments in the heart of Canterbury! Prices Start from £210,000....."
"Offers over £210,000 Bairstow Eves are delighted to offer this impressive period first floor flat with access from the ground floor to delightful communal gardens that are wall enclosed with an abundance of established shrubs and plants. There is an oak sweeping staircase leading..."
"A rare opportunity to acquire this two bedroom ground floor retirement flat which is situated in a much sought after position in Canterbury city centre.The property is accessed via it's own private entrance into a lobby area, with storage and access to the spacious sitting room/diner. This opens ..."
"Just on market , very nice , spacious and modern (approx ) 29 year old 2 bedroom static home backing onto woodland , available for a quick sale if required .Located midway between Canterbury and Herne Bay .Mains gas central heating , double glazing . Age limit minimum 55 years. Service charge ..."
"Located on the edge of a very small development, sits this modern one bedroom ground floor apartment built approximately 10 years ago. Talk about a prime location, Sainsbury's local is seconds awa..."
Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this lovely one bedroom first floor apartment overlooking the communal garden. The property offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout and is presented in good order. The Lounge offers ample space for living and dining r...
"Churchill Sales & Lettings are pleased to offer for sale this one bedroom first floor apartment on a corner plot. The apartment has had newly fitted carpets and consists of a lounge, kitchen with integrated appliances, bedroom with built in wardrobe, fully tiled shower room and airing cupboard in..."
"*Offers in excess of £200,000* A beautiful two bedroom flat situated in a character building along the Old Dover Road. Mann Countrywide are delighted to bring to the market this two bedroom, first floor flat situated in the Grade II listed building, The Hoystings along the Old Do..."
"A one bedroom apartment set in the heart of Canterbury and within the City Walls. Offering an ideal first time buy or investment, the property is well presented and includes a lounge, kitchen, bedroom and bathroom. Sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN and allocated parking space."
"**NO CHAIN** TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT ** Guide Price £200,000- £220,000 A beautiful two bedroom flat situated in a character building along the Old Dover Road. Bairstow Eves are delighted to bring to the market this two bedroom, first floor flat situated ..."
IN THE HEART OF THE CITY. Miles and Barr are delighted to present this modern purpose built first floor flat. Situated in a historical part of Canterb...
"**Guide Price £200,000 - £220,000** ** TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS ** EN-SUITE TO MASTER BEDOOM ** SEPARATE BATHROOM ** OFF ROAD PARKING ** PRIVATE GARDEN ** Bairstow Eves are privileged to bring to the open market a deceptively spacious two double bedroom, two bathroom baseme..."
Currently Let until June 2023. A fantastic bright and Airy first floor flat located close to Canterbury's City Centre.
"**GUIDE PRICE £220,000 - £240,000** Two bedroom, first floor apartment, close to Canterbury city centre. Entrance to hall, storage cupboard, two double bedrooms, the master bedroom benefits from a fitted wardrobe and ensuite. Spacious living room which can easily fit in ..."
"This superb flat offers space and a presentation that will be hard to beat. Whether you are a first time buyer or simply looking for that weekend retreat, this lovely home is in turn key condition - call to arrange your viewing today! EPC Grade D. Council tax band B. Please note the seller is cur..."
"NO ONWARD CHAINMiles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this wonderful two bedroom ground floor apartment forming part of Peri Court, a small development of flats within a quiet cul-de-sac location."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £198,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £300,000"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £194,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £295,000"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £191,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £290,000"
"This second floor one bedroom apartment conversion is situated in the heart of Canterbury. The property is in a prominent position on the High Street and has a very attractive period facade. There is a well kept communal entrance hall with a tiled floor, post boxes and a bin store, this has (cont.)"
"Superb first and second floor flat for the over 60s, available in the ever-popular Chantry Court Retirement Development situated within the City Centre. 18 Chantry Court is a well presented first and second floor maisonette, which is for the over 60s able to live independently. There ar..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £210,000 ** Fantastic three bedroom top floor maisonette set over two levels ** Spacious feel throughout ** Within walking distance to the historic city of Canterbury ** Call us to make an appointment to view! ** The property is..."
"Immaculate, Two Bedroom Apartment with Allocated Parking"
A Stunning Loft Style Apartment Close to the city centre.
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £188,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £285,000"
Miles & Barr are delighted to be offering this lovely one bedroom apartment located in the popular Ripple Court development.
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £185,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £280,000"
Whether you are looking to put those exciting first steps on the property ladder or are searching for a solid long term investment this spacious one bedroom apartment in one of Canterbury's most desirable locations is a must see. Stepping inside the space on offer here is what stands it apart f...
"GREAT FIRST TIME PURCHASE OR INVESTMENT - This spacious three bedroom flat offers great accommodation and is only 0.5 miles from the city centre. There is a good sized living room with plenty of space for table and chairs. You can access the balcony from the living room, which provides some outsi..."
"Guide price: £180,000 - £190,000. Investment opportunity with tenants in situ until April/May 2023. 1 bed first floor apartment with scenic views of the river Stour. Open plan living room/kitchen. 1 double bedroom plus modern bathroom. Balcony overlooking the river. No onward chain."
JUST REDUCED! Lovely maisonette in a central Canterbury location. Share of freehold and no forward chain. Superb first home or buy to let investment.
"Your Move are proud to offer this attractive apartment offered with no forward chain. In need of modernisation, the home offers walking distance to the High Street and Kent & Canterbury Hospital. Lease length 999 years. Maintenance is variable shared between the three apartments to the proper..."
Freehold House Vacant Possession
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £172,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £260,000"
*MODERN ONE BEDROOM APARTMENT IN CENTRAL CANTERBURY!*NO ONWARD CHAIN!
"Guide Price £170,000 - £190,000 Juliet Balconies | City Centre Location | Chain-Free | Desirable Location | Communal Gardens Mann Countrywide are delighted to offer to the market this well-presented chain-free, spacious one-bedroom second-floor apartment situated..."
"A recently refurbished one bedroom, ground floor retirement apartment for the over 60’s situated just a 2 minute walk from the High Street and backing on to the River Stour. Mulberry Court is a very popular and attractive development of retirement apartments located in a particularly c..."
"Exceptional and spacious two bedroom, second floor apartment within a sought after retirement community in a central location within walking distance of the Cathedral City of Canterbury centre and Canterbury West Train Station. Please Quote JV0094
"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £165,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £250,000"
"Offered with no forward chain, this great apartment is located in walking distance to transport and the city centre. Do not miss your chance to view - call us today! EPC Grade D. Service charge £250.00 per qtr approx. Lease Date : 28 September 2006 Term : 150 years from 29 September 19..."
** SHARE OF FREEHOLD**Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom maisonette with a private garden and driveway parking to the front.
NO ONWARD CHAIN!Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom ground floor maisonette with driveway parking and a private garden to the rear.
A two bedroom purpose built first floor retirement close to the centre of Canterbury City centre offered for sale with no forward chain.
"PRICED TO SELL - Calling all Flat Hunters! St Andrews Close offers a short walk to Canterbury High Street & more with this apartment block popular with first time buyers to investors. Offered with no forward chain, do not miss your chance to view! EPC Grade C. Council tax band B. Lease term -..."
"PERFECT FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. This first floor flat is conveniently located for Canterbury City Centre & local amenities. Comprising lounge, fitted kitchen, double bedroom, bathroom and off street parking, View now to avoid disappointment!"
CALLING ALL INVESTORS looking to make an instant return with TENANTS IN SITU! First floor apartment within walking distance to Canterbury city centre. This comes with the right to use a parking space although this is not included within the title deeds of the property.
***Investment Opportunity or first timer buyer *** Martin & Co are pleased to offer this One Bedroom Apartment to the market with Tenants in Situ until October 2023. This property is situated on the ground floor with the City centre close by. The property offers ample living space with extra...
"Brand new home on popular new development just over 1 mile from nearby city centre with excellent amenities. Contemporary kitchens, allocated parking & shares available from 40% on the Governments Help to Buy, Shared Ownership Scheme"
Page and Co are pleased to present to the market this ground floor apartment in Rhodaus Close which is being sold with no onward chain.
Miles & Barr are delighted to offer to the market this light and airy first floor retirement apartment.
"A fantastic two bedroom first floor retirement apartment located in a prestigious river-side complex in central Canterbury within easy reach of local shops, the Marlowe Theatre and Canterbury West railway station. The property is offered to the market with no onward chain and is well present (cont.)"
"Do not miss this golden opportunity to purchase a luxury retirement apartment, located in the heart of St Dunstan`s with everything you need just a short stroll away. Exclusively for the over 60`s"
A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT LOCATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR WITH RIVER VIEWS Deans Mill Court is flanked on three sides by the River Stour and was constructed to resemble the water mill that previously occupied the site. The development was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) ...
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £148,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £225,000"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £145,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £220,000"
"VACANT, 2 BEDROOM STATIC HOME LOCATED ON A POPULAR RESIDENTIAL PARK APPROX. 4 MILES FROM THE CITY OF CANTERBURY . THE VILLAGE SHOP AND A PUBLIC HOUSE WITH RESTAURANT ARE CLOSE BY . BUS ROUTE TO CANTERBURY AND HERNE BAY AT HAND ,.MAINS GAS CENTRAL HEATING. DOUBLE GLAZING , MIN .AGE RESTRICTI..."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this one bedroom retirement apartment situated in the sought-after Barton Mill Court development close to St Dunstans, Sainsburys, Canterbury West station and a short walk to the city centre."
"Just available , chain free , approx 17year old Omar Sherrington style 2 bedroom 32ft X 20 ft static home , located on one of the most popular static home sites in the area midway between Canterbury and Herne bay . All electric heating with radiators , double glazing ,off road parking , fitt..."
A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR Barton Mill Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 53 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each property in...
A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE GROUND FLOOR WITH PATIO DOOR Barton Mill Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 53 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within...
"Nicely appointed 2 bedroom Park Home for the over 55 s . Approx 25 years old , located on the ever popular residential site between Herne Bay and Canterbury . Parking for this property is just a few yards away in the main car park costing £6.87 pcm. . Features electric wall mounted radiators ,..."
A comfortable purpose-built retirement apartment on the ground floor of an impressive complex by McCarthy & Stone close to Canterbury City Centre and Canterbury West railway station. The property occupies a corner setting within the building which gives the main sitting/dining room a lovely dual ...
A VERY WELL PRESENTED ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR WHICH HAS BEEN COMPLETELY RENOVATED Barton Mill Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 53 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can...
Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this two bedroom ground floor apartment in Warren Lodge.Benefitting from direct access onto the communal gardens from the lounge patio doors this over 55s retirement home is part of a development constructed by Pelham Homes consisting of twenty five two bedro...
"Mann Estate Agents are delighted to welcome this one bedroom, first floor retirement apartment in the desirable location of South Canterbury. There is superb living accommodation with warden assistance on site. There are wonderful well-established communal gardens and a real sense of a comm..."
Great first time buy or investment opportunity boasting city centre living.
A SECOND FLOOR ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT Homespire House was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 54 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each property in the case of an...
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer to market this one bedroom, ground floor retirement apartment offering independent living. Situated within the city walls and walking distance to many local amenities on offer. With the building there is also access to a communal lounge with regular get togeth..."
A fantastic opportunity to move into this lovely first floor apartment in this desirable independent retirement building which has been newly decorated and new fitted carpets throughout. 
"Exclusively for the over 50's on the Dengrove Park Home site, located in the sought after village of Broad Oak. This one bed park home is ideally situated with access to local amenities and is on main transport routes into coastal Herne Bay and The Cathedral City of Canterbury. With mains gas fi..."
A ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT Homespire House was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 54 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each property in the case of an em...
"*INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - TENANTS IN SITU PAYING £800 PCM* A SECOND FLOOR ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT Bairstow Eves are pleased to offer for sale this fantastically located one bedroom retirement apartment on the second floor. The apartment is located in Knotts Lane, j..."
"OVER 60's ONLY ... Your Move are proud to offer this ground floor apartment located within the heart of Canterbury. With the city on your doorstep, do not miss the opportunity to view this great buy!! EPC Grade C Council Tax band B. Lease 99yrs from Sept 1984. GR £500 approx. per annu..."
*OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE 40% THROUGH THE SHARED OWNERSHIP SCHEME* This spacious first floor coach house style apartment is located in the prestigious Kingsbrook Park development within walking distance of Canterbury West Train Station and only a short walk from the city centre!
"Set in an extremely convenient position on the outskirts of the City of Canterbury being 3/4 mile from the City centre with its shopping facilities, Cathedral, bus routes and Canterbury East railway station. The Canterbury West railway station with its links to London and St Dunstan’s Street are ..."
"Guide Price £80,000 Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this studio apartment. The property is located on the ground floor and accomodation comprises: entrance hallway, bathroom, living/bedroom area leading round to the kitchen. Externally, there are communal gardens. "
A GROUND FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT BENEFITTING FROM A LEASE EXTENSION Homespire House was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 54 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each pr...
"Chain Free! For those seeking a blend of independence and security, this top floor flat would make an excellent retirement option being on the doorstep of Canterbury and all it amenities."
"Offered to the market is this one bedroom, ground floor retirement apartment offering independant living and 24 hour care line, situated within the city walls. The property enjoys gated parking area and communal rooms including lounge and laundry. The property is sold with no onward chain."
Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this one bedroom ground floor retirement flat.
"Bairstow Eves are pleased to offer for sale a well presented one bedroom park home within a secluded garden backing onto woodland. This is a fine example of a one bedroom park home. On entry, the hallway leads through to a double bedroom with views overlooking the garden. There is a recently..."
"READYMADE INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. One bedroom STUDENT SUITE currently let out, open plan to its own lounge/kitchen area. Located within the student village of Parham Rd, this suite has a secure card entry system & includes a SHOWER ROOM with access to a communal social living area. NO ONWARD CHAIN!"
"*ATTENTION INVESTORS* A STUDENT SUITE with its own open plan bedroom, lounge & kitchen area. Located within the Canterbury student village of Parham Road, this suite has a secure card entry system & includes a SHOWER ROOM with access to a communal social living area & laundry room. NO ONWARD CHAIN!"
"*Currently Let* One Bedroom STUDENT POD, with the potential to achieve a 6.5% YIELD, located within the student village of Parham Road. This pod has secure card access & includes a SHOWER ROOM with access to a communal kitchen and social living area. NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"**GUIDE PRICE £60,000 - £70,000** Bairstow Eves are pleased to offer for sale this fantastically located one bedroom retirement apartment on the second floor. The apartment is located in Knotts Lane, just a stones throw from Canterbury High Street and array of convenience s..."
"Fully managed, hands-free investment in prime Canterbury Location: Fully furnished En-suite Student apartments with shower. Excellent communal kitchen/lounge facilities included. *CASH BUYERS/INVESTMENT ONLY."
"Prime Canterbury Location: Fully furnished En-suite Student apartments with shower. Excellent communal kitchen/lounge facilities included. Fully managed, hands-free investment
*CASH BUYERS/INVESTMENT ONLY."
"Set in the heart of Canterbury is this one bedroom, first floor, retirement apartment for people aged 55 or over. The property is in need of updating and includes a lounge, double bedroom, kitchen and bathroom. There is a communal lounge, laundry room and gardens. Sold with no chain."
"***Guide Price: £58,000 - £62,000*** Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this one bedroom student suite which is currently let out. The property has a secure card entry system & includes a modern-fitted en-suite shower room with access to a communal social living area. ..."
"*Currently Let* One Bedroom STUDENT POD, located within the student village of Parham Road. This pod has secure card access & includes a SHOWER ROOM with access to a communal kitchen and social living area. NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this one bedroom student suite which is currently let out. The property has a secure card entry system & includes a modern-fitted en-suite shower room with access to a communal social living area. Externally, there are communal gardens. This prop..."
"Studio Apartment in the well known STUDENT ACCOMMODATION development of Parham Road. Comprising of a bedroom/ living area & private en suite shower room. Also providing access to communal kitchen, living space & laundry areas. Within close proximity of local amenities, transport links & city centre."
VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE | CONTACT MANN COUNTRYWIDE FOR VIRTUAL VIEWING. FANTASTIC INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this one bedroom student suite which is currently let out. The property has a secure card entry system & includes a modern-fitted e...
"A pod in the STUDENT VILLAGE ON PARHAM ROAD close to amenities including shops and restaurants. The property offers a double bedroom as well as a private shower room with shower cubicle, WC and wash basin. There are also communal kitchen and social facilities. No onward chain & tenant in situ."
An ideal one bedroom studio situated in the Canterbury Student Village at the highly desirable Kentish House. This one bedroom classic en suite offers its self as great investment
"A well presented STUDIO apartment set in a well maintained and fully managed block in the Parham Road student village in Canterbury. Positioned close to local amenities, the property comprises a bedroom with en suite shower room and full use of communal areas such as kitchen and social lounge."
Call Your Move to view this student residence offered with no forward chain. Block Energy Rating - Grade A. Lease 250 yrs from July 2014. GR/Maintenance £942 per annum. Council tax TBC
"***Guide Price £40,000 - £45,000*** Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this one bedroom student suite which is currently let out. The property has a secure card entry system & includes a modern-fitted en-suite shower room with access to a communal social living area. E..."
"Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this chain-free one bedroom student suite which is currently let out. The property has a secure card entry system & includes a modern-fitted en-suite shower room with access to a communal social living area. Externally, there are communal gardens. "
"A purpose built block within a student village close to Canterbury City Centre. The property comprises a bedroom area and en suite shower room. There are communal areas within a lounge, kitchen and laundry. An ideal investment property with on site management team to find and look after tenants."
"***Guide Price: £30,000*** Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this one bedroom student suite which is currently let out. The property has a secure card entry system & includes a modern-fitted en-suite shower room with access to a communal social living area. Externally..."
SINGLE GARAGE FOR SALEMiles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this single garage in a very central location.
"SINGLE GARAGE EN BLOC, located on the Hales Place Estate in Canterbury. This brick built garage comes with an up and over door. Call to find out more and book your viewing."
Freehold Garage and Land Vacant Possession
The home of great value! The Cork benefits from a bright and well designed living room that leads into a contemporary kitchen-diner with French doors leading out to the rear garden. A handy cloakroom completes the downstairs space. Upstairs you'll find two generously sized bedrooms an...
"Linstock House is a substantial 6/7 bedroom period residence sitting in a generous plot of around 0.5 acres with a large coach house which has been converted into 2 two bedroom cottages, enjoying outstanding panoramic views across its own gardens to the North Pennine Fells. This is a superb oppo..."
" A charming, ‘chocolate box’ period home with its own Grade II Listed Tower is located in the heart of the popular village of Rickerby, sitting in a private position with beautiful gardens, stunning walled courtyard and a large barn/workshop to the rear.Dating back to 17th Century, H..."
"An excellent smallholding which offers a variety of opportunities for potential buyers. The property consists of a modern four bedroom detached bungalow with detached garage together with modern outbuildings, concrete and hardcore yard areas and good quality grazing land extending to 4.14 acres."
" A magnificent four storey townhouse of grand proportions with superb period features throughout and off road parking. With over 4100 sqft of accommodation, this exceptional home includes three reception rooms, six bedrooms, six bathrooms plus a private garden with off road parking to the rear. ..."
"This unique, Georgian period property really is a show-stopper of a home. The four bedroom, semi-detached property retains many original features throughout, it benefits from a recently installed boiler and new double glazing and is immaculately presented.  Viewing is essential to ap..."
"Book your private viewing today to see the luxury Sefton show home.Exclusive luxury is available in ‘The Sefton’, a uniquely designed three storey townhouse. These spacious contemporary family homes offer a modern intelligent design nestled on the edge of Carlisle’s hi..."
Desirable park side location. Attractive 4 bed detached house with delightful gardens beautifully located enjoying fine open views. Prime Carlisle location. Walk to Stanwix amenities and city centre.
An elegant six bedroom substantial Grade II listed townhouse with period style & character in a prime residential area and within walking distance to a wide range of amenities and Carlisle city centre.
"A charming, well established multi award winning guest house with south facing garden and off street parking for several cars all conveniently set just half a mile form the city centre. Beautifully presented and appointed. 9 bedrooms. 9 bathrooms (8 ensuite). Superb location handy for the A69 and..."
"In the heart of Carlisle, discover a chain free, character home with serious kerb appeal and the benefit of off road parking. Fully renovated for modern living, with its own private parking and secret, suntrap garden…could this be Carlisle's most eligible Victorian home? This imposing Gr..."
"Situated on possibly Carlisle’s most sought after road, occupying a generous plot with an open aspect to the rear over fields towards Rickerby Village and the Folly, an exceedingly rare opportunity to acquire a substantial, detached, family home offering flexible and spacious living accommo..."
"Plot 9 - The Shire is ideal for family living or failing that for those looking to downsize into a high quality, easy to maintain home. Properties of this specification and in this location rarely come to the market and the attention to detail in these homes is outstanding. Within close proximi..."
"This elegant Victorian villa is situated in a leafy part of Carlisle close to the city centre only a short distance from the local amenities including bus services, train station with links to Glasgow and Euston, University of Cumbria, schools along with retail parks, shops, supermarkets, restaur..."
"Plot 10 The Shire is a superb four bedroom detached home, finished to a luxury specification with high quality fixtures and fittings, the layout internally has been designed to make sure that the flow is cohesive to this style of modern living accommodation. On the ground floor there is an impres..."
"Plot 1 The Shire is ideal for family living or failing that for those looking to downsize into a high quality, easy to maintain home. Properties of this specification and in this location rarely come to the market and the attention to detail in these homes is outstanding. Within close proximi..."
"This exceptionally spacious detached former police house really has everything that a large family requires. The property has five bedrooms, five reception rooms, three bathrooms, fantastic storage throughout, generous lawned gardens, shillied drive and double garage. Ideally situated close to..."
"Plot 8 The Shire - Within close proximity to the City of Carlisle, The Paddocks is an exclusive, private gated development of only 10 luxurious 4 bedroom detached homes. From the stunning gated entrance approach, designed around a central green space, the developer has wanted to create something..."
"Plot 2 - The Shire is ideal for family living within close proximity to the City of Carlisle or ideal for those looking to downsize into a high quality, easy to maintain home. Properties of this specification and in this location rarely come to the market and the attention to detail in these home..."
" Plot 5 - Within close proximity to the City of Carlisle, The Paddocks is an exclusive, private gated development of only 10 luxurious 4 bedroom detached homes. From the stunning gated entrance approach, designed around a central green space, the developer has wanted to create something that is ..."
" Plot 3, The Clydesdale, is a superb four bedroom detached home, finished to a luxury specification with high quality fixtures and fittings, the layout internally has been designed to make sure that the flow is cohesive to this style of modern living accommodation. On the ground floor there is ..."
"4 Bedroomed Detached House 4 Bedrooms 2 Bathrooms 2 Reception rooms Dining kitchen
"
"A rare opportunity to purchase a traditional, period, five bedroom, two bathroom, two reception room, townhouse situated in the city centre close to all amenities and with easy access to the motorway.  The property retains many original features throughout and comprises two spacious ..."
'SHOW HOME NOW AVAILABLE TO VIEW'
"Wonderfully different, 9 Howard Place is an outstanding example of how a period home should be! Brilliantly placed on a beautiful tree-lined street, this stunning Victorian mid-row period property boasts two large reception rooms, a modern kitchen, seven bedrooms and two bathroo..."
"This two bedroom mid-link terraced property benefits from being newly modernised and refurbished throughout with brand new fitted kitchen and bathroom, new carpets and flooring. The UPVC double glazed and gas central heated accommodation briefly comprises entrance hall, lounge, dining kitchen,..."
"A two bedroomed end of terrace home, situated to the west on the city, in a quiet cul de sac within the development of Derwent Gardens off Wigton Road. Conveniently located within easy reach of a range of many local amenities. "
"A very well presented modern built four double bedroom, two bathroom, family home with solar panels situated in the Story built 'Eden Gate' development in Houghton to the north of Carlisle."
"Overlooking green, open space, the 5 bedroom Lavenham with double garage is an ideal family home boasting generous proportioned rooms."
"Newly available again. A four bedroom detached house in a peaceful rural location on the edge of the city. Kitchen breakfast room, dining living room, conservatory and three bathrooms. Large gardens and two garages."
"This stunning four bedroom detached property is a popular style Warwick house built by Story Homes. Offering entrance hall, cloakroom, two reception rooms, open plan dining kitchen, gallery landing, four double bedrooms, en-suite to Master, and family bathroom. The property also benefits from ..."
"An immaculately presented, four bedroom, two bathroom, detached family home situated on the popular Ridings estate, built by Story Homes. This generously proportioned property has a spacious entrance hall with ground floor cloakroom, lounge and stunning 30’ dining kitchen/family room wit..."
"This is the plot for a CA3 postcode!. Situated in a private, sunny location it is not overlooked and as such is one of the best plots north of the river. The accommodation has been adapted to provide a ground floor annexe which has its own external access, a living space (potential to add kitchen..."
"A perfect opportunity to purchase this beautiful 4-bedroom detached home. Presented to the highest standard throughout, the home has a spacious and flexible layout. A large entrance hall leads into the living room which is tastefully decorated. There is an open kitchen diner which create..."
NB. This property is exclusively available to PRIVATE LANDLORDS who are accredited by the relevant local authority or who are members of the National Landlords Association. The property comprises three Grade II Listed Buildings which inter-connect by way of interior doorway openings...
"Wow, this is really something… situated in one of the city's most loved locations you’ll find the absolutely fantastic 123 Warwick Road. This a magnificent and immaculately presented mid-terraced family home and a fine example of why we all love period properties!  From t..."
"Found on Rufus Road on the modern Taylor Wimpey development at Rosehill, Carlisle is this stunning 4 bedroom detached home. Our vendors have spared no expense on upgrading the kitchen, flooring and bathrooms when built. The property is found in immaculate condition and would make a stunning famil..."
"Located in this always popular and sought after area to the north of Carlisle, with easy access to Stanwix Village, Rickerby Park and the town centre, a well presented, 2 reception room, 3-bedroom semi-detached family home, sensibly extended with a kitchen dining room with separate utility. Ampl..."
"A show home at The Paddock is now available to view, get in touch today to book your private appointment.Exclusive luxury is available in ‘The Avebury’, these uniquely designed spacious contemporary family homes offer a modern intelligent design nestled on the edge of Carlis..."
"Tucked away in a cul-de-sac location overlooking green, open space. The Haddenham with 4 double bedrooms is an ideal choice for those looking for extra space."
"The Sanderson has a striking entrance, with an open hallway that has a feature staircase and leads into the open plan kitchen/dining/family area. This space links to a useful utility room and downstairs WC and features a stylish island and French doors that extend the living area"
"Found on the popular Charles Church development just off Dalston Road on the edge of Carlisle is this stunning 5-bedroom detached property. Immaculately presented throughout, the property is ready to move straight into and would make an amazing family home. To the front of the property there is a..."
"Deceptively spacious three bed, one en-suite home. Two reception rooms. Breakfast kitchen. Large rear garden. Convenient west of city location close to shops and public transport. "
"Immaculate, Modern Family Home That Just Happens To Be A Bungalow. Don’t be put off just because there’s no stairs! This is a thoroughly 21st century property on a large plot with space to extend, so it’s ideal if you’re a couple or have kids. Property ref: KD0516"
"Some houses have just got it...Number 27 Beaver Road is definitely one of those properties. From the minute you pull up to the house and from the minute you step inside you cannot fail to be bowled over by this fantastic and generously extended five-bedroom, three reception room and two bathro..."
"We are delighted to offer this beautifully presented bungalow in the sought after location of Rickerby village, built in 2003 by Story homes to a high very high standard and briefly comprises:- Entrance hallway, spacious dining lounge, conservatory with french doors to rear garden, breakfasting k..."
"A rare opportunity to acquire a spacious, 3 bedroom, detached home with flexible living accommodation and generous mature gardens, found in one of the most desirable locations in the city, to the fringe of the village of Houghton, with its sought after primary school, occupying an elevated locati..."
"With 4 double bedrooms, the Eynsham offers a modern and spacious layout for those looking for extra space."
"A recently renovated, beautifully presented, three bedroom, detached bungalow situated on a generous plot providing scope to the rear to extend the property (subject to planning permission).  Well-presented front and rear gardens and driveway providing parking for two/three cars."
"The Coniston's kitchen/family room is perfect for spending time as a family and for entertaining. There’s also a well-proportioned living room, a separate dining room, a downstairs WC and a handy utility room. Upstairs are four bedrooms - bedroom one has an en-suite - and the family bathroom."
"Homesearch Direct is delighted to offer to the market a gorgeous former show home situated in a sought after residential location to the North of Carlisle. Ideal for growing families, this property offers an abundance of space and is positioned in a quiet cul-de-sac location. Accommodatin compris..."
"Style and sophistication reigns supreme here at 9 Etterby Street, located in an elevated row of traditional townhouses and north of the river in the always in demand location of Stanwix."
"Vicinity Homes are delighted to offer to the market this immaculately presented, modernised, deceptively spacious four bedroom mid terrace house situated within a popular residential area to the North of Carlisle City Centre. The property is close to a range of local amenities, regular bus route,..."
"Looking for family life with a little more luxury? Then look no further…Sewell Lane is a contemporary, and beautifully presented executive home; ideal for the discerning family seeking space and luxury in an ultra-convenient location. QUOTE LI0465.
"
"A superb four bedroom terraced house which has been tastefully restored and presented to a high standard throughout. Situated conveniently close to Stanwix School, shops and amenities including Rickerby Park. The property benefits from double glazing, gas central heating, a new roof front and b..."
Well located detached bungalow. En-suite master bedroom. Garage and pleasant rear garden. Well presented but with scope to modernise and improve. 
"Four bedroom terrace offered to the market in fantastic condition throughout, situated in sought after location of Stanwix to the North of Carlisle close to a wealth of local amenities including popular Stanwix School."
"The Earlswood features an open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading into the garden, a handy utility room and a front-aspect living room, plus under-stairs storage and a WC. The first floor has three bedrooms and the main family bathroom. The top floor is home to an en suite bedroom."
"Executive houses on the much sought-after Hebden Avenue are rarely available...Number 99 is a real gem and features a fantastic large conservatory to the rear, with an incredible open-plan dining lounge, four bedrooms, a garage, an extensive driveway and a gorgeous low-maintenance so..."
"An exciting opportunity to purchase a four bedroom, two reception room, detached family home with attached single garage, driveway and low maintenance rear garden.  Etterby is located to the north of the city with easy access to the western bypass, Austin Friars school and convenienc..."
"FOR SALE Grade ll Listed Carlisle City Centre Residential Opportunity1 Castle Street, Carlisle, Cumbria CA3 8SY"
"This impressive, three bedroom, detached property offers two reception rooms, modern integrated kitchen with separate utility as well as sun room, ground floor cloakroom and three first floor bedrooms including master with en-suite. Extensive rear garden, front garden, garage and driveway park..."
"The only way to describe this three bedroom detached home is absolutely perfect! The property is in a Turn-Key condition, boasting two reception rooms, modern kitchen and bathrooms and a generously sized conservatory overlooking the beautiful landscaped gardens! Viewing is highly recommended to a..."
"Purplebricks are proud to bring 380 Warwick Road onto the Market. This incredible family home has to be viewed to be appreciated and I promise you will be surprised how large it is. This family home has 4 bedrooms, ensuite off the master, a large family bathroom, 2 reception rooms, good size kitc..."
"This stunning, three double bedroom, bungalow is immaculately presented throughout, in turn-key condition ready for a buyer to move straight into. With three double bedrooms, one of which was converted from the garage, modern kitchen with utility room, sun room, modern shower room and lounge w..."
"We are delighted to bring to the market a large, detached home in need of some modernisation situated on the west side of Carlisle, lovely views over the park to the front and within walking distance of the local schools, shops and bus stop. Just a few minutes away from the bypass and the M6"
"Homesearch Direct is delighted to offer to the market 3 Carvoran Way, a three/four bedroomed detached family house situated in a highly sought after residential location to the West of Carlisle. Occupying a generous corner plot, this property has been extended to the ground floor, offering so muc..."
A superb three bedroom end terraced cottage to the North of Carlisle in the hamlet of Tarraby offering a countryside feel yet within easy access of the City and local amenities. Early viewing advised. EPC rating awaited. Council tax band C.
"Situated in a quiet semi-rural location, this three bedroom semi-detached cottage has just the right combination of traditional and modern features. An immaculately presented, low maintenance property all on one level with double glazing and gas central heating.  Tarraby is situated ..."
"Show home for sale with all furniture and fittings included! The four bedroom Longford boasts a large living room leading from a separate entrance hall, taking you to a stunning contemporary kitchen-dining area with French doors opening onto the rear garden. There is ..."
"Magnificent and immaculately presented.… this property is a fine example of why we all love period homes!  From the spacious rooms with high ceilings to the detailed cornices, this fabulous property finds numerous ways to put a smile on your face.  Welcome to number 130 P..."
"We are pleased to offer for sale a substantial building plot, that has recently had planning passed for a substantial detached property with open views across the fields and River Petteril. Alternatively, the site could provide scope for two detached bungalows (subject to planning permission)...."
"New to the market, a four bedroom, substantial, detached family home situated on the popular Brackenleigh residential estate to the west of the city. The property also benefits from off-street parking for two vehicles, single garage and lawned rear garden enjoying an open aspect across th..."
"This two bedroom, mid-link property is situated in a popular development to the north of the River Eden offering fitted kitchen, lounge incorporating French doors opening onto the patio and turfed rear garden. To the first floor there are two bedrooms and bathroom. The property benefits from a..."
"A beautifully presented, three storey townhouse, retaining many original features throughout.  The three bedroom, two reception room property also has a first floor office and spacious four piece bathroom.  Country style kitchen and a double garage.  Dalston Road is situated to ..."
"An immaculately presented, four bedroom, two bathroom, three storey townhouse situated just off Harraby Green Road. The property offers an extensive family home and is neutrally decorated throughout with a spacious dining lounge, modern dining kitchen and practical ground floor cloakroom. ..."
"This stunning three bedroom, semi-detached property offers an abundance of space which must be viewed to be appreciated. Situated in a quiet no-through road to the north of the River Eden with three double bedrooms, dining lounge, dining kitchen, conservatory, four piece bathroom, low maintena..."
"Is This The Best 3 Bedroom Semi On This Popular Street? That’s a bold claim but the superb, sociable ground floor layout and the spectacular bathroom will make it hard to beat. It’s been extended and improved to create a fantastic family home. Property ref: KD0516
"
"This three bedroom Victorian terraced house is packed with retained character and period features whilst benefitting some of the more modern comforts we all love. With an abundance of space throughout, this property would suit a range of purchasers, whether you need extra space for your family to..."
"Who Says Your Lounge Has To Be Downstairs? Like many modern townhouses, this 2015 Persimmon home has the lounge on the first floor. But you can’t say it doesn’t have the perfect layout for summer entertaining, with a large sunroom and even a hot tub. Property ref: KD0516
"
"Vicinity Homes are delighted to offer to the market this well presented, extended, three bedroom semi detached house situated on a spacious corner plot in Lowry Hill. The property is close to a range of local amenities, popular Primary Schools, regular bus route and has excellent access to the M6..."
"3 Bedroomed Semi Detached House 3 Bedrooms 1 Bathroom 2 Reception Rooms
"
"Houses on the much sought-after Green Lane are rarely available...Number 147 is a real gem and features a fantastic two-storey extension to the side and rear, with an incredible open-plan dining area with Bi-Folding doors into a large conservatory and a gorgeous south-facing rear garden with s..."
"An excellent opportunity to purchase a spacious four bedroom, two reception room mid terraced property where a wealth of original features have been retained including fireplaces and coving and is situated within walking distance of Carlisle city centre. The property has the additional benefit..."
An Immaculate Semi Detached House with STUNNING and STYLISH fitted kitchen that is truly the heart of this home! This wonderful home is boasting a walk in condition that is situated in a desirable cul-de-sac to the North of City - Please contact Hunters today to schedule your viewing! ...
"An immaculate, walk-in condition three bedroom semi-detached house situated in the desirable Kingstown area to the North of Carlisle. The accommodation is briefly comprising of Entrance Hall, Living Room opening into the Stylish Kitchen, Dining Room, Bathroom and 3 Bedrooms to the first ..."
"A four bedroom detached home offered to the market with no onward chain, situated in a highly sought after residential location to the West of Carlisle. Council tax band D. EPC rating E."
"An immaculately presented property over three floors. Three generous bedrooms the primary having an en-suite. A fitted kitchen with appliances, and a living room with French doors leading to a landscaped rear garden. A popular area to the west of Carlisle, with good local transport links, and ame..."
"The Grasmere is a three-bedroom family home that’s ideal for modern living. The open-plan kitchen/dining room has French doors leading into the garden. The front porch, downstairs WC and two cupboards take care of everyday storage. Bedroom one has an en suite. This home also has an integral garage."
"A well presented three bedroom, two bathroom, semi detached home with a fabulous ground floor extension ensuring modern open plan living with bi-fold doors out to the rear patio and garden in a sought after area north of the city."
"The 3 bedroom Gosford with detached garage will appeal to first-time buyers, couples and families looking for a little extra space and will be ready to move into this Spring!"
"With a much sought-after south-west facing garden, the 3 bedroom Gosford is ready to move into this Spring and is ideal for couple or families looking for a little extra space."
"Property Launch Tuesday 21st March between 12;00 - 13;30, please contact Hunters to schedule your viewing! This three bedroom double fronted house has been lovingly cared for and is offered the the market in an immaculate, turn-key condition. Complete with a spacious living room, modern..."
"The home of great value! The Kildare is a beautiful three bedroom home that features a spacious living room leading into a contemporary kitchen-diner, with French doors leading out to the garden. Upstairs you'll find a master bedroom complete with a luxurious en-suite bathroom and two..."
"A modern built, spacious and very well presented three story, three bedroom, town house located in a sought after semi-rural area to the north of the city. With open plan living to the ground floor, a master ensuite and rear garden this is a lovely family home."
"10 Crosshill Drive is a spacious two/three bedroom detached bungalow, situated in a popular residential location, just off Queensway to the west of Carlisle. Having been lovingly cared for over the years this bungalow offers loads of space and flexible accommodation, depending on what the buyers ..."
"This extended two bedroom semi-detached bungalow is modern throughout, with lounge, breakfast kitchen, family shower room and two double bedrooms. The spacious Master bedroom features an en-suite bathroom and has French doors leading out to the rear garden. The property also benefits from gara..."
"Offering four bedrooms and two bathrooms, this newly decorated property would suit either a family or equally suitable as a buy to let investment or HMO property. With new carpets throughout, and situated close to the city centre, this property has an abundance of potential.  The dou..."
Sanderling Walk is a stunning development of 3 & 4 bed homes brought to you by renowned developers HJK Properties. Built to a high specification as standard each property is designed to offer the very best of modern living with excellent room proportions and quality finishings. Behind the kerb ap...
"This is not just your average ""Kilkenny"" home, this three bedroom Gleeson Home has been upgraded to a fantastic specification to provide a modern and luxurious family living space. Why buy a basic new home when you can have a pristine, pre-loved home packed with upgrades including full floorcover..."
"A beautifully presented 2 bed semi detached house with large corner plot, driveway parking for several vehicles, garage and gardens located to the West of the city centre in a popular residential area. Briefly comprising:- entrance hallway, sitting room, dining room with patio doors to conserv..."
"A 2 bed semi detached bungalow to the North of the city centre, popular location close to local amenities and available for sale with no onward chain. This well presented property briefly comprises:- entrance porch and hallway, spacious lounge, fitted kitchen with door to side, 2 double bedroo..."
"The home of great value! The Kilkenny is a beautiful three bedroom home perfect for modern living. A bright living room featuring a stunning exposed staircase leads through to an open-plan kitchen-diner, where French doors open onto the garden creating an flexible living space. Upstai..."
"WELCOME to your new home! This immaculate four bedroom, two reception room townhouse is just a short walk from the city centre and offers ample accommodation. Viewing is HIGHLY RECOMMENDED to appreciate the accommodation on offer. "
"A beautifully presented and recently fully refurbished three bedroom semi-detached property, with new rear extension, situated in the popular residential area of Belle Vue."
"The Buttermere is very popular with families. The bright and modern open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading into the garden is ideal for entertaining and for enjoying family meals. The front porch, inner hallway, downstairs cloakroom and useful cupboard take care of everyday storage."
"An opportunity to purchase a spacious, two double bedroom, detached bungalow, which is in need of some modernisation as reflected in the price, occupying a superb plot with an open aspect to the front, situated on a much sought after street to the west of the city.The double glazed and ..."
Are you looking for a residential development/investment property in Carlisle? This substantial and imposing building has planning consent for conversion into 7 flats and would make a perfect investment with potential use as an HMO. Previously used as a Doctors surgery and centrally located in a...
Very spacious 3 bedroom semi detached property built in the 1960’s. This property is 5 mins from the M6 motorway and is situated south of Carlisle. A very solid building needing a bit of modernisation but has loads of potential and plenty of outside space to extend.    • 3...
Walk is a stunning development of 3 & 4 bed homes brought to you by renowned developers HJK Properties. Built to a high specification as standard each property is designed to offer the very best of modern living with excellent room proportions and quality finishings. Behind the kerb appeal each h...
"Homesearch Direct is delighted to offer to the market, this recently renovated three bedroom semi detached house situated in the sought after Stanwix location to the North of Carlisle on this quiet tree lined street. Ideal for families, this property is convenient for a wealth of local amenities ..."
"The Rufford is a three-bedroom family home. The open-plan kitchen/dining room has French doors leading into the garden. The front porch, inner hallway, downstairs cloakroom and cupboard take care of everyday storage. This home also has an en suite to bedroom one, family bathroom and integral garage."
"Looking for more space for your growing family…..….then step inside Keenan Road, a spacious, recently constructed and delightful three-bedroom detached home located to the south of Carlisle in a highly desirable residential location. QUOTE LI0465.
"
"A show home at The Paddock is now available to view, get in touch today to book your private appointment.Exclusive luxury is available in ‘Gordon Richard’s House’, a contemporary apartment building comprising eight generously proportioned two double bedroom properties ..."
Located in Shaddon Mill within easy access of local amenities and the City centre a fantastic two bedroom apartment with open plan living space and parking. EPC rating grade D. Council tax band C.
"This well-presented, terraced property is the perfect combination of traditional and contemporary. The two/three bedroom accommodation retains many original features and comprises vestibule, entrance hall, lounge with original cast iron fire, sitting room with multi fuel stove opening onto the..."
"Offered to the market in immaculate condition throughout, a three bedroom period mid terrace home situated on Warwick Road, in walking distance of the City Centre. Council tax band B. EPC rating D."
"Suitable for cash buyers only. Title is unregistered and title deeds are unavailable, may only get possessory title. Indemnity insurance is usually available. NB. This property is exclusively available to PRIVATE LANDLORDS accredited by the relevant local authority or who are members..."
"Located in a quiet cul de sac, in this popular and sought after development to the south side of Carlisle, with excellent local amenities and primary schools, a well presented, modern, 3 bedroomed, master ensuite, semi-detached family home with offroad parking to the front and enclosed gardens to..."
An immaculate modern home on a popular development to the south of the city. En-suite master bedroom. Good size garden. 
"NO CHAIN - This two bedroom semi-detached bungalow is nestled in a lovely cul-de-sac whilst benefitting many amenities close by. Boasting two spacious reception rooms, large L shaped conservatory, two bedrooms and modern shower room, viewing comes highly recommended. The accommodation br..."
"Looks and feels detached! Welcome to Number 30 Staunton Drive on the highly sought-after 'Coppice' development on the southeastern fringe of the city. QUOTE AP0121
"
A well presented semi detached bungalow offered to the market with no onward chain and situated in a highly sought after area to the West of Carlisle. EPC rating C . Council tax band B.
Exceptional traditional terrace retaining some original features boasting an EN SUITE shower room to master and a DOUBLE LENGTH GARAGE to rear. Price to sell this attractive home boasts a generous amount of internal living space with the bonus of low maintenance external space and having that...
"Offered to the market with no onward chain and huge potential, a three bedroom detached bungalow on a generous plot to the South of Carlisle on Blackwell Road. Council tax band C. EPC rating awaited."
"Welcome to 46 Holmrook Road, a deceptively spacious and well-presented three-bedroom semi-detached dormer bungalow with the added benefit of a conservatory, garage and drive! QUOTE LI0465.
"
"Take a closer look at the outstanding 28 Petteril Street. A gorgeous Victorian mid row Family Home bursting with charm and original features. If you are looking for a turn key property convenient for the City Centre, then this should be at the top of your must view list! Accommodation comprises:-..."
"If You're A Lifelong Blues Supporter You’ll Love Living So Close To Brunton Park. But this spectacular three bedroom terrace isn’t just for football fans, thanks to the superb high quality renovation that’s transformed it into a gorgeous family home. Property ref: KD..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, an immaculately presented three bedroom detached home situated to the West of Carlisle on the popular Brackenleigh Estate."
"Allan Estate Agents are pleased to offer to the market a newly renovated semi-detached bungalow situated in a cul-de-sac location to the West of Carlisle City Centre. The accommodation briefly comprises of entrance hall, lounge, modern kitchen, one double and one single bedroom and a contemporary..."
"The extremely popular Hanbury is a three-bedroom family home with a bright and modern open-plan kitchen/diner which has French doors leading into the garden. The downstairs WC, three handy storage cupboards and an en suite to bedroom one mean it ticks all the boxes for practical family living."
"*** NEW INSTRUCTION, MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! - FREE MORTGAGE ADVICE AVAILABLE ON THIS PROPERTY. LOVELY 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY, NOT TO BE MISSED, IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS / YOUNG FAMILIES, spacious accommodation, WELL PRES..."
"This two bedroom semi-detached bungalow is located within a highly sought after location to the North of Carlisle. Perfect for those looking for easy living, the property offers great space both internally and externally and is in a move in condition. Arrange your viewing today! The acco..."
"This three bedroom detached bungalow is in need of full modernisation throughout however once complete, this will be the perfect happily ever after home. Boasting a 25' living dining room, kitchen and utility, three bedrooms, front and rear gardens with a detached garage, there is ample space for..."
"A well presented three bedroom mid terraced property with a spacious dining kitchen and ground floor bathroom situated just off London Road in the city centre. The double glazed and gas central heated accommodation comprises of entrance hall, lounge with electric fire, dining kitchen and bathr..."
"This cleverly laid out home offers spacious, open plan living, perfect for those looking for their first home, or for those who are ready to downsize. The kitchen/dining area has a fully equipped L-shaped kitchen that features French doors with full height windows on both sides"
The home of great value! The stunning three bedroom Lisburn offers a bright living room plus a contemporary open-plan kitchen-diner with French doors leading to the garden. A handy cloakroom completes the downstairs space. Upstairs you'll find a beautiful master bedroom and two furthe...
"The home of great value! The stunning three bedroom Galway benefits from a combined kitchen-diner with French doors that lead out onto the garden, creating a seamless contemporary space. Across the hallway you'll find a separate living room, plus a useful storage cupboard and handy do..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, an immaculately presented, modern semi detached home with ample storage and situated conveniently to the West of Carlisle. EPC rating B. Council tax band B."
This could be your chance if you're looking to get a foothold on the property ladder in CA3! This gorgeous period mid-row terraced home has a very generous rear garden and is tucked away off the main drag in the highly sought-after Stanwix area of Carlisle. QUOTE AP0...
"A well presented two bedroom link detached bungalow with garage and a modern shower room located in a cul-de-sac in this sought after area to the west of the city, close to many amenities and transport links."
"An extended three bedroom semi detached family house situated in this sought after residential location to the West of Carlisle. Benefiting from a large ground floor extension, this spacious property offers loads of potential, whilst requiring cosmetic refurbishment. Accommodation comprises Entra..."
IN TIME FOR CHRISTMAS A newly built three bedroom family home will be rady for its new owners very soon. Viewing is highly recommended to appreciate the accommodation on offer.  
"A wonderful opportunity to purchase this two bedroom semi-detached bungalow pleasantly situated within Kelvin Grove, to the West of Carlisle. The bungalow boasts an upgraded kitchen and shower room internally whilst externally the gardens are a perfect for avid gardeners. Viewing comes highly rec..."
"A recently refurbished, three bedroom, end-terraced property situated within walking distance of the city centre, close to shops, local amenities and schools and with easy access to the M6 motorway at junction 43. The UPVC double glazed and gas central heated accommodation briefly comprises ve..."
"Open plan living on the ground floor, a hideaway bedroom with the second floor all to itself, the Moseley is a new home with great options. Young families, first-time buyers and professionals who have their eye on a potential home office, will enjoy making this flexible home their own."
"Purplebricks are proud to bring this large semi detached property to market. This incredible family home is situated in a popular location within Carlisle, close to schools, shops and transport links. The property benefits from Gas Central Heating and double glazing. The accommodation briefly co..."
"Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac overlooking the park, a three bedroom, semi-detached family home with generous gardens, driveway and garage, sold with the benefit of no onward chain. The double glazed and gas central heated accommodation briefly comprises entrance hall, dining lounge, conservat..."
"Homesearch Direct is pleased to offer to the market this traditional 1930's semi detached family house positioned in a quiet cul-de-sac location with a modern fitted kitchen and modern bathroom. Ideal for families or first time buyers, the property is being sold with no ongoing chain. Convenient ..."
A rare opportunity to purchase a substantial building plot on Durdar Road heading South from the city centre. With full planning permission for a 4 bedroom detached house this plot offers tremendous potential to build a fabulous family home. Excellent road links to the motorway at junction 42 o...
"Homesearch Direct is delighted to offer to the market this Victorian bay fronted mid terraced family house, situated in a popular residential location, bursting with charm and original period features with decorative coving and high ceilings, this property offers plenty of space for a growing fam..."
"Perfectly proportioned, the Alnwick has a stylish open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading into the garden, a good-sized living room and two double bedrooms. There's also off-road parking. Ideal for a first-time buyer looking for a fresh modern home you can make your own."
"Houses on the much sought-after Speckled Wood Development are rarely available… Number 14 Admiral Way is a real gem and features a fantastic landscaped west-facing rear garden! Recently constructed, with three bedrooms and two bathrooms, this beautifully presented and modern s..."
"This modern 3-bed semi in Carlisle offers an unparalleled combination of convenience and comfort. The home is situated close to all amenities in the city. Inside, the living area is bright and airy, with patio doors leading to the garden. The fully-equipped kitchen is modern and stylis..."
28 Bedford Road is an extended three bedroom semi detached family house situated on this popular street to the West of Carlisle between Dalston Road & Wigton Road. The property has a ground floor extension offering a good sized sun room and a large rear garden making this property an ideal family...
"This three-bedroom, semi-detached property is well presented throughout. On entering through the front door the hallway has stairs that lead to the first floor and access to the ground floor accommodation, comprising of a W.C, modern fitted kitchen with a range of wall and base units, spa..."
An immaculate two bedroom first floor apartment in the exclusive Twickenham Court. Spacious and well proportioned accommodation in beautiful surroundings with the benefit of being sold with no onward chain. 
"Vicinity Homes are delighted to offer to the market this immaculately presented, freehold, three bedroom end link house situated within the popular Persimmon Homes Speckled Wood Development which is located to the South of Carlisle City Centre. The property is close to a range of local amenities,..."
A top floor apartment in a modern development to the South of the city. ideally located for transport links as well as access to the M6. Safe and secure accommodation with intercom access. The property is offered to the market with no onward chain. 
"Found in the extremely sought-after High Green Croft area of Carlisle is this superb two-bedroom semi-detached house, an ideal purchase for a first-time buyer or a very solid rental investment. Internally the accommodation comprises an entrance porch, inner hallway, P-shaped living room and a din..."
"Perfect for downsizers... Number 49 Brisco Road is a delightful two-double-bedroom semi-detached bungalow situated in one of the city's most popular locations. QUOTE AP0121
"
"The home of great value! The Mayfield boasts a modern kitchen-diner and a separate bright living room, creating a seamless living space. A central staircase leads upstairs where you'll find two bedrooms and a great-sized family bathroom. *Images, dimensions, and layout..."
"This lovely and highly desirable home situated on Coney Street has so much going for it. Presented in a wonderful turn-key condition throughout, this property features an abundance of extended ground-floor living space with the added benefit of a new kitchen, bathroom and floor coverings ..."
"*NO ONWARD CHAIN*This well-presented 4 bedroom semi detached home is situated on a popular residential estate just outside of the city centre with good access to the M6. To the ground floor is a spacious lounge with open staircase to the first floor, good size dining kitchen with French..."
The Perfect Home Base If You Spend A Lot Of Time On The Road. If you clock up plenty of motorway miles this family-friendly three bedroom semi will make joining the M6 a breeze. Eden Park Crescent is a popular example of a 1950’s suburban estate that’s the perfect place to ...
"Homesearch Direct is delighted to offer to the market, this immaculately presented and spacious three bedroom semi detached family house situated in the sought after village of Cummersdale to the Western outskirts of the City. This extremely well presented family home has recently been decorated ..."
"This mid terraced property spans across three floors featuring two reception rooms, kitchen, bathroom, three double bedrooms and attic conversion. The property benefits from new carpets and flooring throughout and a private enclosed rear yard with on street parking. This property would make an..."
A spacious and well presented family home found in a sought after residential location to the West of Carlisle and in catchment area for popular schools. EPC rating is grade C. Council tax band A.
"Located to west of Carlisle, well served for access to the city centre and the nearby village of Dalston, a beautifully presented, detached park home, situated in a popular and well run community for the over 55s, offering flexible and low maintenance living accommodation with conservatory, 3 bed..."
"A two bedroom semi detached bungalow positioned in a quiet cul-de-sac in a popular location to the West of Carlisle. Requiring some cosmetic refurbishment, this is a property you can put your own stamp on. Boasting attractive front and rear gardens and a detached garage. Accommodation comprises E..."
"10 Miles McInnes Court is a spacious, top floor apartment situated in the heart of Stanwix and enjoying some of the finest views the city has to offer overlooking Rickerby Park. This property offers an abundance of space throughout and is convenient for a host of excellent amenities and is just a..."
"READY MADE INVESTMENT. Found to the east of Carlisle, close to local amenities & within walking distance of the city centre, an excellent opportunity to acquire ownership of a popular style, 4 bedroom mid-terrace property, with good tenants generating a potential income in the region of &po..."
"Located to the fringe of the city centre, handy for the University Of Cumbria and a selection of local facilities and amenities, an interesting investment option to acquire the freehold of an occupied ground floor business unit, along with a self-contained 2 bedroom flat to the first floor with a..."
"The home of great value! The Kerry combines a modern open-plan kitchen and dining area with the privacy of a cosy, separate living room to create the perfect living space. Upstairs benefits from two double bedrooms and a modern family bathroom. *Images, dimensions, and..."
"**NO CHAIN**
Purplebricks are proud to bring this Mid link house to market. A superb three bedroom mid link house situated within this popular area. Conveniently close to local shops and amenities including schools, western bypass and hospital. This excellent home is ideal for First time buyers, ..."
"A deceptively spacious two bedroom end terraced house with a generous reception hall. Located within this highly sought after area, conveniently close to both Stanwix and Kingstown retail park. With the addition of picturesque walks to Rickerby park and surrounding countryside whilst also providi..."
"*** NEW INSTRUCTION, MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! LOVELY 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY - IDEAL FOR YOUNG / GROWING FAMILIES, NOT TO BE MISSED, spacious accommodation, gas central heating / double glazing, open plan modern kitchen / living..."
"A well presented detached park home, perfectly nestled for quiet and easy living. Boasting a spacious and modern interior, the home benefits two/three bedrooms and is available fully furnished subject to negotiation. Orton Grange Park is a highly reputable park offering 12 month residential occup..."
"A three bedroom, two reception room semi-detached property with double glazing and gas central heating throughout. This spacious family home is in need of some modernisation and benefits from a large garden, garage and driveway."
A well presented and deceptively spacious four bedroom mid terrace home found in the popular Urban Village of Denton Holme which is within walking distance of the City Centre. EPC rating E. Council tax band B.
A ONE BEDROOM retirement apartment with L-SHAPED LIVING ROOM and JULIET BALCONY on the FIRST FLOOR of a McCARTHY STONE Retirement Living development located close to a MORRISONS SUPERMARKET and BUS STOPS.
Springbok Properties offers this well presented two bedroom flat to the market. Situated in the heart of Carlisle Viewing is advised. 
"Presented in fantastic order throughout a three bedroom mid terraced property to the north of the river Eden within easy access of local shops, schools and transport links. EPC rating is grade C. Council tax band A."
"A three bedroom mid-terraced home located within a popular residential area to the North of Carlisle. Boasting a spacious living room and well proportioned kitchen diner with direct garden access, the property will suit a range of buyers. The accommodation, which has gas central heating..."
A beautifully presented and spacious top floor apartment in the popular Hanson Place development situated minutes from the City Centre. The apartment is neutrally decorated and carpeted throughout with the kitchen area and bathroom floors being vinyl. All rooms lead off the entrance hall which ha...
"BPK are pleased to offer this superb, well maintained Two Bedroom Semi-Detached house. Beautifully decorated and perfect for a first time buyer. Situated within this sought after estate West of the city, conveniently close to a wealth of local shops and amenities including the hospital, with eas..."
"A highly desirable, modern, 5th floor apartment in the extremely popular Shaddon Mill. Ideally located for the City Centre, hospital and local amenities. This excellent apartment comprises of communal entrance with lift and stairs to 5th floor, spacious entrance hall with storage, open plan l..."
"Wow, this is really something… situated in one of the city's most popular and loved locations you’ll find the absolutely fantastic 38 Cumberland Street! QUOTE LI0465
"
"As part of the Low Cost Housing Scheme (reduced from the open market value by 25%) a well presented mid-link property benefiting from fully fitted kitchen, generous lounge with patio doors to enclosed lawned gardens, three good size bedrooms and two bathrooms. Parking for two cars to the front..."
"A three bedroom, two reception room, mid-terraced property which retains many original features, situated close to local amenities, schools and hospital and only a short walk to the city centre."
"NO CHAIN! Fantastic investment opportunity! A spacious three bedroom semi-detached house with some decorative upgrading required. The accommodation briefly comprises; two reception rooms, three bedroom, first floor bathroom and gardens to the front and rear. The property has double glaz..."
"A spacious three bedroom semi detached property in need of some upgrading located to the west of the city, no onward chain, central heating, double glazing. EPC rating awaited, council tax band A."
"A deceptively spacious double fronted three bedroom end terraced property located in the popular Denton Holme area of the city, with two reception rooms and a first floor bathroom."
"Homesearch Direct is delighted to offer to the market this immaculately presented mid terraced property, offering a modern kitchen and luxurious modern bathroom. Situated on this quiet side street just off Warwick Road to the East of Carlisle. Having been successfully rented out for the last 5 ye..."
"FOR SALE WITH SITTING TENANT. A three bedroom, two reception mid terrace home situated on a lovely residential street in Denton Holme. EPC rating D. Council tax band A."
"Looking for your first step onto the property ladder or more space for your growing family? Then I urge you to view 42 Colville Street…..a spacious and beautifully presented, three-bedroom and two reception room mid-row terraced property situated in this highly desirable residential loc..."
A fantastic opportunity for first time buyers or growing families to purchase a spacious and well presented three bedroom end link house situated in this quiet location to the Southern edge of Carlisle convenient for a wealth of local amenities. The property which is offered in excellent decorati...
"Step inside the charming 6 Irvings Place, a beautifully presented mid row cottage situated on the outskirts of Carlisle. This lovely property offers fantastic character and has been recently updated, offering a superb modern fitted kitchen and bathroom. Ideal for a variety of purchasers, includin..."
"A well presented three double bedroom mid terraced house perfect for a young family or those looking to get on the property ladder. The accommodation, which has double glazing and gas central heating, briefly comprises: entrance hall, living dining room, kitchen and side access to the g..."
"Number Three Thomas Street is a charming period terrace with an abundance of original features throughout, generous room sizes and offers well-balanced living accommodation over two floors. Featuring a gorgeous living room, a showstopper of a kitchen/diner, t..."
"This two double bedroom, ground floor apartment offers an en-suite master bedroom, spacious lounge, integrated kitchen, family bathroom, storage and ample parking with communal gardens."
"Offered to the market in turn key condition having been fully refurbished throughout to an extremely high standard, a spacious mid terrace home situated on a quiet residential street in the Urban Village of Denton Holme. EPC rating C. Council tax band A."
"An excellent opportunity to acquire a Two Bedroom Semi-Detached House in a very popular area west of the city centre. Situated conveniently close to local shops and amenities including schools, the western bypass and picturesque walks. The property benefits from gas central heating and double g..."
"PROPERTY LAUNCH - Saturday 11th March between 11am and 12:30pm. Arrange your viewing today! Situated within a sought after location to the North of Carlisle, this three bedroom semi-detached property is perfect for first time buyers, young families or investors. Complete with two recepti..."
"We are proud to offer this Two Bedroom Semi Detached Bungalow – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £125,000 - £135,000*"
"An immaculately presented, second floor apartment, with private parking space, enjoying open views over the waterfall towards the nearby fields.   River View is situated in The Mills development in Denton Holme close to local amenities, bus routes and within walking distance of the c..."
"PUBLIC NOTICE ADDRESS…162 Watermans Walk, Carlisle CA1 3TU We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £120,000. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contracts take..."
A well presented three bedroom mid terrace home situated within walking distance of the City Centre in the popular 'Urban Village' of Denton Holme. Council tax band A. EPC rating D.
"This three bedroom traditional mid terraced property is full of character and original features. With two reception rooms, kitchen, bathroom and three bedrooms this property is the ideal home for a growing family or first time buyer.  Situated just off London Road within easy reach o..."
"A spacious first floor apartment in a well maintained and secure apartment block in a popular location to the East of the city. Two double bedrooms, spacious hallway, large lounge and generous separate kitchen are all on offer at Watermans Walk. "
An immaculately presented end link two bedroom property to the South of the city. Ideally suited for first time buyers or investors alike. 
"First time buyers take a closer look at the outstanding 82 Whernside. An exceptional mid row property, with quality fixtures and fittings throughout. This turn key home would make a great buy for those looking to get on to the property ladder. Accommodation comprises Entrance into Vestibule, Good..."
"OFFERED FOR SALE UNDER THE AFFORDABLE HOUSING SCHEME AT 70% MARKET VALUE. A well presented three bed, two bath townhouse in a popular residential development on the western fringe of the city. Offered in good order throughout and with the benefit of off-street parking and a rear garden. "
"Vicinity Homes are delighted to offer to the market this immaculately presented, modern, two bedroom mid link house situated within the popular Persimmon Homes Brackenleigh Development which is located to the West of Carlisle City Centre. The property is close to a range of local amenities, regul..."
"If you are seeking a straightforward project in Carlisle, this property should be at the top of your list. Featuring three spacious bedrooms, one bathroom and two stylish reception rooms, along with wonderful kerb appeal, this terraced home has a great deal to offer any buyer.
"
"An Affordable Way To Buy Your Own Home On This Quiet Cul-De-Sac, With More Security Than Renting. Thanks to Shared Ownership, you get to enjoy 100% of this bungalow but only need to buy 75%. It’s neat, tidy and ready for you to make it your new home.
"
"Finish Work At 5.30pm, Walk Through Your Front Door At 5.45. Life’s too short to sit on buses or in rush hour traffic. After a hard shift at the hospital or McVitie’s you can walk home and be sat with your feet up in under fifteen minutes. Property ref: KD0516
"
"Welcoming to the market a quaint semi detached cottage North of the River, the property is ideally situated for Motorway access, Kingstown Industrial Estate and on a regular City bus route. The property benefits from entrance into vestibule, spacious living room, kitchen/diner, three pi..."
"An individual two bedroom property located within easy access of local amenities, supermarkets, schools and within walking distance of the City Centre. EPC rating is grade D. Council tax band A."
"48 Boundary Road is a traditional, bay fronted three bedroom end terraced house situated in the Currock area of Carlisle. The property has a wealth of amenities on its doorstep and is also handy for Carlisle City Centre. The property itself offers plenty of space and is a home that you can put yo..."
"A spacious, three bedroom, two reception room, mid-terraced property situated on a quiet no-through road just off London Road within walking distance of the city centre and St Nicholas Retail Park.  The accommodation, which retains a wealth of original features, briefly comprises ent..."
"Positioned in a quiet cul-de-sac location in this ever popular residential development to the West of Carlisle is this spacious mid link house with large driveway providing ample off street parking, modern kitchen and bathroom, making this property a great first time buy or buy to let. Being sold..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a spacious two bedroom semi detached property, built less than ten years ago, ideal for a first time buyer or investors for rental purposes. Entering through the front door you will find a bright, spacious lounge with plenty of room for an array of furniture..."
"A spacious, well-presented, two bedroom, two reception room, terraced property situated in the popular residential area of Denton Holme with a variety of local amenities and within walking distance of the city centre. The double glazed and central heated accommodation comprises vestibule, entr..."
" *** NEW INSTRUCTION, MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! - FREE MORTGAGE ADVICE AVAILABLE ON THIS PROPERTY. LOVELY 2 BEDROOM TERRACED PROPERTY, NOT TO BE MISSED, IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS, YOUNG FAMILIES AND INVESTORS!! Spacious accommodat..."
*FREEHOLD* This ready to move into 2 bedroomed ground floor property is not only freehold but also has the benefit of a garden and parking. Recently decorated throughout with a newly fitted boiler it a perfect buy to let or would make a fantastic permanent base. Gas central heating and double gla...
"Purplebricks are delighted to off this 3 bedroomed, 2 reception roomed Mid terraced house to the market. The property has the benefit of Central Heating and Double Glazing and briefly comprises:- Entrance Vestibule, Entrance Hall, Sitting Room, Living Room, Rear Hall, Bathroom and 3 Bedrooms. Out..."
"Spacious two bedroom, top floor apartment with private gated allocated parking space. Great city centre location within walking distance of a wide range of amenities. Strong yielding buy to let or excellent lock up and leave property."
"Looking to add a property to your growing portfolio… Then I suggest you take a look at 15 The Grange, Newfield Drive! In terms of value for money, this flat will take some beating. ""Turn-key"" ready and with all the amenities you need close by this well-presented firs..."
"GUIDE PRICE £110,000+ FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCITON ON Thursday 30th March 2023 AT THE HALSTON HOTEL, CARLISLE - For bidding registration, please visit auctionhousecumbria.co.uk - 3 bedroomed semi-detached house on west side of City between Wigton Rd and Orton Rd with easy access to the new western..."
"Suitable for cash buyers only. Title is unregistered and title deeds are unavailable, may only get possessory title. Indemnity insurance is usually available. NB. This property is exclusively available to PRIVATE LANDLORDS who are accredited by the relevant local authority or who..."
FOR INVESTMENT PURPOSES ONLY A beautifully presented ground floor apartment in a private setting. A successful investment for the current owner now being sold with no onward chain. 
"An excellent opportunity to purchase a recently decorated and well presented two bedroom end of terrace house, located to the North of Carlisle. Ideal for either First Time Buyers or Investors, the property is ready for the next owner to move straight in. Arrange your viewing today. The ..."
"*** LOW COST HOUSING *** 15 Hanson Place is a beautifully appointed, turn key, lift serviced second floor apartment situated on this picturesque street just a short walk into Carlisle City Centre. The apartment is spacious and is presented in pristine decorative order throughout with a modern ope..."
"A three bedroom, end-terraced property situated to the west of the city in a popular residential area with primary and secondary schools nearby, shops and the Cumberland Infirmary and close to regular bus routes. No onward chain."
"A nicely presented and spacious second floor apartment located in the historic quarter of Carlisle City Centre. Boasting a spacious open plan living kitchen and two double bedrooms, this apartment is ideal for first time buyers, landlords or as a city crash pad. Viewing comes highly recommended.<..."
"This two bedroom mid-terrace property is perfect for First Time Buyers or Investors. Complete with spacious living room, two bedrooms and generous rear garden, contact Hunters to arrange your viewing today! The double glazed and gas central heated accommodation briefly comprises of: entr..."
"A modern 2 bed mid terraced house to the North of the city centre with Conservatory, Driveway parking and large rear Garden. Close to the amenities of Stanwix this well presented property briefly comprises:- spacious lounge with dining space, fitted kitchen and conservatory. First floor with 2..."
Presented in fantastic order throughout a this two bedroom terraced property within easy access of local amenities. Early viewing advised. EPC rating is grade D. Council tax band A.
"Situated on a quiet street just a 10 minute walk into the city centre, this well presented, spacious, two bedroom terraced property would make an ideal first time buy or buy to let investment.  Holme Terrace is an excellent location for the city centre, Carlisle Castle and Cathedral ..."
"A well presented two bedroom semi detached house, occupying a generous corner plot with a large private rear garden. The property would make an ideal first time buy or buy to let property. Convenient for a wealth of local amenities and just a short walk into Carlisle City Centre. Accommodation co..."
"Perfect for that first step onto the property ladder… Welcome to 70 Crossways, a delightful and immaculately presented two-bedroom end-terraced property, located within the ever-popular residential area of Harraby to the south of the city with an incredibly large lawned rear garden, dri..."
"Ideally suited to the first time buyer or buy to let investor, a three bedroom mid terraced property situated in this popular residential area to the west of the city. The UPVC double glazed and gas central heated accommodation briefly comprises of entrance hall, lounge and dining kitchen. To ..."
A three storey townhouse with three bedrooms and two bathrooms situated just a short walk into the city centre and close to the Cumberland Infirmary.   The double glazed and electric heated accommodation does require some upgrading throughout as reflected in the price. The prope...
"Found in the heart of Carlisle city centre in the convenient area of Botchergate is this traditional 2 bedroom terraced house with on street parking to the front and a private yard to the rear. The accommodation is spacious throughout with living room, and dining/kitchen and utility room to the g..."
"A spacious three bedroom end terraced property in need of some updating, easy access to retail parks, bus routes, schools and M6 motorway. Council tax band A. EPC rating D."
"First Time Buyers take a closer look at 20 Whinsmoor Drive, a beautifully presented two bedroom end link home offered to the market in immaculate decorative order throughout. Ready to move straight into and being a great first step onto the property ladder, this lovely home benefits from a modern..."
"An immaculately presented, newly refurbished, two double bedroom, mid-terraced property with first floor bathroom and garden situated in the popular area of Denton Holme just a five minute walk to the city centre and railway station. The double glazed and gas central heated accommodation is ne..."
"Fresh, Clean, Accessible…And Ready For You To Make It Your Own. This modern ground floor flat is in the same showhome condition as it was when first built in 2006. It’s perfect if you’re wanting a quiet and secure home without any stairs. Property ref: KD0516
"
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, a well presented first floor apartment situated in a prime City Centre location above the Lanes Shopping Centre on Scotch Street. EPC rating grade C. Council tax band A. Leasehold 141 years remaining."
"BPK are pleased to offer this ready to move in, well maintained Two Bedroom Terraced House. Newly decorated and newly carpeted throughout making it perfect for a first time buyer or a buy to let property. Situated within walking distance to the city centre with shops, doctors and other amenities..."
"An immaculately presented, neutrally decorated, mid-link property situated to the North of the River in a quiet position. Ideal for local shops, park and only a few minutes from the City Centre. Entrance into hallway, leading to neutral kitchen with a good range of wall and base units, integrated..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, a two bedroom mid terrace home within walking distance of the City Centre. EPC rating awaited. Council tax band A."
"Homesearch Direct is pleased to offer to the market this traditional, well presented mid terraced house situated in a sought after residential location to the North of Carlisle. Making an ideal purchase for first time buyers or the buy to let market, the property is being sold with no ongoing cha..."
"This traditional mid-terraced two bedroom, two reception room property has been completely refurbished and re-modernised throughout. Finished to an extremely high standard, this property would make an ideal first time buy or an investment opportunity."
"A beautifully appointed two bedroom mid terraced house presented to the market in turn key condition and making an excellent first time buy or buy to let. Positioned on this quiet side street and convenient for Carlisle City Centre. Accommodation comprises Entrance into Lounge, Modern Fitted Dini..."
A modern first floor apartment on a popular development. The property is being sold at 80% of the full market value as part of the affordable housing scheme and is therefore not open to investment purchase. Sold with no onward chain this is an excellent choice for your first home. 
An immaculately presented two bedroom mid terrace home situated in the popular 'Urban Village' of Denton Holme. EPC rating C. Council tax band A.
Take a look at this two bedroom mid terrace on Currock Street. Ideally located for bus routes and local amenities. A great contender for first time buyers. 
DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS end terrace with REAR GARDEN and ATTIC SPACE. This end terrace offers superb space for the price tag and a potential yield of 8%.
"A rare opportunity to purchase a two bedroom end link bungalow situated to the east of the city in an established residential area with communal gardens, located at the head of a cul-de-sac."
"Located in the City Centre, a well presented first floor two bedroom apartment arranged over two floors. EPC rating is grade D. Council tax band B."
"Situated conveniently for the University of Cumbria is this deceptively spacious mid terraced house which has been a successful student let, generating an income of £900 PCM. The property has been recently decorated and is also just a short walk into Carlisle City Centre. Accommodation comp..."
"This traditional two bedroom terraced property is situated in a quiet no-through road just off Warwick Road with an open outlook to the front with a green area and childrens park. The double glazed and central heated accommodation comprises lounge, dining kitchen, two bedrooms, family bathroom..."
A rare opportunity to purchase a beautifully appointed and fully furnished Grade II Listed ground floor apartment situated in the heart of Carlisle City Centre. This charming property boasts many original period features with a modern touch. The property has been utilised as a successful Airbnb r...
"Homesearch Direct is pleased to offer to the market this spacious first floor flat situated in a popular residential location just off London Road to the South of Carlisle. Perfect for a variety of purchasers, the property boasts a wealth of local amenities on its doorstep and is conveniently loc..."
"*** BEING SOLD WITH A LONG STANDING TENANT WHO IS CURRENTLY PAYING £485.00 PER CALENDAR MONTH*** Homesearch Direct is pleased to offer to the market this spacious, three bedroom semi detached family house situated at the head of a cul-de-sac in this quiet residential location to the West o..."
"This two bedroom, mid-terraced property offers two reception rooms, modern kitchen, ground floor bathroom and two double bedrooms with a private rear yard and on-street parking. The property has UPVC double glazed windows fitted throughout which are less than 8 years old. The roof has also bee..."
"This two bedroom, traditional, mid-terraced property is ideal for a first time buyer also a perfect opportunity for an investor as it has previously been a successful rental property. With modern kitchen and bathroom the property is in good decorative order throughout and would be available to..."
A two bedroom terrace in the heart of Denton Holme within walking distance of local amenities and bus routes. Ideally suited for first time buyers and investors. 
"A spacious two bedroom, two shower room, first floor apartment with an open plan kitchen, living and dining area, entry phone and allocated parking located close to the city centre."
"READY MADE INVESTMENT. Found to the West of Carlisle, close to local amenities & within walking distance of the city centre, an excellent opportunity to acquire ownership of a popular style, mid terraced mid-terrace property, currently with 3 let rooms with good tenants generating an income..."
"An opportunity to purchase a three bedroom terraced property situated to the west of the city close to the Cumberland Infirmary. The double glazed and gas central heated accommodation briefly comprises of entrance hall, spacious dining lounge and kitchen with understairs storage. To the first ..."
"NO ONGOING CHAIN. Found to the West of Carlisle, close to local amenities & within walking distance of the city centre, a popular style, mid terraced 2 reception, 2 bedroom property. Ideal first time buy or buy to let, the property is found in good order, with some updating required and b..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, a well presented first floor apartment situated in a prime City Centre location above the Lanes Shopping Centre which briefly comprises of entrance hall, living room with gas fire, fitted kitchen, one double bedroom and a three piece bathroom. The prope..."
"***IDEAL BUY TO LET or FIRST TIME BUYER*** Low service charges!!. A spacious, neutrally decorated first floor apartment in the popular Church conversion at Methodist Court. Entrance hall with secure entry phone system. Large Open plan lounge/Kitchen diner with modern kitchen. Appliances include i..."
A two bedroom mid terrace property with two reception rooms in need of updating. Ideally suited for investors or first time buyers. 
"Purplebricks are proud to bring this Terraced House on Dalston Street onto Market. This property will be ideal first time home or the perfect investment property ready to go for the open rental market. The Lounge has plenty of space for a range of furniture, feature fireplace, under stairs stora..."
"A Two storey mid terraced house with Two large ground floor cellar rooms, close to the city centre and local amenities this property also offers excellent potential for investment purposes or with a little updating to a spacious 2 bedroom home. The property briefly comprises:- Entrance Hallway..."
"Here is a perfect rental investment or opportunity for first time buyers to buy a two bedroom mid terrace traditional property, located south Carlisle, within walking distance of the city centre and the University campus on Fusehill St. There is a handy bus route and very convenient amenities nea..."
"Wow, this is really something… situated in one of the city's most quiet and loved locations you’ll find the absolutely fantastic 8 Melrose Terrace! If your looking for that perfect first step onto the property ladder, then look no further! QUOTE LI0465.
"
"**Perfect First Time Buy**
20 Longholme Road is a good size two bedroom ground floor flat. Competitively priced and featuring a garden to the front, this flat will appeal to a range of buyers.
The accommodation benefits from double glazed windows throughout and offers well laid out accommodation ..."
"This two bedroom, first floor apartment is offered for sale in immaculate condition with double glazing and a newly fitted combi boiler. The property has been neutrally decorated and has newly fitted carpets, flooring and new blinds throughout. Off the entrance hall there are two bedrooms, new..."
"A spacious, well-presented, first floor apartment situated in the popular Mills development in Denton Holme just a ten minute walk to the city centre and close to Holme Head bay waterfall with pleasant walks along the Carlisle to Dalston cycle path. The well-maintained communal areas have the ..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, a well presented semi detached home situated to the West of Carlisle. EPC rating D. Council tax band A."
"Looking to add a property to your portfolio… Then I suggest you take a look at 10 Maryport Court! In terms of value for money, this flat will take some beating. ""Turn-key"" ready and with all the amenities you need within walking distance this well-presented firs..."
"This third-floor apartment is well presented throughout and enjoys wonderful far-reaching views. Complete with spacious living dining room, double bedroom and an allocated parking space in the communal garage, this property is perfect for first time buyers, investors or those looking for a city c..."
"A two bedroom terraced property in need of some modernisation situated to the west of the city close to the Cumberland Infirmary. The central heated accommodation has a spacious lounge, kitchen, rear hallway and ground floor bathroom. To the first floor are two double bedrooms."
INVESTMENT ONLY This first floor flat is being sold with a sitting tenant. 
"Situated to the West of Carlisle, in this popular residential location is 16 Whinnie House Road, a spacious first floor flat being sold with no ongoing chain. The property does require some cosmetic refurbishment but would suit a variety of purchasers from first time buyers or buy to let landlord..."
A spacious and well maintained second floor apartment offered for sale with no onward chain and benefiting from garage parking and pleasant views across the city. EPC rating D. Council tax band B.
A superb two bedroom spacious and bright upper flat situated in a great position within this sought after area. The property is 75% shared ownership and is restricted to 55 years old or over. The property is decorated to a high standard throughout other benefits include electric storage heating a...
"An ideal project for an investor looking at flipping a property, a buy to let investment or a first time buyer, this mid terraced two double bedroom property is in need of a complete renovation. The property has a recently installed gas central heating system and benefits from two reception ro..."
NB. This property is exclusively available to OWNER OCCUPIERS for the first four weeks of marketing after which the property will additionally be marketed to PRIVATE LANDLORDS accredited by the relevant local authority or who are members of the National Landlords Association The proper...
"Ideal as a first time buy, or with great buy to let potential, set in a popular area, in easy walking distance of the town centre and close to local facilities, amenities and the Cumberland Infirmary, a purpose built, top floor apartment offering two double bedroomed accommodation (the master bei..."
"A lovely two bedroomed ground floor retirement apartment, located on Riverside Way, Greystone Road, a short distance from the city centre of Carlisle. Local amenities are within easy reach, with a leading supermarket and J43 of the M6 a short drive away. "
"A first floor two bedroom flat located to the west of the city in the ever popular residential area of Morton Park. Close to a range of local amenities, including shops, GP surgery, Church, bus route and easy access to the city bypass. NO ONWARD CHAIN"
"A well presented 2 bedroom ground floor flat situated within this highly sought after area of Stanwix. Located conveniently close to local shops and amenities. The property is 75% ownership, there is an age restriction of over 55s and you must be retired. Benefits include electric storage heating..."
"Two bedroom ground floor flat. Gas central heating and triple glazing and a Careline Energy Call System. Comprises: Hall, Living Room, Kitchen, 2 double Bedrooms and a Bathroom/WC. Externally there are communal gardens and parking. Occupants should be 50 years of age and over. 70% ownership ..."
A ground floor flat ideally suited for investors or first time buyers. Within easy access from the designated parking area sitting amongst quiet communal grounds. 
"Looking to add a property to your portfolio… Then I suggest you take a look at 22 Rydal Street! In terms of value for money, this flat will take some beating. ""Turn-key"" ready and with all the amenities you need within walking distance this well-presented first-..."
"For sale by the modern method of auction and with no onward chain, a well presented first floor flat situated to the East of Carlisle. Council tax band A. EPC rating C."
WANT MORE FOR YOUR MONEY? Then take a look at this immaculate ground floor flat with no minimum effort required to make it a home. 
"PROPERTY LAUNCH - Friday 17th March between 1pm and 2:30pm. Book your viewing today! NO ONWARD CHAIN- Great investment opportunity to purchase a 3 bedroomed property with a generously sized rear garden priced to sell. With gas central heating and double glazing, front and rear gardens."
"Located in a quiet part of this always popular and sought after area to the north of the city, in a cul-de-sac setting with easy access to transport links to the town centre and the facilities and amenities of Kingstown and Stanwix Village, a 1st floor, 70% shared ownership 2 bed flat for the ove..."
"Reception Room, Two Bedrooms, Bedroom 3/Study, Kitchen/Diner and Bathroom/WC, Lease with approximately 92 years remaining, GIA (Source: EPC) approximately 57 sq m (613 sq ft), Communal Parking to rear and side Patio area, Carlisle city centre and its rail station are situated a touch over 1 mile ..."
"A two Bedroomed ground floor retirement apartment, located to the North of Carlisle, ideally positioned for access to local amenities and access routes across the city. This 70% shared ownership of the property is available to persons over the age of 55 and also retired.
"
"GUIDE PRICE £45,000+ FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCITON ON Thursday 30th March 2023 AT THE HALSTON HOTEL, CARLISLE - For bidding registration, please visit auctionhousecumbria.co.uk - Good investment property. 2 bed terraced house near City centre. Needs modernisation. Good rental potential."
"An opportunity to purchase a 70% share of this ground floor apartment situated North of the river, subject to age restrictions. EPC rating D. Council tax band B."
A two bedroom ground floor shared ownership retirement apartment located in small development of homes to the north of the city in a peaceful residential area. Price denotes a 70% share - qualifying criteria applies.
"GUIDE PRICE £40,000+ FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION ON THURSDAY 30TH MARCH 2023 AT THE HALSTON HOTEL, CARLISLE. For bidding registration, please visit auctionhouse.co.uk - Mid terraced house in popular street on west side of City, between Wigton & Newtown Roads near Cumberland Infirmary. Requires mo..."
"GUIDE PRICE £35,000 - £45,000 FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCITON ON Thursday 30th March 2023 AT THE HALSTON HOTEL, CARLISLE - For bidding registration, please visit auctionhousecumbria.co.uk - 3 bed terraced house with gardens situated on the west side of the City off Orton Road. In need of modernisatio..."
A well presented and deceptively spacious four bedroom town house offering approx. 1700 square feet of living accommodation and which offers the added advantage of being sold with immediate vacant possession and therefore benefiting from having no onward chain.
*DISCREET MARKETING* 100 Key Properties are delighted to present this substantial country residence which offers circa 6600sqft of accommodation including multiple outbuildings all set within the most idyllic mature grounds of 9.5 acres in a quiet semi-rural setting approx 3 miles from...
Listed village house two miles from Chelmsford city.
"Where rural charm meets modern sophistication. Set in the peaceful surroundings of Chignal Smealey, this former farm has been lovingly transformed into 8 exquisite homes, each with its own unique character. From the bespoke interiors to the expansive private gardens, every aspect of these homes h..."
"LAST TWO REMAINING PLOTS *INCENTIVES AVAILABLE, PART X, CASHBACK & ASSISTED MOVE. Your own luxury detached waterside home with PRIVATE LAKE, HOT TUB and a huge luxury specification to include air con, underfloor heating, CUBE taps, all flooring & luxury appliances as standard. t&c's apply "
**Last One Remaining*** A detached four bedroom luxury home on The Lakes at Channels; A unique waterside development situated just 3.3 miles from Chelmsford Station.
"Last 2 luxury waterside detached homes on a private lake. Make this your new year home. Open plan living area plus 4 beds, 4 bathrooms and a study. Decking and hot tub overlooking your private lake for residents only. INCENTIVES AVAILABLE ACROSS OUR DEVELOPMENTS, PART X, CASHBACK & ASSISTED MOVE. "
"Constructed in 2002 and offered chain free, the property is situated on one of the largest plots in Beaulieu. It has fine symmetrical elevations including a classic portico and provides brick elevations under a slate tile roof. The accommodation has numerous large windows with well-proportioned r..."
"A rare opportunity to acquire this Grade II listed period home, arranged over 3 floors with 6 bedrooms. The house enjoys an idyllic setting overlooking the green at Writtle. No onward chain."
A privately situated listed village house and annexe.
"An imposing detached family home nestled within the former grounds on Springfield Place, situated in a select private development, featuring a mature westerly facing rear garden and located approximately 1.2 miles from Chelmsford city centre. EPC D (Ref: CHS200584)"
"**GUIDE £1,300,000 - £1,400,000** Situated on 0.35 acre is this immaculate extended and refurbished 4/5 bedroom family home. The property benefits from a 21' kitchen/breakfast room, 24' family area, 24' dining area, 17' study, 12' utility room with a bath, groun..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £1.25m - £1.3m** Stunning 5 bedroom home at Paglesham Place, a bespoke development surrounded by countryside. Beautiful open plan kitchen/dining/family room with bi-fold doors, utility room, home cinema room - ONE OFF OPPORTUNITY"
"GUIDE PRICE: £1,250,000 - £1,300,000. With a specification to the highest of orders is this simply fantastic modern family residence, located in Springfield Road and just 1.5 miles from the A12. This re-modelled home offers contemporary living throughout and includes a digitally controlled Lightw..."
"Substantial Grade II Listed former house and coach house, in over an acre."
"With an impressive 2500 sqft of accommodation set over three floors we are delighted to offer to the sales market this brand new 5/7 bedroom detached residence situated in one of the most prestigious private roads in Chelmsford, Essex. The home has been meticulously designed and built to the high..."
"Situated in the sought after village location of Writtle, Redwood Gardens is a private development conveniently located within walking distance of the village and within walking distance of a regular bus service that runs through the village and provides access into Chelmsford and beyond."
Last of this design availableBe a part of Wimbush Waters with this wonderful luxury detached waterside home. Open plan living over two floors & fronting onto the lake with decking. Fitted with our premium luxury finish. All German appliances & flooring included. 
"LOCATED WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO ALL LOCAL AMENITIES & SCHOOLS! OFFERING 5 BIG BEDROOMS, TRIPLE LENGTH GARAGE, LARGE GARDEN, PARK VIEWS & MUCH MORE!"
Superb refurbished five bedroom detached residence offering versatile accommodation on a plot of approximately half an acre.
"Situated in the popular development of Beaulieu overlooking Beaulieu Park, accessed via a private driveway with a large plot, plenty of parking, a double garage and good room sizes. An incredible opportunity to purchase this amazing house! EPC awaited (Ref: CHS230083)"
"Boasting an impressive 21' OPEN PLAN kitchen/family room, GARAGE & CARPORT plus EN-SUITE to master bedroom is this IMMACULATELY PRESENTED three bedroom EXTENDED semi-detached property. Offering a well-proportioned rear garden, a spacious 15' lounge & located within walking distance of all local s..."
"A larger than average one bedroom ground floor apartment offering two bath / shower rooms, a carport and a generous living room, situated 0.7 miles from Chelmsford station and offered for sale with no onward chain. An internal viewing is advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer...."
"A detached four bedroom residence in a private setting on a plot of approx. one acre (option to purchase additional paddock land). Beautiful interior including an Orangery, elevated to enjoy the surrounding open farmland. Well placed for Chelmsford City Centre, main line rail services and exce..."
"A unique conversion of an Essex farm building designed by the renowned Victorian architect and philanthropist, Frederick Chancellor."
"A substantial period home of approximately 2500 sq ft retaining much of its Victorian elegance . The property has the benefit of the adjacent detached coach house offering versatile use, ideal for separate home office. Close proximity to the City centre and Oaklands Park. NO ONWARD CHAIN."
LOCATION! LOCATION! LOCATION! ONWARD CHAIN COMPLETE - This large extended 5 bedroom detached house is situated in an enviable location at the far end of this prestigious small lane of only a handful of other executive style properties on large plots. The property offers excellent potential t (cont.)
Flexible family home ideal for multigenerational living.
This stunning five bedroom family home is located on the notoriously popular Galleywood Road
"Quote reference *MB0473* Located within Chancellor Park is this high specification five bedroom family home and one bedroom annex housing the 'clock tower'. Having the added benefit of NO ONWARD CHAIN, an internal viewing is highly recommended. 
"
"This beautiful detached seven bedroom family home is situated in one of Great Baddow's most desirable roads. The internal accommodation boasts; 18' living room, 20' conservatory, 16' dining room, 19' kitchen/breakfast area and ground floor cloakroom. The property has seven bedrooms, a..."
"BUILT TO THE ‘YORK’ HOUSE TYPE BY COUNTRYSIDE PROPERTIES IN THE ORIGINAL PART OF BEAULIEU PARK, IS THE SPACIOUS AND VERSATILE FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE SET OVER TWO FLOORS. DOUBLE GARAGE. STUDY. LIVING ROOM. DINING ROOM. KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM. 2 MINUTES WALK TO THE DEER PARK AND..."
A versatile three storey city house with garaging and studio.
"A detached extended and upgraded chalet style bungalow, set on a large plot, semi rural setting offering 4/5 bedrooms, 5 bathrooms, fitted kitchen and utility room, garden room, double carport, workshop, self contained annex, large driveway, access to Chelmsford City and A130 for Stansted Airport."
"An opportunity to acquire a portfolio of 5 Leasehold apartments in Chelmsford city centre, just 0.2 miles from the railway station."
"**Sales & Marketing Suite open 7 days a week - CM3 3PT ** Set over three floors with open plan living. All German appliances & flooring included. VIEW THE VIRTUAL TOUR. RESERVE NOW with a 5% DEPOSIT. INCENTIVES AVAILABLE ACROSS OUR DEVELOPMENTS WITH PART X, CASHBACK & ASSISTED MOVE "
**NEW PLOT JUST RELEASED** Be a part of Wimbush Waters with this wonderful luxury home. Set over three floors with open plan living. All German appliances & flooring included. VIEW THE VIRTUAL TOUR. RESERVE NOW with a 5% DEPOSIT. 
"Welcome to Waltham Grange, an exclusive new gated collection of 10 outstanding detached family homes, perfectly located to provide an oasis of peaceful, luxurious living at the point where the town meets the countryside. These outstanding family homes offer beautifully appointed rooms a..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £900,000 - £950,000** An impeccable four bedroom executive detached family home benefitting from an enviable position, overlooking fields. The property has been extended and boasts spacious accommodation which is set over three floors and comprising..."
This large detached house is situated in a highly favoured established road on the convenient West side of Chelmsford and is within walking distance of the station and shops in the centre itself. Riverside walks through Admirals Park are on the doorstep at the bottom of the road and The King (cont.)
"Nestled in a small private road within this SOUGHT AFTER CUL-DE-SAC, an impressive 1875 SQ FT of bright and airy accommodation, spacious lounge, beautiful OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/FAMILY ROOM. Must be viewed."
"Impressive 1930's five bedroom detached family home located on the west side of Chelmsford within close proximity of Admirals Park, walking distance of Chelmsford City centre. The garden has large patio and a separate decked area surrounding a heated swimming pool measuring 9 m x 5 m, perfec (cont.)"
"STUNNING EXTENDED DETACHED FAMILY RESIDENCE IN CHANCELLOR PARK - the property offers an entrance hall, ground floor cloakroom, THREE RECEPTION ROOMS, high quality kitchen/family room with integrated appliances UNDER FLOOR HEATING & GRANITE work tops, four bedrooms, family bathroom, en-suit..."
"Enviably situated only 1.1 mile from the station, is this beautiful four double bedroom detached family home. The ground floor accommodation comprises; 18' living room, 22' kitchen/diner, 7' utility room, 15' study, ground floor cloakroom, 12' dining room, and spacious entrance hall.<..."
"UNIQUE NEW HOME - Stunning 4 bedroom home at Paglesham Place, a bespoke development surrounded by countryside. Beautiful open plan kitchen/family room with bi-fold doors, utility room, ground floor shower room, double carport - DON'T MISS OUT"
NO ONWARD CHAIN- SITUATED 0.5 MILE FROM CHELMSFORD STATION- HIGH SPECIFICATION APARTMENT- TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS- 18' MASTER BEDROOM WITH EN SUITE- 13' BEDROOM TWO- 20' OPEN PLAN LIVING- INTEGRATED DOMESTIC APPLIANCES- 
"Part of our Signature collection, a delightful unlisted, 5 bedroom detached family home positioned in a prime residential turning, situated just 1.5 miles south of Chelmsford city centre in a highly accessible location. "
** Launch Event Saturday 11th March 9am till 1pm** Waltham Grange is an exclusive development of just 10 five bedroom detached family homes. Plot 1 measures approximately 2250 sq.ft and is built and finished to a high specification throughout. EPC Awaited
"Over 2,500 SQ FT, this IMPRESSIVE family home features a GARAGE, CARPORT and TERRACE. FOUR double bedrooms, two with EN SUITES and DRESSING AREA to bedroom 1. GENEROUS sitting room, ISLAND KITCHEN and BOSCH appliances. Plus downstairs STUDY."
**JUST REDUCED BY £25K ** Be a part of Wimbush Waters with this wonderful luxury home. Set over three floors with open plan living & a wonderful family room with sun terrace. All German appliances & flooring included. VIEW THE VIRTUAL TOUR. RESERVE NOW with a 5% DEPOSIT.
"GUIDE PRICE £875,000 - £900,00. This unique four-bedroom property is located in a tranquil setting in Galleywood, close to the ever sought-after common, boasting an open-plan living space with breath-taking views. It features a driveway for multiple cars, detached garage & generous garden ..."
"**Discover The Chelmer - a MODERN family home with OPEN PLAN kitchen/breakfast/family room with kitchen ISLAND, SKYLIGHTS and BI-FOLD doors. CARPORT, Large dining room, sitting room and bedroom one with BALCONY, DRESSING ROOM and EN SUITE."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer for sale this EXECUTIVE DETACHED RESIDENCE OFFERING VIEWS OVER A LAKE TO THE FRONT situated in the sought after Channels development featuring MASTER SUITE WITH EN SUITE, DRESSING ROOM & ROOF TERRACE, guest bedroom with en suite and four piece family..."
"EXTENDED FAMILY HOME WITH SELF CONTAINED STUDIO - the property offers an entrance hall, ground floor WC, two receptions rooms, fitted kitchen/family room with GRANITE work tops & integrated appliances, UTILITY ROOM, SIX bedrooms, THREE bathroom/shower rooms, AMPLE off road parking, DOUBLE ..."
"** Launch Event Saturday 11th March 9am till 1pm** This beautiful 5 bedroom family home is designed to a high specification over three floors measuring 1,943sq. ft. Waltham Grange is an exclusive development of just 10 five bed detached properties located in Little Waltham."
"A gorgeous detached family home offering spacious living throughout, ample off street parking, an extensive rear garden and great local amenities nearby!"
"Welcome to Waltham Grange, an exclusive new gated collection of 10 outstanding detached family homes, perfectly located to provide an oasis of peaceful, luxurious living at the point where the town meets the countryside. These beautiful five-bedroom homes have been designed to offer an a..."
"Welcome to Waltham Grange, an exclusive new gated collection of 10 outstanding detached family homes, perfectly located to provide an oasis of peaceful, luxurious living at the point where the town meets the countryside. These impressive five-bedroom homes have been designed to provide ..."
** Launch Event Saturday 11th March 9am till 1pm** Waltham Grange is an exclusive development of just 10 five bed detached properties located in Little Waltham. Plot 4 is built and finished to a high specification throughout.
"Welcome to Waltham Grange, an exclusive new gated collection of 10 outstanding detached family homes, perfectly located to provide an oasis of peaceful, luxurious living at the point where the town meets the countryside. These beautiful five-bedroom homes have been designed to offer an ..."
"Welcome to Waltham Grange, an exclusive new gated collection of 10 outstanding detached family homes, perfectly located to provide an oasis of peaceful, luxurious living at the point where the town meets the countryside. These impressive five-bedroom homes have been designed to provide a..."
"*Open Day Sunday 9:00 - 12:00*
Purplebricks are proud to present this extended and improved detached four bedroom home occupying a corner plot located in the sought after area of Old Springfield. A double story extension to the rear provides ample living space with four bedrooms upstairs, the mas..."
"***Guide Price £800,000- £850,000*** Lux Homes are pleased to bring to the market this beautifully presented character Victorian four-bedroom semi-detached family home situated on the highly sought-after New London Road. Contact Lux Homes to arrange your viewing!!"
"***GUIDE PRICE £800,000-850,000*** One of only two five bedroom houses in the estate is this simply stunning property is located in Great Baddow. Benefiting from five large double bedrooms, three en-suites, double garage and large open living space this is the perfect family home."
"An impressive brand new four bedroom detached family home. Set in a sought after location with lovely rear views, across open countryside. High quality build and specification. > 1905 sqft > Air source heating system > Underfloor heating to the ground floor "
Situated in one of Chelmsford's most sought-after roads is this beautifully presented five bedroom extended detached family home. An internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC awaited (Ref: CHS220506)
Available for the first time in over 15 years is this well presented extended FOUR BEDROOM family home with a rear garden measuring in excess of 200ft which is west facing. With parking and being close to shops and bus route early viewings are advised.
Situated in a prime location with easy access to Chelmsford City Centre and railway line is this established 4 bedroom family home on a plot of approximately quarter of an acre offering scope for further improvement. NO ONWARD CHAIN
"GUIDE PRICE £800,000 - £825,000. An impressive & immaculately maintained FIVE bedroom detached family home, arranged over three floors & offering approx. 2,000 sq.ft. of accommodation. Located in a prominent yet quiet sought after modern development within walking distance of Chelmsford Town Centre."
"Enjoying a semi rural location and a stunning third of an acre plot, a substantial two bedroom detached bungalow with a two and a half width garage and planning to convert to a four bedroom house. The mature and attractive gardens are well tended, there is extensive parking to the front and (cont.)"
"Situated in a quiet countryside mews of only four properties, is this well-presented extended four bed detached family home. The property is perfectly located for river walks and picturesque views of Sandford Mill Conservation Area. Internally, the property offers a porch, ground flo..."
"Situated on a sought after development, with four bedrooms, EN-SUITE shower room, good size rear garden & CARPORT PARKING"
"*LAUNCHING SPRING 2023 - Register your interest today!* Discover the Jeweller, an EXECUTIVE FAMILY HOME with a dual aspect living room, triple aspect kitchen/dining/family room, UTILITY ROOM, study, downstairs cloakroom, plus TWO EN SUITES to bedrooms 1 and 2, and a DRESSING ROOM to bedroom 1."
"Pleasantly located within an enviable non estate, cul-de-sac position, is this well presented Three Bedroom Detached Family Home. The accommodation, which has undergone extensive updating and modernisation in recent times comprises of a spacious Entrance Hall, Lounge with multi fuel burner, Ki..."
"Dating back to the mid 1930's, a charming detached family home, positioned within one of Chelmsford's most established residential locations. Ample off road parking, garage and established rear garden."
"Situated in a popular turning within Great Baddow and a rare opportunity to purchase a property within this area, is this currently advertised three bedroom detached property with a large frontage and rear garden. A viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. E..."
Spacious 4/5 bedroom semi-detached house located in a popular road with easy access to Hylands Park.
"Situated approximately 1.3 miles from Chelmsford’s mainline train station and city centre, situated on a 0.12 acre plot is this spacious four bedroom detached family home offering versatile accommodation and scope for extension (STPP) The accommodation is set over two floors and comprise..."
A detached building with residential consent.
"Situated in a popular village location, four bedroom detached house with en-suite, large driveway and double garage and a large rear garden. EPC D (Ref: CHS230089)"
"Purplebricks are proud to present this four double bedroom link-detached home situated in the sought after Chancellor Park positioned on the east side of Chelmsford and boasts its own primary school, recreational grounds and shopping centre nearby in Chelmer Village. The property has been moder..."
"This well presented, four bedroom detached family home is located in the highly desirable Galleywood Road which is within easy access of the A12 and conveniently located within 1.5 miles of Chelmsford City Centre. The deceptively spacious accommodation comprises an entrance hallway wi..."
"A superb EXTENDED and very well maintained family home spread over three floors and having the potential of up to five bedrooms depending upon requirements. The property is situated on a small select development in a ""tucked away"" location within walking distance of the City centre and stati (cont.)"
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer this ESTABLISHED DETACHED FAMILY HOME set in a prominent position within the SOUGHT AFTER GREAT BADDOW AREA, the property features TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, fitted kitchen/dining room, utility room, STUDY, three bedrooms and family bathroom. SOUTH FACING GARD..."
"Measuring over 1880 SQ FT, a generous FAMILY HOME with four SPACIOUS bedrooms and STUDY/NURSERY. OPEN PLAN kitchen/diner with BOSCH appliances and BI-FOLD doors. CARPORT and off-road PARKING spaces. "
"EXTENDED four bedroom family home in a CUL DE SAC LOCATION, fitted kitchen/diner and TWO FURTHER RECEPTION ROOMS, en suite shower room."
The Property This beautifully presented 1930's style semi detached house offers good sized and flexible accommodation set over three floors with room for all the family and plenty of space for those who are home working. The spacious kitchen family room is ideal for entertaining with built in ap...
"This detached family residence is situated in a sought-after, quiet and leafy street, within easy walking distance of the City centre and mainline railway station.  The ground floor accommodation comprises an entrance hall with feature painted staircase and decorative wall panelling to on..."
"*LAUNCHING SPRING 2023 - Register your interest today!* Don't miss out of these brand new homes, suited to all types of buyers and boasting a GREAT LOCATION just 12 minutes' from Chelmsford City Centre, plus every home is also complete with a CHAIN FREE move, 10 year warranty and modern interior."
This extended and spacious 4/5 bedroom Victorian detached character house is ideally situated less than one mile from Chelmsford Railway Station and city centre
"Offered with no onward chain and situated in a popular location, presented to an extremely high standard is this five / six bedroom, detached family home"
"Detached chalet positioned on a CORNER PLOT, for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN, flexible living options with ground and first floor bedrooms and bath/shower rooms. THREE/FOUR BEDROOMS, DOUBLE GARAGE"
"GUIDE PRICE £700,000-£720,000. Located in a sought after cul-de-sac within 1.5 miles of Chelmsford train station & 1 mile from Chelmsford High St is this five bedroom semi detached family home. This character property has been extended to offer well-planned & versatile living accommodation. "
Situated on the outskirts of the popular Broomfield area of Chelmsford the house is ideally located for those wishing to have the peace and quiet of village life whilst still being a short drive from the city centre. The house is accessed via a quiet country lane and would be a dog owners dream w...
"An impressive four-bedroom detached family home ideally located in the sought-after village of Writtle. Well-proportioned throughout, to the ground floor the property consists of an entrance hall way, useful cloakroom, lounge with doors leading to the well maintained rear garden, dining room, kit..."
"Offered with no onward chain is this beautifully presented four bedroom detached home, position down a secluded driveway with only one other house, offering a great deal of privacy. This property offers ample living accommodation both internally and externally, therefore an internal viewing is h..."
"A modern family home featuring BOSCH appliances, downstairs STUDY, generous SITTING ROOM and dining room. Three LARGE BEDROOMS, two with EN SUITES. Contemporary bathrooms, over 1,600 SQ FT and OFF-ROAD parking."
**NEW PHASES NOW LAUNCHED** Be a part of Wimbush Waters with this wonderful luxury home. Set over two floors with open plan living. All German appliances & flooring included. VIEW THE VIRTUAL TOUR. RESERVE NOW with a 5% DEPOSIT. 
"Ashford Place is a modern development off of Broomfield Road, just a short walk to the Grammar Schools and City Centre. Broomfield Hospital is just a few minutes drive away making the location perfect for those that work at the hospital."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer THIS EXTENDED & MUCH IMPROVED DETACHED FAMILY HOME with accommodation laid out over three floors comprising FITTED KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, utility room, living room, cloakroom, MAIN BEDROOM WITH FITTED WARDROBES & EN SUITE, further three double bedr..."
"Quote Reference MB0473 Located approximately 1.5miles from Chelmsford City Centre is this spacious three bedroom period home.
"
Spacious detached bungalow within sought after cul de sac in central village location being offered for sale with no onward chain.
"Situated on a private road in the countryside of Galleywood is this stunning three bedroom detached bungalow sitting on a large plot. Benefiting from field views, driveway for six/seven cars and massive potential to extend. Early viewings are advised for this one of a kind bungalow!"
"Enviably situated in this desirable cul-de-sac in the frequently requested Channels development, is this beautiful four double bedroom detached family home. The ground floor accommodation comprises; 18' living room, 17' kitchen/diner, 10' study, ground floor cloakroom and spacious ent..."
"*Guide price £675,000-£700,000* A highly impressive four-bedroom, three storey mid terraced town house including a landscaped private rear garden, high specification throughout, and useful integral garage, ideally positioned within close proximity to Chelmsford City Centre. "
"Located on the highly sought-after Galleywood Road is this well-presented three bedroom detached chalet home. This property offers ample living accommodation both internally and externally, therefore a viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC E (Ref: CHS2..."
"Stunning detached home with an impressive open plan kitchen/diner/family room, The Newton features include a living room, separate dining room and a utility. The top floor bedroom one benefits from a large en suite. The first floor is home to four further bedrooms - one with a second en suite."
"*Guide Price £675,000-£700,000* A highly impressive extended four-bedroom, two storey detached house including landscaped private rear garden, two contemporary bathrooms, and useful tandem garage, ideally positioned within this peaceful cul-de-sac in the heart of sought-after Chelmer Vi..."
"**Guide price £675,000-£700,000** An impressive extended four bedroom semi-detached family home providing versatile accommodation including three reception rooms, dining room and a private driveway offering parking for multiple vehicles, all idyllically positioned within the highly soug..."
Occupying a GOOD SIZE PLOT situated within the sought after Village of GALLEYWOOD is this spacious FOUR BEDROOM detached family home 
Purplebricks are proud to present this recently extended and renovated five bedroom semi detached home. The property has been tastefully transformed incorporating open plan living spaces with a fantastic finish throughout and is located in the sought after village of Sandon. Sandon is a village j...
"Semi-rural location, generous size plot, plenty of parking, overlooking fields, potential to extend (expired planning permission). EPC E (Ref: NBC210488)"
"A period 3 bedroom red brick semi detached property, situated on a mature plot with the benefit of a TWO STOREY detached OFFICE/GYM with studio room above. The property has 3 reception rooms, fitted kitchen, sealed unit windows and gas radiator heating. Off road parking."
"***£15,000 MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION subject to terms and conditions*** Situated within the exclusive new development, Grayling Park, in the sought after area of Little Waltham, is this detached four bedroom family home beautifully designed with attention to detail and a finished to a high qual..."
"A superb four bedroom detached family home at Beaulieu Heath. Features include a well-equipped kitchen with integrated appliances, handy utility room, separate living and dining rooms with feature bay windows. Impressive principal bedroom with fitted wardrobes & en suite. Flooring throughout & more!"
"SITUATED IN A LOVELY CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION IS THIS LUXURIOUS 4 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME WITH SO MUCH INCLUDED, LOTS OF ADDED EXTRAS & NO ONWARD CHAIN!"
"Offered for sale in the very highly regarded ""Avenues"" is this SUBSTANTIAL, EXTENDED 1930's semi detached home boasting FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS with an EN SUITE to the second-floor's master/guest suite, plus a SPACIOUS LOUNGE and additional sitting/dining room, a 21' MODERN KITCHEN breakfast room, e..."
Located in Broomfield is this stunning three bedroom semi detached house and two bedroom annex
"Guide Price: £325,000- £350,000. Calling All Commuters! New to the market is this modern two bedroom Second floor apartment located in the popular city of Chelmsford."
Redevelopment opportunity in just under an acre to the north of the city.
"Extended two bedroom bungalow in the sought after area of Ongar Road, benefitting from a south facing garden and off road parking."
"*LAUNCHING SPRING 2023 - Register your interest today!* The Silversmith is a stunning family home not to be missed! Inside you'll find a modern, dual aspect living room, TRIPLE ASPECT KITCHEN/FAMILY ROOM, separate dining room, downstairs cloakroom and a well-equipped EN SUITE to bedroom 1."
"Located down a private road, is this three bedroom detached bungalow on a large plot with plenty of off street parking"
"Rarely available three bedroom semi-detached cottage on the prestigious Writtle Green, coming to the market with the benefit of no onward chain."
"**GUIDE PRICE £650,000-£675,000**Boasting EXCEPTIONAL LIVING SPACE with an impressive 2,000sq ft of versatile accommodation is this UNIQUE detached home - finished to a high standard throughout and located within a SHORT WALK TO THE CITY CENTRE and it's mainline station! Benefitting from upto FOU..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £650,000 - £675,000** Situated in the frequently requested Beaulieu Park is this stunning, immaculately kept, “Laurenson” four bedroom terraced family home which was constructed in 2019 by Countryside arranged over three floors with a South-facing ..."
"A substantial extended four bedroom detached family home providing versatile accommodation including three reception rooms, private driveway and double garage, all within the highly sought-after Little Waltham."
"Purplebricks are proud to present this extended, detached, three bedroom bungalow positioned on a generous corner plot in the heart of Writtle. The plot itself could interest potential investors with potential to build two properties (STPP). Potential aside this bungalow has fantastic living sp..."
"** ALMOST 2400 SQFT OF ACCOMMODATION ** A deceptively large and much improved semi detached family home with the added benefit of a detached garage and annexe, located in the favourable area of Old Moulsham and within easy walking distance of the City centre and mainline railway station."
"Set in the popular village location of Galleywood is this detached four bedroom family home, which in our opinion has been decorated to a high standard throughout. The property benefits from a 18' living room, 11' kitchen with 9' breakfast area, 7' utility room, 11' dining room, 12' c..."
"William H Brown are delighted to offer this unique opportunity to design and complete to your own taste, this three bedroom bungalow, with completed and immaculately presented two bedroom Annex."
"Situated in one of the highly favoured established roads off Roxwell Road on the convenient West side of Chelmsford is this EXTENDED 3 BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE which offers excellent potential for further extension, subject to the necessary consents. The property is within easy reach of the st (cont.)"
Extended three bedroom detached property in a desirable cul de sac close to Writtle village centre. The property is offered for sale with no onward chain.
"Stunning four bedroom detached family home, found in popular residential area. Catchment areas for Larkrise Primary school, Moulsham Infant/Junior school, Moulsham High School and Great Baddow High school. Easy access to A12 road links, Park and Ride into Chelmsford city centre and railway statio..."
"Set well back off the road with views across countryside to the front, is this substantial four bedroom detached house, which has been improved and cared for, hence presented in very good order. The property offers parking for several vehicles, has 3 reception rooms, front and rear gardens.
"
"A four bedroom link-detached house built by Higgins Homes, within just over a mile of two of the county’s best schools."
"Welcome to this charming detached property, situated in the desirable residential area of Longmead Avenue, Great Baddow. This delightful family home has been lovingly maintained and offers potential buyers a fantastic opportunity to acquire a comfortable home with lots of potential."
"Situated in a popular area of Old Springfield, detached extended home, plenty of off-street parking, four good size bedrooms, en-suite to master, potential to extend further (subject to planning permission). EPC awaited (Ref: CHS230067)"
REDUCED PRICE! This SUBSTANTIALLY ENLARGED AND EXTENDED detached property is situated on the highly favoured West side of the City centre and needs to be internally viewed to be fully appreciated. It offers ADAPTABLE ACCOMMODTION comprising up to 5 bedrooms depending upon requirements. It (cont.)
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer for sale this UNIQUE BRAND NEW DETACHED FAMILY HOME set down a private drive in a mews of just 2 homes within the sought after GREAT BADDOW AREA of Chelmsford, finished to a HIGH SPECIFICATION & READY TO MOVE IN this home simply must be viewed to app..."
"*LAUNCHING SPRING 2023 - Register your interest today!* The Pargeter is a stunning new home, not only CHAIN FREE for an easy move, but complete with an open plan kitchen and dining room with UTILITY ROOM, a dual aspect living room with snug, spacious bedrooms with an EN SUITE to bedroom 1. "
"Situated in the desirable Moulsham area is this stunning three bedroom semi-detached family home. Benefiting from driveway/garage, open plan living downstairs and large bedrooms upstairs. Early viewings are advised to not miss out on this fantastic property."
"Three bedroom semi detached property situated on the popular MOULSHAM LODGE development, ground floor cloakroom, approx 85' REAR GARDEN, driveway & carport, NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"If you're looking for a family home located within Old Moulsham, close to the City Centre and in the catchment area to popular local schools, then this property is for you.This property offers a bright hallway and a living room which provides plenty of natural light. There is also a fur..."
"Available for the first time in over 40 years, this detached three bedroom bungalow is located in the sought after village of Writtle with all of its local amenities and schooling. Chelmsford City centre with its further amenities and mainline train station is also within just a short distan (cont.)"
"Victorian three bedroom semi detached house EXTENDED to provide a vaulted sitting room overlooking the rear garden, ground floor shower room and first floor family bathroom. The property is walking distance to the City centre and is situated opposite Admirals park and Tower gardens ."
Located off the main Galleywood Road William H Brown are pleased to offer this large detached FOUR BEDROOM family home within easy access to the A12 and only a short drive from Chelmsford City centre with a park close by this TWO GARAGES.
IN NEED OF MODERNISATION is this attractive four bedroom detached bungalow with potential to extend STPP.
REDUCED PRICE! This EXTENDED 4 bedroom detached house offers spacious adaptable ground floor accommodation and is located on a MUCH LARGER THAN AVERAGE CORNER PLOT for the development with a total width of about 85' and Southerly facing. The property is situated on Newlands Spring with loca (cont.)
"*LAUNCHING SPRING 2023 - Register your interest today!* Discover The Sculptor is a stunning new family home, complete with a DUAL ASPECT LIVING ROOM, open plan kitchen and dining room, downstairs cloakroom, STUDY and an en suite to bedroom 1. Plus our homes come with a 10 year NHBC warranty."
Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac location is this four bedroom detached family home. Offered with no onward chain and situated within walking distance to Chelmsford city centre an internal viewing is highly advised. EPC D (Ref: CHS220536)
"**ANNEXE POTENTIAL / IDEAL HMO** This LARGE 6 Bedroom house situated in MOULSHAM LODGE is ideal for a whole host of different purposes. These include an IDEAL HMO, ANNEXE OPPORTUNITY, HOME WORKING AS MULTIPLE ROOMS IDEALLY SET UP and laid out or simply as a versatile FAMILY HOME. This pr."
** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** LOCATED IN ONE OF THE MOST POPULAR ROADS OF THE CHANNELS ESTATE SITS THIS BIG & BRIGHT 4 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME
"Situated in the popular area of Newland Springs, four bedroom detached property set over three floors, three bathrooms, extended to create an incredible family home. EPC awaited (Ref: WRS230015)"
"GUIDE PRICE £600,000 TO £650,000 Located within the sought after village of Broomfield this excellently well maintained and improved detached house with four good sized bedrooms would make an ideal family home. Inside you will find a lounge with a bay window, a re-fitted kitchen family room with..."
1930s detached house for restoration with enormous potential. Located on highly favoured and most convenient west side of the town within easy reach of Chelmsford City centre and main line railway station. POTENTIAL TO EXTEND (STPP)
"A FOUR BEDROOM semi detached home situated in a NON ESTATE LOCATION, en suite shower room, garage & carport, OPEN FARMLAND VIEWS TO THE FRONT."
"Stunning 4 bedroom End of Terrace family home with off street parking, conservatory and beautiful garden area"
"Situated in the desirable Springfield area is this stunning three bedroom semi-detached family home. Benefitting from driveway to the front, huge rear garden and easy access into Chelmsford City Centre. Early viewings are advised to not miss out on this amazing property."
This lovely three bedroom cottage benefits from stunning farmland views
"Guide Price - £600,000 - £675,000 - Located in one of Great Baddow's most popular after cul-de-sacs, is this well presented extended four bedroom detached family home"
"**GUIDE PRICE £600,000 - £675,000** Situated in one of Great Baddow's most sought after cul-de-sacs, is this well presented extended four bedroom detached family home. The property benefits from 17' kitchen/breakfast room, 21' living room, home office/study, 10' ..."
"Situated in the sought after Great Baddow is this four bedroom semi detached home. The property has undergone a two story extension to the side and rear, making it very spacious and an ideal family home. Internal viewings are strongly recommended"
"**GUIDE PRICE £600,000 - £650,000** Situated in this sought after cul-de-sac in Springfield, is this extended and refurbished 4/5 bedroom family home. The accommodation comprises; ground floor bedroom/reception room, ground floor bathroom, cloakroom, living room..."
"GUIDE PRICE £600,000 - £625,000!! This delightful four bedroom link detached family home is located in the sought after village of Great Baddow and within a short walking distance of local schools, shops and the countryside. For those commuting, Johnson Road gives convenient access to the (cont.)"
"Situated in the desirable heart of Great Baddow is this stunning four bedroom detached family. Benefitting from ample parking on the driveway, two garages, utility room and downstairs W/C. Early viewings are advised for this amazing property."
"*Initial offers are invited in the region of £425,000 to £450,000* A stylishly appointed two bedroom terraced home situated in a sought after development 0.4 mile to Chelmsford station."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are pleased to offer for sale this DETACHED FAMILY HOME situated within close proximity of Chelmsford's grammar schools and WITHIN A MILE OF STATION & CITY CENTRE, the property features TWO RECEPTIONS, study/playroom, cloakroom, three bedrooms, MASTER BEDROOM WITH BUILT IN..."
"Space for all the family with this 4/5 bed townhouse on the popular 'Channels' development in Chelmsford, with two en-suites, parking and garage."
"*Guide price £600,000 - £625,000*
Purplebricks are proud to present this prestigious link detached 4/5 bedrooms home situated on the sought after Channels developments with all of its local amenities. The property was built in 2020 and is in immaculate condition throughout. The accommodation co..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £600,000 - £615,000*** Situated in a new build development is this stunning four bedroom semi-detached house. Benefitting from large modern open plan living, large rear garden along with garage and driveway. The property also benefits from two en-suites and downstairs toilet."
"*LAUNCHING SPRING 2023 - Register your interest today!* Discover The Scrivener, a brand new family home, boasting a living room with bay window, open plan kitchen, family and dining room, UTILITY ROOM, downstairs cloakroom plus an EN SUITE to bedroom 1. Every home is chain free for an easy move. "
"Situated in the desirable Broomfield area is this four bedroom detached family home. The property benefits from four double bedrooms, open plan living and a large rear garden. Within easy reach of Broomfield Hospital and Chelmsford City Centre this stunning property is not one to miss."
"GUIDE PRICE £600,000 - £620,000! A superb 3 BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW pleasantly situated in a small turning of just four other bungalows in the favoured village of Broomfield on the North side of Chelmsford. The bungalow is located backing farmland and has the advantage of a DOUBLE WIDTH (cont.)"
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer for sale this EXTENDED FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME set in a cul-de-sac location, the property features a dual aspect living room, separate dining room, MODERN FITTED KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM, study, MAIN BEDROOM WITH EN SUITE & FITTED WARDROBES, ..."
"Immaculately presented four bedroom detached family home, found in sought after residential area. Close to local amenities, A12/A130 road links, popular schools and Park and Ride into Chelmsford City Centre and railway station. Accommodation boasts, impressive entrance hall, ground floor cloakroo..."
"The Property GUIDE PRICE £600,000 TO £620,000 Sitauted within the popular area of Great Baddow this excellentley presented four bedroom semi detached house has two en-suites and a family bathroom and offers good sized flexible accommodation set over three floors. The front garden has drivewa..."
We are pleased to offer this outstanding semi-detached cottage having been refurbished together with the adjoining property to an excellent standard now nearing completion. This charming property occupies a generous size plot backing onto open countryside having the benefit of off street parking...
Occupying a generous sized plot with far reaching field views to the rear elevation is this refurbished three-bedroom semi-detached cottage style family home in the popular village of Writtle. The property is perfectly situated with Chelmsford Town Centre and Train Station being just a short dri...
"An extended four-bedroom detached family home ideally located in the sought-after location of Galleywood. Well-proportioned throughout, to the ground floor the property consists of an entrance hall way, lounge measuring 23ft in length with doors leading to the well maintained rear garden, kitche..."
**NEW PHASES NOW LAUNCHED** Be a part of Wimbush Waters with this wonderful luxury home. Set over two floors with open plan living/dining room and separate kitchen. All German appliances & flooring included. VIEW THE VIRTUAL TOUR. RESERVE NOW with a 5% DEPOSIT 
"New to the market is this well presented four bedroom semi-detached family property which is situated in the catchment area for excellent local schools.This property offers a spacious hallway, a bright living area which benefits from a large bay window which provides plenty of natural l..."
"‘THE WILLOW’ SET WITHIN BEAULIEU OAKS EXCITING NEW DEVLOPMENT, WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO ALL LOCAL AMENITIES AND THE BEAULIEU PARK SCHOOL, LOTS TO OFFER!"
"McCartney estate agents has pleasure in offering this four bed detached family home which has recently undergone many improvements throughout by the current vendor and is located in the popular village of Great Baddow which is within walking distance of local shops and amenities, and close to ..."
A spacious 3 bedroom apartment with a large terrace in Chelmsford City.
* NO ONWARD CHAIN * EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM HOME * END TERRACE * TWO RECEPTION ROOMS * JOHN LEWIS FITTED KITCHEN WITH GRANITE WORKTOPS * INTERGRATED APPLIANCES * TWO ALLOCATED PARKING SPACES * WALKING DISTANCE TO LOCAL AMENITIES * LOW MAINTENANCE REAR GARDE...
"A SPACIOUS established 4 bedroom semi detached house with EXTENSIONS to the side and rear and having a LOFT CONVERSION as well, all greatly enhancing the accommodation. The property is located on the North side of Chelmsford in the favoured ""Avenues"" being convenient for local amenities incl (cont.)"
*INCENTIVES AVAILABLE* Be a part of Wimbush Waters with this wonderful luxury home. Set over two floors with open plan living. All German appliances & flooring included. 
"Rarely available in the heart of the desirable area of Galleywood is this stunning, newly built 3 bedroom detached property - Constructed by reputable local developers and to an exceptional standard.This superb home features an array of spacious and stylish accommodation throughout. Int..."
**CASHBACK INCENTIVES ACROSS OUR DEVELOPMENTS ** Be a part of Wimbush Waters with this wonderful luxury home. Set over two floors with open plan living/dining room and separate kitchen. All German appliances & flooring included. VIEW THE VIRTUAL TOUR. RESERVE NOW with a 5% DEPOSIT 
"THE GABLES - Located within the highly demanded area of Galleywood is this beautifully designed new build, three bedroom detached home, constructed by highly-regarded local developers to an outstanding standard and offered with a new home warranty."
Conveniently situated within easy reach of Chelmsford City centre is this good sized two bedroom ground floor apartment
William H Brown are delighted to bring to market this development opportunity which benefits from having full planning permission granted. This is a fantastic opportunity to acquire a development site for two houses within walking distance of Chelmsford city centre.
JUST A STONES THROW FROM WHERE THE BEAULIEU PARK TRAIN STATION WILL BE SITS THIS STUNNING 4 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME OFFERING PARK VIEWS & MUCH MORE…
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this stunning and recently constructed three-bedroom detached home. The property is located in the exclusive Channels development and is within close proximity of an array of amenities that include; golf club, bars, restaurants & other eateries, ..."
"Offered with no onward chain is this 1930's style three-bedroom semi-detached family home located within easy reach of Chelmsford City Centre. The accommodation comprises of a spacious entrance hall, ground floor shower room, utility room, lounge with bay window to front, dining room with access ..."
"Being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN, A very spacious, vastly EXTENDED and ABSOLUTELY STUNNING family home that boasts a SUBSTANTIAL 23' LOUNGE open-plan to the impressive, BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED 23'10"" modern kitchen diner with BI-FOLDING DOORS and skylights! Plus upto FIVE GOOD-SIZED BEDROOMS with EN..."
"Situated within this cul de sac location within the Broomfield area of Chelmsford is this much improved FOUR bedroom family home, the property in our opinion has been improved by the current vendor with replacement of the kitchen, oak veneer doors throughout and good size double glazed conse (cont.)"
"** FOUR BEDROOMS, TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, CONSERVATORY ** A wonderful FOUR bedroom detached FAMILY home situated within a highly sought after location. Upon viewing the property you'll be greeted with spacious, bright and airy rooms, you'll get a real feel of a loving family home throughout."
"SITUATED IN A CUL-DE-SAC SITS THIS STUNNING 3 BEDROOM HOME WITH A DOUBLE GARAGE, ONE OF WHICH HAS BEEN CONVERTED TO AN OFFICE/RECEPTION ROOM!"
"A FOUR BEDROOM family house with versatile accommodation over three floors, TWO EN SUITE BEDROOMS, first floor dual aspect lounge, OFF ROAD PARKING FOR TWO CARS AND A GARAGE."
"A rare opportunity in the heart of the desirable area of Galleywood with this stunning, newly built 3 bedroom detached chalet style property - Constructed by reputable local developers and to an exceptional standard.This superb home features an array of spacious, stylish and versatile a..."
"Having undergone extensive refurbishment in recent times, is this immaculately presented Two Bedroom Detached home. The ground floor accommodation comprises of a cloakroom, 25' Lounge/Diner and a 21' Modern Fitted Kitchen/Breakfast Room. To the first floor, there is a modern fitted Shower Room..."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer for sale this EXTENDED DETACHED FAMILY HOME situated in a CUL-DE-SAC location in the sought after area of GALLEYWOOD, offering TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, stylish fitted kitchen, four good sized bedrooms, modern four piece family bathroom, GARAGE & DRIVEWAY..."
William H Brown are delighted to offer for sale this Bellway Home built link detached house located on the Channels Development to the North of Chelmsford. It is located within easy driving distance of the City centre with its mainline station and has the benefit of still having an NHBC certificate
"* NO ONWARD CHAIN * LOCATED IN ‘OLD BEAULIEU’ SITS THIS STUNNING, UNIQUE, FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME SURROUNDED BY GREENERY. THE PROPERTY OFFERS LOTS OF LIVING SPACE DOWNSTAIRS WITH AN OPEN PLAN LIVING / DINING AREA WHICH PROVIDES A NICE BRIGHT AND AIRY FEEL. THE PROPERTY ALSO HAS A ..."
"If you are looking for charm and character, look no further! A rare opportunity has arisen to acquire this delightful detached 17th Century Grade II listed cottage in Springfield. Full of charm and all the original features you would expect of a property from this period. The accommodation is arr..."
"William H Brown are delighted to offer for sale this well-presented FOUR bedroom TOWN HOUSE located on the Chancellor Park development - The property offers two en suites, family bathroom, first floor cloakroom, fitted kitchen / breakfast room, separate utility room and a driveway leading to garage"
"Situated in the desirable area of Newlands Spring is this amazing four bedroom detached family home. Benefitting from large downstairs living space, driveway/garage and en-suite to the master bedroom. Early viewings are advised to not miss out on this stunning property."
"Situated within the sought after area of Chancellor Park, within close proximity to Chelmsford’s City Centre, well -regarded schooling and local amenities is this four bedroom, link detached family home. Accommodation is bright and airy throughout with a well-considered flow and set over..."
McCartney Sales is introducing this ideal investment opportunity!This is a 6 bed end of terrace property which is in excess of 2000 square ft and has a 5 bed HMO license with 5 bedrooms currently occupied and potential for it to become a 6 bed HMO using the final unoccupied room....
"Situated in one of the most sought-after developments within Chelmsford is this beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached family home. Offering ample living accommodation both internally and externally, a viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC D..."
*NO ONWARD CHAIN* A STONES THROW FROM THE BEAULIEU PARK SCHOOL IS THIS ‘ALBERO’ STYLE HOME OFFERING 3 DOUBLE BEDROOMS AND VERSATILE LIVING ACROSS THREE FLOORS
"1239 SQ.FT Penthouse apartment for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN, 3 beds all with built in wardrobes, GARAGE, open plan living with feature glazed bay leading onto TWO BALCONIES."
Just reduced by £25k & with Stamp Duty Contribution*. Be a part of Wimbush Waters with this wonderful luxury home. Set over two floors with open plan living. All German appliances & flooring included. VIEW THE VIRTUAL TOUR. RESERVE NOW with a 5% DEPOSIT. * T & C's apply 
"Connells are please to offer this 1930s semi detached house, located within close promimity to Chelmsford City Centre. offers potential for extension subject to planning permission."
"Situated within the popular area of Springfield, within close proximity to well-regarded schooling, local amenities and Chelmsford's city centre is this 4 / 5 bedroom extended, link detached family home which has been finished to the highest of standards throughout.Accommodation is set ..."
This impressive four bedroom town house is perfectly located in the heart of Chancellor Park
"Dating back to the seventeenth century comes this truly spectacular, fully detached, Grade II Listed cottage set across two floors. This unique two bedroom property boasts multiple features telling of its age, including exposed wooden beams, an inglenook fireplace & bread oven ..."
"Located in the sought-after Beaulieu Park area, this immaculately presented two bedroom detached home. The property comprised of a lounge/diner, cloakroom, kitchen/breakfast room, office. two double bedrooms, and two ensuites bathrooms. Internal viewings are highly recommended"
"Located within the popular residential area of Newlands Spring is this well presented Four Bedroom Detached Family Home. The accommodation comprises of an Entrance Hall, Shower Room, Lounge, Kitchen/Diner and Conservatory to the ground floor and to the first floor, there are Four Bedrooms, Fam..."
IDEAL INVESTMENT PURCHASE OR ALTERNATIVELY A LARGE FAMILY HOME! Extended semi detached property currently functioning as a student H.M.O.
"***Guide Price - £550,000 - £575,000*** This modern extended detached house is ideally located in the heart of Moulsham close to Chelmsford city centre"
"*** STAMP DUTY PAID *** A truly stunning and impressive brand new three bedroom family home of over 1500 sqft. This includes a separate generous working from home space over the garage. This home appeals to a wide variety of homebuyers, including families, first time buyers and commu..."
"Set in this sought after turning within the delightful village of Galleywood, is this three bedroom detached house offered with no onward chain"
"Situated within 2.2 miles from Chelmsford railway station this beautifully presented extended 1930's style semi detached house would make an ideal family home. Within easy reach are infant, junior and high schools as well as a bus route and the local shopping parade. The recessed entrance porc..."
"GUIDE PRICE £550,000-£575,000 Situated in the heart of Old Moulsham is this stunning five bedroom family home. This property benefits from open plan living, driveway to the front for two cars and a large rear garden. With local amenities, schools and easy access to Chelmsford train station."
"GUIDE PRICE £550,000 - £575,000 - OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN Late Victorian "
"Immaculately presented four bedroom detached family home, found within a sought after residential area. Offering many fine features including potential to extend stpc. Spacious accommodation comprises, impressive entrance hall, lovely size lounge, separate dining room, kitchen/breakfast room, con..."
"This CONSIDERABLY EXTENDED 4 bedroom house is located in one of the HIGHLY FAVOURED ""Avenues"" on the Northern fringe of the City centre within walking distance to the station and having both the King Edward Grammar and County High Schools close by. The property further benefits from lots of (cont.)"
"Located in a quiet, tucked away location of Galleywood is this three bedroom bungalow. "
"Being offered with no onward chain is this impressive modern four-bedroom detached family home located within the popular area of Great Baddow. Well-proportioned throughout, to the ground floor the property consists of an entrance hall way, useful cloakroom, lounge, kitchen with breakfast area an..."
Excellent development opportunity!McCartney sales are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom end of terrace property in the sought after area of Galleywood. This property has a side plot for a four bed detached house subject to planning. On the ground floor there is a separate l...
Offered for sale with no onward chain is this fully detached THREE bedroom family home which has been extended to the ground floor and now boasts a much bigger Kitchen. To the front of the property there is a large Garage which can be accessed internally and could be turned into living accom (cont.)
"A NEWLY RENOVATED and SUBSTANTIALLY EXTENDED detached home, finished to a high specification and boasting a generously-sized, UNOVERLOOKED GARDEN with an OUTBUILDING/OFFICE, three good sized bedrooms, VERY IMPRESSIVE 28' OPEN PLAN LIVING AREA with newly fitted kitchen, spacious lounge, newly fitt..."
"Situated on this popular development is this well maintained and improved four bedroom family house which overlooks an open green to the front. The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, with a staircase to the first floor and a ground floor cloakroom. There is a dual aspect lounge with featur..."
"*Guide price £550,000 - £575,000*
Purplebricks are proud to present this extended and improved five bedroom semi-detached family home situated on the sought after road of Moulsham Drive walking distance from Chelmsford City Centre with all of the local amenities it has to offer including mainline..."
"STUNNING MODERN FAMILY HOME IN BEAULIEU PARK - the property offers an entrance hall, ground floor WC, recently RE-FITTED kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, lounge/diner, FOUR bedrooms, THREE bathroom/shower rooms, 34FT GARAGE & rear garden."
"SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME BEING SOLD WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN - the property offers an entrance porch & hall, TWO reception rooms, kitchen/diner, FIVE BEDROOMS, family bathroom, driveway to front PLUS a further driveway & GARAGE to rear."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are pleased to offer this WELL MAINTAINED THIRD FLOOR APARTMENT WITH COMPLETE ONWARD CHAIN - the property offers an entrance hall, OPEN PLAN living/dining/kitchen with integrated appliances, two DOUBLE BEDROOMS with fitted wardrobes, TWO bathroom/shower rooms, BALCONY"
"*** GUIDE PRICE £500,000 TO £575,000 *** * NO ONWARD CHAIN * SIX BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE * ANNEX * DOUBLE STORY EXTENSION TO FLANK * OPEN PLANNED LOUNGE/DINING AREA * THREE BATHROOMS * OFF STREET PARKING * 0.5 MILES FROM KINGS ROAD P..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £550,000 - £575,000** A spacious, 1930's property that has been extended, modernised and adapted, to suit a large or growing family, whilst retaining many character features including; working fires, bay windows, picture rails and stained glass. Arr..."
"Located within 2.2 miles from Chelmsford railway station this well presented extended semi detached house. The property is located within easy reach are infant, junior and high schools as well as a bus route and the local shopping parade, making an ideal family home"
"This well presented three bedroom detached home is ideally located in Newland Spring and would make an ideal family home. The property benefits from a modern kitchen/diner, lounge, conservatory, downstairs cloakroom, three good sized bedrooms, a family bathroom, and landscaped rear garden"
"This substantial, detached property occupies a generous corner plot position and offers the potential to extend, develop or re-furbish. This is a quite a unique opportunity to purchase a property rarely available. There is versatile accommodation over two floors, with a total of four/..."
This three/four bedroom chalet style property is set in the sought after location of Mayfield Road and is coming to the market with the benefit of no onward chain.
"GUIDE PRICE £550,000 TO £600,000 This four-bedroom detached house has ample off-street parking and a garage and offers vacant possession with no upward chain. The property is sited on a wide plot and with the relevant planning permission would lend itself to further expansion and improvement. C..."
"We are proud to present this Four Bedroom Semi Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £550,000 - £575,000*"
"A detached bungalow situated on an elevated plot on the sought-after Galleywood Road, offering potential to extend STPP and offered for sale with no onward chain. An internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC D (Ref: CHS220342)"
"OPEN HOUSE SATURDAY 18TH MARCH - BY APPOINTMENT ONLY Three bedroom link-detached house set in the sought after area of Lodge Road, coming to the market with the benefit of no onward chain."
"No onward chain, sought after Beaulieu Park location, modern three bedroom semi detached home with impressive main bedroom suite, the ground floor very much embraces open plan living with a modern fitted kitchen, opening to large living space incorporating part vaulted ceiling with sky light (cont.)"
"This extended immaculately presented property is located in a quiet cul de sac location in the popular Springfield area of Chelmsford. The property boasts a large extension, with 3/4 double bedrooms including a large master bedroom with en suite and a balcony."
"An EXTENDED and well presented four bedroom DETACHED home boasting an IMPRESSIVE 17' MASTER BEDROOM with RECENTLY-FITTED EN-SUITE, spacious 17' lounge that is open-plan to the DINING AREA, modern fitted kitchen, modern bathroom, entrance hall & cloakroom, a long driveway plus CARPORT & GARAGE - o..."
**IMPRESSIVE FAMILY HOME** Located in an incredibly SOUGHT AFTER location in GREAT BADDOW is this very impressive FAMILY HOME. Offering a Versatile way of living this home boasts FIVE BEDROOMS and a further THREE reception rooms. Benefiting from being in the Baddow Hall Infant School catchment ar...
"Balch Estate Agents are proud to present this 1930's Three Bedroom Semi Detached property that is situated on the sought after Avenues offering scope for extension (STPP). The accommodation comprises of an Entrance Hall, Cloakroom, Lounge, Dining Room and Extended Kitchen to the ground floor a..."
"This excellently presented four bedroom semi detached house offers flexible family accommodation with two reception rooms, conservatory, kitchen family room and an additional shower room on the first floor. Local shops and schools are within easy reach. Chelmsford Railway Station is within 3.5 mi..."
"Available as a family home purchase or an investment opportunity, a large semi detached property currently functioning as a student H.M.O. This property is being offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN!!"
"Beresfords are pleased to offer to the market this rarely available, beautifully presented and extended three bedroom semi-detached bungalow. Offering ample living accommodation both internally and externally, a viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC C ..."
"Four bedroom detached family home, situated at the end of a pleasant cul-de-sac, offering two reception rooms, plenty off-street parking and a garage. EPC awaited (Ref: CHS220135)"
"McCartney Sales are pleased to offer for sale this three bedroom semi detached 1930's house in need of modernisation, the property is situated in the popular area of Old Moulsham giving excellent access to the City Centre with many shops and restaurants together with a main line railway statio..."
"An immaculate, four-bedroom, two storey semi-detached family house including a spacious private rear garden and useful garage, ideally positioned within sought-after Galleywood."
"Immaculately presented family home found in sought after Chelmer Village. Close to A12 road links, Chelmer Village Square and Asda Supermarket, popular schools close by. Brilliantly extended three bedroom detached house offers modern décor, spacious lounge and fantastic size kitchen/diner. Well ..."
"**Guide Price £525,000 - £550,000** A well-proportioned four-bedroom, two storey detached house including a spacious private rear garden and useful garage, ideally positioned to the north of Chelmsford within sought-after Broomfield."
"This stunning three bedroom extended semi-detached bungalow situated in a particularly sought after road approaching Admirals Park. This property benefits from open plan living, a large rear garden as well as parking and a garage to the front. Early viewings are advised to not miss out!"
"A three bedroom detached family home situated in the highly sought after village of Writtle with local amenities nearby. The property offers driveway parking, an ensuite shower room and family bathroom, separate living room and dining room as well as a conservatory and cloakroom. "
"GUIDE PRICE £525,000 - £550,000! Having undergone many improvements by the current vendor, this semi detached FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM family home is spread over three floors. The accommodation comprises a ground floor cloakroom, refitted kitchen with integrated appliances and a dual aspect lou (cont.)"
"Situated in the desirable Galleywood area is this stunning four bedroom family home. Benefiting from driveway/garage, field views to the front and presented in immaculate condition. Early viewings are advised to not miss out on this amazing property."
"*LAUNCHING SPRING 2023 - Register your interest today!* The Shipwright is a modern family, spread over 3 floors and maximising space. Inside is finished to a high quality specification, and every home is CHAIN FREE for an easy move, comes with a 10 year warranty and benefits from a GREAT LOCATION."
"**Guide Price £525,000 - £550,000** A substantial four bedroom modern semi-detached family home providing contemporary living, generous sized garden and carport, all within the highly sought-after Broomfield."
"Offered with no onward chain is this well-presented four bedroom detached family home. Offering ample living accommodation both internally and externally, a viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC C (Ref: MAS230046)"
"This amazing four bedroom detached family home situated in Chelmer Village is being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. this property benefits from en-suite to master bedroom, garage and large garden. Early viewings are advised to not miss out!"
"An established three bedroom family home with EXCELLENT SCOPE TO EXTEND AND RE MODEL, approx 60' rear garden, sought after location, NO ONWARD CHAIN"
"Family homes, idyllic countryside
Surrounded by beautiful landscapes and inspirational architecture, Pompadour is a
collection of new 2, 3, 4 and 5-bedroom houses for sale in Chelmsford, Essex. Located on the edge of Channels Village, Pompadour is the ideal place ..."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer this detached family home SET ON A CORNER PLOT WITHIN A CUL DE SAC LOCATION WITHIN THE POPULAR WEST CHELMSFORD. The property features an entrance hall, cloakroom, dual living/dining room, kitchen, FOUR BEDROOMS and family bathroom. Externally the pr..."
"This truly stunning four bedroom family home is located within a mile of sought after schools on the south side of the City. The modern link detached townhouse offering two ensuites, two family bathrooms, garage and car port parking. Internal viewings are highly recommended"
Calling all investors! 6 bedroom HMO in Chelmsford
"GUIDE PRICE £500,000 TO £520,000 Situated within the sought after Chelmer Village area this four bedroom detached house would make an ideal family home. Local schools are within easy access including; Barnes Farm Infant and Junior and Chancellor Park Primary. Chelmsford mainline railway station ..."
Well presented four bedroom family home found in sought after residential area. Positioned within a quiet cul-de-sac. Catchment area to Barnes Farm and Chancellor Park Primary Schools. Close proximity to Chelmer Village Square and Asda Supermarket. Moments drive into Chelmsford City Centre and ra...
"A fabulous Grade II listed double fronted cottage, steeped in history and offering huge potential, idyllically nestled within the very heart of sought-after Little Waltham. "
"A splendid semi detached bungalow which has been extended and refurbished to a high standard, to provide spacious and well presented accommodation throughout. The property is ideally positioned within short walking distance of Sandon Secondary School and also within a mile of Baddow Hall Junior S..."
"An EXTENDED three bedroom semi detached bungalow situated in a CUL DE SAC LOCATION, impressive open plan Kitchen/living area, approx 80 REAR GARDEN, driveway & garage. "
"*** GUIDE PRICE £500,000 TO £550,000 *** * THREE BEDROOMS * SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE * TWO RECEPTION ROOMS * DOUBLE LENGTH GARAGE * CONSERVATORY * UTILITY ROOM * TWO RECEPTION ROOMS * PLANNING PERMISSION TO EXTEND 21/00814/FUL * OFF STREE..."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer for sale this EXTENDED MODERN FAMILY HOME BEING SOLD WITH A COMPLETE ONWARD CHAIN - the property offers an entrance hall, ground floor cloakroom, living room, modern fitted kitchen/dining room with integrated appliances, family bathroom with white suite,..."
"WATCH OUR VIRTUAL VIEWING
WELL-PRESENTED FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE IN SPRINGFIELD. Ideally situated for the local schools, this house offers lounge, kitchen/diner, 4 bedrooms, master with en-suite & built in wardrobes, main bathroom, garden, single garage & driveway parking."
"Well presented four bedroom family home, located close to Chelmer Village Square and Retail Parks. The property offers many fine features including potential to convert/extend (stpc). Located close to popular schools, easy access to A12/A130 plus a moments drive into Chelmsford City Centre and ra..."
"Situated at the end of a pleasant cul de sac on the popular west side of Chelmsford city is this four bedroom detached house. The property sits on a corner plot and benefits from two separate reception rooms, a ground floor wc, a large lounge/diner, four bedrooms and a detached garage. The pro..."
LOCATED IN ONE OF THE MOST POPULAR LOCATIONS OF BEAULIEU PARK SITS THIS BEAUTIFUL 3 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME WITH A GREAT SIZE REAR GARDEN!
"William H Brown are delighted to offer this well presented, large four bedroom three-storey home that benefits from lounge/Diner, fitted kitchen breakfast room, a good size entrance hallway, ground floor cloakroom, EN SUITE to master bedroom, family bathroom and is decorated to a very high standard."
"Guide Price £500,000 - £550,000 - Ideally located in Galleywood is this extremely well looked after and extended four bedroom semi detached family home"
"** GUIDE PRICE £500,000 - £550,000 ** This three bedroom semi detached chalet style bungalow is located in the heart of Great Baddow"
"Popular village location, offered with no onward chain, potential to extend (STPP), good size rear garden, large drive. EPC awaited (Ref: CHS230132)"
"Impressive well presented three bedroom family home found on sought after Beaulieu Park. Close to local amenities, schools and accessible to good transport links. Moments drive into Chelmsford City Centre. Accommodation boasts, entrance hall, ground floor cloakroom/wc, lounge and spacious kitchen..."
Situated less than a mile from Chelmsford railway station is this stunning seven bedroom semi-detached house currently sub divided into two residences
"Guide £500,000 - £550,000. Four bedroom detached family home on a corner plot with home office, in a popular cul de sac of Chelmer Village."
"OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN. Ideally located within the picturesque location of Bell Street in the midst of Great Baddow is this beautifully presented and much improved character home, arranged over three floors and having a wealth of originality and features."
"This stunning three-bedroom detached house is in the sought-after location of Marston Beck, Chelmer Village, Chelmsford. Ensuite Shower room to master bedroom. Garage and off street parking."
"Offered with no onward chain, situated in the popular area of Broomfield is this rarely available three bedroom detached bungalow. Offering ample living accommodation both internally and externally, a viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC E (Ref: CHS23..."
"Situated in the popular location of Great Baddow is this beautifully presented and extended three bedroom semi-detached family home. Offering ample living accommodation both internally and externally and offered with no onward chain, an internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that t..."
This charming character two bedroom detached cottage has been refurbished to a high standard throughout with many original remaining features.To the ground floor the property consists of a large open hallway leading to the lounge with log burner and W/C. The stylish kitchen is complete ...
"Bond Residential are delighted to announce the launch of HAWTHORN CLOSE BY TROY HOMES a select development of brand new HIGH SPECIFICATION two, three, four bedroom homes in the desirable village of BICKNACRE. This Three bedroom link detached home is AVAILABLE NOW TO RESERVE OFF PLAN, Call 0124..."
"Occupying a GENEROUS PLOT to include ample private off road parking is this unique BRAND NEW three bedroom family home to include three bathrooms, an impressive and fully integrated kitchen/family room, ground floor shower room and separate living room."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN this EXTENDED & REMODELLED SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW featuring an open plan living/dining room, kitchen breakfast room, utility cupboard, THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS, family bathroom with modern white suite, LANDSCAPED REAR GARDE..."
This stunning three bedroom semi detached house is ideally located in Channels
"A charming three bedroom home at Beaulieu Gate features include an OPEN PLAN kitchen/dining area leading out onto the GARDEN, kitchen comes complete with integrated APPLIANCES. Impressive principal bedroom occupying the whole top floor with EN SUITE and FITTED WARDROBES. Flooring included and more! "
"REDUCED PRICE! WAS £500,000 now £480,000! Located on the popular Beechenlea development and within close proximity of Chelmsford City Centre is this extended semi detached family home. The property is pleasantly situated in a cul-de-sac and offers four bedrooms, two reception rooms, refit (cont.)"
"A fantastic three bedroom detached family home offering natural decor throughout. The property is situated within close proximity of Chelmsford City Centre, mainline railway station and a short walk from local shops and amenities. The property consists of the entrance hall, generous sized rece..."
"*JUST REDUCED - WAS £500,000 - NOW £480,000* Being offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN, extended FOUR BED semi set in a popular village with GOOD ACCESS to the A12 & A414. Keys held for viewing."
"Michaels Property Consultants are pleased to present this spacious and well-presented four-bedroom family home located within the ever sought after Galleywood. Within proximity to both Chelmer Park and Jubilee Park as well as A12 road links, primary school with Ofsted rating of ""Outstanding"", ..."
"An established 3 bedroom extended semi detached house situated in a cul-de-sac location in this popular tree lined Avenue. The property is in need of some TLC and offers excellent family accommodation , situated within walking distance of County Girls and King Edward Grammar Schools."
"Boasting THREE GOOD SIZED BEDROOMS with EN SUITE to the master, a garage & carport with parking for two cars is this WELL PRESENTED semi detached home that further offers an entrance hall & cloakroom, IMPRESSIVE-SIZE 22' LOUNGE DINER, modern kitchen, modern family bathroom and POTENTIA..."
Purplebricks are proud to present this extended three bedroom semi-detached home situated on the tranquil road of Woodhouse Lane with panoramic idyllic field views to the front while also being a short distance from Chelmsford City Centre will all of its local amenities and mainline station. The ...
"**GUIDE PRICE £475,000 - £500,000** **LUXURY PENTHOUSE APARTMENT** Offering over 1100 square feet of accommodation this fantastic penthouse apartment, on the private 9th floor has panoramic views as far as the eye can see across Chelmsford. The stylish ..."
"McCartney sales is delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom detached chalet, benefiting from seperate lounge, fitted kitchen with a conservatory to the side. the property also benefits from two double bedrooms on the first floor and a family bathroom.Externally, the rear garden is m..."
"Situated within 1.5 miles of Chelmsford city centre and mainline railway station is this beautifully presented four bedroom family home. Offering ample living accommodation both internally and externally, a viewing is highly advised. EPC C (Ref: CHS200650)"
"Situated in the sought after area of Broomfield, is this three bedroom semi detached house that would make an ideal family home. The property benefits from a spacious living and dining area, fitted kitchen, three good sized bedrooms, and family bathroom. Internal viewings are highly recommended"
This extended four bedroom family home is located in the heart of Springfield
This EXTENDED semi detached house is most pleasantly situated in the highly favoured Old Springfield area of Chelmsford and is offered for sale with no onward chain. The property fronts the playing fields of The Boswells Secondary School and offers excellent potential to further improve and (cont.)
"Four bedroom end of terrace house on the popular Long Brandocks development benefitting from a garage, off road parking and an enclosed rear garden."
"Situated in a highly sought after cul-de-sac location is this splendid four bedroom semi detached family home set over three floors, which has been extended and improved to provide ample space for the growing family. The property is ideally positioned within walking distance of the highly regarde..."
"BEING OFFERED TO THE MARKET IS THIS THREE BEDROOM LINK DETACHED FAMILY HOME.  ACCOMMODATION IS SET OVER TWO FLOORS AND COMPRISES AN ENTRANCE HALL, CLOAKROOM, TWO RECEPTION ROOMS AND A KITCHEN TO THE GROUND FLOOR. TO THE FIRST FLOOR ARE THREE BEDROOMS AND A FAMILY BATHROOM. EXTERNALLY..."
Rarely available two bedroom semi-detached bungalow coming to the market with the benefit of no onward chain. Ref: WRS220107
"Honywood Gardens is a small, private development exclusively for the over 55`s and within walking distance of Chelmsford city centre. The bungalow forms part of this exclusive mews of similar properties and enjoys landscaped low maintenance gardens with car port and additional parking space."
Ideally located within close proximity to Chelmsford City centre is this impressive three bedroom detached bungalow
"PERFECT FAMILY HOME OR DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY - Extended four-bedroom substantial end of terrace property, occupying in our opinion a pleasant position within the road and overlooking a small greensward. Surrounded by large gardens to the front, side and rear, the property boasts well-appointed ..."
*RARE TWO BEDROOM LISTING* second floor apartment with walk out balcony set within a desirable McCarthy & Stone retirement living plus development. *PRIVATE PARKING*
"RARELY AVAILABLE IS THIS HIGH SPEC, THREE BEDROOM FAMILY ECO-HOME, SITUATIED IN THE HEART OF BEAULIEU PARK, CLOSE TO ALL LOCAL PARKS, SCHOOLS, SHOPS AND OFFERS MUCH MORE THAN THE AVERAGE HOME…"
"Located within Great Baddow this FOUR bedroom semi-detached house benefits from a lounge/ dining room, rear garden, downstairs W/C, four good sized dedrooms and a family bathroom, garage and off road parking."
"What a View. Only 3 luxury Waterside apartments left. Private decking or balconies onto the Lake. Sales & Marketing Suite Open 7 days a week from 10am - 5pm. Located opposite the Channels Brasserie CM3 3PT. ** INCENTIVES AVAILABLE ACROSS OUR DEVELOPMENTS, PART EXCHANGE, CASHBACK ** "
"RE-AVAILABLE! FEB 23 Situated within this cul de sac location and within close proximity to Chelmsford City Centre is this semi detached two/three bedroom bungalow, the bungalow currently is shown as a two bedroom with the wall between bedroom three and lounge being removed giving a good s (cont.)"
"A recently renovated rarely available Detached Two Bedroom Bungalow, with Off Street Parking for Three Cars plus own Garage in a secluded cul-de-sac in a sought-after location. The property has a Large Lounge/Reception with wide patio doors that overlook a nice sized Secluded Garden, it has a f..."
"A three bedroom DETACHED property situated on a CORNER PLOT 1.2 miles from the station, garage and parking, NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"A modern detached home in STUNNING CONDITION throughout, with a beautiful OPEN PLAN kitchen/family/dining room, TWO RE-FITTED BATH/SHOWER ROOMS. Parking for two."
"Situated within walking distance of Chelmsford City Centre and the railway station, with fast and frequent services to London Liverpool Street. This sizeable established three bedroom semi-detached house, located in a quiet cul-de-sac with a shared drive and off-road parking is offered for sale w..."
"Being offered with no onward chain, a well positioned, three bedroom link detached home, situated a short distance from Broomfield village, within the NHBC guarantee and presented to a high standard throughout, offering off road parking and a low maintenance rear garden."
"Situated on the edge of Chelmsford, a short distance from Broomfield village, is this well-presented three bedroom detached home. The property is presented to a high standard throughout and is still within the NHBC guarantee. NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"McCartney sales have great pleasure to market this three bedroom semi detached bungalow situated in the sought-after cul-de-sac in the popular area of Moulsham.The property features a modern fitted kitchen to the rear of the property, separate lounge, three bedrooms and a family shower ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £450,000 - £475,000... An extended semi-detached home situated in a popular no through road location on the periphery of Great Baddow within a short drive of Chelmsford City Centre, A12 access and the vineyards shopping centre. This property has undergone extensive modernisation in re..."
"SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME BEING SOLD WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN - the property offers an entrance porch & hall, ground floor WC, lounge/diner, fitted kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, three bedrooms, shower room with MODERN WHITE SUITE, gas central heating, garage & driveway and SOUTH FACI..."
"Guide Price £450,000 - £475,000 This stunning family home is situated in the highly sought after Broomfield area"
"SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH PROFESSIONAL HOME OFFICE - the property offers an entrance porch, lounge, fitted kitchen/diner, THREE BEDROOMS, family bathroom with modern white suite, garage & driveway and rear garden."
INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. 5 BEDROOM HMO WITH GROSS YIELD OF 6.0 % Close proximity of local amenities.
This semi-detached family home being sold with no onward chain and is located in the popular Galleywood area
Boasting NO ONWARD CHAIN and offering THREE LARGE DOUBLE BEDROOMS (over the two upper floors) and a sizeable UNOVERLOOKED rear garden with further POTENTIAL TO EXTEND (STPP) plus TWO reception rooms and spacious kitchen/diner is this EXTENDED end-terrace property. Benefiting from accommodation se...
"Located in Old Moulsham, William H Brown are delighted to offer this large, three bedroom terraced house within walking distance of the main line train station to London Liverpool Street"
"Situated in the popular area of Broomfield is this well-presented three bedroom detached family home. Offering ample living accommodation both internally and externally, therefore an internal viewing is highly advised. EPC C (Ref: CHS230016)"
"Situated within the popular St Johns development close to local schools, supermarket and transport links. Chelmsford railway station is within 1.5 miles. This well presented three bedroom terraced house would make an ideal family home. Inside you will find a good sized lounge, a fitted kitchen fa..."
"Situated in a desirable cul-de-sac in Broomfield, is this beautiful four bedroom family home. The property was constructed in 2015 and benefits from; 13' kitchen/diner, 16' living room, ground floor cloakroom, three bedrooms on the first floor, and a 19' master bedroom with en suite on..."
Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this DETACHED three bedroom family home LOCATED AT THE END OF A NO THROUGH ROAD. Only 1.2 MILES WALKING DISTANCE OF CHELMSFORD'S TRAIN STATION
"McCartney Estate Agents are delighted to bring to market this extended family home, located in a very popular location.The property is in need of some refurbishment and could be a perfect family residence. On the ground floor, upon entering from the porch, there are two reception rooms ..."
"Popular location, three bedroom terraced home, separate lounge, kitchen / diner, downstairs cloakroom, en-suite to master bedroom, landscaped rear garden, off-street parking available for two vehicles. EPC B (Ref: CHS220548)"
William H Brown are delighted to offer this LARGE and well-presented semi-detached family home Situated in one of Great Baddow's most sought after cul-de-sacs. Externally this property offers a garage and ample off street parking
"Positioned in one of the most sought-after areas in Chelmsford is this beautifully presented two / three bedroom semi-detached bungalow. Offering ample living accommodation both internally and externally, a viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC D (Ref:..."
"A well presented three bedroom semi detached house located in the sought after location of Great Baddow, conveniently located for access to local schooling, shops and Chelmsford City Centre, with off road parking, single garage and an open plan living/dining arrangement. "
"Three bedroom family home found in sought after location. Close to Moulsham infant/Junior School, Meadgate Primary School, Chelmsford City Centre and railway station. Accommodation boasts, entrance hall, lovely size lounge, separate dining room, kitchen, family room and ground floor shower room. ..."
"Guide Price £450,000 - £475,000 - This deceptively spacious four bedroom end of terrace house is located within popular Long Brandocks development and is close to local amenities, schools and the village green. Internal viewing are highly recommended"
"Situated in the popular Springfield area is this well-presented three bedroom detached family home. Offering ample living accommodation both internally and externally, a viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC C (Ref: CHS220350)"
This well-presented semi-detached two bedroom bungalow on a stunning plot is ideally located in Springfield
**CASHBACK INCENTIVE & Stamp Duty Contribution** Be a part of Wimbush Waters with this wonderful luxury home. Set over two floors with open plan living. All German appliances & flooring included. VIEW THE VIRTUAL TOUR. RESERVE NOW with a 5% DEPOSIT. t&c's apply
"GUIDE PRICE £450,000 - £475,000 **EXTENDED FAMILY HOME WITH APPROVED PLANNING FOR LOFT CONVERSION** Langdale gardens is a DESIRABLE cul-de-sac located just 1 Mile from CHELMSFORD CITY CITY CENTRE & STATION. There are FOUR local schools that are 0.5 miles away from the property and they are Meadga..."
"Well presented extended three bedroom family home located in popular residential area. Found within a cul-de-sac position close to local amenities, good transport links, Park and Ride into Chelmsford City Centre and railway station. Catchment area for The Sandon School. Accommodation boasts entr..."
"A superb three bedroom home at Beaulieu Heath. Features include a high specification kitchen with integrated appliances, an OPEN PLAN kitchen/living/dining area leading out onto the rear GARDEN. A luxurious principal bedroom complete with an EN SUITE & fitted WARDROBES. FLOORING included throughout"
"Located in the popular area of Moulsham Lodge is a three bedroom semi detached home with a large garden, off road parking and detached garage."
"A well-presented and spacious four bedroom semi-detached property in north Chelmsford, plenty of parking, good size rear garden, three reception spaces. An internal viewing is advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC C (Ref: CHS220580)"
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer this MODERN FAMILY HOME featuring a dual aspect lounge, fitted kitchen/diner with feature corner window and double doors overlooking and leading to the rear garden, cloakroom, THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS, en suite shower rooms to bedrooms 1 & 2, family bat..."
"OFFERS INVITED IN EXCESS OF £435,000 - QUICK SALE REQUIRED! Offered for sale with vacant possession and no onward chain, this well presented DETACHED BUNGALOW situated in a very private ""tucked away"" location on the favoured and convenient West side of the City centre. The bungalow is just (cont.)"
"Three bedroom family home, kitchen / diner, separate lounge, three good size bedrooms with an en-suite to master, carport with off-street parking for multiple vehicles. EPC C (Ref: CHS230037)"
**NEW PHASES NOW LAUNCHED** Be a part of Wimbush Waters with this wonderful luxury home. Set over two floors with the Living room overlooking the garden. All German appliances & flooring included. VIEW THE VIRTUAL TOUR. RESERVE NOW with a 5% DEPOSIT.
"Popular turning within Newlands Spring, three bedroom link-detached property, two reception rooms, presented to good standard throughout, good size rear garden, parking and garage. An internal viewing is advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC awaited (Ref: NBC221674)"
"GUIDE PRICE OF £430,000 - 450,000 **UNIQUE & RARE PROPERTY** This property really is UNIQUE as it offers many features that come truly DESIRABLE There is also HUGE POTENTIAL TO EXTEND STPP. The accommodation comprises of a good sized LOUNGE/ DINING ROOM, KITCHEN DINER, TWO very good size bedrooms..."
"McCartney Estate Agents have great pleasure in offering for sale this link detached three bed property in a great location. The accommodation comprises of a lounge, separate dining room, fitted kitchen along with three beds and a family bathroom on the first floor. Outside the rear garden is m..."
"Situated in the desirable Old Moulsham area is this three bedroom link-detached family home. Benefiting from Driveway/Garage, large rear garden along with walking distance to Chelmsford City Centre. Early viewings are advised to not miss out on this excellent family home."
"A MUCH IMPROVED two bedroom end terraced property conveniently situated close to the railway station, SUPERB RE-FITTED kitchen & bath/shower room, approx. 40' REAR GARDEN."
"Offers Over £425,000 - Plenty of room for the growing family with this five bed semi in Broomfield."
"A charming, semi-detached Victorian Cottage located in a sought after turning close to Chelmsford Golf Course and within walking distance of Chelmsford City Centre..."
A three bedroom detached bungalow situated in Great Baddow with no onward chain. An internal viewing is advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC D (Ref: CHS220553)
"*JUST REDUCED - WAS £440,000 NOW OFFERS OVER £425,000* EXTENDED & IMPROVED FOUR BEDROOM house on the popular TILE KILN development, spacious re fitted kitchen, EN SUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM, garage and parking to the rear."
"Delightful three bedroom detached home, found in sought after location. Close to Chelmer Village Retail Parks, Asda Supermarket and Village Square. Easy access to A12/A130 link roads plus only a moments drive into Chelmsford City Centre. Accommodation boasts, entrance hall, ground floor cloakroom..."
"Situated adjacent to open greensward is this delightful three-bedroom END OF TERRACE family home situated in the popular Springfield location, situated within easy access to local shops, schools and amenities. Also includes detached garage."
**CLOSE TO CITY CENTRE AND STATION** This THREE bedroom END OF TERRACE house has just recently been REFURBISHED and is conveniently located for the city centre and Chelmsford train station. Admirals park is within close proximity and the location of this home offers lots of main bus routes into t...
LOCATED IN ONE OF THE MOST POPULAR AREA’S IN SPRINGFIELD JUST OFF OF BEARDSLEY DRIVE SITS THIS RARLEY AVAILABLE 2 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME WITH GARAGE!!!
**EXTENDED FAMILY HOME IN MOULSHAM LODGE** This THREE Bedroom EXTENDED FAMILY home is set in a very DESIRABLE location off Heath Drive and is within close proximity to local shops MOULSHAM HIGH SCHOOL and MILDMAY JUNIOR SCHOOL. The property is being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The acco.
Boasting NO ONWARD CHAIN and offering a 90' UNOVERLOOKED rear garden plus spacious 26' DUAL ASPECT lounge/diner & lean-to is this sizeable three bedroom SEMI-DETACHED property. Benefiting from POTENTIAL TO EXTEND (STPP) plus detached GARAGE with driveway parking and ideally located within popular...
This stunning Victorian terraced house is ideally located on the prestigious South Primrose Hill
"**GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000** **A FANTASTIC THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME, JUST A SHORT WALK FROM THE CITY CENTRE, TRAIN STATION & GRAMMAR SCHOOLS** This well presented property sits back from the road on Patching Hall Lane and offers good size rooms and po..."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are pleased to offer this FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME set in a mews setting within the popular SPRINGFIELD area of Chelmsford. The property features a living room with patio doors over looking and leading to the rear garden, Kitchen/Dining room, cloakroom, dual aspect master bedr..."
"Situated in the pleasant location of Sandon is this beautifully presented character property. Offering ample living accommodation both internally and externally, a viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC C (Ref: CHS230022)"
"This 3 bedroom house has recently been IMPROVED and needs to be internally viewed to be fully appreciated. It is located on the Northern side of Chelmsford with bus services and local shopping parade close by. It comprises an entrance hall, lounge to the front, refitted rear kitchen / dining (cont.)"
"Situated a stones throw away from Chelmsford City Centre is this stunning two bedroom mid-terraced property. Benefitting from two large bedrooms, bifold doors opening to the rear garden and on street permit parking this amazing property is not one to be missed."
"PERIOD BAY FRONTED home with TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS, two reception rooms and a spacious kitchen. OWN DRIVEWAY. Must be viewed!"
"Situated on this no through road with views across the road to a greensward within the sought after village of Great Baddow is this three bedroom semi-detached bungalow positioned on a spacious plot with scope for extension STPP. The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, three bedrooms,..."
"Refurbished three bedroom, two reception house, convenient for Chelmsford city centre and close to Admirals Park, off-street parking, offered with no onward chain. EPC D (Ref: CHS190890)"
"Located in the Great Baddow area is this three bedroom semi-detached Victorian property. Benefiting from open plan living downstairs, three large bedrooms and large rear garden. Early viewings are advised to not miss out on this stunning property."
This 3 bedroom DETACHED HOUSE is offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN and would make an ideal project for those buyers seeking a property to modernise and improve to their own tastes and requirements. It is located in Great Baddow on the Southern side of Chelmsford close to the Park and Rid (cont.)
"Three bedroom house situated in a popular cul de sac in central village location benefits include lounge/diner, rear garden and garage in a block."
"**EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM HOUSE WITH LARGE GARDEN** This THREE bedroom SEMI-DETACHED house is situated in the popular area of Moulsham Lodge within close proximity to the local SHOPS, SCHOOLS and BUS ROUTES. The property boasts an impressive LARGE rear garden with GARAGE and WORKSHOP. "
"This 3 bedroom semi detached house is situated on a corner plot and offers excellent potential for extension, improvement and modernisation and has a good size garden within which is a DOUBLE GARAGE. The property is located on Moulsham Lodge on the South side of Chelmsford within easy reach (cont.)"
"A much improved three bedroom property within a FIVE MINUTE WALK OF THE RAILWAY STATION, two reception rooms, RE-FITTED KITCHEN , residents parking, NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"William H Brown are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom bungalow, Chain free and having potential to make this an amazing home early viewings are recommended."
"A spacious semi-detached property situated within the popular location of Springfield, only a short distance from the local schools and amenities. The property offers well presented accommodation throughout which includes three good size bedrooms, bonus first floor study/cot room, lounge, conserv..."
"*LAUNCHING SPRING 2023 - Register your interest today!* The Tailor is a brand new home, well suited to first time buyers and families, not only boasting a GREAT LOCATION just 12 minutes' from Chelmsford City Centre, but also complete with a CHAIN FREE move, 10 year warranty and modern interior."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are pleased to offer for sale this semi detached family home which has been MUCH IMPROVED by the current owners to feature a REFITTED KITCHEN, open plan living/dining room, three bedrooms, REFITTED BATHROOM with modern white suite, new flooring, internal doors and front door, ..."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN this SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION - the property offers an entrance hall, GROUND FLOOR WC, lounge/diner, fitted kitchen, three bedrooms, family bathroom, garage in nearby block, block paved driveway & ma..."
"Spacious three bedroom family home found within a cul-de-sac position in sought after residential area. Easy access to A12 road links, Aldi Supermarket and popular schools nearby. Accommodation boasts, entrance porch, lovely size lounge, kitchen/diner, conservatory, utility room and ground floor..."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer for sale this modern SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION - the property offers an entrance hall, living room, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER, three bedrooms, family bathroom, GARAGE & PARKING, landscaped rear garden."
William H Brown are delighted to offer this well-presented three bedroom semi-detached family home situated in a pleasant cul de sac. The property has been extended on the ground floor accommodation and enjoys an un-overlooked aspect to the rear.
" Purplebricks are proud to present this extended and improved two bedroom, Victorian terraced home, benefiting from a garage and off street parking for two cars and 90', landscaped rear garden. Ideally located within walking distance to the vibrant City Centre of Chelmsford, 3 mins from the Stat..."
"Guide Price - £425,000 - £450,000 - Situated just 0.5 miles from Chelmsford City mainline railway station is this beautiful three bedroom family home with the added benefit of being offered with no onward chain"
"PRICE £420,000 - £440,000 . A three bedroom chalet style semi detached family home, situated on this small development within close proximity of local Schools and shops. The property is being sold with vacant possession ."
Three bedroom semi-detached house in popular location being offered for sale with no onward chain. EPC C (Ref: WRS220076)
"This three bedroom Victorian cottage is presented in immaculate order and is being offered with no onward chain. You'll find charm and character throughout this wonderful home. The property offers two reception rooms, family kitchen and ground floor bathroom.On the first floor there are..."
"An attractive 1930’s semi-detached family home situated in the sought-after area of Springfield, featuring a south-easterly facing rear garden and offering potential to extend STPP. EPC E (Ref: CHS150266)"
"Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this EXTENDED semi detached bungalow, boasting a SPACIOUS 17' LOUNGE, modern bathroom, fitted kitchen, TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS, conservatory, CORNER PLOT WITH POTENTIAL TO EXTEND (STP) and ample driveway parking."
Located within an area noted for its popular choice of SCHOOLING for all ages is this three bedroom SEMI DETACHED home located on the southern fringes of SPRINGFIELD
"A contemporary two bedroom end of terrace house with the benefit of secure parking space to rear and south facing courtyard style garden. The property is situated within walking distance of both Moulsham street shops, restaurants and bars and the City centre."
Rarely available four bedroom townhouse on the sought after Long Brandocks development benefitting from a garage and off road parking.
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN this modern two bedroom house situated on the popular CHANNELS DEVELOPMENT featuring open plan living/kitchen/dining room, downstairs cloakroom, TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS, modern bathroom, rear garden and TWO ALLOCATED PARKING SPA..."
"A 3 bedroom end of terrace town house with accommodation spread over three floors. The property has a south facing rear garden and off road parking for three vehicles, the garage has been converted to living accommodation. Walking distance of Moulsham Street and City centre."
"*FAMILY HOME IN TILE KILN WITH HOME OFFICE* This THREE bedroom END OF TERRACE is within WALKING distance to Mildmay Primary School and is located conveniently for the local amenities and travel links. The property benefits from its own HOME OFFICE, three good sized bedrooms a good sized ..."
"For sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN, through lounge/diner, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN, first floor bathroom off the landing, WALKING DISTANCE of the High Street and railway station."
"An extended three-bedroom semi-detached family home, well-proportioned throughout and being located within close proximity to Chelmsford City Centre. The accommodation offers generous entertaining space and consists of a welcoming entrance hall, generous sized lounge, dining room, downstairs bath..."
"William H Brown recommend an internal inspection of this much improved and well-presented family house situated in the North west area of Chelmsford within walking distance of local shops, schools and bus services and also within easy access of Chelmsford town centre and main line station."
A modern detached house situated in a sought-after area of Springfield offering bright and airy accommodation throughout and offered with no onward chain. EPC D (Ref: CHL210074)
"Purplebricks are proud to offer for sale this well presented and recently decorated two bedroom End of Terrace property that is situated in the sought after road of South Primrose Hill, within walking distance of Chelmsford City centre with all of its local amenities and train station. The ground..."
"DETACHED HOUSE BEING SOLD WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN - the property offers an entrance hall, living room, kitchen, ground floor bathroom, two DOUBLE bedrooms, gas central heating, driveway providing off road parking, detached GARAGE & established rear garden."
"GUIDE £400,000 - £425,000 - Modern three bedroom Link-Detached family home with Off Street Parking for two cars"
"Situated in the popular area of Moulsham Lodge is this beautifully presented and extended three bedroom semi-detached family home. Benefiting from ample living accommodation both internally and externally, a viewing is highly advised. EPC D (Ref: CHS230088)"
"PRICED TO SELL - Offered for sale with no onward chain is this 3 BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE situated on Chelmer Village fronting a large greensward. The property does require general updating and comprises an entrance hall, cloakroom, kitchen and rear lounge / dining room, main bedroom with en s (cont.)"
"OFFERS OVER £400,000 - CHAIN FREE! Three bedroom Semi-Detached family home with Off Street Parking for three cars"
"Situated in the popular Moulsham Lodge development is this well presented three-bedroom family home. The property has been well maintained and comprises of an entrance hall way, open plan lounge / diner and kitchen with door leading to the rear garden there is also the addition of a conservatory...."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer for sale this well presented family home within WALKING DISTANCE OF CITY CENTRE & STATION which features THREE BEDROOMS, living room, dining room, fitted kitchen, MODERN SHOWER ROOM WITH WHITE SUITE, established rear garden & driveway to front."
"Extended four bedroom home set on a large corner plot offering flexible and spacious accommodation including ground floor bedroom with wet room. Further salient points include large driveway, kitchen/diner & spacious lounge and is all set with easy access to local schooling."
"Immaculately presented three bedroom family home offered for sale with no onward chain. Located within Springfield area, close to local amenities, popular schools, Aldi Supermarket and A12 road links. Found within a cul-de-sac position the property offers good size lounge/diner, brand new fitted ..."
Two bedroom mid terrace cottage located in the heart of Writtle village being offered for sale with no onward chain.
"**GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £425,000** Situated only half a mile from Chelmsford mainline train station, is this beautiful Victorian two bedroom terraced family home. The internal accommodation comprises 15' lounge, 23' dining room/kitchen, 11' master bedroom with ..."
"An extended two bedroom semi detached BUNGALOW situated in the popular OLD SPRINGFIELD, Sherborne Road is situated within walking distance of Torquay shopping parade, schools and bus services to Chelmsford City centre."
Situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac location is this two bedroom semi-detached chalet style home. Offered with no onward chain this property has ample living accommodation both internally and externally therefore an internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to off...
"Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this EXTENDED semi detached bungalow featuring TWO GOOD SIZED BEDROOMS, modern shower room, SPACIOUS 27' LOUNGE DINER, fitted kitchen, with excellent POTENTIAL TO EXTEND further, driveway parking and PRIVATE REAR GARDEN."
"Being offered with no onward chain is this three-bedroom end of terrace home ideally located within close proximity to Chelmsford City centre. Well-proportioned throughout, to the ground floor the property consists of an entrance hall way, lounge, dining room and kitchen. To the first floor are t..."
"4th FLOOR SKY LOUNGE - Brand new RETIREMENT APARTMENTS now released - 1 & 2 beds now available to reserve off plan, near by SHOW APARTMENTS ready to view, part exchange & other moving incentives available."
"This three-bedroom family home is located on the ever-popular Moulsham Lodge development and is ready to move straight into.The property is very well presented throughout, on the ground floor you have large lounge which opens into the dining room, which overlooks the rear garden. The ki..."
Three bedroom terraced house in the sought after cul-de-sac location of The Priory. The property is being offered with no onward chain and requires modernisation throughout.
Rarely available two bedroom semi-detached house set within a prominent position in the sought after village of Writtle. The property is coming to the market with the added benefit of no onward chain. (Ref: WRS220056)
Located within half a mile of CHELMSFORD CITY CENTRE and Railway Station is this established spacious THREE BEDROOM mid terrace residence. 
"Pleasantly situated in a ""walkway"" position having no passing traffic and fronting a large greensward hence could well suit the family buyer with young children is this 3 bedroom house with cloakroom and conservatory additions. It is located on Tile Kiln on the South side of Chelmsford with (cont.)"
"Connells are pleased to offer this beautifully presented period home, offering openplan lounge/diner, Kitchen, two double bedrooms, bathroom, garden, summer house. This property is 1.8 miles from Chelmsford Mainline station with superb links into London and walking distance into the City Centre."
"Being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN and boasting excellent POTENTIAL TO EXTEND (STP) is this link detached home further offering a 15' LOUNGE, spacious kitchen diner, THREE GOOD SIZED BEDROOMS, re-fitted family bathroom, PRIVATE REAR GARDEN, driveway parking, and GARAGE with potential to convert or e..."
"Purplebricks are proud to present this modernised and improved three bedroom home situated on the sought after Writtle Road located within a close proximity to local amenities, fantastic schools and Chelmsford City Centre with all of its amenities and mainline station. The property is comprised..."
"Situated in the popular area of Moulsham Lodge is this beautifully presented three bedroom terraced family home. Offering ample living accommodation both internally and externally, a viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC C (Ref: CHS230069)"
Situated within walking distance to Chelmsford city centre and mainline railway station is this beautifully presented two bedroom terraced period home. An internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC D (Ref: CHS220513)
William H Brown are pleased to offer this well presented end of terrace cottage style family home. The property has been well extended to rear and into the loft providing a further bedroom. Located in Chelmer Village and close to local amenities and popular schools.
"*We'll pay up to £400 a month towards your mortgage. Plus no legal fees to pay!* A superb two bedroom home at Beaulieu Heath, features include an OPEN PLAN kitchen/living/dining area leading out onto the GARDEN. Kitchen comes complete with integrated APPLIANCES and breakfast bar. Flooring and more!"
"**CHARMING COTTAGE** This VICTORIAN cottage boasts many features which you would expect that are sure to WOW you. This GRADE II LISTED cottage has BEAM FEATURES that really show off this period property in the way it deserves. The accommodation comprises of a charming front entrance, re..."
"Situated in the popular area of Broomfield, William H Brown are pleased to present this three bedroom semi-detached home. The property provides ample living accommodation, two reception rooms, a sun room as well as an additional room which could be used as a study and also has a downstairs WC."
The property is situated on a quiet walkway which is just a short walk from Mildmay Primary School. The property has easy access to local shops and Chelmsford City Centre.On the ground floor you are greeted with an entrance porch leading to a spacious lounge. The newly fitted kitchen is...
2 bedroom duplex with large south facing balcony
**THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN MOULSHAM LODGE** Benefitting from being Offered CHAIN FREE we are proud to present this FAMILY HOME in the ever popular location of Moulsham Lodge. The property is conveniently located for local schools including Moulsham High School and Mildmay Junior School. The P...
"No onward chain! Some modernisation required with large side plot, which subject to the usual planning consents, provides excellent scope for extension of potential additional dwelling."
"William H Brown are pleased to be offering for sale this three double bedroom house situated within a cul-de-sac position in the popular Newland Spring area of Chelmsford. Further benefits include, south facing low maintenance rear garden, garage and immaculately presented"
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this extended 3 bedroom home which fronts greensward an overlooks a pond. The property comes with a garage to the rear and is found at the end of a pleasant cul-de-sac location on the outskirts of Chelmsford City. The property offers a spacious hallway, lounge ..."
"**FAMILY HOME IN TILE KILN** This THREE bedroom END OF TERRACE property is within walking distance to MILDMAY PRIMARY SCHOOL and is IDEAL FOR FAMILIES. The accommodation comprises of a good size lounge with log burner, kitchen/diner, conservatory, downstairs w/c, three good sized bedrooms, family..."
Three Bedroom Terraced house in immaculate condition with Off Street Parking for two cars
"**IDEAL FAMILY HOME IN TILE KILN** This THREE bedroom END OF TERRACED property is within walking distance to Mildmay Junior School and the green. This home is VERY WELL MAINTAINED throughout and offers both a front and rear garden. The accommodation comprises of a lounge, kitchen/diner, conserva..."
"Offered with no onward chain is this well-proportioned three-bedroom semi-detached family home located in close proximity to Chelmsford City centre. This home comprises of an entrance hall, lounge with patio doors leading to the rear garden, kitchen opening up on to the dining area as well as the..."
"Two bedroom period property within walking distance to Chelmsford city centre and mainline railway station, two reception rooms, separate kitchen, two double bedrooms. EPC D (Ref: GDS230008)"
A beautifully presented & sympathetically extended three DOUBLE bedroom house occupying a fabulous Cul de sac position within the Newlands Spring area of Chelmsford. 
100 Key Properties is pleased to present this fantastic three-bedroom terraced home with off-street parking. 
*LIKE NEW CONDITION* well presented one bedroom first floor apartment with WALK OUT BALCONY set within a desirable MCCARTHY STONE retirement living plus development
"This Victorian TWO bedroom end of terrace property is ideal for the busy commuter being located within walking distance of Chelmsford City centre and the mainline train station. The property enjoys a good size lounge/diner, kitchen, ground floor bathroom, two bedrooms and a southerly facing (cont.)"
"*CATCHMENT FOR MILDMAY JUNIOR SCHOOL* This THREE bedroom property is currently being sold with NO-ONWARD CHAIN and is within walking distance to Mildmay Junior School. The accommodation comprises of a lounge, kitchen/diner, three good sized bedrooms MODERN BATHROOM, rear garden and GARAG..."
"A well presented Two Bedroom Semi Detached Bungalow that comprises of an Entrance Hall, White Suite Bathroom, Fitted Kitchen, Lounge/Dining Room and Two Bedrooms. The property further benefits from gas central heating, double glazed windows, driveway providing off road parking and a mature sou..."
This well presented three bedroom mid terrace property is ideally located in the heart of Springfield
"**GUIDE PRICE £375,000-£400,000** Offering NO ONWARD CHAIN and benefiting from a 16' DUAL ASPECT lounge plus 16' dining room & large kitchen/breakfast room is this EXTENDED three bedroom end-terrace property. Boasting a sizeable rear garden with POTENTIAL TO EXTEND (STPP), a RECENTLY REFITTED sh..."
"Three Bedroom Semi-Detached House with Garage, Ideal for a young family"
Being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this stunning two bedroom penthouse apartment. The property is in immaculate condition benefiting from a wrap around balcony with views over Chelmsford's central park and county cricket ground. The property also has allocated underground parking for one.
"This spacious house, within a short walk of the City Centre an Station, offers lounge / diner, modern fitted kitchen, 2 double bedrooms, modern shower room, gas central heating, off street parking to front and rear garden."
"A delightful and well-presented two bedroom semi-detached bungalow, with a long driveway and excellent garden to the rear. This property occupies an excellent position on a quiet and sought after road."
New to the market is this three-bedroom home in Moulsham LodgeThe property is being sold with no onward chain and is available to view straight away.The property itself offers a lounge/diner and the kitchen on the ground floor and three bedrooms that are serviced by a family bath...
William H Brown are delighted to offer this is a well presented three bedroom terraced property along Meadgate Avenue in Chelmsford. With NO CHAIN early viewings are advised
"Extended mid-terraced house on the sought-after Long Brandocks development benefitting from three bedrooms, modern kitchen, good sized lounge and front and rear gardens. EPC. D (Ref: WRS230020)"
"Being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this well presented EXTENDED terraced property boasting FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS plus NURSERY/STUDY, modern shower room and family bathroom, spacious lounge, kitchen diner, UTILTY ROOM with excellent potential for further extensions (STP) and private UNOVERLOOKED RE..."
"Situated within the popular Springfield area of Chelmsford, this well appointed house offers three double bedrooms, a large driveway to the front with a garage and garden to the rear."
"A two double bedroom Victorian cottage situated in the heart of the City centre , off road parking space to rear. The property has a re-fitted kitchen and the benefit of a ground floor shower room and first floor bathroom off bedroom one."
Ideally located within close proximity to Chelmsford City centre is this stunning newly built two bedroom detached bungalow
"Grab yourself the opportunity of a swift move with this spacious 3 bedroom family home that is available with NO ONWARD CHAIN in a FAVOURED LOCATION in catchment area of FANTASTIC SCHOOLS, within WALKING DISTANCE TO TRAIN STATION (15 min) and CITY CENTRE (10 min) surrounded by CLOSEBY NATURE rese..."
"Located in Great Baddow is this well-presented THREE BEDROOM family home features TWO RECEPTION rooms, fitted kitchen with family bathroom. Further benefits include an out build with potential to convert into an annex"
Situated on a quiet walk way is this stunning three bedroom terraced home
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN this terraced home SITUATED IN THE POPULAR GREAT BADDOW AREA of Chelmsford and comprises an entrance hall, cloakroom, living room, kitchen/dining room, three bedrooms, bathroom/wc, front garden with BLOCK PAVED DRIVEWAY and ..."
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Excellent 3 bedroom semi-detached family home. This property is located within a 15-20 MINUTE WALK OF CHELMSFORD STATION and further benefits from a well fitted kitchen, a good size lounge leading to its own conservatory, a ground floor cloakroom, HUGE 100FT REAR GARDEN with..."
"*LAUNCHING SPRING 2023 - Register your interest today!* The Cooper is a brand new home, well suited to first time buyers, young professionals and downsizers alike. Inside you'll find a MODERN, OPEN PLAN LIVING & DINING ROOM, plus two spacious bedrooms. These homes also come with allocated PARKING."
This recently renovated three bedroom terraced house is ideally located in the heart of Great Baddow
"Located within walking distance of Chelmsford City Centre and mainline station and multiple shopping facilities, a three bedroom semi detached property benefitting from a large garden approximately 90' in length."
"Being offered to the market with no onward chain and ideally located under one mile from Chelmsford's mainline Railway Station and 1.2 miles to Chelmsford's city centre, this well situated house is close to cycle lanes into town. This spacious three bedroom family home offers bright and airy a..."
Purplebricks are proud to present this modern semi-detached two double bedroom home situated in the sought after Chancellor Park development. The property has been modernised and improved to a high standard with extended living space in the form of a partially brick built conservatory which opens...
"We are pleased to offer this 2/3 bedroom end of terrace home offering two receptions, lounge, kitchen, family bathroom, two shower rooms and rear garden. Situated within close proximity to Chelmsford City Centre with all of its local amenities, main line railway station and schools."
"McCartney Sales is delighted to offer this two bedroom mid-terraced period property which benefits from the lounge which includes the feature fitted fireplace and the fitted kitchen to the rear.On the first floor there is the two bedrooms and a family bathroom.Externally, to the ..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this modern end-terraced property, built in 2011, and located on the very popular Clarion Gate Development in Great Baddow, this development is away from the main road and a 20MPH zone. The property is immaculately presented throughout and has the adde..."
"*Guide price £375,000 - £400,000*
Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this modernised, well presented two double bedroom house incorporating original period features situated within walking distance of Chelmsford City centre with all of its local amenities, main line railway station and ..."
This modern well presented two double bedroom house is located within walking distance of the city centre. It possesses stunning original period features and is modern throughout. Internal viewings are strongly recommended
"WELL PRESENTED three bedroom home, Overlooking a small green to the front, WITH A SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN"
"A three bedroom end terraced house offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN, ground floor cloakroom, SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN, "
"An EXTENDED three bedroom house in an established location close to LOCAL SCHOOLS & shops, GROUND FLOOR CLOAKROOM, dual aspect lounge/diner."
"*MUST SEE* A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED ONE BEDROOM, GROUND FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT WITH A PATIO AREA ~Built by McCarthy & Stone~"
Conveniently situated approx ONE mile from the city centre is this extended THREE BEDROOM semi detached family home.To the front of the property there is potential for off-road parking for two cars (STPP). The rear garden is approximately 80' in depth.
Conveniently situated approx. one mile from the city centre is this extended three bedroom semi detached property
"Being in need of some general updating and modernisation is this Two Bedroom Semi Detached Bungalow. The accommodation comprises of an Entrance Hall, Two Good Sized Bedrooms, Bathroom, Kitchen/Breakfast Room, Lounge and Conservatory. The property further benefits from double glazed windows, ga..."
Located in Broomfield is this spacious two bedroom cottage located within walking distance to Broomfield hospital and local amenities. An internal viewing is advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC awaited (Ref: NBC221515)
"**Ask about our incentives available** MODERN FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT WITH BOSCH APPLIANCES. Bedroom one with EN SUITE, WARDROBE and JULIET BALCONY plus generous bedroom two. Allocated PARKING."
"**INCENTIVES TO HELP YOU MOVE ** MODERN FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT WITH BOSCH APPLIANCES. Bedroom one with EN SUITE, WARDROBE and JULIET BALCONY plus generous bedroom two. Allocated PARKING."
"**Contemporary FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT WITH BOSCH APPLIANCES. Bedroom one with EN SUITE, WARDROBE and JULIET BALCONY plus generous bedroom two. Allocated PARKING."
"*INCENTIVES AVAILABLE** CONTEMPORARY FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT WITH BOSCH APPLIANCES. Bedroom one with EN SUITE, WARDROBE and JULIET BALCONY plus generous bedroom two. Allocated PARKING."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are pleased to offer for sale this VICTORIAN TERRACED HOME situated within Chelmsford city centre with NO ONWARD CHAIN comprising TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, fitted kitchen with Shaker style units, two bedrooms, bathroom with modern white suite, SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN, residen..."
"William H Brown are delighted to offer this well-proportioned three bedroom terraced freehold residence providing an excellent family home. Offering neutral decors throughout, to the ground floor the house consists of a well equipped kitchen, fantastic reception room and a useful utility room."
This well presented three bedroom extended terraced home is ideally located in Great Baddow
"Guide Price £350,000 - £375,000
Rarely available in the city of Chelmsford is an impressive two bedroom top floor apartment, located 0.4 miles from the train station"
"*** Guide Price £350,000 to £375,000 ***A three bedroom semi detached property situated within this sought after village, close to the local amenities including village school, shops and Hylands Park. Writtle is located on the outskirts of Chelmsford City Centre within easy reach of the train sta..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £350,000-£360,000** Situated in the sought after Chelmer Village is this three bedroom terraced house that would make an ideal family home. The property benefits from an open plan ground floor, three good sized bedrooms and a family bathroom. Internal viewings are strongly recommende"
"**Guide Price £350,000 to £375,000** Being sold with the added advantage of NO ONWARD chain and situated under a mile from Chelmsford's mainline train station, is this spacious three bedroom family home. The accommodation comprises; 12' living room, 12' dining r..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000** This Spacious two bedroom penthouse is a commuters dream and is offered with no onward chain!"
"Guide price £350,000 - £375,000 and being sold with no onward chain. Brian Thomas Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this lovely two bedroom semi detached bungalow located in a quiet and sought after development within short walking distance to local amenities."
"A unique opportunity for this SUPERBLY MODERN AND IMMACULATE, 1,183 SQ FT TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM, upside down duplex apartment. With TWO JULIET BALCONIES, TWO ALLOCATED PARKING SPACES and more! MUST BE VIEWED!"
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are pleased to offer for sale this three bedroom extended terraced home situated in the popular area of GALLEYWOOD. The property features TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, open plan kitchen/diner, TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS, ons single, shower room with white suite. Externally the property offers..."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are pleased to offer for sale this mid terraced family home featuring living/dining room, FITTED KITCHEN, three bedrooms, BATHROOM WITH MODERN FOUR PIECE WHITE SUITE, landscaped rear garden with paved patio and seating area, GARAGE IN BLOCK."
NO ONWARD CHAIN - SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW - TWO BEDROOMS - TWO WET ROOMS - 16' LIVING ROOM - 9' DINING ROOM - 10' KITCHEN - 11' MASTER BEDROOM - GARDEN - DETACHED GARAGE - OFF STREET PARK...
"GUIDE 350,000 - £375,000 Extended Three Bedroom End Of Terrace House with Garage "
A charming cottage offering two bedrooms and a first floor shower room and on the ground floor there is a lounge and a kitchen with appliances including built in stainless steel oven with stainless steel gas hob with extractor over and free standing appliances including fridge and washing mach...
BEING OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN IS THIS THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME WITH A LARGE SIZE REAR GARDEN LOCATED A MILE AWAY FROM CHELMSFORD CITY CENTRE!
"Being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this well presented terraced property boasting THREE GOOD SIZED BEDROOMS, kitchen diner, SPACIOUS LOUNGE with CONSERVATORY to rear, ground-floor CLOAKROOM/WC, re-fitted family bathroom, PRIVATE REAR GARDEN and driveway parking for 2/3 cars. Ideally located close..."
"Guide Price - £350,000 - £375,000 - Ideally located in the heart of Galleywood is this well presented three bedroom end of terrace house"
"OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN! This good size family home is located on the popular Tile Kiln estate, in a walkway position and has accommodation comprising lounge / diner, modern kitchen with appliances, 2 double bedrooms, 1 single bedroom, bathroom, front and rear garden, garage to the rear and ..."
"*LAUNCHING SPRING 2023 - Register your interest today!* These brand new homes are in an enviable Chelmsford location, surrounded by picturesque countryside yet just a 12-minute drive from Chelmsford city centre. Plus, all homes come with a MODERN INTERIOR, an easy, chain free move and PARKING."
Purplebricks are proud to present this spacious and extended terraced home with three good size bedrooms situated in a sought after cul-de-sac location within walking distance of Chelmsford City Centre and all of its local amenities including the mainline station. The property boasts versatile ...
"Third floor apartment with private balcony & £10,500 Mortgage Contribution available*"
"This spacious three bedroom family home is being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Benfitting from Garage/Driveway, downstairs cloakroom and a large rear garden this property is not one to be missed! Early viewings are advised to not miss out!"
"Situated in Emberson Court, on the fringe of Chelmer Village, is this stunning two bedroom end of terrace home. This well presented property comprises of a spacious living area, fitted kitchen, conservatory, two large bedrooms, and family bathroom. Internal viewings are strongly recommended"
"Brand new RETIREMENT APARTMENTS now released - 1 & 2 beds now available to reserve off plan, stunning residents SKY LOUNGE, part exchange & other moving incentives available. "
"**Ask about our incentives** MODERN GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT WITH BOSCH APPLIANCES. Bedroom one with EN SUITE, WARDROBE and FRENCH DOORS onto patio plus generous bedroom two and STORAGE SPACE. Allocated PARKING."
"A modern GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT WITH BOSCH APPLIANCES. Bedroom one with EN SUITE, WARDROBE and FRENCH DOORS onto patio plus generous bedroom two and STORAGE SPACE. Allocated PARKING."
"Two bedroom, Two Bathroom, Top Floor Apartment With Balcony | Allocated Parking Space | Residents Gym | Concierge Service
Leasehold | Ground Rent & Service Charges Apply | EPC B"
"**We'll pay up to £400 a month towards your mortgage. Plus no legal fees to pay!** A stylish 2 bed coach house at Beaulieu Heath. Features include an OPEN PLAN kitchen/living/dining area with Juliette balcony, kitchen comes complete with integrated APPLIANCES, flooring throughout and more."
This family home is set in the sought after area of Newland Spring. With spacious rooms throughout and recently modernised kitchen this home can be moved straight into and will be perfect for any family or investors
"Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this well presented semi detached home that boasts a GENEROUS UNOVERLOOKED REAR GARDEN with excellent space to extend (stpp) and a private driveway with DETACHED GARAGE (with door to garden!), plus a SPACIOUS LOUNGE, modern fitted kitchen, TWO GOOD-SIZED B..."
"Situated in the heart of Chelmsford City Centre is this three bedroom property. Being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN and is in need of work with huge potential. Benefiting from on street permit parking, large rear garden and three double rooms. Early viewings are advised to not miss out!"
"We'll pay up to £400 a month towards your mortgage. Plus no legal fees to pay!*A stylish 2 bedroom coach house at Beaulieu Heath features include an OPEN PLAN kitchen/living/dining area with Juliette balcony, kitchen comes complete with integrated APPLIANCES, flooring included throughout and more."
"Second floor 2 bedroom apartment with private balcony and £10,170 Key Worker Discount available."
"Fifth floor apartment with private balcony, 2 bedrooms and floor to ceiling windows throughout."
"Offered with no onward chain comes well presented end terrace cottage that benefits from a west facing spacious garden to the rear. The property dates back to approximately 1900. The ground floor comprises of a separate lounge to the front, with a kitchen/breakfast room overlooking the rear. T..."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN this three bedroom character house situated within walking distance to the city centre & mainline station, featuring a living room, separate dining room, fitted kitchen, ground floor bathroom, two double bedrooms & o..."
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN *** Leonard Gray Estate Agents are pleased to market this THREE BEDROOM, SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY. Unusually for its era, the property benefits from a convenient layout, with a DOWNSTAIRS SHOWER ROOM, WC AND PLUMBING UPSTAIRS and ALL BEDROOMS OFF THE LANDING. The house also feat..."
Located in a convenient spot just over HALF OF A MILE to Chelmsford Mainline Railway Station on the London Liverpool Street Line is this two bedroom executive FIRST FLOOR apartment with NO CHAIN.
"Fourth floor 2 bedroom apartment with private balcony, open plan kitchen/living area and multiple storage cupboards."
"This three-bedroom property is located within easy access of Chelmsford City Centre and is being sold with no onward chain.The property has huge scope to improve and would make a great project for somebody who is looking for their first refurbishment project.On the ground floor, ..."
"King William Court is an outstanding development combining Studios, 1 & 2 bedroom contemporary apartments, featuring spacious interiors designed to make the most of light, space and clean lines wherever you turn located right in the heart of Chelmsford City Centre"
An exceptionally well-presented TWO BEDROOM PENTHOUSE apartment located within the prestigious Century Tower development positioned in the heart of Chelmsford city centre. The property sits minutes away from Chelmsford's mainline railway station and benefits from its own underground PARKING SPACE.
"Offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN this mid-terraced, three bedroom house benefits from being positioned opposite a pleasing greensward. There is a lounge, kitchen diner and a ground floor WC. Independent drive leading to a single integral garage. Key held, internal viewing highly recommended."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £325,000 - £350,000 *** Situated in North-West Chelmsford, is this three bedroom semi detached house"
"Situated 0.5 miles away from Chelmsford Railway Station, is this attractive two bedroom apartment. Located on the second floor and has access to a generous balcony with views overlooking the development. This property was built to a high standard throughout in 2014 and is still under the NHBC gu..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this two bedroom, executive, second floor apartment which is modern throughout. Located 0.4 miles from Chelmsford mainline railway station and 0.5 miles from the city centre, this apartment is an ideal purchase for first-time buyers and commuters alike. ..."
"Offered with no onward chain is this three-bedroom semi-detached character home. The property consists of to the ground floor an entrance hall, w/c, lounge with feature fireplace, kitchen / dining area (with patio doors leading to the rear garden), To the first floor are three bedrooms and the fa..."
"Immaculately presented and located in the highly requested Beaulieu Park development is this two double bedroom ground floor apartment offering fabulous proportions throughout and providing an excellent first time buy. Boasting of contemporary living space, internally the property consists of a s..."
"*LAUNCHING SPRING 2023 - Register your interest today!* These brand new apartments are in an enviable Chelmsford location, surrounded by picturesque countryside yet just a 12-minute drive from Chelmsford city centre. Plus, all homes come with a MODERN INTERIOR, a chain free move and PARKING."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer this TOP FLOOR APARTMENT being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN, situated in the sought after MARCONI DEVELOPMENT within Chelmsford City Centre. The apartment features OPEN PLAN LIVING ACCOMMODATION, 31' balcony, TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS, master bedroom with fitted ..."
"REF:-GW0451 *SENSATIONAL TOP FLOOR TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM MODERN APARTMENT* Situated in the highly desirable Gemini House, perfectly located in the heart of Chelmsford City Centre and only 0.4 miles from the Mainline Station which offers direct service to London Liverpool St in only ..."
**MAKE THIS YOUR OWN HOME** William H Brown are delighted to offer this family home with NO CHAIN that needs updating. The property has a lounge and a separate dining room and also a downstairs WC. Externally this home boasts off street parking to the rear and also a garage.
"Offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN and enjoying a pleasant location overlooking school grounds and sports playing fields, a particularly SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM MID-TERRACE FAMILY HOME which has been extended to the ground floor and offering a large lounge/dining room, conservatory, kit..."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are pleased to offer for sale this end of terrace family home being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN, the property comprises a lounge/diner, fitted kitchen, three bedrooms & family bathroom.  "
"William H brown are delighted to offer this beautifully presented RETIREMENT apartment with a BALCONY and NO CHAIN. Built by McCarthy Stone. Close to supermarket, opposite popular Oaklands park with easy access to town."
"Located in the popular village of Broomfield is this stunning end of terrace, two bedroom family home"
"Situated on a generous CORNER PLOT close to shops, schools and amenities a 2 bedroom end terraced property being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £325,000 - £350,000 *** Ideally located in the heart of Sandon is this character filled two bedroom cottage"
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN - LONG REAR GARDEN OFFERING SCOPE TO EXTEND (stpp) ** A THREE BEDROOM TERRACED HOME SITUATED WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE OF THE CITY CENTRE WITH THE MAINLINE RAILWAY STATION TO LONDON. The accommodation includes: Ground floor: ENTRANCE HALL, GOOD SIZE THROUGH LOUNGE, SEPARATE DI..."
Philip James Are pleased to offer for sale this two bedroom second floor apartment on the popular Evolution development in the centre of Chelmsford. The property is presented to a very high standard and benefits from having an on site Gym and allocated parking. Vieiwng highly recommeded
"McCartney Sales and Lettings is introducing this excellently presented, two bed flat located in one of Chelmsford's most popular apartment locations, which is also walking distance to the railway station & City Centre. The City Centre has many designer shops, as well as various bars and re..."
"Immaculately presented two bedroom apartment offered for sale with secure intercom entry. Located within close proximity to Chelmsford City Centre and railway station. Accommodation boasts, impressive entrance hall, two well proportioned bedrooms, en-suite shower room and three piece bathroom. La..."
"A pleasant, converted ground floor apartment with views across Broomfield Green, offered for sale with no onward chain. An internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC D (Ref: CHS220412)"
"Offered with NO CHAIN and located within easy reach of Chelmsford City Centre is this older style terrace home. With moderate TLC required, parking & garage to the rear early viewings are strongly recommended"
"An extremely well presented two double bedroom third floor apartment, situated within close proximity to Chelmsford City Centre and mainline railway station offering an ensuite shower room as well as three piece bathroom, well proportioned open plan kitchen and living space with balcony. "
"Set within this modern development this unique three bedroom apartment Measures nearly 1200 sqft. The centrally place living room opens out to a private balcony and also accesses a separate modern kitchen and utility room, the bedrooms are a very good size one with a walk in wardrobe. Externall..."
"A three bedroom terraced property situated on the Westlands development being offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN, located in a walkway position with secure parking to the rear and a double garage. Located within walking distance of local shops, schools and Chelmsford City centre."
"*NO ONWARD CHAIN* Being situated close to Chelmsford Town Centre & Train Station, is this three bedroom terraced home perfect for any first time purchase or investment. Internally to the ground floor this property features a good size lounge, separate diner / study area..."
"A quirky two bedroom Victorian cottage, oozing with CHARM AND CHARACTER WITH MANY ORIGINAL FEATURES. The property is situated in the sought after location of Old Moulsham giving excellent access to Chelmsford town centre and mainline railway station. Features include: Lounge 22''5""..."
"Goodmove are pleased to present thsi spacious end of terrace home, within convenient reach of Chelmsford town centre and within commutavile of the City of London. The property which boasts light and space briefly consists: Entrance hallway, fitted kitchen, spacious lounge. Stairs then ..."
"City Centre apartment offering good sized accommodation, great views, parking and no onward chain. Viewing is recommended to fully appreciate the location and living space available."
"NEW HOMES IN OLD MOULSHAMWe offer this stunning collection of apartments in a prime location, set in highly desirable area of Old Moulsham.Offering the modern way of life, 35 Moulsham Street, is within a short walk to CHELMSFORD BUSTLING CITY CENTRE where you will f..."
"Welcome to this stunning one bedroom first floor apartment, located in the heart of Chelmsford, Essex. This stylish apartment boasts a balcony overlooking the tranquil River Chelmer, providing the perfect setting to unwind and relax..."
A very well-presented and improved 2 bedroom end of terrace property situated in the popular area of Great Baddow. The property is approached from the front into a welcoming entrance hall leading through to the kitchen and lounge/diner. The lounge/diner is a comfortable room with access doors i...
"A two double bedroom terraced home with south facing rear garden, situated on a walk way position at the end of a cul-de-sac. The property is being sold with no onward chain and is positioned within close proximity of local schools, super markets, Doctors Surgery and Chelmsford Athletic club."
"A well presented two double bedroom top floor apartment located in the popular village of Broomfield with allocated parking, en suite shower room and well positioned for access into Chelmsford City Centre and Broomfield Hospital."
"This central apartment is ideal for a City commuter, or any buyer looking for a property within a short walk of Chelmsford’s High Street. Internal viewings are highly recommended"
Being offered for sale WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN is this TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM apartment benefitting from an impressive 15 FOOT BALCONY! 
"**GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000** This stunning three bedroom family home in the heart of Great Baddow is not one to be missed"
"This Incredible home has stunning views overlooking Central Park, with 2 double bedrooms, open plan kitchen Dining room. A large en-suite - What's not to love?! This really is a special home an experience you only get from walking through the door..."
A stunning city centre apartment just minutes from the mainline station and Bond Street Shopping Centre. This home will wow you as soon as you walk in having been finished to the highest of standards
"** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £315,000 **A stunning city centre apartment just minutes from the mainline station and Bond Street Shopping Centre. This home will wow you as soon as you walk in having been finished to the highest of standards"
"***GUIDE PRICE £300,000-325,000*** A two double bedroom executive apartment located in Chelmsford City Centre. Benefitting from underground parking as well as a balcony with amazing views over Chelmsford. Offered with no onward chain."
"This stunning 2 bedroom 6th floor flat situated in the heart of Chelmsford city centre is not to be missed. Benefiting from 2 double bedrooms, balcony overlooking central park and allocated parking. Being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN this is a perfect first time purchase or investment opportunity."
"Situated in the heart of Chelmsford City Centre is this stunning third floor two bedroom flat. Being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN and benefitting from en-suite, allocated parking and balcony. This amazing property is not one to be missed and early viewings are advised!"
"Conveniently located in Great Baddow ideal for local amenities and being offered with no onward chain is this three bedroom house, sure to be popular families and first time buyers"
"*The stamp duty freeze is getting close to finishing take advantage of this property with NO ONWARD CHAIN now*
A stylish 2 bedroom ground floor apartment occupying a favored position within this attractive modern development located within the heart of Chelmsford city centre. The apartment forms ..."
"A chance to acquire this two bedroom end of terrace property that offers tonnes of potential. The property benefits from a drive, large reception room, fitted kitchen, two bedrooms, bathroom and private rear garden"
Flexiplex apartment split across 2 floors with a dedicated study.
"A two bedroom first floor apartment situated on this popular development, EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM, fitted kitchen, BALCONY & UNDERGROUND PARKING SPACE, short walk to the railway station."
"**GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000** This two bedroom semi detached house is extremely well presented and recently renovated throughout"
"Guide Price £300,000 - £340,000 - This three bedroom end of terrace family home is located close to local amenities and Chelmsford city centre"
"Leaders are happy to offer this superb 2 bedroom 6th floor flat situated in the heart of Chelmsford city. Benefiting from 2 double bedrooms, en-suite bathroom, a balcony overlooking central park and allocated parking. Being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN this is a perfect first time purchase or inv..."
"Lordsons are proud to present this attractive, modern two-bedroom apartment in the very popular City of Chelmsford. Located on the 2nd floor and built to a high standard throughout. The property benefits from two double bedrooms with fitted wardrobes, en-suite to the master bedroom, a (cont.)"
"Brand new to Beaulieu Heath, a superb one bedroom home featuring an OPEN PLAN kitchen/living/dining area, integrated APPLIANCES to the kitchen. A superb light filled principal bedroom with luxurious bathroom. FLOORING included throughout and more!"
"**NO ONWARDS CHAIN** Rarely available in the city of Chelmsford is well presented one bedroom first floor apartment, located 0.4 miles from the train station. The property would be ideal for commuters for a first time buy or investment property. Internal viewings are strongly recommended"
"Leaders are happy to offer this 2 bedroom apartment set in the heart of Chelmsford City . With no onward chain and being set within a short walk to the city centre this would be the perfect first time buy or investment. The modern property includes an entrance, lounge and kitchen, two good sized ..."
"This is a rare opportunity to purchase a move-in ready property that has been recently decorated throughout. Located in Great Barrow, this gorgeous terraced home boasts a plethora of superb features, from its stunning garden to its spacious rooms. Move fast to avoid missing out on this wonderfu..."
Pleased to offer for sale this stunning two double bedroom apartment situated a stone's throw away from Central Park. Both bedrooms have views over the cricket ground. The property has been finished to a very high standard and is offered with no onward chain.
"A delightful and quirky character cottage that offers a 17' LOUNGE DINER, two double bedrooms, and an 84' REAR GARDEN - located WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO THE STATION, in the heart of Old Springfield - with local shops, schools and bus services within a very short walk! Also offering a fitted kit..."
"LUXURY CITY CENTRE APARTMENT WITH COMPLETE ONWARD CHAIN - the property offers an entrance hall, OPEN PLAN living/dining/kitchen with INTEGRATED appliances, balcony, two DOUBLE BEDROOMS, en-suite shower room PLUS bathroom with modern white suite & parking which has an electric barrier for a..."
This immaculately presented apartment is ideally situated just a stones throw to Chelmsford railway station
"Yopa is delighted to offer for sale this immaculate, two double bedroom apartment situated in Chelmsford city centre and within walking distance to the train station. The property comes with secure parking and a long lease. ****Call or book a viewing online 24/7****"
"Situated in the sought after Gloucester Avenue is this two bedroom end of terrace house that would make an ideal first time buy or family home. The property benefits from a spacious lounge, fitted kitchen, two good sized bedrooms and family bathroom. Internal viewings are strongly recommended"
"An exceptional particularly spacious two bedroom second floor apartment with dual aspect allowing in plenty of light, views to one side over the communal gardens and offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"RE-AVAILABLE, ONLY TO BUYERS ABLE TO PROCEED STRAIGHT AWAY! Fifth floor executive apartment with balcony and stunning views across Central Park to the City centre, and the Chelmsford County Cricket Grounds. Two good sized bedroom with en-suite to main, separate bathroom, open plan lounge/k (cont.)"
"Located within close proximity of Chelmsford City centre and station is this recently built two bedroom apartment within this imposing tower block which fronts Central Park. The apartment has a security entry system and comprises a good size lounge with further useful area, kitchen, shower r (cont.)"
Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this lovely two bedroom first floor apartment. The property offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout and is presented in fantastic order. The Lounge offers ample space for living and dining room furniture. T...
"**Modern first floor FLAT OVER GARAGE with INCENTIVES AVAILABLE. A modern apartment with WARDROBES to the bedroom, CONTEMPORARY bathroom and generous OPEN PLAN kitchen/sitting/dining area with BOSCH appliances and JULIET BALCONY. Allocated PARKING."
William H Brown are pleased to offer this superb riverside apartment within walking distance of the mainline station and Chelmsford city centre. Having been finished to very high standard the property benefits from en suite to master bedroom and has no chain. Ideal investor or first time purchase.
"William H Brown are delighted to offer for sale this modern LARGE ONE BEDROOM top floor apartment featuring a spacious entrance hall, open plan living/dining room with fitted kitchen with built in appliances, south facing balcony double bedroom with fitted wardrobe and bathroom."
"An incredibly spacious two double bedroom top floor flat that is well presented throughout, Large lounge with Juliet balcony, fitted kitchen with space for appliances, two double bedrooms and bathroom with white suite. Fully double glazed. Cost efficient communal heating and water. There is s..."
Boasting PERIOD FEATURES THROUGHOUT is this STUNNING TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM DUPLEX apartment within WALKING DISTANCE OF THE CITY CENTRE.
"**GUIDE PRICE £280,000 - £300,000** 0.7 MILE FROM CHELMSFORD STATION- BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED- GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT- PRIVATE ENTRANCE- HIGH SPECIFICATION- TWO BEDROOMS- OPEN PLAN LIVING- INTEGRATED..."
"GUIDE £280,000 - £300,000. Two bedroom top floor apartment with en-suite and underground parking. CHAIN FREE! "
"We present to the market this stunning two bedroom apartment, offering a fantastic location in CENTRAL CHELMSFORD. With the train station a short walk away, transport links and amenities close by, there is little left to be desired! Don't miss out on this rare opportunity!"
This Spacious two bedroom apartment is a commuters dream and is offered with no onward chain!
"We are proud to present Regency Apartments, a collection of 1 & 2 bedroom apartments within this magnificent, Georgian building in the centre of Chelmsford, just half a mile from the station & even closer to the City Centre.These sympathetically renovated homes perfectly balance the old and new ..."
"Situated towards the west side of Chelmsford is this amazing two bedroom semi-detached property. Benefiting from two double bedrooms, driveway and a good size rear garden. Early viewings are advised to not miss out on this great property."
"Guide Price - £275,000 - £300,000 - Ideally located in the village of Great Baddow is this stunning two bedroom penthouse"
"**LAST REMAINING APARTMENT ON PHASE ONE** - Regency Apartments is bespoke collection of thirteen homes. Phase One consists of five luxurious 1 & 2 bedroom apartments set within a 3 storey Georgian, Grade II listed building in Chelmsford city centre"
"A fantastic chance to purchase this investment property, a two bedroom home situated on the outskirts of Chelmsford City. The property comes with a driveway to the front for four vehicles, front and rear gardens, hallway, kitchen, conservatory, lounge/diner, two double bedrooms and a bathroom."
Located just over a mile from Chelmsford Railway Station is this fantastic two bedroom semi detached house. The spacious property currently has tenants in situ making it the perfect investment!
Unique building plot with land.
"Split level 2 bedroom maisonette being offered to the market with no onward chain, the property has the benefit of re-fitted kitchen/dining room, new carpets , redecorated throughout. Use of a communal courtyard garden to rear."
"McCartney Sales in Chelmsford has great pleasure in offering this two bedroom premium penthouse for sale, comprising of two double bedrooms, an en-suite to bedroom one, a family bathroom, open plan kitchen and lounge and a private balcony with great views across Chelmsford City Centre. This co..."
"Third floor apartment offering an open-plan layout, two private west facing balconies and high specification German engineered kitchen."
"QUICK SALE REQUIRED! Offered for sale with vacant possession available and no onward chain is this modern City centre apartment benefiting from TWO BEDROOMS and TWO EN-SUITES, as well as barrier entry private parking. It is located right in the City centre, literally within a FEW MINUTES WA (cont.)"
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer for sale this TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT located in the popular OLD MOULSHAM AREA and within walking distance to local amenities, the apartment features a MASTER BEDROOM WITH EN SUITE SHOWER, open plan living kitchen dining room, modern family bathroom, COVER..."
"Boasting a GARAGE and TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS with an EN SUITE to the master is this first floor apartment centrally located in Chelmsford being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN and further offering a modern kitchen with NEWLY FITTED BOILER, modern bathroom, SPACIOUS 16' LOUNGE DINER, lawned communal areas,..."
NO ONWARD CHAIN- GROUND FLOOR MAISONETTE- MODERN AND WELL-PRESENTED DECOR- PRIVATE ENTRANCE PORCH- TWO BEDROOMS- 21' LOUNGE/DINER- 9' NEWLY RE-FITTED KITCHEN- BATHROOM- OFF STREET PARKING- PRIVATE G...
"Located within the residential area of Chelmer Village is this well presented ONE BEDROOM FREEHOLD HOUSE. The accommodation comprises of an Entrance Lobby, Lounge, Fitted Kitchen and Conservatory to the ground floor with a Double Bedroom and Bathroom to the First Floor. The property further be..."
"A pleasant two bedroom ground floor maisonette featuring a shared garden, allocated parking and an en-suite to the master, situated just 0.2 miles from Chelmsford station and offered for sale with no onward chain. EPC C (Ref: CHS180399)"
"A modern one bedroom, built 2019 - Chain free and in good condition throughout, this apartment is ready to move into. Fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, open plan living/dining area Double bedroom  Ideal for a first time buyer or investor  Convenient central location..."
Purpose built one bedroom ground floor maisonette with own courtyard rear garden and secure allocated parking space. The property forms part of this small development situated just off Springfield Road within walking distance of the City centre .
"Situated within walking distance to Chelmsford city centre and mainline railway station is this beautifully presented ground floor apartment. Offered with no onward chain, an internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer, EPC C (Ref: CHS230085)"
"**75% OWNERSHIP (With OPTION TO PURCHASE 100% FOR £360,000)** William H Brown are delighted to offer this superb two double bedroom top floor apartment offering fabulous proportions throughout providing an excellent buy for young professionals, commuters in to London"
"The stunning two bedroom apartment is ideally located in Moulsham, close to the city centre. This property would make an ideal first purchase or investment property. Internal viewings are highly recommended"
"Situated in Great Baddow is this stunning two bedroom top floor flat. Benefiting from two parking spots one being a carport, en-suite to master bedroom, bike store and presented in immaculate condition. Early viewings are advised for this amazing property."
"** GUIDE PRICE £260,000 - £270,000 ** This light and airy two bedroom apartment, situated in central Chelmsford. Located on a modern development just off of Springfield Road and within easy walking distance to the shops, bars and restaurants that Chelmsford City has to offer"
"First floor retirement apartment with LIFT ACCESS a very pleasing aspect overlooking bowling green and playing field. NO ONWARD CHAIN, re-decorated and re-carpeted throughout. There are TWO BEDROOMS, modern refitted kitchen, lounge, refitted bathroom and generous built in storage. There are (cont.)"
Offered with no onward chain is this two-bedroom first floor maisonette with its own garden and garage in block. The property is well maintained throughout and offers a great first time purchase or buy to let investment. Internally the property consists of a private entrance with stairs leading t...
"**CITY CENTRE LUXURY LIVING** Located in the heart of the City, overlooking the historic Tindal Square is this 'As New' renovated two bedroom luxury first floor apartment. With a video intercom system, fully integrated luxury kitchen and bathroom, new floor covering and 'on trend' decor; this apa..."
"**CITY CENTRE LUXURY LIVING** Located in the heart of the City, overlooking the historic Tindal Square is this 'As New' renovated two bedroom luxury second floor apartment. With a video intercom system, fully integrated luxury kitchen and bathroom, new floor covering and 'on trend' decor; this ap..."
"Set within Chelmer Village, is this stunning two bedroom ground floor apartment"
"One bedroom apartment, on the 2nd floor, offering an open-plan layout and private balcony with £5,200 paid towards energy bills."
Set in the heart of Great Baddow is this stunning one bedroom apartment. Having been maintained to an excellent high standard from the property will be ready to move straight into and is perfect for first time buyers and investors
"Situated within walking distance to Chelmsford city centre and mainline railway station and offered with no onward chain is this one bedroom mews property. Perfect for first time buyers or for those looking to invest, an internal viewing is highly advised. EPC D (Ref: CHS230001)"
"William H Brown are delighted to offer this TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM ground floor apartment WITH NO CHAIN situated within walking distance of Chelmsford City centre and Mainline Railway Station. The property benefits from double glazing, gas central heating and an allocated parking space."
"Situated in the popular Marconi development is this fourth floor, one bedroom modern apartment, benefitting from allocated parking and within easy access to Chelmsford city centre and mainline railway station. An internal viewing is advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC..."
"**HURRY! LAST REMAINING PLOT!** Fully furnished SHOW APARTMENT for sale WITH A £1,000 PAID towards your mortgage every month for 12 months*"
This well presented two bedroom ground floor flat is located in the popular and sort after area of Beaulieu Park with local amenities including local shops and takeaways. Beaulieu Park is conveniently located around ten minute drive to Chelmsford City center as well as links to the A12/A130. ...
"AVAILABLE TO VIEW - This stunning 2 bedroom apartment is situated in the heart of Chelmsford high street, a short hop skip and a jump to Chelmsford city train station makes this the perfect first purchase or investment alike. Beautifully refurbished throughout with stunning views to the rear."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain and located 0.2 miles from Chelmsford city centre and mainline railway station is this spacious two bedroom apartment. Featuring ample living space and allocated parking to the rear, an internal viewing is advised. EPC D (Ref: CHS230075)"
"Being offered with no onward chain is this well presented throughout, modern one double bedroom apartment offering a favourable balcony spot, with secure allocated parking, open plan living and situated in the heart of Chelmsford's City Centre walking distance from Chelmsford Railway Station. "
A very rare opportunity to acquire this two double bedroom over 55's retirement apartment
"LUXURY WAREHOUSE STYLE one bedroom apartments, just a few minutes walk from the RAILWAY STATION & HIGH STREET. Ground floor plots from £250,000 and fourth floor from £275,000. NOW AVAILABLE TO VIEW & RESERVE."
"William H Brown are delighted to offer this TOP FLOOR, well presented, two bedroom apartment with en-suite to master. Situated in the popular area of Great Baddow, within easy reach of Chelmsford City Centre, & the A12. The property has attractive countryside views so early viewings are advised"
"Two Bedroom, Ground Floor, Allocated Parking, Close to Local Amenities and Transport links. Perfect First Time Buyers Property or Investment In the Heart of Chelmsford within a beautiful setting and grounds off Rainsford Road."
Offered with no onward chain is this two-bedroom ground floor maisonette with its own private rear garden. The property is well maintained throughout and offers a great first time purchase or buy to let investment. Internally the property consists of a private entrance with the accommodation comp...
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer for sale this MODERN TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT, featuring an entrance hallway, lounge/dining room, bedroom one, bedroom two, fitted kitchen, modern bathroom suite which was updated by the owner in 2020 + allocated parking via a permit."
"GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £260,000. Two Bedroom Apartment in Chelmsford for close to the City Centre! "
"A very well presented, modern second floor flat with two bedrooms and spacious lounge open to a generous kitchen. The property has parking, is conveniently located near a major supermarket, is a short drive from the A12 and convenient for Chelmsford City centre."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer this MODERN APARTMENT situated within Chelmsford city centre and WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE OF THE STATION. The apartment is situated on the ground floor and comprises a hallway, SPACIOUS LOUNGE/DINER, modern fitted kitchen, TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS, bathroom wi..."
BRAND NEW Pathfinder Bespoke Ferndale (36'x20') | FULLY FURNISHED | Quality Fitted Kitchen | Peaceful And Welcoming Retirement Park For The Over 50’s | Convenient Location For Local Amenities | Garden Shed | Safe And Secure Community Of Liked-Minded People | Part-Exchange Available
"Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market this prestigious one bedroom apartment situated off of Burgess Springs, located 0.1 miles away from Chelmsford Mainline Railway Station and city centre offering an array of amenities. The accommodation consists of an entrance hallway, open plan lou..."
"Situated within walking distance to Chelmsford city centre and mainline railway station is this immaculately presented one bedroom third floor apartment with a concierge and gym, offered with no onward chain. An internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer..."
"** INVESTORS ONLY - LET UNTIL JANUARY 2024 ** A modern third floor apartment situated just 0.3 miles from Chelmsford station and 0.3miles to Chelmsford city centre, featuring a balcony and allocated parking. EPC B (Ref: CHS200630) "
"A modern ground floor apartment featuring an en-suite to the master bedroom and allocated parking, located approximately 1 mile from Chelmsford city centre and offered for sale with no onward chain. An internal viewing is advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC C (Ref: CH..."
"Well presented two bedroom flat ideally positioned on the first floor of this exclusive modern development providing an excellent first time buy or rental investment. Offering high quality fittings throughout the property consists of a fantastic open plan kitchen/reception room, two bedrooms as w..."
"This first floor apartment comprises of entrance hall, Lounge, newly fitted kitchen, two bedrooms, newly fitted modern Bathroom, Externally there is communal gardens and allocated parking. Located approx. 0.4 miles into Chelmsford City Centre and 0.7 miles distance to Chelmsford Station CHAIN FREE!"
"Being offered with no onward chain is this immaculately presented one bedroom, third floor apartment with balcony, within this attractive modern development located within the heart of Chelmsford City Centre. "
"Conveniently located within walking distance to Chelmsford city centre and railway station is this one bedroom, modern apartment. Offering an onsite concierge and gym access an internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC B (Ref: NBC220802)"
"****Guide price £240,000-£250,000**** Yopa are delighted to offer for sale this ground floor two bedroom apartment being offered with no onward chain and a recently extended lease. Call or book your viewing online 24/7."
"** Guide Price £240,000 - £250,000 ** An immaculately presented one-bedroom apartment ideally positioned within close proximity to the City center. Located in this well maintained modern development providing a fantastic first time purchase or buy to let investment. Offering stylish d..."
"GUIDE PRICE £240,000 - £250,000 Situated in a popular location approximately 0.5 miles from the city centre and railway station is this two bedroom ground floor apartment"
"*** GUIDE PRICE £240,000 TO £250,000 *** * TWO BEDROOM TOP FLOOR FLAT * LEASE 132 YEARS * ALLOCATED PARKING * MODERN FINISH THROUGHOUT * EN-SUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM * JULIET BALCONY * 0.8 MILES FROM KINGS ROAD PRIMARY SCHOOL * 2.5 MILES FRO..."
"This modern first floor apartment located at the top end of Springfield Road and offering access to local shops, the A12 and on a bus route to the city centre & mainline station. The property is comprised of: Entrance hallway with security entry phone, open plan living space with wood flooring a..."
"Offers Over £240,000 - Two bedroom apartment within walking distance of the City Centre and being sold with no onward chain!"
Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this one bedroom ground floor apartment with Patio area. The property offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout and is presented in good order. The Lounge offers ample space for living and dining room furniture with doo...
"A two bedroom second floor City Centre luxury apartment with the added benefit of secure OFF ROAD PARKING SPACE. EWS1 CERTIFICATE AVAILABLE The railway station is just a few minutes walk away and host of great bars, restaurants and shops, therefore it is the perfect first home for commuters."
"Situated in this sought after cul-de-sac, is this beautifully presented ground floor two bedroom apartment with no onward chain. The property benefits from, 15' lounge/diner, separate 8' kitchen, 14' master bedroom with en suite, 11' second bedroom and allocated off street parking. "
An immaculate two-bedroom apartment conveniently positioned on the ground floor of this sought-after residential development within the heart of Chelmsford city centre.
"Situated within walking distance to Chelmsford city centre and mainline railway station is this well-presented two bedroom apartment. Offered with no onward chain, an internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC C (Ref: CHS230058)"
"A first floor one bedroom apartment located in Wharf Court, offering an open-plan layout and with a spacious private terrace"
"** Guide Price £235,000-£240,000 ** NO ONWARD CHAIN - A modern first floor apartment situated just 0.2 miles from Chelmsford city centre featuring two good size bedrooms, an open plan living room / kitchen, modern throughout. With a valid EWS1 form and the potential to rent a car p..."
A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR WITH VIEWS OVER THE PARK AND COURTYARDS.Roberts Court was constructed by Roberts Homes and comprises 39 properties arranged over 2 floors. Apartments 21-33 only on the first floor are served by a lift. Situated in Great Baddow Recrea...
"A fourth floor one bedroom apartment located in Wharf Court with £6,990 Key Worker Discount available."
"A second floor one bedroom apartment located in Wharf Court, offering an open-plan layout and with £11,600 Mortgage Contribution available."
"Guide Price £230,000 - £250,000 - Situated in a popular residential turning within Chelmer Village is this two bedroom ground floor maisonette"
"Positioned ideally for access to the city centre with it's vast array of amenities, schools, restaurants and transport links, is this two bedroom first floor apartment, being sold with the added advantage of no onward chain. The property comprises of spacious lounge/diner with floor to..."
A one bedroom modern apartment situated within walking distance to Chelmsford city centre and mainline railway station. EPC B (Ref: CHS230087)
"** GUIDE PRICE £230,000 - £240,000 ** Located a short distance from Chelmsford's Train Station and several schools, this well presented, two bedroom first floor apartment is ideally situated and conveniently close to local amenities. The accommodation is well presented thr..."
"A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR WITH WOODEN FLOORING. Situated on Broomfield Road in Chelmsford, Chancellor Court was built by McCarthy & Stone and consists of 34 apartments arranged over three floors each served by a lift. The apartments consist of one or two ..."
"A split level penthouse apartment with a sunny, south facing balcony, large open plan living room/kitchen, useful mezzanine area, bathroom, double bedroom and gas central heating. With accommodation over two floors and newly re-decorated and carpeted."
"CALL TODAY TO VIEW - Stunning brand new 1 bedroom contemporary apartments in the heart of Chelmsford, all upper floors homes with their own private balconies! - LAST REMAINING PLOT"
"A rarely available TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR retirement apartment in this most convenient complex on the fringe of the City Centre. It has the benefits of a re-fitted kitchen, re-fitted shower room, replacement PVCU double glazed windows and the further advantage of an extended Lease. Balmo (cont.)"
"A stylishly presented one-bedroom modern apartment, conveniently positioned on the top floor of this sought-after residential development within the heart of Chelmsford City Centre. Generously proportioned throughout, the property would make an ideal first purchase, pied-a-terre or buy-to-let inv..."
"City living on your doorstep! Pavilion House has it all, set in the heart of Chelmsford's bustling city centre offering a variety of shops, cafes and restaurants, 0.6 miles from the railway station and a stone's throw from Central park!"
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN!!**Boasting an EXTENDED LEASE and ZERO (PEPPERCORN) GROUND RENT plus the benefit of an EN-SUITE and TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS is this spacious first floor apartment located within walking distance to Chelmsford's mainline Station. Offering a SPACIOUS LOUNGE/DINER, fitted kitchen, entr..."
"If you are looking for a stylish apartment in Chelmsford’s thriving city centre, this property may be the perfect fit for you! Boasting no onward chain, this luxury first floor apartment offers a welcoming entrance hall, a spacious master bedroom, family bathroom & planned Lo..."
A well presented GROUND FLOOR apartment situated within a POPULAR MCCARTHY & STONE retirement development with a patio area from lounge.
A stunning second floor luxury apartment located in the city centre being offered with no onward chain
A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE GROUND FLOOR BENEFITING FROM A LEASE EXTENSION. Balmoral Court was constructed by Cromwell Homes and comprises 46 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each pr...
A beautifully presented one bedroom apartment in the heart of Chelmsfords City Centre. Having been finished to a very high standard the property can be moved straight into and will be perfect for first time buyers or investors
"A pleasant first floor maisonette situated on the corner of Broomfield Green, offered for sale with no onward chain. An internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC E (Ref: CHS230008)"
"Situated in this purpose built small block of flats we are pleased to offer this modern one bedroom flat with its own parking space. Walking distance to town centre and station, with direct link to London Liverpool St and Stratford, is approx 20mins with its range of upmarket bars and restaurants . "
"A WELL PRESENTED one bedroom second floor apartment with JULIET BALCONY in the lounge, situated within a DESIRABLE MCCARTHY & STONE retirement development."
"This well presented and improved two bedroom GROUND FLOOR maisonette has the advantages of an EXTENDED LEASE, gas fired heating by radiators and double glazed windows. The maisonette further benefits from an area of GARDEN to the rear, a GARAGE in a nearby block, and comprises of an entrance (cont.)"
"This Churchill GROUND floor retirement apartment is located within the popular Tyrell Lodge development which is situated in the heart of Chelmsford City centre. The complex comprises of a communal lounge, laundry facilities and kitchen area, along with communal grounds and parking area. Thi (cont.)"
Situated in the heart of Chelmsford City Centre is this stunning one bedroom flat. Being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN and benefitting from walking distance to the train station. Early viewings are advised to not miss out!
"Located within walking distance to the CITY CENTRE and boasting TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS with an EN SUITE to master is this IMMACULATE first floor apartment that offers a SPACIOUS 19' OPEN-PLAN LOUNGE with JULIETTE BALCONY and the adjoining MODERN KITCHEN, plus a modern bathroom, entrance hall, reside..."
"GUIDE PRICE £225,000- £250,000 This characteristic and beautifully presented Victorian maisonette is located within walking distance of the city centre and offered with no onward chain!"
"**GUIDE PRICE £225,000-£250,000**Benefiting from a NEWLY FITTED shower room, uniquely offering a SHARE OF THE FREEHOLD and beautifully presented throughout is this quaint maisonette. Offering a spacious lounge, fitted kitchen, spacious DOUBLE bedroom and gas central heating. Located within WALKIN..."
"GUIDE PRICE £225,000-£250,000 Situated in the sought after ""Sandringham Place"" development is this well presented and spacious TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT. The property is situated in close proximity to the city centre and is offerred with no onward chain"
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this good size 2 BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR retirement apartment with DIRECT ACCESS FROM THE LOUNGE TO THE COMMUNAL GARDENS. It is located on the fringe of the City centre and has accommodation comprising an entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, 2 good size bedro (cont.)"
"Situated in a sought after location, is this beautifully presented first floor two bedroom apartment with a balcony. The accommodation comprises; 15' living room, 12' kitchen, 11' master bedroom, 10' second bedroom and a beautiful modern bathroom. Conveniently located 1.4 mi..."
Set in the heart of Chelmsfords City Centre is the stunning two bedroom second floor apartment. With no onward chain and being set within a short walk to the city centre this would be the perfect first time buy or investment
We are delighted to bring to the market this exceptionally well presented one bedroom first floor apartment forming part of the much favoured Tyrell Lodge retirement development. In our opinion the property itself has been meticulously maintained and could potentially be sold as fully furni (cont.)
"Situated in the heart of Chelmsford City Centre is this modern one bedroom, second floor apartment with a balcony offering views over the City. Internal accommodation comprises of a modern fitted kitchen which is open plan to the lounge/diner with access onto the balcony which runs the full wi..."
"Situated in walking distance from the city centre is this two bedroom apartment that would make an ideal investment or first time buy. The property benefits from living area, fitted kitchen, two bedrooms and a modern bathroom. Internal viewings are highly recommended"
"A pleasant couch house style apartment situated in the popular Grange Court development located just 1 mile from Chelmsford city centre, offered for sale with no onward chain. An internal viewing is advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC D (Ref: NBC221851)"
"UNIQUE first floor maisonette, OWN ENTRANCE DOOR, large open plan kitchen/living, BUILT IN STORAGE cupboard, ALLOCATED parking space, BALCONY."
"A TWO BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT Spalding Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 35 properties arranged over 3 floors served by a lift. Situated close to main Shopping Centre, Bus and Train Station and local park.  There is a resident Devel..."
A pleasant first floor apartment situated in the popular area of Chelmer Village. An internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC D (Ref: CHS170165)
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** CITY CENTRE LOCATION ** COMMUNAL LIFT ** A modern ONE BEDROOM, Second Floor Apartment situated within Walking Distance of Chelmsford City Centre & Station. The property boasts a spacious living area, separate Kitchen with integral appliances, Bathroom with shower facilities ..."
Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this stunning one bedroom first floor apartment. The property offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout and is presented in fantastic order. The Lounge offers ample space for living and dining room furniture and has a f...
"A really good size one bedroom second floor retirement property in the popular Tyrell Lodge development with its luxurious surroundings. There is a particularly generous lounge, fitted kitchen, double bedroom and shower room. The property is offered with vacant possession!"
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer for sale this BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT located in the city centre featuring an entrance hallway, open plan living kitchen/dining room, one double bedroom and modern shower room. To appreciate the great location & presen..."
"Being offered with no onward chain and recently extended lease is this two bedroom first floor apartment located within close proximity to Chelmsford City Center, providing an excellent buy for first time buyers, commuters in to London and for those looking for a rental investment. The living spa..."
A spacious one bedroom top floor apartment featuring two impressive balconies. The property is situated within 0.1 miles of Chelmsford city centre and mainline station. EPC C (Ref: CHS230100)
A TWO BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT IN IMMACULATE CONDITION THROUGHOUT INCLUDING FITTED CARPETS AND EQUIPPED KITCHEN AND BEING ONE OF THE LARGER DESIGNS IN THE COMPLEX OFFERS TRULY SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION AND IS AVAILABLE FOR IMMEDIATE VACANT POSSESSION WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN.
"Offered with no onward chain is this two bedroom top floor apartment, benefiting from ample living accommodation. An internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has offer. EPC E (Ref: CHS230004)"
This well presented two bedroom apartment is ideally located close to Chelmsford City Centre
"A ONE DOUBLE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT situated in this popular modern development, on site lodge manager 5 days a week, residents lounge, LOVELY COMMUNAL GARDENS."
"A second floor ONE BEDROOM OVER 60'S RETIREMENT APARTMENT within the popular Chelmer Lodge development, RESIDENTS PARKING AVAILABLE, double bedroom with fitted wardrobe, LODGE MANAGER AVAILABLE 5 DAYS A WEEK"
"William H Brown are pleased to offer for this modern apartment located at the top end of Springfield Road and offering access to local shops, the A12 and being on a bus route to the city centre & mainline station. The property is immaculately presented and benefits from an open-plan stlye"
"An extremely well presented one bedroom first floor retirement apartment in this centrally located complex just off of New Writtle Street. Being only about 8 years old, it has an excellent specification and is offered for sale with vacant possession and no onward chain! It comprises an entra (cont.)"
A rare opportunity to purchase a UNIQUE 2 BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT being part of an original Regency style villa in the highly favoured and convenient Old Moulsham area of Chelmsford. The apartment really MUST be internally viewed to be fully appreciated!
This very well presented first floor two bedroom apartment is situated in a highly popular residential location in the heart of Galleywood. Early viewings of this exceptional property are highly recommended to avoid disappointment
"Situated in North Chelmsford is this two bedroom TOP FLOOR apartment. The property is conveniently located to local transport links and a bus route, amenities and nearby schools. There is also a communal garden and allocated parking."
"A well presented one bedroom FIRST FLOOR apartment situated within a POPULAR MCCARTHY & STONE retirement development. Boasting JULIET STYLE BALCONY in the living room, a MODERN KITCHEN & SHOWER ROOM as well as a DOUBLE BEDROOM with built in wardrobe."
"Guide price £215,000 - £225,000 - This well presented two bedroom, top floor, apartment is located in Chelmer Village"
"A pleasant ground floor apartment surrounded by lawned communal gardens and featuring a lease in excess of 950 years, Ideal for investor, offered for sale with no onward chain and situated less than 1 mile from Chelmsford city centre. An internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that ..."
"Surrounded by lawned communal gardens is this two bedroom ground floor apartment. Offering a lease in excess of 950 years, ideal for investor and offered with no onward chain, an internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC C (Ref: CHS230020)"
"Situated in the popular area of Chelmer Village is this well-presented two bedroom first floor apartment. Offered with no onward chain, an internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC C (Ref: NBC220692)"
"A pleasant ONE BEDROOM apartment situated just 0.3 miles from Chelmsford station. The property features a double bedroom, a generous living/dining room, a modern bathroom and fitted kitchen, whilst externally features one allocated parking space."
"Guide £210,000 - £220,000. CHAIN FREE One bedroom apartment in the heart of Chelmsford City Centre"
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom ground floor purpose built apartment being situated in close proximity of Old Moulsham and its plentiful amenities, whilst the main City Centre is also within striking distance. The apartment itself offers in our opinion bright and spa..."
"Offering no onward chain is this top floor ONE bedroom apartment which is located within the City Centre and Railway Station, the property is situated within the Marconi Plaza complex which gives you access to a gym, private parking and Concierge facilities."
"A spacious two bedroom, top floor apartment, located within walking distance to Chelmsford city centre and mainline railway. An internal viewing is advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC awaited (Ref: NBC221843)"
"Coming to the market with no onward chain is this modern first floor maisonette built in 2016 located in the picturesque village of Writtle offering open plan lounge/kitchen, double bedroom, bathroom and allocated parking."
"***CASH BUYERS ONLY*** Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this rare opportunity to purchase this third floor one double bedroom apartment featuring open plan living accommodation with fitted kitchen, large balcony with views over the waterfront, bedroom with access to the balcony, larg..."
"MODERN TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT WITH PARKING, Martin & Co are delighted to offer this good size apartment on the first floor of this block. The accommodation comprises lounge, modern kitchen with appliances, two good size bedrooms, bathroom, parking & communal garden."
"A one bedroom apartment featuring a lease in excess of 950 years, situated just 0.5 miles from Chelmsford station and offered for sale with no onward chain. An internal viewing is advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC D (Ref: CHS220552)"
"**GUIDE PRICE £210,000 - £240,000** Situated only 0.3 miles from Chelmsford railway station is this beautifully presented, high specification one bedroom ground floor apartment. The accommodation comprises of high ceilings, an open plan lounge/diner, kitchen with..."
"Perfect for first-time buyers or those looking to invest is this two bedroom ground floor apartment, finished beautifully throughout. An internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC C (Ref: CHS230099)"
"Being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this well presented TOP FLOOR apartment located within a SHORT WALK TO THE CITY CENTRE. Comprising of an entrance hall, one double bedroom, spacious lounge diner, fitted kitchen, REFITTED BATHROOM, allocated parking, plus NO GROUND RENT & LOW SERVICE CHARGES ......"
Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this lovely one bedroom first floor apartment overlooking the communal garden. The property offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout and is presented in good decorative order. The Lounge offers ample space for...
A modern first floor apartment located 0.2 miles from Chelmsford mainline railway station and walking distance to the city centre. An internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC C (Ref: WRS230001)
City Centre Location - Open Plan Designer Kitchen And Living Room - One Double Sized Bedroom With Fitted Wardrobes - Family Bathroom - Excellent Transport Links - CCTV Operated - Secure Cycle Storage - Lift - Audio Visual Entrance - High Specification
"Situated in the heart of Chelmsford City Centre is this stunning two bedroom second floor apartment. Being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN and benefitting from two double bedrooms, en-suite to master bedroom and large open plan living space."
"Situated in the heart of Chelmsford City centre with PARKING, Canside is a development of apartments overlooking the centres main High Street and of course the River Can. Located on the 5th floor with access via lift or stairs, this one bedroom apartment offers high ceilings, a good size ope (cont.)"
"Situated in the sought after Springfield location is this one bedroom apartment flat being ideal for a first time buyer. The property benefits from lounge, kitchen, off road parking and communal gardens. Offered with no onward chain an internal viewing is strongly recommended"
"**GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £220,000** This well presented, two bedroom apartment with newly fitted Bathroom is located on the ever-popular Village development, within a short distance to Chelmsford's City Centre"
"**GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £220,000** This well presented, two bedroom apartment is located on the ever-popular Village development, within a short distance to Chelmsford's City Centre"
"
Purplebricks is proud to bring to the market this purpose built first floor one bedroom apartment located within the popular Village development, with over 165 years remining on the lease and no ground rent. The property is conveniently located less than one mile from Chelmsford town centre an..."
"Being offered with no onward chain is this two bedroom, first floor apartment with a dual aspect lounge/diner, allocated parking and conveniently located for access into Chelmsford City Centre as well as transport links to the A12 and A130. "
A centrally located first floor retirement apartment in excellent condition and with no upward chain.
"** GARAGE INCLUDED ** Bright and airy ground floor flat, modern kitchen and bathroom, PLENTY OF STORAGE, for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN."
William H Brown are pleased to offer this third floor CITY CENTRE apartment located within close proximity of Chelmsford mail line railway station and local amenities. With NO CHAIN early viewings are recommended. EPC Rating C
"Guide Price £200,000 - £225,000 This desirable one double bedroom apartment with secure allocated parking is ideally positioned on the third floor of this sought-after residential development within the heart of Chelmsford City Centre"
This well presented GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT is conveniently situated within easy reach of Chelmsford City centre and station and could prove either an ideal first purchase or indeed possible investment buy. The apartment has the benefit of a RECENTLY EXTENDED LEASE ABOUT 167 YEARS and has pe (cont.)
This modern one bedroom apartment is excellently located close to Chelmsford City Centre
"Boasting a NEWLY EXTENDED LEASE upon completion, NO ONWARD CHAIN, and located a short walk to Chelmsford's City Centre is this IMMACULATELY PRESENTED first floor maisonette. Further offering an entrance hall, lounge diner, MODERN KITCHEN, refitted shower room, a FRONT GARDEN AREA with potential t..."
"A spacious two-bedroom apartment, ideally positioned on the first floor of this low-rise residential development within the heart of sought-after Springfield. Generously proportioned throughout, the property would make an ideal first purchase, pied-a-terre, or buy-to-let investment. "
"Being offered with no onward chain and situated within close proximity to Chelmsford City centre is this three-bedroom duplex maisonette. The property comprises of an entrance hall way, lounge / diner, kitchen and ground floor w/c. To the first floor there are three bedrooms as well as a family b..."
"MODERN APARTMENT- INVESTMENT PROPERTY WITH TENANT IN SITU- CURRENT RENTAL INCOME: £1,000 PCM ONE BEDROOM 24' OPEN PLAN LIVING INTEGRATED KITCHEN 13' BEDROOM SECURE UNDERGROUND PARKING CONCIERGE "
* FOUR MINUTE WALK TO CHELMSFORD TRAIN STATION 0.2 MILES * FIVE MINUTE WALK TO CHELMSFORD CITY CENTRE * ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT * MODERN BATHROOM * SECURED ENTRANCE * CITY CENTRE LOCATION * IDEAL BUY TO LET INVESTMENT/FIRST TIME BUYER * 5.5% RENTAL YI...
"Offered for sale boasting no onward, this spacious apartment is an a fantasic location. Perfect for investors. Guide Price £200,000 - £210,000 A luxury modern apartment, one bedroom first floor apartment, situated in Barratts 2005 ""Capital Square"" Deve..."
This recently redecorated 1 bedroom retirement apartment is situated just along Broomfield Road on the Northern fringe of the City and is pleasantly situated within the complex having South facing views over the playing fields of the King Edward Grammar School and beyond. The apartment is of (cont.)
A GROUND FLOOR ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT WITH PATIO DOOR TO COMMUNAL GARDENS.Roberts Court was constructed by Roberts Homes and comprises 39 properties arranged over 2 floors. Apartments 21-33 only on the first floor are served by a lift. Situated in Great Baddow Recreation grounds with i...
"Situated a stone’s throw away from Chelmsford city centre and mainline railway station. The property is fully furnished and offered with no onward chain, ideal for a buy to let investor or first time buyer. EPC C (Ref: CHS210497)"
"****GUIDE PRICE - £190,000 TO £210,000**** **LARGE GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT WITH AN EN-SUITE** Ideal for first time buyers or investors, this great size two bedroom apartment is for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The property offers; two double bedrooms, two bathrooms..."
"This ground floor apartment offering two double bedrooms, generous sized reception room, kitchen with built in cooker and hob and white bathroom suite with electric shower. Further benefits double glazing, electric heating and residents parking. Haig Court is conveniently located to t..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £200,000** William H Brown are delighted to this well presented, top floor one bedroom apartment located within 0.6 miles of the Station and has accommodation comprising open plan lounge / kitchen, complete with integrated appliances, double bedroom, bathroom and gas heating"
"Located within walking distance to Chelmsford's main line railway is this spacious one bedroom second floor apartment, with the added benefit of no onward chain. "
"Situated within walking distance to Chelmsford city centre and mainline railway station, two bedroom top floor apartment, offered with no onward chain. An internal viewing is advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC D (Ref: CHS220516)"
"CITY CENTRE LOCATION* Leaders Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to market this one bedroom first floor apartment conveniently located only 0.2 miles from the Chelmsford Mainline Train Station. This modern apartment benefits from having an open plan Lounge/Kitchen, communal courtyard area, g..."
Situated in arguably one of the BEST POSITIONS in this modern purpose built retirement complex along Broomfield Road is this one bedroom top floor retirement apartment. Early viewings are advised to not miss out!
"Located within a SHORT WALK TO THE CITY CENTRE and boasting a very long lease with NO GROUND RENT CHARGES is this GROUND-FLOOR apartment - offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Comprising of an entrance hall, spacious lounge, fitted kitchen, double bedroom, bathroom and PRIVATE PARKING SPACE. Id..."
"One bedroom first floor apartment forming part of this small development, in a cul-de-sac location of mixed housing off one of the Chelmer village premier turnings. The apartment is conveniently located for Asda super store and village square, Chelmer village retail park and gastro pubs."
"offered for sale boasting no onward chain is this spacious apartment situated on the ever popular Marconi Plaza. With an impressive 132 year lease this impeccable home consists of a roomy entrance hall, Modern Kitchen with integrated appliances, family bathroom, double bedrooms and substantial li..."
"Situated just over one mile from Chelmsford's city centre and being offered with the benefit of no onward chain is this spacious two bedroom top floor apartment. Accommodation is set over one level and comprises a spacious entrance hall providing access to two well-proportioned bedrooms, spaci..."
"Connells are pleased to offer this ONE Bedroom Apartment Offering lounge, kitchen, three piece suite bathroom, double bedroom and balcony located on the first floor Located close to all your amenities, doctors and kings road primary school, and Approx. 1.4 miles from CHELMSFORD CITY CENTRE."
"Situated within The Village is this two bedroom second floor apartment offers a entrance hall, a large lounge/diner, kitchen, two bedrooms and bathroom and new windows fitted throughout. Approx 1.3 miles distance to Chelmsford City mainline railway station, schools, doctors and local amenities."
"Guide Price £190,000 - £210,000 - Excellently located in the heart of Springfield is this very well presented two bedroom first floor apartment"
"CHAIN FREE! This ONE BEDROOM APARTMENT offerring secure communal door with telephone intercom, large lounge/kitchen, bathroom and bedroom. Located in Moulsham Street, good local school, doctors and amenities. Approx. 1 mile from CHELMSFORD CITY CENTRE & MAINLINE TRAIN STATION!"
In the heart of city livingBowlers Court is a brand new collection of one and two-bedroom apartments on Springfield Road available with shared ownership. These new-build homes are designed perfectly f...
"A Well presented One Bedroom First Floor Maisonette located within the popular area of Galleywood. The accommodation comprises of having it's own personal entrance door with stairs rising to first floor, inner hallway, open plan lounge/kitchen, bedroom with fitted wardrobe and a white suite ba..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain and in the heart of Chelmsford is this spacious, convenient and ready to move into retirement apartment. Tyrell Lodge is a purpose built block of spacious apartments with a homely community and warden assistance if required. It is perfectly situated for those..."
"Situated in the heart of Chelmer Village is this amazing one bedroom first floor maisonette. Being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN and benefiting from two parking spaces, long lease and large rooms this property is not one to be missed!"
"***GUIDE PRICE £180,000 - £200,000*** Temme English are thrilled to market this superb one-bedroom maisonette WITH LONG 986 LEASE and recent double-glazed windows (July 2022). Pleasantly tucked away yet still close to local amenities and easy reach to access the A12 quickly. "
"A spacious one bedroom apartment in a sought after location. Accommodation comprises one double bedroom, a modern kitchen/living room with appliances and a contemporary bathroom. Throughout the apartment is in good condition and features plenty of storage. Residents also benefit from two allocate..."
"Discover the Best retirement Living Experience with this Ground Floor 1-Bedroom Flat with a Long Lease and your own beautiful Patio overlooking the communal gardens to enjoy. If you are looking for a comfortable and secure place to call home in your golden years, look no further! This over 65&..."
Situated within close proximity of Chelmsford city centre and mainline railway station is this well-presented retirement apartment for over the 55's only. An internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC B (Ref: CHS220367)
"***GUIDE PRICE OF £180,000 TO £200,000*** * ONE BEDROOM MAISONETTE * LEASE 986 YEARS * COMMUNAL PARKING * IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS/INVESTORS * MOTIVATED SELLER * NEW DOUBLE GLAZING THROUGHOUT THE PROPERTY IN JULY * 0.5 MILES FROM LOCAL AMEN..."
"A chance acquire an exceptionally well presented and modernised second floor TWO bedroom retirement apartment which is located in the heart of the city centre. There is a lovely atmosphere within the complex with a whole host of activities for residents. SECURITY DOOR TO COMMUNAL HALL, LIFT TO AL..."
A WELL PRESENTED ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT LOCATED CLOSE TO CHELMSFORD CITY CENTRE.
"Immaculately presented one bedroom first floor flat, located close to local shops and amenities. The property is also close to River Chelmer where you can enjoy lovely walks into Chelmsford City Centre and railway station. Accommodation boasts entrance hall, three piece bathroom, double bedroom, ..."
"Situated in the stunning location of Old Moulsham is this amazing one bedroom ground floor flat. Being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN and benefitting from allocated parking, open plan living and walking distance to Chelmsford City Centre. Early viewings are advised to not miss out!"
"William H Brown are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £220,000 for 95 Kings Tower. Anyone wishing to place an offer on this property should contact William H Brown 12 Duke Street Chelmsford ."
** CASH BUYERS ONLY ** A rare investment opportunity for a unique 9th floor apartment situated in the heart of Chelmsford city centre and just 0.1 miles from Chelmsford mainline station. EPC C (Ref: CHS210472)
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this well-proportioned one bedroom first floor apartment, Externally there is a communal garden, as well as allocated parking. Bounderby Grove has bus and road links to Chelmsford City Centre and mainline railway station, as well as excellent access to ..."
"A well presented one bedroom flat in Chelmsford, available with TENANTS IN SITU for immediate INVESTMENT. Call for details! Bettermove are proud to present this one bedroom flat in Chelmsford available with no forward chain. The property benefits from double glazing, el..."
"BOND RESIDENTIAL are delighted to offer this ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT situated in the popular OLD MOULSHAM area of Chelmsford being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Macmillan Court benefits from a RESIDENTS LOUNGE, LIFT TO ALL FLOORS & ESTABLISHED COMMUNAL GARDENS."
"Quote reference MB0473  Located just 1.4 miles from Chelmsford mainline railway station, is this spacious one bedroom ground floor apartment, having the added benefit of NO ONWARD CHAIN.
"
"Guide Price £170,000 - £190,000 - Ideally located in Chelmsford city centre is this stunning fourth floor one bedroom apartment"
" Leaders are pleased to present this one bedroom first floor apartment located in the popular area of Springfield in Chelmsford. The property benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and is being sold with no onward chain. The apartment has ample parking and has a 91year lease. Serv..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £170,000-180,000*** A spacious one bedroom flat conveniently located in the Great Baddow area of Chelmsford. Within walking distance of Chelmsford City Centre and mainline railway train station, this property is offered with no onward chain. A perfect first purchase or investment."
"Located within Chelmer Village is this recently renovated one bedroom first floor maisonette. Benefiting from spacious living accommodation, allocated parking a cul-de-sac location and no onward chain. Call now to arrange your viewing. "
"Situated in the popular development of Albion Court on Moulsham Street is this beautifully presented one bedroom ground floor apartment which benefits from direct access and views over the communal gardens. Accommodation is set over one level and enjoys a spacious living room, modern fitted ki..."
"We are proud to present this One Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. *Guide Price £165,000 - £185,000*"
"We are proud to present this One Bedroom Retirement Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £165,000 - £185,000*"
"** CASH BUYERS ONLY / INVESTORS ONLY - TENANT IN SITU ** Modern first floor apartment within a quarter of a mile of the mainline station, double bedroom, open plan living / kitchen / diner, white suite bathroom, NO PARKING. EPC B (Ref: CHS190760)"
Wonderful 2 bedroom apartment in the Beaulieu Park development. The price advertised represents purchasing a 50% share of the home
"Retirement apartment for persons AGED 55 OR OVER, recently redecorated throughout out with new carpets, being offered for sale with no onward chain. LIFTS TO ALL FLOORS"
"A one bedroom SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT , offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN and boasting a renting yield of 4.9% NET, open plan kitchen/living area, SMALL BALCONY"
"Ideal opportunity for a first time buyer to get onto the property ladder or an investor to acquire this first floor apartment offering double bedroom, lounge/well fitted kitchen area and a shower room. Located in the heart of Moulsham Street amongst an abundance of shopping facilities and amen..."
"A well presented third floor apartment located in the popular development of The Vineyards benefitting from gas fired central heating, balcony and parking space. EPC C."
Offered with no onward chain and located in a highly sought after area is this recently renovated one bedroom retirement apartment with pleasant views and attractive communal gardens
"Being offered CHAIN FREE, This one bedroom top floor apartment offers kitchen, lounge, double bedroom, bathroom, and allocated parking located in Chelmer Village within close proximity to village square CHELMSFORD CITY CENTER & MAINLINE STATION is approx. 1.5 Miles away,"
"Ideally located on Broomfield Road, close to Chelmsford City Centre, is this one bedroom first floor retirement apartment being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN"
Located in a highly sought after area is this one bedroom retirement apartment with pleasant views to Great Baddow Millennium Community Park and attractive communal gardens
"1 bedroom first floor RETIREMENT APARTMENT in this favoured complex in Great Baddow. It has a lounge with a Westerly facing BALCONETTE, a refitted kitchen, bedroom and a shower room and is offered for sale with no onward chain. Kingfisher Lodge is situated adjacent to the park just off The D (cont.)"
A two bedroom flat located close to Chelmsford City Centre offered with no onward chain. Further benefitting from a garage.
"A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT LOCATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR Situated on Broomfield Road in Chelmsford, Chancellor Court was built by McCarthy & Stone and consists of 34 apartments arranged over three floors each served by a lift. The apartments consist of one or two bedrooms, entrance hall,..."
"Property being offered with a tenant in situ. A well presented one double bedroom apartment ideally positioned on the fourth floor of this sought-after development providing superb far reaching views. Bright and airy throughout, the property consists of a spacious reception room leading to privat..."
"A rare opportunity to buy a one bedroom RETIREMENT COTTAGE in this small exclusive ""courtyard complex"" in the highly favoured Old Moulsham Area, right in the centre of Chelmsford."
First floor studio apartment offered with no onward chain with its own rear garden. An internal viewing is advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC C (Ref: CHS220281)
"Modern bright, well presented second floor retirement apartment overlooking the communal gardens. This apartment benefits from a re-fitted kitchen, re-fitted shower room and recently installed double glazing. No onward chain."
"Presented to a high decorative standard, a one bedroom ground floor retirement property with rear door opening onto the communal gardens. The property has a refitted kitchen and bathroom, and is available with no onward chain!"
This spacious one bedroom 2nd floor retirement property is located within the city centre of Chelmsford. The property comes with communal living and garden areas as well as laundry rooms. Internal viewing are high recommended
"A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR Albion Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone Developments Limited and is a part conversion, part purpose built development. It is set in the older, more established part of Chelmsford and consists of 50 apartments, 38 of whi..."
"A recently redecorated and considerably improved one bedroom first floor retirement apartment located in a quiet position at the rear of the complex overlooking the communal gardens. The complex is situated at the bottom end of Springfield Road, close to Tesco's and the City centre. It benef (cont.)"
"A ONE DOUBLE BEDROOM second floor retirement apartment situated in this popular development just off MOULSHAM STREET, no onward chain."
"Town centre location, one bedroom second floor retirement apartment offered with vacant possession! Havencourt is situated just off Victoria Road on the very fringe of the City centre within just minutes walking distance of the High Street and Cathedral. The complex is for females aged 60 or (cont.)"
"** RETIREMENT LIVING ** First floor one bedroom apartment for sale with no onward chain, RESIDENTS PARKING, just a short walk from the local shops, stores, restaurants and High Street."
CHAIN FREE INVESTMENT PURCHASE - Studio flat in the popular village of Writtle with tenant in place!
A pleasant second floor retirement apartment located just 0.2 miles from Chelmsford city centre and offered for sale with no onward chain. An internal viewing is advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC C (Ref: CHS220091)
This well presented ground floor two bedroom retirement maisonette is ideally located in Springfield
"This modern and spacious two-bedroom apartment is available through a 35% shared ownership scheme, making it a great option for first time buyers, professionals, London commuters, and those seeking a city retreat"
Approximately 1.5miles from Chelmsford City Centre is this two bedroom ground floor apartment
"Guide £120,000 - £130,000. One bedroom ground floor apartment for the OVER 60's located on the fringe of the city centre."
PRE-OWNED (32'x10') Park Home | Residential development | Exclusive for the over 50s | Garden area | Parking bay | Established park | Countryside location | Recently refurbished | Part exchange available | Available to view now | Convenient for local amenities
"A pleasant top floor apartment located in a pleasant retirement complex on the fringes of the city centre, featuring one bedroom and a generous lounge / diner, offered for sale with no onward chain. A viewing is highly advised to appreciate all that this property has to offer. EPC C (Ref: CHS22..."
Havencourt is a development of retirement apartments situated within just moments of Chelmsford City Centre with its multiple amenities all within easy reach. The development itself is surrounded by well maintained communal gardens which are mostly laid to lawn and provides various seating (cont.)
"Very well presented and recently decorated throughout providing a fresh light feel, a one bedroom ground floor retirement apartment positioned conveniently close to the main building front door. The property benefits from a recently refitted high quality wet room, is offered with vacant poss (cont.)"
"Located in North Springfield's sought-after RETIREMENT DEVELOPMENT is this spacious modern GROUND FLOOR maisonette that offers a SPACIOUS LOUNGE DINER, fitted kitchen & bathroom, one double bedroom. Facilities include an optional 24hr emergency pull cord, communal laundry, and residents/visitors ..."
"William H Brown are delighted to offer this beautifully presented apartment with NO CHAIN, Concierge, Lift, Allocated Underground Parking and Secure Cycle store, in vibrant Chelmsford town centre steps away from the Station with fast and frequent trains for London commuters"
"A WELL PRESENTED one bedroom TOP FLOOR retirement apartment in a most conveniently situated complex at the bottom end of Springfield Road close to Tesco's and the High Street. It comprises an entrance hall, lounge which opens to the kitchen, bedroom and refitted bathroom. Competitively pric (cont.)"
A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR Balmoral Court was constructed by Cromwell Homes and comprises 46 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each property in the case of an emergency....
"**GUIDE PRICE £100,000 - £125,000** NO ONWARD CHAIN- FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT- SECURE ENTRANCE- ONE BEDROOM- 17' LIVING ROOM- 8' KITCHEN- 13' BEDROOM- SHOWER ROOM- COMMUNAL LOUNG..."
Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this well presented and improved 1 bedroom FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT in this most convenient RETIREMENT COMPLEX close to Tesco's and the City centre itself. The apartment fronts Springfield Road hence ideal or those buyers who like to watch the (cont.)
"GUIDE PRICE ***£100,000-110,000*** Available with no onward chain we are pleased to offer this spacious design one bedroom top floor flat. Spalding Court is conveniently located in the west of Chelmsford within minutes walking distance of local shopping amenities and Chelmsford City centre"
"***GUIDE PRICE £100,000 - £130,000*** Balmoral Court development, situated in the City of Chelmsford, is a one bedroom top floor apartment fully refurbished to a contemporary style, for independent retirement living for ladies over the age of 60 or gentlemen over 65"
"**PURPOSE BUILT, GROUND FLOOR RETIREMENT PROPERTY** Designed exclusively for the over 55's, this ground floor maisonette offers spacious accommodation within a development of similar properties, with; communal grounds, gardens, parking, residents lounge and laundry. The prop..."
"Being sold with the added advantage of no onward chain, is this one bedroom first floor retirement apartment, which has the added advantage of a secure entrance, concierge and lift access. The accommodation comprises; 17' living room, 8' kitchen, 13' bedroom, shower room, communal lou..."
"REDUCED PRICE! A GROUND FLOOR retirement apartment located in this convenient retirement complex off of Springfield Road, close to the Tesco Superstore and the City centre itself. The apartment is offered for sale with no onward chain and is situated at the front of the complex with window (cont.)"
One bedroom first floor maisonette for the over 60's located in the popular North Springfield area of Chelmsford within walking distance of shops and a bus stop. CHAIN FREE!
"Located in North Springfield's sought-after RETIREMENT DEVELOPMENT is this spacious maisonette that offers a SPACIOUS LOUNGE DINER, fitted kitchen & bathroom, one double and bedroom. Facilities include an optional 24hr emergency pull cord, communal laundry, and residents/visitors parking. For sal..."
"A one bedroom ground floor retirement apartment which is situated conveniently within the block, being close to the main entrance door. The City centre location is close to the mainline train station and is well served by bus services and is a couple of hundred yards away from Chelmsford's m (cont.)"
"This 1 bedroom first floor retirement maisonette is located on Newlands Spring close to local amenities including bus services and Morrisons store. There are communal grounds and a private parking area for residents. It is located on Newlands Spring being convenient for local bus services, s (cont.)"
"*25% Shared Ownership* Located on this sought after city centre development, within minutes of Chelmsford railway station this very well presented maisonette is arranged over two floors and simply must be viewed to appreciate the accommodation on offer. The ground floor offers a good size, open..."
A ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT Havencourt was constructed by Anglia Secure Homes and comprises 61 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each property in the case of an emergency. For periods when...
SHARED OWNERSHIP This excellentley presented two bedroom second floor apartment is located within the heart of Chelmsford's City Centre and is available for purchase with a 25% share. Inside you will find a good sized entrance hallway with a useful large built in cupboard. Doors lead to: A br...
"** SHARED OWNERSHIP ** Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market this prestigious one bedroom apartment situated off of Burgess Springs, located 0.1 miles away from Chelmsford Mainline Railway Station and city centre offering an array of amenities. The accommodation consists of an entrance..."
This stunning apartment in the heart of Chelmsfords City Centre is available for purchase with a 25% share
"Postponed **For Sale By Public Auction 15th March 2023 09:00 AM To inspect the legal documents for this property go to our website to download the legal pack** A Plot of Land Measuring Approximately 112 sq m (1,204 sq ft) Freehold Guide Price = Postponed Locat..."
Residential development opportunity situated in north east Chelmsford.
This superb semi-detached three bedroom family home is situated in a highly popular location of Westminster Park and is a short drive to Chester city centre along with being within walking distance to both the Kings School and Catholic high school.
"An exceptional residential and equestrian farm with arable, grassland and woodland in a highly sought after and accessible location."
An elegant period house in a highly sought-after location.
"Conveniently situated within 3.5 miles of Chester City Centre this impressive Detached Five Bedroom Family Home offers well proportioned characterful accommodation set within 1.25 acres of secluded formal gardens which includes a Heated Swimming Pool, Tennis Court, Large Garage Block with versati..."
"An impressive family home set in over an acre, with heated swimming pool, tennis court and a self-contained cottage."
"An exceptional residential and equestrian farm with arable, grassland and woodland in a highly sought after and accessible location"
A truly outstanding Victorian detached family property set in 3.7 Acres with a licenced caravan touring park in the most picturesque setting and with direct access to the Shropshire Union Canal to the rear.
"IMPOSING DETACHED COUNTRY HOME, LANDSCAPED GROUNDS (MAINTAINED), SECURE GATED DEVELOPMENT. Reades is delighted to offer for sale Park House - an imposing country home enjoying a stunning semi-rural setting, occupying a sizeable plot within a private, gated development, on the outskirts of the..."
"Perfection is neither easily attained or in the case of this house, easily achieved. If however you're in the market for the best in terms of location and above all fit and finish, please apply for a viewing. Hunters are delighted to showcase this superbly presented detached home. It typ..."
"Meticulously redesigned, renovated and extended, Oakdene on Townfield Lane is a vintage home, made modern - and turnkey ready. Sweep through the electronically opening oak gates, inscribed with the name ´Oakdene´; everything about this home - from your initial arrival to the moment yo..."
"Rural, yet not remote, Mount Farm is an imposing yet friendly-looking farmhouse set along an adopted road, within seven acres of gardens and grounds and with walks at the doorstep, Mount Farm lies to the north of Chester, providing easy access to road and rail networks. "
"Within the private Old Hall Country Estate grounds, Wisteria cottage sits approximately 1 mile from the main road. As you meander through the estate, taking in the nearby woodland and countryside, you will come across Wisteria Cottage, an exceptionally restored home with 4 bedrooms."
"An excellent family home with land and outbuildings, in a highly sought-after area."
"From the moment you lead down the private driveway from Upton Lane and approach this stunning and very individual detached family home, you will instantly be intrigued over what the inside has to offer. Having undergone a truly outstanding transformation, every box has been ticked and no stone le..."
"Experience luxury living in this stunning executive 4-bedroom Art Deco detached home located in the sought-after neighborhood of Lache Lane, Chester, Cheshire. Boasting light & spacious living areas where the character and features of the old house have been retained and restored and cleverly..."
"Sitting in lovely gardens and grounds in Chester's most prestigious postcode, Orchard House offers potential to improve and extend."
Beautifully presented family house in an excellent residential location.
LOCATION LOCATION LOCATION Swetenhams are delighted to present this four bedroom semi-detached property located in one of Chester's most desirable locations. Enviably positioned with far reaching views across the racecourse and the City's Skyline. Viewing a must!
"OF INTEREST TO PRIVATE BUYERS, DEVELOPERS AND INVESTORS A substantial period property with coach house in a desirable location close to the city centre comprising 7 self-contained units producing a 7% yield based on the current rental income of circa £67,000 per annum. "
** Show home opening 7th March call to pre-register** Five bedroom architecturally designed townhouse set within a prestigious new build development.
"An attractive semi-detached late Victorian property together with a detached Coach House with extensive parking, situated within walking distance of Chester. Total internal area: 5955 sq ft (552 sq m)"
"This strikingly impressive home boasts well presented, light and spacious accommodation throughout, located within a highly regarded village and situated within a ten minute drive from Chester city centre with easy access to local motorway networks."
"Architecturally remodeled inside and out, discover easy flow living with a stylish edge in the sought-after village of Christleton, close to the primary and secondary schools. Unrecognisable from its 1960s origins, No. 10, Rowan Park has been stripped back and reinvented for the 21st century. "
"A fantastic family house with potential to modernise, in a highly sought-after residential area."
The perfect home for any first-time buyer! Located on the outskirts of Chester City Centre the property is tucked away in a quiet cul-de-sac and comes complete with allocated parking. An array of local amenities are within walking distance and convenient public transport links allow easy access t...
Situated on the prestigious Kings Moat garden village only a stone's throw away from the Kings secondary school whilst being convenient for the City centre. The property is well located with a open aspect across a nature reserve with the rear garden having been landscaped with a westerly outlook...
"This impressive Substantial Victorian Family home is a rare opportunity in Hoole to own a well maintained period property with the potential for an income. This extensive property which was run as a bed and breakfast, also offers with a large enjoining extension to the rear which cont..."
A detached four bedroom family home in a much sought after location on the fringes of the city centre.
A deceptively spacious and beautifully presented luxurious detached family home set in its own grounds. Complete with timber cabin having its own bar and lounge area and a hot tub!
"This beautiful 5 bedroom detached house in the heart of Mollington, Chester, is the perfect family home. Set on a large plot, this property offers stunning country views and mature interior. Upon entering the ground floor, you are instantly greeted by a hallway with beautiful hardwood flooring ..."
A spacious and extended family home in a prime residential address within a short walk of Chester city centre and the River Dee.
"A spacious and free-flowing family home within a large plot, located in a sought-after residential setting."
A beautifully renovated detached period house in a highly sought-after conservation area in Hoole. The property has the benefit of up to 3 parking spaces and a garage.
A delightful 5 bedroom semi-detached family home in the sought-after location of Upton Park within striking distance of Bache station
An exceptionally well presented family house in a highly sought-after location.
"Situated in a popular and most convenient location, an outstanding, BRAND NEW, detached family home with EXCEPTIONAL SPECIFICATIONS and superb flexible accommodation throughout. Landscaped private gardens, gated entrance opening onto the driveway providing off road parking for several vehicles a..."
IMMACULATE FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR SOUGHT-AFTER AREA Don't miss out on the chance to make this extended detached property your new family home! Homes on this road do not come up often... so book your viewing to really appreciate how spectacular every part of the property is. From th...
"Nestled on the banks of the river, in the heart of the city, welcome to No. 7, The Groves. An historic home dating back to the 1800s, and an iconic part of Chester's riviera, enjoy the hustle and bustle of life along the riverside during the day, followed by tranquil nights within the cocooning w..."
"* PICTURESQUE VILLAGE LOCATION * APPROX 2.5 MILES FROM CHESTER * LARGE GAMES/BILLIARDS ROOM. An attractive four bedroom detached cottage prominently situated along Village Road in the highly sought-after village of Christleton, recently named by the Sunday Times as 'one of the top 10 places to li..."
A fully remodelled four/five bedroom detached property with high quality fittings throughout as well as stunning south facing garden and garage. 
Forming part of the exclusive 'Mount Barns' development of similar luxury barn conversions; this spacious four-bedroom character home boasts a wealth of features including a stunning luxury dining kitchen and separate living room with feature fireplace. Viewing Essential!
"A brand new barn style property offering spacious accommodation of around 3,597 sq ft, located in a pretty Cheshire village close to the historic city of Chester"
"This superbly designed modern ""Redrow"" homes designed family home being one of the popular and rarely available ""Richmond"" style. The property which is kept in immaculate order and has been well improved with a newly installed ""Vaillant"" combination boiler as well a..."
ONLY FOUR PLOTS REMAINING! A four bedroom detached house forming part of a collection of 21 beautiful new build homes accessed via a private road off Lache Lane.
"***LAST TWO PLOTS REMAINING*** Situated in the heart of one of Chester’s most sought after neighbourhoods, St Michael’s Park is a distinct development of just 20 new homes of character finished to an exacting specification. St Michael’s Park lies along a private road off Lache Lane and c..."
"A four bedroom detached house forming part of a collection of 21 beautiful new build homes accessed via a private road off Lache Lane, one of Chester’s most sought after addresses."
"The Balmoral is a 4 BEDROOM DETACHED home with a OPEN PLAN KITCHEN, a seperate UTILITY room, a seperate LONGUE & 2 luxury EN-SUITES."
The Henley is a FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED home with a huge OPEN PLAN LIVING AREA stretching width of property as well as a SEPARATE LOUNGE & 2 EN-SUITE BEDROOMS.
"A period bay fronted five bedroom semi detached residence occupying a pleasant elevated position in an established residential area close to the city. With spacious rooms, high ceilings and character features, this lovely home would be great for the growing family"
"A 1960s four-bedroom detached house, with larger than average corner plot having significant potential, a double garage, and an extremely convenient as well as sought after location within a mile of the Chester city centre. Long regarded as one of the premier Chester locations, Queens ..."
"Imagine experiencing that sense of holiday relaxation, every time you return home from work… Turn your imagination into reality, at 4 Mount Barns, Poplar Hall Lane, in the charming west Cheshire village of Chorlton by Backford only a short drive from Chester. "
"** LAST ONE REMAINING** With its handsome bay front, stylish soffits and canopied porch, No. 3, Regents Court is a home with presence. Park up to three cars along the driveway, before making your way along the Indian stone paved pathway of the front garden to the sage green, solid wood front do..."
"OUTSTANDING 5-bedroom, DETACHED BUNGALOW set on a LARGE PLOT in the picturesque village of SAUGHALL. Benefiting from UNDERFLOOR HEATING throughout, OAK DOORS and INDIVIDUAL ROOM THERMOSTATS. Located on a RURAL SETTING just an 8 minute drive to CHESTER CITY CENTRE"
"A contemporary 4 bedroom home within an exclusive new development of only 13 homes situated in a private location off Plas Newton Lane, in Upton-by- Chester."
** Show home opening 7th March call to pre-register** Four bedroom architecturally designed townhouse set with a prestigious new build development.
"The Sunningdale is a 4 BEDROOM DETACHED HOME featuring an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, a Seperate LOUNGE AND SNUG, 2 EN-SUITE BEDROOMS and an integral double GARAGE"
"A PROVEN RENTAL OPPORTUNITY AND PERFECT AS A HOLIDAY LET, a charming Grade II Listed 4-bedroom townhouse located within the City Walls close to the city’s leisure and retail facilities"
Situated on a private and secluded corner plot with a south westerly facing side and rear garden this well extended 1935 built home makes a superb family home in walking distance of popular schooling. The property which retains much of its original character whilst boasting a two storey rear ext...
"A rare opportunity to purchase this outstanding barn conversion on the outskirts of Chester. Finished to a very high standard, with a beautiful interior style and modern cottage features. The property is deceptively spacious with four double bedrooms, a luxury modern bathroom, ample living areas..."
"An opportunity not to be missed! This beautiful and spacious family home is located in the thriving village of Waverton and offers a fantastic amount of living space along with far reaching views over farmland towards Beeston Castle at the rear. A rare find, this property offers four good sized b..."
"GET A REAL FEEL FOR THE PLACE AND CHECK OUT OUR INTERACTIVE TOUR! Constructed by Redrow Homes in the early 1990s, Gawer Park has always been an extremely popular development. Comprising a relatively small number of larger detached houses, which together form a select cul-de-sac that is both priva..."
"An extended four bedroom mid 1960s detached house, with attractive and established gardens, superb aspects to the rear towards Upton golf course, and an extremely popular location to the north of Chester. Being sold by the family of the only owners from when the property was newly cons..."
A UNIQUE OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE THREE PROPERTIES! This is a truly unique opportunity to purchase a substantial 5 bedroom family home along with two separate one bedroom flats that have the option to be sold with vacant possession or tenanted and have provided the current owners with a superb ext...
"We're delighted to offered to market this spacious Four Bedroomed detached home located within the highly desirable and sought-after village of Waverton. The home enjoys a fantastic position within the cul-de-sac, bordering fields to rear, and enviable views can be enjoyed from the first floor. A..."
"A terrific four bedroom, two bathroom, four reception room detached house, located in a superb cul de sac within Waverton village set in a lovely plot with east facing garden and wide driveway "
Traditional Farm Buildings with planning consent and modern farm buildings.
Very spacious 4 bedroom detached bungalow with an attached garage and ample parking. Set in a small cul-de-sac the bungalow has extensive rear gardens with a sunny aspect. In addition there is the benefit of planning consent to create a substantial extension to give the bungalow huge potential.
"A stunning two double bedroom penthouse apartment in Chester City Centre, close to the Racecourse. With a large south facing balcony with incredible views over the river & North Wales & high quality luxury fixtures and fittings, this would be ideal for a purchaser looking for space and luxury living"
We are delighted to bring to the market this beautiful four bedroom detached property set back from Parkgate Road with a large driveway and large lawned area.
GET A REAL FEEL FOR THE PLACE AND CHECK OUT OUR INTERACTIVE TOUR! A stunning detached home ticking all of the boxes and definitely future proofed for any growing family. This detached property is situated not only in a much sought-after area but has also been extended to offer an abundance of fle...
The Shaftesbury is a 4 BEDROOM DETACHED home with a SPACIOUS INTERIOR including LARGE SEPARATE LOUNGE and OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM. First floor boasts 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS with an EN-SUITE to the master.
"Located in this ever-desirable suburb of Chester, is this 1930s three bedroom semi-detached property, in need of modernisation and refurbishment throughout. Offering a huge amount of potential to any prospective buyers, the property comprises an entrance hall, living room, dining room, kitchen, f..."
"The Shaftesbury is a 4 BEDROOM DETACHED HOME which features an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY area, an EN-SUITE to the MASTER BEDROOM & a DETACHED single GARAGE."
"Situated in the popular district of Saighton just outside the city, this detached family home provides an excellent range of accommodation including open-plan kitchen/dining space, large living room and four bedrooms. There is also a double garage and landscaped garden to the rear."
"A substantial penthouse apartment in a sought-after village setting with lovely views, along with a share of communal grounds and paddock. Current lease can be extended to 164 years."
THREE BEDROOM DETACHED home with SPACIOUS OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/FAMILY AREA and a LARGE SEPARATE LOUNGE. An EN-SUITE to EVERY BEDROOM and a walk-in wardrobe to the master.
"Situated in a greatly sought-after location, this very well presented mature semi-detached family home has the added benefit of having a self contained annex to the rear, perfect for guests or even a well positioned air BNB. Close to town and the Countess of Chester Hospital, it also well served ..."
"* LOCATED ALONG A DESIRABLE ROAD CLOSE TO HOUGH GREEN * FLEXIBLE LAYOUT * GATED DRIVEWAY WITH GARAGE & WORKSHOP. An attractive three/four bedroom semi-detached bungalow located along a tree-lined part of Glan Aber Park in Chester. The accommodation briefly comprises: entrance porch, entrance hall..."
"Beautifully presented through-out, this excellent detached family home is situated on an exceptionally popular development, with good access to local amenities. Featuring a large living kitchen which has Bi-fold doors opening into the manicured rear garden, it provides an comfortable living space..."
"An opportunity not to be missed! This beautiful family home is located in the thriving village of Waverton and offers a fantastic amount of living space that's been tastefully modernised by our current sellers to offer that 'turnkey' home. A rare find, this property offers three good ..."
"A traditional 1920's semi-detached home offering much more than you might expect! Truly stunning in presentation and finish, blending beautiful character features with modern design. With three bedrooms and a great deal of living accommodation, this home has been cleverly extended offering an..."
"We are proud to present this Four Bedroom Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £500,000 - £550,000*"
"A truly beautiful, impressive and unique characterful home in the centre of Mickle Trafford with stunning garden and double garage. A 3 bed Detached home which has been used as a 4 bed and has great potential. This property briefly comprises; spacious entrance hall which can take you ..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this handsome detached house. Offering a rare opportunity, the sale of this property will attract a high level of interest. Whilst being well presented and very well maintained there is huge potential to further extend and enhance the property to ..."
"An imposing double fronted Georgian building, with multiple parking spaces, current office consent, potential for residential conversion subject to planning, and an undeniably convenient location within walking distance of the railway station and city centre. With towpath walks along t..."
"*HIGH SPECIFICATION BUY-TO-LET INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY* Mr Investa are pleased to offer for sale this SIMPLY STUNNING four double bedroom, two bathroom, three storey mid mews townhouse, situated within the city walls of Chester City Centre. This exclusive property is 1 of only 4 in this HIGHLY SOU..."
This stunning 5 bed Felton home is set back from the road with a front of green space.
"The 5 bedroom, 2.5 storey Felton is fronted with green space and complete with a garage."
"A most exciting addition to the property market! A characterful bay fronted 1920s semi-detached home positioned along Canadian Avenue in Hoole, one of Chester's most notable and sought after addresses. Situated on a good-sized plot with private driveway to front and well-tended garden to rear whi..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN A substantially extended and tastefully modernised four bedroom post-war detached house with superb kitchen/dining/day room, lawned gardens and an extremely popular residential location just over a mile from the Chester city centre. Argosy is a classic post-war detached..."
A wonderful example of a four double bedroom detached family home situated in the desirable area of Mollington. This lovely home has ample space for the growing family & fantastic outside space too. The property is offered for sale with no ongoing chain & is ready to move into.Book your viewing 24/7
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. A fully licensed 10 BEDROOM HMO within a short walk of the main university campus on Cheyney Road. All furniture included. Presently fully let and providing WE UNDERSTAND a gross rental of £ 49,868 per annum. The property has been let for next academic year with gross..."
"A unique opportunity to own a substantial period home in the heart of Hoole, one of the most desirable locations in Chester. This is perfect for a family or investor as it is currently set up as individual apartments on each floor and has no onward chain. This property is in great con..."
The Oxford Lifestyle is a 3 BEDROOM DETACHED home with an EN-SUITE to each BEDROOM along with a WALK-IN DRESSING ROOM to the master BEDROOM. Ground floor boasts an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM along with SEPARATE UTILITY and CLOAKS ROOM as well as a SEPARATE LOUNGE and INTEGRAL GARAGE.
"The Oxford is a 4 BEDROOM DETACHED home with an Extensive OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM along with a SEPARATE UTILITY, a LARGE SEPARATE LOUNGE, an EN-SUITE MASTER BEDROOM & a integral single GARAGE"
"Situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac, this modern detached bungalow must be viewed to be appreciated, offering spacious living space, very well presented, and located in a popular village location. Having gas central heating and double glazing it comprises; spacious reception hall, large living room..."
"One of a kind. Deceptively spacious, considerable character and with an L-shaped garden for longer enjoyment of the sun."
"NO ONGOING CHAIN. A substantially extended 4/5 bedroom, two bathroom, 1963 detached house, incorporating an extremely useful one bedroom annexe suite/home office, and having the additional benefits of a South West facing rear garden, ample driveway, larger than average corner plot, and a highly r..."
* PERIOD TOWN HOUSE WITHIN THE CITY WALLS * FLEXIBLE LAYOUT OVER FOUR FLOORS * BALCONY WITH VIEWS TO REAR. An attractive three/four bedroom townhouse style property ideally located inside the city walls in the heart of the city. The accommodation briefly comprises: reception hall with Minton-st...
***VIEWINGS COMMENCING JANUARY 23rd*** A 'blank canvas' modern family home in fantastic condition arrives on the market in the Saighton development. This four-bedroom detached property is finished to a high standard and is brilliant for a family looking for a bit more space! It is located down a...
***MUST BE VIEWED*** Take a look at this beautifully presented four bedroom semi detached family home located on a highly desirable residential road in Curzon Park. The accommodation is generous perfect for a family looking for modern fixtures and fittings. The property comprises of an entran...
"An extended, link-detached family home offering flexible accommodation and offering great potential. Situated in the corner of a quiet cul de sac in the popular area of Guilden Sutton on the outskirts of Chester the accommodation to the ground floor comprises Entrance Porch, Reception Hall, Study..."
"Situated alongside one of Chester’s most sought-after thoroughfares, this beautiful semidetached property has in recent years undergone a program of full modernisation throughout and now presents internally and externally to the very highest standard. And benefiting from both UPVC double glazing ..."
"A well proportioned three storey, three bedroom, two bathroom 1980s mid town house, with study/home office, south facing balcony and patio garden, garage, parking space, and an extremely sought after conservation area location within the city walls of Chester. The situation of this pro..."
"* IDEAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY * CLOSE TO CITY CENTRE & UNIVERSITY OF CHESTER. A substantial terraced property, skillfully converted into three flats providing an excellent investment opportunity. FLAT ONE: A duplex-style flat set over two floors with four letting rooms and a walled court..."
"Set within a quiet and secure gated development, this contemporary top floor apartment comes with a share of the freehold, this bright and spacious apartment comes with two double bedrooms, two bathrooms, two parking spaces and benefits from having a recently refitted bespoke kitchen, underfloor ..."
"A spacious 4 double bedroom family home set in the highly desirable area of Westminster Park, set within the catchment for Kings and Queens schools plus within walking distance of Chester Race Course and City Centre it’s a perfect family home The garage has been converted by the current owners i..."
"Welcome to Queens Lancashire Avenue, located in the desirable Crown Park development. This stunning four bed detached property boasts a prime position close to a communal green space. This newer build offers a perfect blend of modern practicality and high-end finishes. The interior has been expe..."
The 4 bedroom Manford hosts a large rear garden and a single detached garage.
"The Marlow is a 4 BEDROOM DETACHED home with a OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM with a SEPARATE UTILITY, an EN-SUITE to the MASTER BEDROOM & a integral single GARAGE."
"An extended five bedroom, two bathroom, 1980’s detached house, with attractive south facing rear garden, solar PV cell array, solar hot water heating system, and a sought after as well as convenient cul-de-sac location to the south east of Chester and a short walk from the Caldy Valley Natu..."
"A recently renovated detached bungalow in a hugely sought after location finished to an extremely high standard throughout with spacious family accommodation including three bedrooms, open plan kitchen/living & dining area and landscaped garden to front and rear with driveway parking NO ONWARD CHAIN"
"Ashton and Grosvenor Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the market place this mature, eceptionally well presented and spacious, detached extended family home where only an internal inspection can appreciate the high standard of living."
A delightful and most spacious 3 bedroom detached dormer bungalow set in a cul-de-sac within popular Upton. The bungalow is well appointed throughout and with a very attractive private rear garden and parking for several cars to the front. UPVC double glazed. Early internal viewing strongly advised.
"A unique detached dorma bungalow in the heart of the village Saughall. This is a large extended property freshly decorated with benefits such as a double garage, off street parking and no onward chain all on this large plot of land. This property briefly comprises; spacious entrance h..."
"Viewing is strongly recommended to appreciate this exceptionally well presented three bedroom semi-detached family home offering light and airy living throughout offering the full benefits of gas fired central heating, double glazing."
"An extended and most substantial 4 bedroom detached family home in the heart of popular Vicars Cross. The property has an integral garage, parking to the front and rear garden. Hall, living room, dining room, kitchen/breakfast room, study and cloakroom. 4 bedrooms, WC and bathroom. NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"* LARGE DETACHED DORMER STYLE PROPERTY * POPULAR VILLAGE LOCATION. An individually designed four bedroom detached dormer style property ideally situated along Church Road in the popular village of Saughall. The accommodation, which offers scope for further enhancement, briefly comprises: open por..."
A fabulous and unique five bedroom barn conversion situated within a quiet and rural location. Self contained annex that also overlooks the countryside. 
A superb three storey detached new build property finished to an extremely high specification throughout with high quality fitments and adaptable open plan living accommodation. The house occupies a private yet accessible location in Hoole with ample off-road parking and enclosed rear garden.
"Situated in the popular and conveniently located hamlet of Backford, this spacious five bedroomed detached family home is ideal for commuters traveling into the City or to Manchester and Wirral, and is just minutes away from the Countess of Chester Hospital. Well presented through-out, the accomm..."
"An immaculate detached family home that has been fully renovated throughout to offer a ready to move in finish and is perfectly positioned on a generous sized plot, at the head of a quiet cul-de-sac. Throughout the property you will appreciate the modern décor and quality fittings, all toppe..."
"An extended 3 bedroom semi detached character family home in one of Chester’s most popular areas. With a stunning open plan kitchen/dining room & two further receptions, larger than average rear garden which backs on to playing fields, this property won’t be around for long! Book your viewing 24/7"
Whilst being situated on the prestigious address of Mill Lane this detached dormer style bungalow is peacefully tucked away at the end of a long driveway with a delightful southerly tree lined outlook from the bungalow onto the private gardens. The property which offers well proportioned room si...
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this immaculate 4 bedroom detached house situated in the highly desirable area of Huntington. Boasting very spacious living accommodation which is perfect for the growing family and beautifully presented throughout, it is in move in condition. ..."
"An opportunity to purchase this superbly located ground floor two bedroom apartment with private patio. This bright and sunny apartment has been totally redecorated throughout and offers great accommodation. The superbly renovated 17th century Hall, which houses the communal facilities (comprisi..."
"Occupying a truly delightful situation in this highly sought after location, close to the centre of the village and the shropshire union canal and set in a superb principally shrubbery garden, a most carefully maintained and modernised post-war detached bungalow providing adaptable family accommo..."
"***NO ONWARD CHAIN*** Extended to the rear, and situated on the edge of the village, this excellent detached property is a perfect family home, close to a superb village primary school, and having good road connections to Chester and the national road network. Having gas central heating and ..."
"A superb spacious two bedroom property offers private views over the cricket fields and beyond. This immaculate apartment has been redecorated throughout and has new carpets fitted. Located in Eaton Building, it offers easy access for the formal gardens and Main Hall. Construction of Eaton Buildi..."
"Situated in one of the Cities most sought-after locations, this detached bungalow offers spacious accommodation that has to be viewed to be fully appreciated. With gas central heating and double glazing, internally it comprises; Impressive reception hall opening onto a spacious living room, break..."
"A SUPERB DETACHED FAMILY HOME SITUATED IN A POPULAR AND CONVENIENT LOCATION, AND SET ON A GENEROUS CORNER PLOT POSITION. Well presented through-out, this individual detached house has the unusual feature of bay windows to both the front and side elevations, providing light and airy living space w..."
"GET A REAL FEEL FOR THE PLACE AND CHECK OUT OUR INTERACTIVE TOUR! A really lovely detached family home in a sought after village where the internal living space is perfectly proportioned, offering the new owner an abundance of flexible living space that can be used to suit their needs. This home ..."
"VIRTUAL VIEWING AVAILABLE, SPACIOUS 4 BEDROOM BUNGALOW, AVAILABLE WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN. This spacious bungalow is located towards the end of a quiet cul-de-sac at Tarrant Court, off Town Lane, in Mollington - a highly sought-after village on the outskirts of Chester City, Cheshire. Situated to..."
**STUNNING APARTMENT SET OVER THREE FLOORS**NO CHAIN** This spacious three bedroom triplex apartment is located a stones throw away from Chester city with many useful amenities & transport links within close proximity. The property is accessed via a communal entrance as well as a private under...
A spacious 3 bed bungalow with double garage and no onward chain. This property briefly comprises; a bright entrance porch into the main hallway with WC. A Spacious open plan lounge and dining room with central fireplace. The dining room opens into the kitchen which has access to the first ...
"A newly refurbished 3 Bedroom semi-detached house, thoughtfully redesigned, extended and remodelled providing contemporary themed accommodation with a range of quality fixtures and fittings."
* STUNNING COTTAGE * FINISHED TO A HIGH STANDARD * VIEWING ESSENTIAL. A former Grosvenor Estate semi-detached cottage occupying an elevated position on a sandstone ridge with views towards Edgars Field. The property is located within the Handbridge Conservation Area and is ideally situated just...
"A larger than average 1970s four bedroom, two bathroom detached bungalow, with south facing rear garden, inherent modernisation potential, and a select inner private cul-de-sac location to the north of Chester. Upton in general and Iver Close in particular are ever popular locations, b..."
"View our stunning Ascot show home at Deva Green, Chester- a four bedroom detached home, perfect for modern family living. "
A stunning new development located within easy walking distance of Chester City Centre. Show home available to view plus a virtual reality tour of this brand new development... 
"A FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOME with INTEGRAL GARAGE. Ground floor boasts OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM with SEPARATE UTILITY, CLOAKSROOM and a SEPARATE LOUNGE."
"Fully refurbished spacious family home within walking distance of the City Centre. The accommodation comprises Entrance Hall, Cloakroom/WC, Living Room, Open Plan Kitchen/Diner with Refitted Kitchen and Bi-Folding Doors, Four Bedrooms and Bathroom. There is a garden to the front and a ..."
"A unique 3 bed detached home in stunning condition throughout making use of its bright and spacious layout. This house has beautiful kerb appeal and benefits from off street parking. This property briefly comprises; impressive entrance hall which is bright with parquet flooring, from ..."
"* LANDMARK DEVELOPMENT * LOCATED WITHIN THE CITY WALLS * SECURE BASEMENT CAR PARKING SPACE * A beautifully presented two-bedroom first-floor apartment forming part of Alexander House along Cuppin Street, with views towards the racecourse and Welsh hills. The accommodation briefly comprises: recep..."
"Available with no onward chain, this a lovely, detached bungalow offers light and spacious accommodation, a low maintenance front garden and a private rear garden, having the benefit of off road parking, a car port and located within the highly desirable area of Upton."
"An extended three bedroom semi detached family home situated in the ever popular area Newton. With light, airy and spacious rooms, this would be ideal for the growing family. With a magnificent landscaped rear garden and being presented in fantastic order, this lovely home won’t be around for long"
"A beautifully presented Victorian terraced home set across three floors in a highly desirable area of Chester, close to the city centre. A spacious entrance hall with Minton tiled floor leads to two large living rooms, one with a newly fitted log burner. The kitchen has a breakfast bar and Belfas..."
"A spacious 4 bedroom link detached family home with open aspect over playing fields to the rear. In brief the property comprises Entrance hall, large living room, dining room, kitchen, conservatory and cloakroom. 4 bedrooms and three piece family bathroom. Gardens to front and rear, ample parking..."
"VIRTUAL VIEWING AVAILABLE., IMMACULATE DETACHED HOME. This fantastic detached home is located along Emperor Avenue, part of the Kings Moat garden village development, close to Chester and in a prime location overlooking a green space. Once complete this stunning development will encompass a..."
"Forming part of an attractive barn conversion development, on the outskirts of Chester, near to Chester Zoo, this three storey property must be viewed to appreciate the dimensions of the living space provided, particularly the spacious living room. Enjoying attractive views across open farmland a..."
"NO CHAIN - TRULY A MUST VIEW!! If you are looking for an immaculate, detached bungalow in Westminster Park then look no further. This property truly is a must view and has been very well maintained over the years but still allows for some cosmetic modernisation if desired. The accommodation is we..."
"A late 1960s three-bedroom detached house, with east facing rear garden, useful garage, inherent modernisation potential, and a highly regarded residential location to the north of Chester. An ever popular location Appleton Road in particular and Upton in general are repeat with access..."
"A refurbished and beautifully presented three bedroomed modern townhouse located within the City Walls. Located in the St Martins development in the city centre, this delightful property has a sitting room, dining kitchen, utility room, cloakroom downstairs with three bedrooms, one en-suite showe..."
"A splendid opportunity to acquire a two bedroom ground floor apartment. The property forms part of the stunning conversion of Backford Hall, a wonderful Grade II listed mid 19th Century residence, standing proud within the desired and highly sought after Backford Park development. Viewing Advised"
* INVESTMENT PROPERTY * CLOSE TO UNIVERSITY & CITY CENTRE * 7 LETTING ROOMS & 7 SHOWER ROOMS. A period end terrace house located in a convenient position close to Garden Lane and ideally situated within walking distance of the University of Chester and the city centre. The accommodation briefly ...
"A STYLISH EXTENDED FAMILY HOME OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO ON-GOING CHAIN! Situated in a desirable residential location, excellent amenities are on your doorstep including a range of local shops, well regarded schools, close access to motorway links, Chester Zoo and Chester City around 10 minutes aw..."
"THIS TRUELY IMPRESSIVE TOWN HOUSE MUST BE VIEWED TO APPRECIATE THE AMAZING SPACE AND QUALITY. Situated close to the City Centre, next to the Shropshire Union Canal, a pleasant way to walk into Chester, the property is incredibly deceptive, providing accommodation set on three storeys, with a host..."
We are pleased to present this fantastic 3 bed semi detached home. Modernised to a high standard this home is perfect for someone looking to upsize. Situated in a highly desirable area and stands within a good-sized plot and offers spacious and versatile accommodation. The location allow...
Complete with a single detached garage and large rear garden is this perfect 4 bed home.
"A 1930s three bedroom semi detached house, with east facing rear garden, well proportioned accommodation, a useful garage and driveway, and a highly regarded residential location some one and a half miles from the Chester city centre. Boughton in general and Belgrave Road in particular..."
"EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OPPURTUNITY. A fully licensed 8 BEDROOM HMO within a short walk of the main university campus on Cheyney Road. All furniture included. Presently fully let and providing a gross rental of £33,748 per annum . NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"A well presented three bedroom detached Bungalow in the popular area, Westminster Park. Even though this lovely home is in great condition, there is plenty of scope for future development & is situated on a larger than average plot. With spacious rooms and a newly fitted bathroom, this is a must see"
A stunning four bedroom family home with open-plan living spaces today! 
We can help you move to the four-bedroom Lymm home on the outskirts of Chester... 
"Come and take a look at this great 4 bedroom detached property in Great Boughton, Chester. Located in a quiet green area, it's an ideal family home. With no chain, this property has the potential to be modernised to your own personal tastes. The entrance hallway is an inviting introduction to t..."
"A deceptively spacious, well-presented terraced home enjoying a garage, private parking, and an extensive secret garden beyond. The property briefly comprises to the ground floor, two spacious reception rooms with a bay window to the front, an attractive open-plan kitchen/diner with ..."
Swetenhams are delighted to present this three bedroom semi detached property positioned on a corner style plot with wrap around established gardens. Hawthorne Corner is located in one of Chesters most desirable suburbs of Hoole.
"*SMALL CUL-DE-SAC SETTING * FAMILY HOME. A four-bedroomed detached house forming part of a small cul-de-sac set back from Oaklands in the popular village of Guilden Sutton. The accommodation briefly comprises: reception hallway, dual-aspect living room/dining area with feature fireplace and patio..."
"A 4 bed detached home in the centre of the highly desirable village of Mickle Trafford with double garage and beautiful gardens. This property which has been a lovely home for the current owners for many years briefly comprises; entrance hall with access to a WC, leading into a large dual aspect ..."
"Up to £5000 to spend how you like!* What's more, this home comes complete with an a superb specification... "
"Wonderful 3 bedroomed cottage style corner plot with extensive gardens, located in Chesters most stylish suburb of Hoole Village, welcome to Hawthorne Corner. Incredibly maintained throughout over 4 decades of current ownership, Hawthorne Corner oozes class with leaded windows throughou..."
"A Fantastic opportunity to acquire an extended three bedroomed detached bungalow which offers fabulous scope for improvement and modernization. The property is positioned on a good-sized plot with gardens enjoying outlooks over fields to both front and rear, and is located within the popular Hool..."
"Detached bungalow in the historic city of Chester offering two bedrooms, bathroom, dining kitchen, living room, conservatory, mature gardens, driveway parking and a single garage ¿ No onwards chain "
"*NO ONWARD CHAIN* An extended and well presented 19th century three bedroom semi-detached Cottage in an attractive rural location on the periphery of the popular village of Mollington, with the additional benefit of planning permission to provide a porch at the front and part single/part two stor..."
"A substantially extended and very tastefully presented, three bedroom inter-war detached house, with superb kitchen/dining room/garden room, stunning bathroom, useful study landing, west facing rear garden, two-car driveway, and a highly regarded residential location within two miles of the Chest..."
"A very stylishly modernised three bedroom, two bathroom 1980’s detached house, with numerous tasteful re-fitments, an impressive master bedroom suite, delightful patio garden, and an extremely sought after as well as convenient location approximately one and a half miles from the Chester ci..."
"A SPACIOUS 4 bedroom DETACHED home, providing the perfect mix of modern-day with family life. OPEN PLAN living, homely living room and spacious kitchen-diner with French doors to the garden, clever laundry cupboard and EN-SUITE to master."
* SUPERB PLOT WITH GENEROUS-SIZED REAR GARDEN AND WIDE GATED DRIVEWAY * WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT. A 1930s three-bedroom bay fronted semi-detached house forming part of an established and popular residential area conveniently situated off Lache Lane and within easy reach of the city centre. The a...
A beautifully presented 3 bed semi-detached home with the unique benefit of having the Shropshire Union Canal accessible from your rear garden gate perfect for a walk into Chester City centre passing Waitrose or a short local walk to the village of Christleton with pleasant pubs along the way. 
"An extended and tastefully presented post war three bedroom semi detached house with double glazed conservatory, well proportioned internal accommodation, attractive south facing rear garden, and an extremely popular residential location to the north of Chester. Upton in general and Ro..."
"An extended three bedroomed detached bungalow located in the extremely popular Westminster Park area of Chester, close to an excellent range of local amenities and transport links. The home has the added benefit of being positioned within a cul-de-sac setting on a good-sized plot with gardens to ..."
"SITUATED IN A QUIET CUL-DE-SAC, THIS EXPERTLY EXTENDED DETACHED BUNGALOW HAS UNDER-GONE A COMPLETE REFURBISHMENT, CREATING A BEAUTIFUL, FUCTIONAL HOME. Conveniently situated, close to Sainsbury's and the local road network, yet in a small cul-de-sac, the bungalow offer spacious and exceptio..."
"A 1980s three bedroom, two bathroom detached bungalow, with part walled rear garden, useful garage, and a highly regarded cul-de-sac location some one and a half miles from the Chester city centre. Located in an ever popular area this bungalow has excellent access to various local shop..."
A very well presented townhouse in the heart of the city with parking and southerly facing garden terrace.
"A well presented family home with good sized light, airy accommodation, attractive gardens and on a larger than average plot, Comprises of Lounge, Dining room, kitchen, four bedrooms, double glazing, garage, off road parking and rear south facing stunning garden. Strongly recommended. No chain"
"A great family home in a great location! This extended semi-detached home ticks many of those important boxes, the biggest box being that impressive open aspect to the rear! Situated within the sought after area of Newton, this home sits central for many local amenities, great schooling as well a..."
"Up to £12,000 to spend how you like!* Plus an exceptional specification... "
"EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OPPUTUNITY.A superb, fully refurbished and now very well appointed 7 BEDROOM fully licensed HMO very close to Chester University's main campus building on Cheyney Road. The property has 2 shower rooms, communal living room and well equipped kitchen. NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"* FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE * GENEROUS SIZED PLOT * WALK-IN READY FAMILY HOME. A beautifully presented and much improved four bedroom detached house forming part of a small cul-de-sac off Stanley Park Drive in Saltney. The accommodation, which is presented throughout to a high standard, briefly..."
"New to the market this lovely semi-detached property is situated in a sought-after area of Upton on this small new build family development.  The property is nicely presented throughout with many great features, such as three good-sized double bedrooms making th..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN. Platinum are delighted to offer onto the market this fantastic and spacious four bedroom end of terrace. Located within the highly sought after location of Chester, this superb property benefits from contemporary kitchen, modern bathroom, combination boiler..."
An extended semi detached in one of Chester´s most sought after addresses! This lovely property offers some original features and is waiting to be modernised to your liking that might include that ever popular family room! 
"An excellent opportunity to purchase this semi-detached 3-bedroom house situated on the outskirts of Chester City Centre in Upton, benefiting greatly from off-street parking and attractive gardens to both the front and rear. **NO CHAIN**"
"THIS PROPERTY IS FOR SALE BY THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION, PLEASE SEE INFORMATION BELOW An impressive three-storey four-bedroom, three bathroom post-millennium townhouse, with double garage, parking strip, south facing decked garden, and an extremely convenient conservation area location within w..."
"A rare and promising find for any house hunter, this glorious detached property has been recently modernised, meaning it is ready for its new owner to simply move in. With superb workmanship clearly apparent throughout, the property features 4 attractive bedrooms, 1 bathroom and an up-to-the-min..."
AMAZING FAMILY HOME IN AN EQUALLY FANTASTIC LOCATION! This three bedroomed property on Edwards Road is a 'turn key' purchase for buyers looking to live within the prestige Chester suburb of Westminster Park. This home on Edwards Road has distinctive period charm from the outside with it...
"THIS IS A FOUR BEDROOM SPECTACULAR MODERN HOME THAT IS PERFECT FOR A GROWING FAMILY LOOKING FOR AMPLE LIVING SPACE AND WE MEAN AMPLE LIVING SPACE! The property has modern decor throughout and little extras that really make this a special family home. Including a steam room, Jacuzzi bath, TV in ma..."
"A BEAUTIFULLY REFURBISHED DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH FIELD VIEWS! Gorgeous detached bungalows tucked away in the desirable village of Saughall are few and far between, especially one's like this offering countryside field views as a backdrop. Offered for sale with no chain, this spacious and inviting..."
Swetenhams are delighted to present this three bedroom detached bungalow with driveway parking located in the ever popular area of Great Boughton. Viewing Advised
Ready to move? The Appleton is a stunning 3 bedroom detached home with EXTRAS INCLUDED that is READY TO MOVE INTO! 
"Offered to market with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this well-presented three bedroomed detached home that enjoys a cul-de-sac position within the highly popular and sought-after village of Mickle Trafford. The village of Mickle Trafford is popular amongst those of all ages, with the local primary school ..."
"LOCATION LOCATION LOCATION - AN IMPRESSIVE DETACHED BUNGALOW OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO CHAIN! Tucked away in the desirable village of Mickle Trafford, this impressive and good sized detached bungalow is simply a must view. Surrounded by rolling countryside, excellent amenities are on your doorstep..."
"A family home with excellent commuting links and easy access to Chester City Centre comes to the market! This semi-detached house briefly comprises 2 Lounges, Kitchen, Master Bedroom and 2nd bedroom both with built-in cupboards, 3rd Single Bedroom, a Bathroom, and a Large Private Garden. Worce..."
"PDA Estate Agents are pleased to bring to the market this beautifully presented three bedroom detached bungalow situated on Hillside Road, Blacon, Chester. Sheltered by its greenery, this neatly tucked away bungalow features generous living space, and the most wonderful garden we have seen in som..."
"A stunning spacious ground floor, one bedroom apartment with superb outside space. This immaculate apartment has been to tastefully throughout. Located in Halston Building, it offers easy access for the formal gardens and Main Hall. Construction of Halston Building was completed in 2012.
The supe..."
"This duplex apartment overlooking the River Dee & Weir offers one of the finest views in the city and has been modernised by the current owner. The living space is open plan with fitted kitchen, dining area and living room, the upper floor provides two double bedrooms and bathroom. Parking & Garage."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN - A well-proportioned three-bedroom interwar semi-detached house, with Southwest facing rear garden, useful garage, and a highly regarded as well as convenient residential location within a mile and a half of the Chester city centre. The Lache Park Avenue area is a pere..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN: Pleasant setting - A spacious 3 bedroom detached bungalow with private gardens, conservatory, ensuite and a large double garage with ample rafter storage. On a bus route and close to the nature reserve."
"GET A REAL FEEL FOR THE PLACE AND CHECK OUT OUR INTERACTIVE TOUR! When it comes to this property, space and versatility strike you from the moment you open the front door. Greeted with a truly stylish and tastefully improved semi-detached home, there is so much natural light cascading around the ..."
"****NO ONWARD CHAIN **** A Three bedroomed detached home enjoying a cul-de-sac position within the highly popular and sought-after village of Mickle Trafford, with private rear garden backing onto the local primary school field. The village of Mickle Trafford is popular amongst those of all ages,..."
"NO CHAIN A larger than average post war three bedroom, two bathroom semi detached ex-police house, with ground floor shower/wet room, east facing rear garden, a degree of modernisation potential, and a highly regarded residential location to the north of Chester. Originally constructed..."
NO ONWARD CHAIN: Enjoying beautiful river outlooks - a spacious and beautiful duplex apartment that you just have to see!
"SITUATED IN THE DEE BANKS AREA OF CHESTER, WHO WOULD NOT WANT TO LIVE IN THIS MOST ATTRACTIVE LOCATION, WITH-IN WALKING DISTANCE OF THE RIVER DEE. Extended to the rear, and with a useful loft room, this three bedroom semi-detached house is a perfect family home, close to both primary and secondar..."
"If you like the idea of a countryside lifestyle, yet still want to be close to the City then Bryn Teg is the home for you. Set in the quiet village of Saughall, this beautiful home surrounded by greenery is a must see."
An opportunity to acquire an apartment close to Chester City Centre with its own private roof terrace!! Redland House is a beautiful 19th Century Victorian Villa that has undergone a sympathetic restoration programme. The building has now been transformed into eight contemporary apartments finis...
"This modern link-detached house is situated in a quite corner of this residential development close to Chester city centre and with good road and rail links. The accommodation on offer briefly comprises; entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/diner, conservatory, three double bedrooms, en-suite shower r..."
"Attention first time buyers, this spacious one bed ground floor apartment is offered at 50% SHARED OWNERSHIP with a balcony, allocated parking space and is perfectly located next door to the historic Little Roodee racecourse within a short walking distance to the centre of Chester."
"NO CHAIN: Pleasant Cul de Sac, popular location, amenities, wrap-around gardens for more sun and a recent and extensive scheme of modernisation."
"EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OPPURTUNITY. A newly fully refurbished, now superbly appointed and fully furnished 6 bedroom licensed HMO very close to Chester Universities main campus which is also on Cheyney Road. NO ONWARD CHAIN. The property is fully let to students for the next academic year at £3..."
"* POPULAR AREA * CLOSE TO AMENITIES *EXTENDED TO GROUND FLOOR & LOFT ROOM. A well-presented three-bedroomed semi-detached house located in the popular suburb of Upton. The accommodation briefly comprises: entrance hall, living room with feature fireplace, dining room with French doors to outside..."
"SENSATIONAL FAMILY HOME IN BOUGHTON!! This 3 bedroomed semi detached house located on a sought after road has off road parking and a garden space as well as a garage. Internally, there is a lounge with a separate dining room. To the rear there is a kitchen as well as a breakfast room & downstairs..."
Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this fantastic 3 bedroom link detached house located in the highly desirable area of Upton. The property offers spacious family accommodation and is perfect for the growing family. Very well presented throughout the property in brief consists of...
"A semi-detached HMO opportunity that is currently tenanted until August 2024. For any investor, this is an instant source of income with six double bedrooms on offer along with off-road parking. The property has been fully renovated throughout offering the tenants a stylish and comfor..."
"A SUBERB INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ON THE DOORSTEP OF CHESTER UNIVERSITY WITH AN UNDERSTOOD INCOME OF OVER£34,000 PER ANNUM. Already let out for this current and next academic year, this 6 bedroom student let property is well maintained and is found on Hayes Park, opposite the main entra..."
"A beautifully unique period property walking distance to the city centre. This is a top floor converted apartment with lots of character, 4 bedrooms, a spacious hallway and access to gardens with no onward chain. This property briefly comprises; ground entrance hall with stairs leading up to the ..."
* 4 BEDROOMS * CENTRAL CITY LOCATION * CONSERVATION AREA * OUTSIDE TERRACE. A unique four bedroom maisonette style property ideally situated behind Bridge Street with its own private entrance door from the historic Chester Rows. The accommodation is presented throughout to a high standard and br...
"PRICED FOR A QUICK SALE. MOTIVATED VENDOR. OPEN TO OFFERS. Situated in the ever popular Hoole district of Chester, this imposing three storey town-house retains many of the original features inherent to the period, and provides an excellent opportunity to create a wonderful family home..."
This 1920's detached bungalow is wonderfully positioned opposite an open green with a great feeling of privacy to both the front and rear. The bungalow would benefit from modernisation and cosmetic improvement but offers a superb opportunity to re-model a bungalow in such a sought after and peac...
"A beautifully present three-bedroom semi detached property with private rear gardens, off-street parking, and within walking distance to Chester City Centre."
This attractive bay fronted late 1930's semi detached home which is ideally situated in a convenient and popular location close to a great range of shops whilst being within walking distance of both the City and the River Dee. Offering a blank canvas with recently decorated whilst offering great...
"Welcome to 28 Clare Avenue, a three-bedroom mid-terraced property situated in the desirable area of Hoole. This fantastic modern property offers bright & airy accommodation throughout and has been well looked after by its owners. Downstairs consists of an entrance hallway with a characterful cas..."
A unique 2 bed Bungalow with off street parking and a west facing garden located in the highly desirable village of Guilden Sutton. This property comprises; entrance hall with access to a shower room and to the second bedroom currently used as an office with access to a large attic. Th...
"A bright and spacious 3 bed luxury duplex apartment in the city centre with 2 reception rooms on the top floor with large roof terrace. This property briefly comprises; spacious entrance hall with built in storage and access to the main bathroom. There are 2 double bedrooms, the larger havin..."
"*NO CHAIN* A well appointed three bedroom end terrace family home situated in the popular area of Boughton, having a modern interior, the property briefly comprises; hallway, open plan living room/ dining room with feature fire place, spacious breakfast kitchen, landing, three bedrooms and 4-pie..."
"A collection of nine homes that not only deliver high standard of specification, but also blending seamlessly into the local surroundings."
"An early 1930s two bedroom detached bungalow, with larger than average south-east facing rear garden, impressive sitting/dining room, inherent potential, and a sought-after as well as convenient semirural location to the North east of Chester. A classic example of inter-war design, Mal..."
"A 3 bed detached home that requires updating located within walking distance of the city centre with garage, off-street parking and a large garden. This property briefly comprises; spacious entrance hall with built in storage. Large dual aspect open plan living and dining area which leads into a ..."
"Dreaming of owning your own period home with stunning Racecourse views and all the culture, cafes and history of Chester only a short walk away? Welcome to No. 25, Blackfriars House, a two-bedroom home brimming with character and offering incredible views out over Chester Racecourse. A blank canv..."
"A traditional 3 bedroom semi detached home within sought after Shaftesbury Avenue with ample parking, conservatory and attractive rear garden. An ideal family home also with a very useful Attic Room. NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"A great opportunity to purchase this Top floor two bedroomed apartment within Kings Buildings, a stunning Grade II listed Georgian townhouse located within the historic city walls. A prime location, the building lies an extremely short walk away from abundance of amenities and facilities the city..."
"Offered to market with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this detached bungalow which occupies a pleasant cul-de-sac position within Newton, a most popular and convenient location within Chester. We feel the property offers a good degree of curb appeal, with a bay window frontage and a double gated, resin set d..."
The 3 bed Gosford is located in a cul-de-sac and complete with views of pond and a large rear garden
"In a market where demand is far higher than supply, early viewing would be highly recommended to ensure you do not to miss out on this fabulous property! This traditional three-bedroom semi-detached home is situated within a pleasant position on the sought-after Toll Bar Road, a quiet area, ideal..."
"This well presented three storey townhouse, offers spacious living in a convenient location, close to the City of Chester and ideally located for commuters."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN - A 1930s three bedroom semi detached house with south west facing rear garden, garage, driveway, a degree of inherent potential and a highly regarded residential location some one and a half miles from the Chester city centre. Located in a highly regarded area convenie..."
This charming ground floor apartment retains many original features including original oak panelling and flooring together with stained glass windows and yet has been sympathetically transformed into exclusive living accommodation.
"This beautiful family home, located on the desirable Whitby Avenue in Newton, Chester, is ready for its next family to move in and make it home. 4 Whitby Avenue is a three bedroom semi-detached property that has been recently modernised and is presented to a high standard throughout. On the grou..."
"***LOCATED IN THE HEART OF HOOLE VILLAGE***TASTEFULLY DECORATED THROUGHOUT*** This stunning period terraced home boasts three bedrooms, lounge, dining room, modern fitted kitchen, modern bathroom, original features, front & rear yard, double glazed windows, recent combi-boiler & overall spacious..."
"A Victorian three bedroom mid terrace house, with inherent period character, an attractive lawned rear garden backing onto the Chester branch of the Shropshire Union Canal, and a sought after as well as very convenient location within a mile of the Chester Racecourse and city centre. A..."
"We’re delighted to introduce these brand new three-bedroom homes for sale in the heart of Chester, with completion expected early 2023. These stunning properties are ideal for a range of buyers including first-time buyers, investors, and downsizers alike. Boasting well appointed kitchens, spaciou..."
"PDA Estate Agents are delighted to offer this recently built three bedroom semi-detached house for sale. The property is located on the popular development of Upton Grange a short distance from the city and located next to the Countess of Chester Hospital. The property comprises of lounge, kitche..."
"* PERIOD TERRACED HOUSE * LOCATED CLOSE TO THE CITY CENTRE * RESIDENT'S PERMIT PARKING. An attractive three bedroom bay fronted terraced house conveniently situated on Moss Bank, just off Parkgate Road, within walking distance of the city centre. The accommodation, which retains a wealth of ..."
"* 1930's STYLE SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE * ESTABLISHED & POPULAR AREA * IDEAL FAMILY HOME. A three bedroom semi-detached house forming part of a popular area close to a wide range of local amenities and within easy reach of the city centre. The accommodation, which has been extended to the rear, briefl..."
"Well presented, three bedroom, modern family home with a private rear garden in the sought after location of Upton, which is within a short driving distance of Chester city centre."
"ATTENTION: First Time Buyers or Investors - This three bedroom property is located in the popular area of Upton Grange. Perfectly located approximately two miles from Chester City Centre, with local shops and the train station only a short stroll away."
"VIRTUAL VIEWING AVAILABLE, SPACIOUS DETACHED BUNGALOW. This lovely detached bungalow is located along St Mark's Road, on the outskirts of Chester City. Situated within easy walking distance of a range of amenities including shops, supermarket, cafes, pubs and Westminster Golf course, and on..."
"Set over three floors, is this charming and well presented three bedroom townhouse. Offering spacious family accommodation which is wonderfully stylish, with modern kitchen, living spaces and throughout. This contemporary home occupies a lovely plot and comes with two allocated pa..."
"*A PERIOD TWO-BEDROOM TOWNHOUSE WITHIN THE CITY WALLS* An attractive two bedroom Grade II Listed double-fronted townhouse in a noted conservation area just a short distance from Grosvenor Street in the heart of this historic city centre. It affords entrance porch, lounge with a feature Victor..."
"A 4 bed semi-detached home with off-street parking, large garden on a corner plot in a desirable village location. This property briefly comprises; spacious entrance hall leading to a large dual aspect lounge with doors into the garden. A kitchen/diner and a separate dining room which can also b..."
"A superb 19th century three-bedroom two bathroom end of terrace house, with pebbled parking space, much larger than average sitting/dining room, delightful rear patio garden with sand pit, and an extremely sought-after conservation area location within the city walls. Rich in history and characte..."
"A 3 bed Semi Detached home with off street parking and a rear extension is offered with no onward chain. This property briefly comprises; spacious entrance hall with built in storage. Front lounge with bay window, a separate dining room off the kitchen and a rear extension used as a second lounge..."
"A city centre 2 bed apartment with no onward chain and a large roof terrace overlooking Grosvenor Park. This property briefly comprises; spacious entrance hall leading first to the second double bedroom with built in storage, then the family bathroom. Then to a spacious open plan kitchen, diner, ..."
"GET A REAL FEEL FOR THE PLACE AND CHECK OUT OUR INTERACTIVE TOUR! Location location location! The position of this spacious town house possesses many benefits, from its lovely elevated views to the front and rear, to being tucked away off one of Upton's most desirable roads. Penfold Hey is a ..."
"A very well maintained and presented 3 bedroom detached bungalow within a small cul-de-sac with attractive landscaped gardens.
Hall, living room and kitchen/diner. 3 bedrooms and bathroom. Attached garage and ample parking. UPVC double glazed. NO ONWARD CHAIN. Early viewing advised."
Ideally located on a spacious plot in Saughall. This two bedroom bungalow has a spacious feel and could be adapted to create a lovely family home. The garden has a private feel and is an ideal secure space for children and pets and is perfect for entertaining in the Summer months.
"** Fully Licensed HMO in Excellent Condition ** Located on the outskirts of the city just a few miles from Chester Business Park and British Aerospace. Shared kitchen, dining and social space, five letting rooms (three en-suite), driveway and low maintenance garden. Income Figures on request. "
"A 3 bedroom semi-detached spacious house with great potential located in the popular area of Vicars Cross and the property is chain free! The property consists of; a large lounge area, kitchen and a second reception room which could be used as a dining area/study/snug. The property als..."
Strike is pleased to present this property in Chester.
"* PRESTIGIOUS DEVELOPMENT * TREE LINED ROAD * CLOSE TO CITY & WITHIN EASY REACH OF CHESTER BUSINESS PARK. A two bedroom first floor apartment forming part of a converted period house along a tree-lined avenue in the popular Chester suburb of Curzon Park. The accommodation, which is presented thro..."
"A tastefully presented three bedroom early 1970s detached house, with south west facing rear garden, refitted kitchen and shower room, garage, driveway, and a sought-after as well as extremely convenient cul-de-sac location to the north of Chester. Upton in general and Iver Road in par..."
"A character-filled 2 bedroom terrace home refurbished to the highest standard, with solid oak Herringbone flooring to the lounge/dining area, period cast-iron fireplaces, contemporary log burners, and a private enclosed garden."
Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac with a stunning outlook to the front this traditional semi detached home is ideally located within walking distance of the Bache railway station & the countess of Chester hospital. This family home which is awash with natural light and benefits from original fe...
"SUMMER IS NEARLY HERE AND YOU CAN CERTAINLY ENJOY THE SUMMER MONTHS WITH THIS PROPERTY. This impressive family home has recently been re decorated and has the added benefit of a loft conversion giving you ample indoor space. In brief, the ground floor benefits from hallway, lounge, a stylish kit..."
A 5 bed HMO opportunity which is currently tenanted until August 2023 within walking distance to the city centre. A 5 bed HMO opportunity which is currently let for £110pw per room. This also could be a 4 bed residential property with double reception which is chain free. This h...
"A tastefully presented three bedroom, two bathroom period mid terrace house, with front garden, stunning aspects across the River Dee and Meadows towards Earl’s Eye, and a sought after conservation area location within a mile of the Chester city centre. With views over one of the..."
"A family home situated in the popular Handbridge area within walking distance of the city centre. The accommodation to the ground floor comprises entrance hall, spacious Living Room enjoying a log burner and French doors to the rear garden, kitchen and shower room. To the first floor there are th..."
"An Edwardian mid-terrace house subdivided into four self-contained studio flats, currently fully let, and producing a healthy annual rental income in this popular residential location approximately a mile from the Chester city centre. Representing an ideal purchase for those seeking a ..."
"A spacious family home situated in a corner plot and offering generous and flexible accommodation. With new double glazing the accommodation comprises Entrance Hall, Cloakroom/WC, Living Room with French doors to a mature stocked garden, Dining Kitchen with Conservatory off, Four Bedrooms and ref..."
"An exceptional period end of terrace property in a quiet yet convenient location close to the city centre. The property has a range of well proportioned accommodation with two large reception rooms, kitchen with courtyard access, three bedrooms, bathroom, outbuildings and ample on street parking."
"****NO CHAIN**** EXTENDED FOUR BEDROOMS DETACHED EN-SUITE GARAGE Offering to the market this modern, four bedroom, extended detached property, situated conveniently close to Chester City Centre, schools, amenities and transport links to the surrounding areas. The property benefits fro..."
"NO CHAIN! This wonderful three bedroomed home in Vicars Cross is looking for its new owners, we suggest somebody who is looking to put their own 'stamp on' a home come and view this wonderful family home, a well kept residence with even further unearthed potential, with extensions (STPP) a possib..."
"Situated in a cul-de-sac, just off Lache Lane, this mature three bedroom semi-detached house offers excellent scope for a willing purchaser to put their own stamp on this substantial family home. With gas central heating and double glazing it comprises; reception hall, living room, separate dinin..."
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. A 6 bedroom terraced fully licensed HMO close to Chester City Centre. The property is currently full let and we understand the gross rental achieved is around £29,700 per annum. There are bathrooms on the ground and first floors. UPVC double glazed windows and gas ce..."
"This stylish and contemporary property is unique, spacious and super fun. Situated within walking distance of Chester City Centre and with great commuter links you have everything you need on your doorstep. From shops to pubs to Chester Race Course."
Situated on an enviable plot and with both off road parking and a garage this three bedroom detached home is located in a popular residential location and offers ready to move into accommodation. 
"Situated in the picturesque village of Christleton, this former school house stands proudly within a conservation area of this most sought after location. It is well placed for a host of local amenities, including revered local schooling as well as the popular Ring O' Bells pub. There is easy acc..."
"This three bedroomed semi-detached home with three reception rooms and detached garage is located within Moorcroft Crescent, a conveniently positioned cul-de-sac accessed off Guilden Sutton Lane, which offers a collection of homes that rarely come to market. Guilden Sutton is a most popular villa..."
"FOUR BEDROOMS MODERN SHOWER ROOM EXTENDED SOUGHT AFTER AREA Offering to the market this spacious four bedroom property, situated within easy reach of the vibrant Chester City Centre, close to local schools, amenities and transport links to the surrounding areas. The property boasts a spa..."
"***VENDOR OPEN TO SENSIBLE OFFERS*** Offered to market with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this extended 1930s three-bedroomed semi-detached home situated within Upton, one of Chester's most sought after go-to locations. Alwyn Gardens is particularly favoured by families as it falls within a stone's throw of..."
"Enjoy a lifestyle of convenience with this spacious, top floor, two storey apartment; located in the heart of Chester and just moments away from the city centre, railway station and Shropshire Union Canal on its doorstep. Experiencing a perfect blend of comfort, style and convenience, the immacu..."
"A 1960s three-bedroom semi-detached house, with South facing rear garden, larger than average driveway, inherent potential, and a highly regarded residential location to the East of Chester. A classic example of this era the property in question is ideally located for access to the exc..."
"Wonderful Family Home! Spacious! Four Bedrooms! Two Receptions! Corner Plot! This wonderful property has so much to offer, with spacious rooms throughout, high ceilings, large plot, ideal for the keen renovators looking to make a property their own. This property oozes potential, looking to..."
"GET A REAL FEEL FOR THE PLACE AND CHECK OUT OUR INTERACTIVE TOUR! This impressive semi-detached home certainly offers much more than meets the eye! Truly immaculate throughout and offering plenty of living space, it's the ideal family home. The property has been greatly improved over time to ..."
"A delightful well maintained two bedroom bungalow in a quiet location in the sought after area of Great Boughton.There is a garage and driveway affording off road parking and a lawned garden to the front and a secluded, low maintenance rear garden. Offered for sale with no chain"
"EXTENSIVE GARDEN - A MUST VIEW!! If you're looking for a sizeable property with a larger than average plot, look no further. We are proud to present this extended 4 bedroom semi-detached home which is ready for its next owners to move straight in. Some of the key highlights for this property are ..."
"A 1950s four bedroom semi-detached house, with inherent modernisation potential, larger than average corner plot, and a highly regarded village location to the north of Chester. Saughall in general and Hermitage Road in particular are perennially popular locations, being near to a vari..."
"A detached bungalow occupying a corner plot in need of modernising and refurbishment. With no onward chain the property comprises Porch, Entrance Hall, Living Room, Dining Kitchen, Three Bedrooms and Bathroom. There are gardens to the front, side and rear plus a driveway and detached garage. "
The Bretton makes the perfect home for first time buyers or investors. 
In need of modernisation this three storey mews house in central Hoole offers a great opportunity for those seeking to put their own stamp on a property and increase value. 
"A CHARACTER FILLED COTTAGE LOCATED IN THE HEART OF SAUGHALL VILLAGE. Positioned on a highly regarded residential road in the beautiful village of Saughall, Hillcrest is brimming with character and charm & is simply ready whenever you are! Excellent amenities are on your doorstep including a range..."
"A superbly presented modern family home with a courtyard to the front with parking, a separate garage and an attractive hard landscaped rear garden. The accommodation has been kept immaculately and extended and briefly comprises hall with oak staircase with inset tread lighting,ground floor cloak..."
"A family home that comes to the market ticking all of the boxes. This semi-detached property has plenty of scope for extension, yet already offers plenty of internal living accommodation over the two floors. Boasting a large frontage, there is plenty of parking available for multiple vehicles and..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN! SUPERB OPPORTUNITY! IDEAL LOCATION! 2 minutes´ walk to the High Street, under 10 minutes to the railway and bus stations! A 4-bedroom, 2-bathroom townhouse that could generate an excellent income per annum with some minor investment."
"A family home that comes to the market ticking all of the boxes. This link-detached property has plenty of scope for extension, yet already offers plenty of internal living accommodation over the two floors. Boasting a large frontage, there is plenty of parking available for multiple vehicles, wh..."
"A fully renovated HMO opportunity that is currently tenanted until August 2023. For any investor, this is an instant source of income with five fully furnished bedrooms on offer along with on-street parking. The property has been fully upgraded throughout offering the tenants a stylish and comfor..."
Beautifully maintained and well appointed 3 bed family home in a prime location. Occupying an excellent size plot. Good schooling nearby and excellent local amenities and transport links
"A no chain 1970s three-bedroom semi-detached house, in a cul-de-sac with an east facing garden, useful garage and driveway, an element of modernisation potential, and a highly regarded residential location within walking distance of Belgrave school. A perennially popular location, West..."
A most sizeable Victorian bay fronted mid terrace in a prominent Chester location close to the University City campus and within easy walkable distance of the excellent range of shopping facilities and attractions within Chester city centre itself. The property has been a long term investment pro...
"Situated in one of the most popular of Cheshire Villages, this semi-detached property is ideal for a family looking to move into the catchment of one of the most renown primary schools, and the excellent Christleton High School. Having gas central heating and double glazing it comprises; receptio..."
"* NO ONWARD CHAIN * ESTABLISHED & POPULAR AREA * GOOD SIZED REAR GARDEN * A three bedroom semi-detached house with great potential. The property is situated close to a wide range of local amenities and within easy reach of the city centre. The accommodation briefly comprises: open porch, entrance..."
INVESTMENT OPPURTUNITY. A very well maintained and fully licenced 5/6 bedroom 3 bathroom end of terrace property close to the City Centre currently let to a mix of students and non students. Agreement now in place to let to students for the academic year 23/24. Sold furnished. 
"Sold with no onward chain. Situated in a small cul-de-sac, this property has huge scope for improvement and extension (subject to planning permission) The property comprises in brief: Beautifully maintaned front and rear gardens, hallway entrance, living room, large open plan dining roo..."
A spacious and bright 3 bed semi in a popular and pleasant setting. Viewing essential!
"A 1930s three bedroom semi detached house with west facing rear garden, inherent modernisation potential, and a very convenient location a short walk from the thriving garden quarter and approximately 0.5 miles from the centre of Chester City Centre. A perennially popular location, the..."
"***OPEN TO OFFERS*** Situated within the landmark building in the city that is HQ Building, this ground floor Two Bedroomed apartment with views onto the Piazza, is offered to market with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Situated in such a prime city Centre location, the apartment benefits form stylish appointme..."
"PDA Estate Agents are delighted to offer this bungalow, situated in a quiet residential cul-de-sac. This detached bungalow has well proportioned rooms, offering excellent scope for internal improvement. Comprising of entrance porch, entrance hall , lounge, kitchen, dining room, two double bedroom..."
"Offered to market with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this bay fronted three bedroomed semi-detached home in Upton, itself being one of Chester's most popular and sought after locations. Neutrally presented throughout, the home represents a great opportunity for a buyer to apply their own cosmetic stamp on ..."
"Adjoining the countryside, recently modernised and an unusually long garden - One you must see without delay!"
"A stunning home in a fantastic, tranquil position a mile from the city centre yet a short stroll to the banks of the River Dee. There are just four apartments in this lovely purpose built property and number 1 occuppies the ground floor with French doors out to a garden. With no onward chain..."
Welcome to this stylish and Beautifully presented duplex penthouse apartment where an early inspection is strongly recommended to appreciate this delightful home.
"A beautiful and spacious apartment ideally situated for the City centre, bus station and train station. An ideal opportunity to buy this first floor apartment at a fully managed retirement development where you can retain your independence (with support where required). Features include a weekly ..."
"An ideal opportunity to buy this third floor apartment at a fully managed retirement development where toy can retain your independence (with support where required). Features include a weekly service clean, on-site communal restaurant, lift access, and pull cords in each room."
"A Spacious 3 Bedroom Semi-detached House with ample off road parking, in the popular location of Upton. The property briefly comprises of Entrance Porch, Hallway, Living Room, Dining Room, Kitchen and Conservatory to the ground floor. There are 3 Bedrooms and a Family Bathroom to the first floo..."
A spacious 3 bedroom semi detached family home set in the highly desirable Westminster Park within walking distance of Chester City Centre A previous rental property this would make an ideal family home with off road parking and a large private garden to the rear Offered for sale CHAIN FREE the...
"A 3 bedroom mews family home, situated in the popular area Vicars Cross & has been upgraded by the current owners. Garage converted as 4th bedroom/office with en-suite. This spacious home would be ideal for the growing family. With a beautiful newly fitted kitchen and wonderful landscaped garden"
Jordan and Halstead are delighted to offer a welcomed edition to the property market with NO ADDITIONAL CHAIN. Tucked away in the popular Garden Quarter district of Chester City is the conveniently positioned Raymond Street. The property is ideal for a multitude of different buyers being an ideal...
"Set within an exclusive development of just four houses, River Lane Mews is arranged over three floors and offers spacious living area with bright open plan kitchen/dining room and a downstairs WC. The main bedroom with en-suite is situated on the top floor with two further bedrooms and a b..."
***NO CHAIN*** ARE YOU LOOKING FOR A MODERN HOME READY TO MOVE INTO? THEN LOOK NO FURTHER! This is a beautiful modern three bedroom detached property that is perfect for someone looking for a property to move into immediately. The property is a great size internally but also there is good sized r...
"Beresford Adams are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £240,000 for 47 Ermine Road, Chester, CH2 3PN. Anyone wishing to place an offer on this property should contact Beresford Adams Chester, before exchange of contracts. A 5 bed HMO opportunity within walki..."
"FABULOUS, TRADITIONAL SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY IN THE HEART OF UPTON - NO CHAIN*** The property makes an ideal family home, situated in a highly desirable location, within close proximity to the local schools, amenities and transport links."
"A well presented, extended two bedroom end of terrace home with the added benefit of a loft room. This lovely home is situated right in the heart of Hoole & close to all local amenities. With a modern kitchen, newly fitted bathroom and fantastic sized rooms, this property won’t be around for long"
This ideally situated semi detached bungalow which is within walking distance of shops and a bus service. One of the great features of the property is landscaped yet low maintenance rear garden which offers great privacy whilst being secure and well enclosed. Approached by an attractive block p...
The Coxley is a stunning two bedroom semi-detached property perfect for first-time buyers & investors alike located on the outskirts of Chester City Centre. up to £5000* to spend how you like....
"A large traditional 3 bedroom terraced home in the heart of ever popular Handbridge close to Chester City Centre and River Dee. The property has a walled courtyard garden to the rear and is mainly UPVC double glazed.
Hall, living room, dining room and kitchen. 3 bedrooms and bathroom. NO ONWARD C..."
"Brilliant first-time buyer property on a highly sort after estate. This 2 bedroom terrace is modern throughout and sits on the quieter outskirts of the Saighton estate. The property briefly comprises an entrance with an understairs W.C., Lounge, Kitchen/Dining room, and Two Bedrooms, both with e..."
Spacious Three Bedroom Semi-Detached in Popular Location of Upton Grange. Perfectly located for Chester City Centre and Commuters. Ideal for First Time Buyers and Investors.
Spacious two bedroom apartment with two allocated parking spaces.
"We are proud to offer this Three Bedroom Semi Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £250,000 - £270,000*"
"A fabulous home with two balconies overlooking the River Dee. Situated in the popular Saddlery Way development a short distance to the historic racecourse and city centre this beautiful apartment enjoys an open plan living area with refitted kitchen and centre island, master bedroom with balcony ..."
"Bell Developments are now offering one final individually designed property that is now available to view on the desirable Mollington Grange Development, The Cottages. Newly converted from charming original farm cottages and finished to a high standard, this home offers a rare opportunit..."
"PRIVATE DEVELOPMENT - A MUST VIEW!! This immaculate 2 bedroom property is an exciting addition to the property market and boasts a highly desirable, private location. Old Mill Court is tucked away off Mill Lane and offers impressive views of the Old Mill. The accommodation is very well proportion..."
"A Two bedroomed detached bungalow occupying a cul-de-sac position within Vicar Cross, a most popular area of Chester with its array of amenities and excellent transport links. The property features extended accommodation, with the addition of a Conservatory to the rear of the home and there have ..."
"A traditional semi-detached family home in need of some modernisation but having great potential. In the popular Upton area of Chester and ideally located for the city centre, Countess of Chester Hospital and Bache Railway Station an early viewing is recommended. The accommodation comprises Entra..."
"A recently renovated cottage situated on a no-through road and conveniently positioned for walking into the city or along the River Dee. There is a spacious through Living Room with oak flooring log burner and exposed beams, Refitted Kitchen, Refurbished Bathroom, Two Bedrooms and an enclose..."
"Located within the highly popular and family friendly Chester suburb of Saltney which is just a 5-10 minute drive from the city centre, is this well presented, three bedroom detached home. Forming part of a modern develpopment the property sits in an enviable position within a quiet cul de sac an..."
"This is one of the nicest apartments I have had the pleasure to view. The location is beautiful along the River Dee and near to the race course and Chester city centre. The accommodation is bright and spacious and offers open plan living, 2 bedrooms the main with ensuite and a main family bath..."
Individual building plots in Cheshire are constantly in demand and Wright Marshall estate agents are therefore delighted to offer for sale this rare and welcome buying opportunity. The property comprises an individual building plot adjoining Hill View Farm in Mickle Trafford. Originally an outl...
"Attention Investors, an opportunity to purchase a mid-terraced property within walking distance of Chester University and the city centre. The property has been split to accommodate five letting rooms providing an annual income of approximately £22,000 per annum. Benefiting from gas central heati..."
"WOW FACTOR - A MUST VIEW!! Every once in a while, a new property comes to market that sets new standards and this property does just that. The current vendor has left no stone unturned in the renovation of this immaculate home and a key feature of this is the landscaped rear garden with a raised ..."
"This well presented, three bedroom, detached, family home forms part of a modern development with a larger than usual, south facing, rear garden."
"Occupying a prime location within this highly desirable development of exclusive apartments, this light and spacious first floor apartment has recently undergone internal improvements and is presented to the highest standard throughout. Benefiting from gas central heating and UPVC double glazing ..."
"A fantastic recently renovated three bedroom semi-detached house with no chain! It has off road parking for two parking spaces and a detached garage. The property boasts of; a large living room, open plan kitchen/diner which has had a brand new hob and oven fitted and there is also a ..."
"Occupying a cul-de-sac position stands this modern style three bedroom semi-detached home which provides well presented accommodation throughout where an early inspection is strongly recommended. NO ONWARD CHAIN INVOLVED, CONVENIENT LOCATION."
"A very tastefully presented second floor two/three bedroom, two bathroom post millennium apartment, with superbly refitted dual aspect sitting/dining/kitchen, secure undercroft parking space, far-reaching Chester skyline views towards the cathedral and in an undeniably convenient location. <..."
"WHAT A FANTASTIC AND UNIQUE PROPERTY AVAILABLE FOR SALE WITH NO CHAIN! Situated on a popular residential road in Chester, this is a fantastic opportunity to purchase a spacious property with several options available. This property was formerly a home with a business premises included until the c..."
"A much improved 3 bed semi-detached home with off street parking and garden room. This property briefly comprises; entrance hall into the lounge with bay window, this leads into the spacious kitchen and modern bathroom. To the first floor, a large master bedroom, additional double bedroom and a s..."
"A first-time buyer's dream! Located in the increasingly popular area of Newtown, this beautifully presented terraced property offers a ready to move into finish, with tasteful fittings, attractive décor and well-proportioned rooms sitting central to all that's on offer. With Chester ..."
A beautifully presented 2 bedroom home with no onward chain and off street parking in the heart of Handbridge within a moments’ walk to the City Centre and The Meadows. This property briefly comprises; entrance hall leading into the bright and spacious lounge with is open plan to the ...
"*** Every Day Is A School Day *** This wonderful characterful property is located in the sought after village of Backford, being perfectly located for people wanting village life with the City on your doorstep. Backford is within a short drive of Chester itself along with the various business ..."
This two bed duplex apartment is ideally situated in a superb location within walking distance of Chester train station and the city centre.
* A BEAUTIFULLY APPOINTED 2 BEDROOM MID TERRACED HOUSE WHICH HAS BENEFITTED FROM A RECENT PROGRAMME OF REFURBISHMENT TO INCLUDE A DELIGHTUL SECLUDED PATIO/GARDEN TO REAR WITH GARDEN SUN ROOM AND STOREROOM * LOCATED IN A VERY CONVENIENT POSITION ABOUT 1 MILE FROM THE CITY CENTRE. It affords en...
"Located within a quiet cul de sac just a 5-10 minute drive from the city centre, this beautifully presented, three bedroom, semi detached home has recently undergone a programme of refurbishment and modernisation throughout. Available for immediate occupation with the benefit of no onward chain."
"CORNER PLOT & EXTENDED!! Are you looking for a generous 3 bedroom semi-detached home with an extensive corner plot? If so, then look no further. This neutrally decorated home boasts unrivalled privacy and a generous plot with gated access and is now ready for its next proud owner to call it home...."
"FOR SALE BY MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION Situated at the head of the cul-de-sac, with-in the greatly sought-after district of Hoole, this three bedroom semi-detached property is a perfect family home, with-in easy reach of local shops and schools. Having gas central heating and double glazing it..."
"AN EXCITING ADDITION TO THE PROPERTY MARKET - A MUST VIEW! Take a look at this impressive, extended family home tucked away in a popular residential spot, with gorgeous greenbelt field views to the rear. The location of this home is superb having well regarded schools nearby, close access to mot..."
"A beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached property located in the sought-after area of Chester, Merseyside, UK. As you enter the property, you will be greeted by a warm and inviting hallway that leads to the main living areas. The spacious living room is bright and airy, perfect for ..."
Situated in a superb location close to the Old Dee Bridge and the River Dee this Grade II listed duplex style townhouse which is ideal for those wanting City living but in a more residential setting. The property would be ready to move into and would make an a great home with its unique central ...
"This two bedroom mid-terraced property is ready for you to make it your own! Offered with NO CHAIN this property is located in a quiet close in Newton, Chester, with a world of potential. The property is in need of modernisation throughout. Upon arriving at the property, you will be greeted by ..."
"Situated within walking distance of the City with potential for off road parking this three story, three double bedroom bay fronted terraced home which is in a great position opposite a park whilst being a stone's throw away from the City centre. This deceptively spacious home offers an entrance..."
Ideal property for First Time Buyers and Investors. Located in the desirable Saighton area of Chester. Allocated parking spaces and an enclosed rear garden.
"A fantastic two bedroom mid- terraced property in the popular of Saighton, which benefits with two parking spaces and access to the garden via a side alley to the property. This modern property boasts of a large living area, kitchen with intergrated appliances and dining area with lar..."
"PDA Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market this extended three-bedroom house with a separate one-bedroom annex. An excellent opportunity for the growing family to acquire this well-proportioned home occupying a sought-after location within Blacon, Chester. The property is available wi..."
"3 BEDROOM home in CHESTER available to buy through SHARED OWNERSHIP from £237,750 for a 75% share, complete with MODERN BATHROOM and KITCHEN (with integrated oven and hob) and a turfed REAR GARDEN. Chester Business Park only a two minute walk away."
"Situated in the popular area of Upton, a well-presented 3 bedroom mid-terraced house for sale. Featuring off-street parking and a fully enclosed garden"
"ATTENTION INVESTORS - A must see property, set in the popular Garden Village area of Chester. The CH1 postcode is within walking distance of Chester City Centre and Sealand Road."
Very sought after TWO BEDROOMED Retirement property for the OVER 60'S in this development in the heart of CHESTER close to GROSVENOR PARK and the RIVER DEE. Fourth floor with great south westerly views. MCCARTHY STONE DEVELOPMENT with ROOF TOP TERRACE.
A two bedroom mews cottage set on Bradford Street in the heart of Handbridge within a short walk of the River Dee and City Centre. The property has parking to the front and a paved courtyard and conservatory to the side. UPVC double glazed. NO ONWARD CHAIN. Internal viewing a must.
"A larger than average second floor three bedroom, two bathroom post millennium apartment, with secure undercroft parking space, existing rental income stream, and an extremely convenient location within walking distance of the Chester branch of the Shropshire union canal, the railway station and ..."
"A 3 bed end of terraced home with newly renovated kitchen/diner also benefits a garage, off street parking and no onward chain. This property briefly comprises; entrance hall leading into a large lounge with double doors onto the garden. There is a separate spacious modernised kitchen with breakf..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase this period townhouse situated in the heart of Handbridge, overlooking Edgar Fields Park and within walking distance of the scenic River Dee."
"This spacious end terraced home which stands on a great corner plot with gardens to both the front, side and rear which offers a great opportunity to further extend subject to any necessary planning/building consents. Ideally located within this popular Village opposite a large green open space ..."
"Three bedroomed semi tucked away in a cul de sac spot in the ever popular village of Saughall! There is plenty to admire with this property, and we imagine it will suit most reading this description, whether that be down to its large rear garden and driveway for multiple vehicles, or internally ..."
"Attention: First Time Buyers & Investors! An ideally located home for a short walk in to the City of Chester. A spacious family home with three bedrooms and family bathroom, enclosed rear garden with both lawned and flagged patio space. Driveway parking and car port."
"A superb retirement apartment situated on the very end of the City Centre, forming part of an exclusive gated development, with excellent spacious living space that is larger than would be be expected. It comprises; large reception hall, large living room, fitted integrated kitchen, master bedroo..."
"Situated in the sought-after Boughton district of Chester, and located on a quiet no through road, this spacious bay fronted terraced property offers excellent living space, suitable for a first time buyer or investment buyer. With-in a reasonable walk from the City Centre, it has gas central hea..."
"***CHECK OUT OUR ONLINE VIRTUAL TOUR***
A beautifully appointed very spacious 2 bedroom 2 bathroom first floor apartment in the heart of Chester's city centre. The apartment has been improved recently by the current owners and offers a lovely large and very bright living/dining and kitchen area. ..."
"GET A REAL FEEL FOR THE PLACE AND CHECK OUT OUR INTERACTIVE TOUR! What an ideal home for any young couple or family, boasting a generous size plot with a private garden and cul de sac location. This home has a tastefully finished interior which has been recently re-decorated throughout, with new ..."
"A spacious top floor apartment enjoying extensive views over the city roof tops. Having the benfit of the use of a roof terrce the accommodation comprises Entrance Hall, Living Room, Kitchen, Main Bedroom with Fitted Wardrobes and Ensuite, Second Bedroom with Fitted Wardrobes and a Bathroom. "
"AVAILABLE FOR SALE WITH NO CHAIN - A MUST VIEW! Located in a highly regarded residential area in Boughton, Chester, this deceptively spacious bungalow is simply a must view. Excellent amenities are on your doorstep including a range of local shops, close access to motorway links, frequent bus rou..."
A four bedroom mid terrace home located within a popular residential area offering ready to move in accommodation set across three floors. 
"A TWO BEDROOM CORNER APARTMENT on the FOURTH FLOOR of this MCCARTHY STONE RETIREMENT LIVING DEVELOPMENT for the OVER 60'S, situated within the walls of CHESTER, so ideally located for Chester amenities, parks and river."
"A well-presented 2 bed mid terrace home with rear garage and parking space conveniently located close to the City Centre. With two spacious double bedrooms, a living/dining area and a lovely garden, it's ideal for a professional individual/couple or a small family looking to live in the popular ..."
** OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN ** In a cul de sac location with similar residential properties lies this attractive three bed semi detached home. The property is in a convenient location to the historical city of Chester and within reach of Manchester and Liverpool. M...
"This loft style top floor apartment offers privacy with a great location within walking distance of the city and lying close to the Shropshire Union canal. Sold with no chain in very good condition with a neutral finish flooded with natural light with ""Velux"" windows throughout. Const..."
"Located at the top of Westminster road, this charming two bedroom terraced home has been recently renovated to a high standard from top to bottom. It provides a modern way of living with excellent finishing touches throughout. There is a also parking access to the rear of the property. Call now t..."
"Located within a quiet cul-de-sac in the highly desirable village of Saughall, is this two bedroom, end townhouse which benefits from gas central heating, UPVC double glazing and in brief comprises an entrance hall with cloakroom WC off, a fitted kitchen, a living room and a first floor landing w..."
"2 double bedroom mature mid terrace home. Ideal first time buyer or investor property. Very popular location. Courtyard to rear. No road parking. UPVC double glazed. Internal viewing advised. Porch, lounge/dining room and kitchen. 2 bedrooms and bathroom."
"A spacious 3 bed Victorian Terraced home or currently used as a 4 bed HMO within walking distance from the city centre with no onward chain. This property briefly comprises; entrance hall with 2 separate reception rooms, the first is currently used as a bedroom, the other is a lounge with a separ..."
"* WITHIN THE CITY WALLS * SECURE PARKING SPACE * IDEAL FOR A HOME OWNER OR INVESTOR * A beautifully presented one/two bedroom apartment forming part of a 'Landmark Development' within the city walls of Chester. The accommodation briefly comprises: entrance hall with built-in cylinder cupboard, ..."
A proven buy-to-let property or a fantastic first-time-buy! This two bedroom terraced house sits on the edge of Chester City Centre making it perfect for those working in the city. There is also a short canal walk that will take you straight to the train station! The property briefly comprises ...
"A second floor two-bedroom post-millennium retirement apartment forming part of a highly regarded, high specification complex within walking distance of the Chester city centre. Developed by McCarthy and Stone in 2009, Forest Court is a well-respected retirement complex specifically fo..."
"A 19th-century two bedroom end of terrace house, with an element of future modernisation potential, and an undeniably sought-after location within walking distance of the Groves, Chester Meadows, and the Chester city centre. A perennially popular location, Handbridge is replete with va..."
"A well-proportioned three-bedroom, semi-detached house, with superb South East facing rear garden, two driveways, and garage/workshop, set on a larger than average corner plot. This property is conveniently located in South West Chester in a popular, established community within walking distance ..."
An immaculately-presented three-bedroom semi-detached house situated in this popular suburb with warm community spirit! A minutes´ walk to schools and close to excellent amenities.
"3 BEDROOM home in CHESTER available to buy through SHARED OWNERSHIP from £212,250 for a 75% share, complete with MODERN BATHROOM and KITCHEN (with integrated oven and hob) and a turfed REAR GARDEN. Chester Business Park only a two minute walk away."
"Enjoying a pleasant cul-de-sac setting and benefiting from an excellent range of local amenities nearby, this 2-bedroom semi-detached house offers a fantastic opportunity for a first time buyer or an excellent investment opportunity. "
"3 BEDROOM home in CHESTER available to buy through SHARED OWNERSHIP from £210,375 for a 75% share, complete with MODERN BATHROOM and KITCHEN (with integrated oven and hob) and a turfed REAR GARDEN. Chester Business Park only a two minute walk away."
"A 3 bed semi-detached home located in a quiet cul-de-sac on a corner plot which benefits a loft room and rear extension with 2 bathrooms, conservatory with large garden and off street parking. This property briefly comprises; entrance porch into a hall and large recently decorated lounge. T..."
Offered with no onward chain is this modern apartment near to the heart of the City Centre. The accommodation boasts many attractive features including its distinctive window design and exposed ironworks and beams. the property is situated in a gated development bordering the Shropshire unio...
This three bedroom end terrace with large front and rear gardens in the popular residential area of Upton with many amenities close by including Primary and Secondary schools.
"* LOCATED ALONG CITY ROAD * LARGER THAN AVERAGE TWO-BEDROOM APARTMENT (APPROX 957 SQ FT /89 SQ M) WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE OF THE RAILWAY STATION, CANAL AND CITY CENTRE. A well-appointed two-bedroom first-floor apartment forming part of a small development conveniently situated along City Road. T..."
THIS SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM PROPERTY IS IDEAL FOR A FIRST TIME BUYER OR SOMEONE LOOKING FOR A FAMILY HOME. THE PROPERTY CAN BE YOURS SOONER RATHER THAN LATER AS IT IS BEING SOLD WITH NO CHAIN! The property benefits from a good size hallway leading to the lounge with doors opening onto the open pl...
"CHAIN FREE! This three bedroom Victorian terraced home is situated in the ever popular and flourishing suburb of Boughton, Chester. The property is currently being used as a successful houseshare, however could very easily be restored to its former glory and make a wonderful home again. In brief ..."
"This three bedroom mid-terrace house is situated on Cheyney Road within close proximity to Chester City Centre. The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, living room, kitchen, ground floor bathroom, three first floor bedrooms and loft space with an enclosed yard to the rear."
"AN ATTRACTIVE DETACHED BUNGALOW SAT ON A CORNER PLOT WITH GORGEOUS FIELD VIEWS! Available for sale with no on-going chain, this deceptively spacious three bedroom detached bungalow is a rare find. Bungalows are few and far between & so an early viewing on this one is highly recommended. Excellent..."
This superb investment property which is being sold as a going concern fully let to university students until July 2023 currently achieving £1350 which will be increasing to approximately £1500 pcm. The property which has been well improved and maintained by the current owner and carri...
A fantastic apartment in Chester City Centre with secure underground parking and easy access to the train station. This property has been successfully rented out for the past 18 years but could make a great residence for those needing to be in Chester. The property briefly comprises an Entrance ...
"A two bedroom semi-detached house which has been extended to the back and side of the property. The accommodation briefly comprises: Open plan living/dining room which leads into fitted kitchen with breakfast bar, downstairs single bedroom, utility, downstairs WC. To the first floor is a landing ..."
"A first floor two bedroom, two bathroom post-millennium apartment with single allocated parking space, and a sought-after conservation area location within the city walls of Chester. Constructed in 2003/2004, this highly regarded and stylish development has a particularly appealing pos..."
"Offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN, Swetenhams are delighted to bring to the market this superb two bedroom ground floor apartment with direct access to communal gardens. Situated in the popular village of Hoole conveniently located within walking distance of Chester City Centre."
"A well presented end terrace property in a quiet and convenient location within the popular Northgate Village which is a short stroll to the city centre. The property has open plan living, two bedrooms, modern shower room and benefits from generous outside space including driveway parking and garage"
"These properties are certainly flying off the shelves, so we would suggest a hasty approach with this fantastic terraced home! Enjoying a great position within the sought-after area of Newton, local amenities and great schooling for both primary and secondary are just a short walk away, whilst th..."
"This three bedroom mid-terraced home is located in the Garden Quarter Ward, within walking distance of Chester City Centre and is offered with three bedrooms, rear patio and on street parking with no permit required."
This spacious modernised terraced home which is ideally situated within walking distance of the City centre whilst benefitting from being within a residents parking scheme. This terraced home would make an ideal first time home or ready made buy to let investment. The accommodation is really we...
"**No Onward Chain** situated in a sought after residential area of Hoole. This three bedroom home benefits from a lounge, fitted kitchen, conservatory, refitted shower room and a en-suite to bedroom one. The house itself also benefits from a driveway for several vehicles, detached tandem garage ..."
Arable and grazing land extending to about 20.03 acres.
A 3 bed terraced house with open plan kitchen/diner and off-street parking on a quiet cul-de-sac by the Shropshire Union Canal and within walking distance to the city centre. The property is to be sold with tenants situ until August 2023. This property is offered with no onward chain and briefly ...
"Guide Price £200,000 For sale by conditional online auction, registration is now open. A Kanazawa machiya built in the Meiji era (1902) that used to be a confectionery before being turned into a guest house in recent years. This machiya is within walking distance to the Higashi Chaya..."
Superbly presented top floor apartment with stunning views of the city skyline situated in one of Chester's most prestigious and sought after streets. The property is a one bedroom apartment with open plan living and has two secure parking spots with communal grounds & a stroll from the city centre
"A well-presented 2 bed semi-detached home with kitchen/diner and off street parking located on a quiet cul-de-sac. This property briefly comprises; entrance hall leading into the spacious lounge. There is a separate kitchen/diner looking out over the large garden. To the first floor, two double b..."
"A fabulous 2-bed apartment situated next to Chester racecourse, only a short walk from the city centre, with an open plan living area, Juliet balconies to the lounge and master bedroom overlooking the racecourse and the River Dee respectively, and a designated car parking space."
"Enjoying views across Water Tower Gardens and towards the City Walls is this modern ground floor apartment situated within walking distance of the city centre and the racecourse. Enjoying secure allocated parking the accommodation comprises Entrance Hall, Living Room, Kitchen, Two Bedrooms, Ensui..."
"This beautiful first floor apartment is located at the prestigious Wharton Court development, Hoole Lane, in Chester City Centre. Well-presented modern two-bedroom first floor apartment located within walking distance of Chester city centre & Chester railway station. With hard wood floor..."
More Plots Available. NO CHAIN: A stunning park home offering contemporary living throughout and finished to high standards. Conveniently located for a variety of local amenities and main road networks. Residential park homes are an increasingly popular option for many over 50's looking to downsi...
"ATTENTION INVESTORS: This 19th century mid terraced home is currently utilised as a three room HMO generating a potential income of £15,000 per annum. Ideally situated the property is within easy access of the Garden Quarter, The Greyhound Retail Park, the hospital and of course Chester city centre."
"A two bedroom double fronted 19th century end of terrace house which is perfectly suited to first time buyers and investors. The property comprises an entrance hall leading to two reception rooms, a downstairs bathroom, cellar, good sized kitchen leading to a small courtyard to the rear and small..."
"Attention! Attention! Come and have a look at this beautifully stylish home, with the the extra feature of a separate annex that is fully insulated with its own stylish shower room. Truly a property not too be missed, with no stone left unturned, this modern designed property has modern des..."
"Look no further do we have a treat for you. On the market with no onward chain a fabulous three bedroom home, naturally bright throughout, open plan kitchen diner, three bedrooms , enclosed rear garden and garage. Situated in a much sought after location, close to local amenities, close to ..."
ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS Purplebricks are delighted to market this fantastic 3 bedroom mid terrace. Located in the ever popular area of Blacon this property is certain to attract a great deal of interest. The current owners have made some impressive upgrades to the property including a recent...
"A 19th-century two bedroom end of terrace house, with open plan sitting/dining room, and a sought after as well as extremely convenient residents’ permit parking location within easy reach of Hoole and Chester city centres. A classic example of this period, the location of this a..."
"NO CHAIN: Set close to local amenities, Chester canal and with easy access to the City Centre; this two-bedroom character terrace home features a dining kitchen, separate utility and pleasant, low-maintenance courtyard garden. Viewing Essential."
A rare opportunity to acquire a two-bedroom duplex apartment featuring an open-plan living suite with Juliet balcony enjoying views towards the Shropshire Union Canal at Chester and having a larger allocated space in the complex parking garage.
NO CHAIN: Wow! A contemporary first floor apartment finished to an exceptional standard AND located within the City Walls. With excellent amenities very nearby!
"*SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE *CUL-DE-SAC POSITION * VIEWS OVER FARMLAND TO SIDE . A three-bedroom semi-detached house occupying a cul-de-sac position just off Saxon Way in Blacon. The accommodation, which would benefit from some updating and modernsation, briefly comprises: entrance hall, living room, di..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN: Set in a riverside complex near Chester's Racecourse; this two double-bedroom apartment on the 2nd floor, is spacious and features high-quality wooden floors throughout, fully fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, and allocated parking."
A three bedroom semi-detached property located in a popular residential area on the fringe of farmland.
Swetenhams are delighted to present this two bedroom mid terrace property located in the desirable suburbs of Boughton. The property benefits from an upstairs bathroom and is being sold with no onward chain. Viewing this property is a must!
A spacious and well appointed two bedroom mid terraced home offering ready to move in accommodation and offering no onward chain.
"A ground floor two bedroom, two bathroom, post-millennium apartment, with single allocated parking space, aspects over a bowling green towards the 14th century water tower, and a sought-after location within walking distance of the racecourse and Chester city centre. Occupying a select..."
"The Willerby Mapleton offers the perfect staycation for those that love a bit of technology in their getaway, the Mapleton boasts a media wall with atmospheric mood lighting. The large open plan lounge is ideal for those who want to take in the latest blockbuster during their luxurious family hol..."
"STOP WHAT YOU ARE DOING AND HAVE A LOOK AT THIS PROPERTY!!!!! Fully renovated throughout, not a stone has been left unturned, brand new windows, new boiler, new fully fitted modern stylish kitchen, modern bathroom, new carpets and flooring throughout. If you are looking for a house to literall..."
"A 3 bed semi-detached home with off street parking and impressive field views to the rear. This property briefly comprises; hallway leading into the lounge with bay window, a separate kitchen with access to a conservatory. A downstairs bathroom. To the first floor, two double bedrooms, a spacious..."
"A unique Ground and 1st floor duplex apartment in the city centre which is chain free and perect for a first time buyer or investor. This property briefly comprises; large entrance hall with built in storage and WC. Spacious open plan Living, Dining and Kitchen on the ground floor. To the first f..."
"A well-presented 3 bed semi-detached home with no onward chain, off street parking and beautiful wrap around garden. This property briefly comprises; entrance hall leading into the spacious lounge with fireplace. There is a separate kitchen which has access to storage and leads to the bathroom. T..."
"Situated in one of Chester's most prestigious addresses, this ground floor studio apartment is set within a Grade II listed townhouse located within the historic City Walls, and has the benefit of use of beautifully presented communal gardens as well as two allocated parking spaces located to the..."
" IDEAL FOR INVESTORS - Currently let at £800 pcm. A lovely modern three bedroom townhouse with easily maintained gardens front and rear. Briefly comprising of hallway, lounge, dining room and kitchen to the ground floor and the three bedrooms and family bathroom to the first floor. The prop..."
A second floor two bedroom apartment set within a desirable location with canal views from bedroom and allocated parking. 
"A spacious, newly refurbished, ground floor apartment in the highly sought-after retirement complex of Forest Court in the heart of Chester. This is a managed development for the over 60s offering an array of social events and community activities. There are regular coffee mornings, theatre ..."
"A 19th-century two-bedroom mid-terrace house, with an element of modernisation potential, and an extremely convenient residence permit parking conservation area location within walking distance of the city centre and railway station. Other popular location, Sibill Street is within walk..."
"A 19th-century two-bedroom mid-terraced house with walled rear yard, inherent potential, and an extremely convenient residence permit parking conservation area location within walking distance of the railway station and Chester city centre. Situated in an enviable location this propert..."
"A well-proportioned second floor one bedroom apartment, with west facing balcony, single allocated parking space, share in the freehold title, and a superb conservation area location within a stylish development adjacent to Grosvenor Park, and a short walk from the Chester city centre. "
"Located in a highly popular area of Saltney, just a short distance from Chester city centre, having the convenience of many amenities close at hand. This three bedroom, semidetached property has the benefit of gas central heating and is located within a quiet cul-de-sac. In brief it comprises an ..."
"A superb, top floor one bedroom apartment set at the rear of a secure gated courtyard within the prestigous Heritage Court just off Lower Bridge in the heart of the City Centre. Superbly appointed throughout and with no onward chain.
Hall, very large bedroom, open plan kitchen/lounge/diner and ba..."
"Offered with no onward chain is this second floor apartment in a popular development has the benefit of an allocated parking space. In brief the accommodation comprises: communal entrance hall with stairs rising to all floors, lounge with French doors opening onto Juliet balcony, kitchen with in..."
"A modern family home situated in this quiet cul-de-sac of similar properties in the popular Blacon area of Chester. Ideally suited to first time buyers and investors the property comprises Entrance Hall, Cloakroom/WC, Spacious Living Room, Dining Kitchen, Three Bedrooms and Bathroom. There are ga..."
Sass & Co Independent Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this well-appointed and ready to move into second floor apartment which has recently been re-decorated throughout along with newly laid flooring. This modern and highly desirable development is conveniently situated with...
ATTENTION INVESTORS: CURRENTLY TENANTED AND PROVIDING A READY MADE INCOME - No Chain: A spacious and well presented top floor apartment situated in a highly desirable development with an allocated parking space and a minutes walk to the City Centre and excellent amenities. Viewing essential. 
"Offered to market with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this spacious three bedroomed mid terraced property located in Newtown, positioned on the fringe of Chester city Centre, enjoying easy access to the wealth of amenities the city has to offer and excellent transport links including the main Chester railway..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN: Set on the banks of the River Dee near Chester Racecourse; this two double-bedroom, two-bathroom corner apartment features extensive river views and an allocated space within this modern waterside complex's parking garage."
"A first floor two bedroom, two bathroom post millennium apartment with allocated parking space, city walls aspect to the rear, existing rental income stream, and a very popular conservation area location within walking distance of the racecourse and city centre. Constructed in the imme..."
"** NO CHAIN ** An immaculately presented luxury upper floor apartment with 2 double bedrooms, an allocated car parking space, and long-reaching views over the Cheshire countryside."
Situated on the outskirts of the city in this quiet backwater which benefits from being within a residents parking scheme. This highly popular location which is ideal for both investors or first time buyers being close to the railway station and the city centre. The accommodation is neutrally p...
"* GROUND FLOOR FLAT * DESIRABLE DEVELOPMENT ADJACENT TO THE HISTORIC UPTON WINDMILL. A beautifully presented one bedroom ground floor flat located in the desirable suburb of Upton. The accommodation briefly comprises: open porch, entrance hall, fitted kitchen with integrated cooking appliances an..."
"ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS AND INVESTORS! Detached two bedroom bungalow with private gardens and gates that leads to the driveway for off road parking, this bungalow has the potential to make a lovely home."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN A stylish one bedroom apartment, high specification, and a superb gated courtyard conservation area location within the city walls of Chester. Created and converted in the post-millenium period with black and white timbered frontage, Heritage Court was origin..."
"A first floor two bedroom, two bathroom, post millennium apartment, with useful allocated parking space, and an ever popular landmark development location within walking distance of the railway station and Chester city centre. Constructed by Morris Homes in the Post Millennium period, ..."
"A 3 bed end of terrace home with off-street parking and the property is no chain! This property briefly comprises; spacious entrance hall leading into the open plan lounge, dining room and seperate kitchen. To the first floor, two double bedrooms, a single bedroom and a wet room. Externally, the ..."
"Offered for sale with no chain & viewings available from the 15th March, this well presented 2 double bedroom apartment set in a popular residential location in a cul-de-sac position & is ideal for investors or first time buyers. With modern interior and 2 parking spaces, book your viewing 24/7"
"A 2/3 bed End of Terrace with off-street parking and no onward chain within walking distance to amenities, local supermarket and short bus ride to the city centre. This property briefly comprises; entrance porch into a spacious hallway with built in storage. Large living room and a separate kitch..."
"No Chain: Situated in a prime location within the historic city of Chester, this first floor apartment offers a fantastic opportunity if you are looking for your first home, a city centre retreat or a great investment. All furniture, TV etc is included for free if wanted."
" ****INVESTOR / LANDLORD PURCHASE**** CLS Estates are pleased to offer this first floor modern two double bedroom apartment located off City road, within a five minute walk to both the train station and the City Centre. Property comprises, open plan lounge, dining and Kitchen with applianc..."
"Forming part of the 'Waters Edge' development located alongside the Shropshire Union canal situated a short walk from the Chester city centre is this modern, well proportioned, two bedroom second floor apartment."
" CLS Estates are pleased to offer this second floor modern two double bedroom apartment located off City road close to both the train station and City Centre. Property comprises, open plan Lounge with access to the rear baclony, dining and Kitchen, two good size double bedrooms, en-suite to m..."
"This two bedroom terraced house is located in a popular and convenient location within walking distance of Chester city centre. Comprising, front living room, rear dining room, kitchen with door leading out to a rear courtyard, upstairs one good size double bedroom, one single bedroom and bath..."
"A well-presented ground floor two-bedroom, two bathroom late 1990s apartment, with single allocated parking space, generous visitors parking spaces, and a very popular as well as extremely convenient location within easy reach of the railway station, city centre, and the thriving heart of Hoole.<..."
"This 3 bedroom semi detached, located on a quiet residential street in Blacon, needs some modernisation, but will be the perfect starter family home or an ideal investment. With front and rear gardens and ample off road parking."
"This charming first-floor flat is located in the heart of Chester, making it a perfect place to call home. Inside, you'll find a spacious and light-filled living room, two bedrooms, a fully equipped kitchen, and a  bathroom.. Its prime location provides easy access to local shops, res..."
"A three bedroom mid terraced property situated in a convenient location, having the benefit of spacious accommodation including a bathroom and separate w.c., off road parking and a south westerly rear garden."
"Retirement apartment situated in the heart of Chester, this over 55's development on Abbots Wood offers a wide array of communal facilities including a restaurant, hairdressers and library as well as communal lounge spaces which hosts regular activities for residents. The apartment itsel..."
"The Oakwood Lodge oozes luxury living and opulence throughout. With a airy open plan lounge, generous sized bedrooms and a full sized bath as well as a large decking area you can enjoy holidays year on year in luxury. Fir Trees holiday park is open March 1st 2023 – January 31st 2..."
"Located approximately two and a half miles from Chester in the popular suburb of Saltney. This two double bedroom, semi-detached home benefits from gas central heating, UPVC double glazing and comprises an entrance hall, living room, a through kitchen/diner, landing two bedrooms, a shower room an..."
"An ideal opportunity to acquire a ready made buy to let investment SOLD with current tenant on a long term contract, generating a substantial monthly return on investment"
"A fantastic canal-side third floor apartment in one of Chester's premier developments. Benefitting from balcony views across the Clwydian mountain range with beautiful evening sunsets, the loction offers amenities on nearby Garden Lane, as well as the city centre and Greyhound Retail Park. Cheste..."
"Two bedroomed first floor apartment with a private balcony and its own allocated car parking space, is located within a popular City development. Walls Avenue lies a short walk away from many favourable amenities and attractions which the historic city of Chester has to offer."
A 3 bed semi-detached home with off-street parking and no onward chain. This property briefly comprises; spacious entrance hall leading into the open plan lounge and dining room which is dual aspect providing lots of light. A separate kitchen with built in storage and enough room for a dining tab...
*** YOU MUST BE AN INVESTOR BUYER TO ENQUIRE ABOUT THIS PROPERTY - NOT AVAILABLE TO FIRST TIME BUYERS *** Landlord to Landlord Service - GetAnOffer are looking for LANDLORDS to purchase this home which is currently RENTED producing an income. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property fo...
"* NO CHAIN* Large two bedroom, two bathroom apartment with an allocated parking space in the secure underground car park. Great Investment purchase!"
****Investment Opportunity**** This two bedroom First Floor Flat is located in the heart of Hoole close to the local amenities to include shops and the railway station. With easy access to the City Centre and motorway network this provides a great first time buyers home or investment property. ...
"3 BEDROOM home in CHESTER available to buy through SHARED OWNERSHIP from £158,500 for a 50% share, complete with MODERN BATHROOM and KITCHEN (with integrated oven and hob) and a turfed REAR GARDEN. Chester Business Park only a two minute walk away."
"PDA Estate Agents are pleased to welcome to the market this generous end terraced property in the popular area of Blacon, Chester. Offered with no onward chain this spacious property must be viewed to truly be appreciated. In brief the property comprises of; entrance porch, spacious lounge, kitc..."
"An early 1990s two bedroom semi-detached house, with south east facing rear garden, useful driveway, and a popular end of cul-de-sac location to the south west of Chester. Situated just off Circular Drive and Lache Lane, the location of this property is ideal for access to the Chester ..."
"A LARGER THAN AVERAGE second floor one bedroom apartment with a single ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE within a secure basement, a late Victorian facade, and an extremely convenient location within WALKING DISTANCE OF THE RAILWAY STATION and city centre."
"Investment opportunity for landlords. This property is currently let at £750 pcm. PDA Estate Agents are delighted to offer this three bedroom house with open plan living room/ dining room, fitted kitchen and a modern shower room. The property benefits from a good sized rear garden with outb..."
A spacious 2 bed ground floor apartment with communal gardens in a desirable location in Vicars Cross with no onward chain. This property briefly comprises; entrance hall with built in storage. Large lounge with fireplace looking over the beautiful gardens. A separate kitchen accessed from the lo...
"Offered to market with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this one bedroomed mid terraced Bungalow, pleasantly situated in a cul-de-sac location. Cedar Mews is situated off Saughall Road on the outskirts of Chester City Centre and the property enjoys excellent transport links and there is local shopping faciliti..."
"FOR SALE BY MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION. Situated close to the City Centre and the railway station, this mid terraced property is a perfect investment property or first time buyer opportunity, offering spacious accommodation in a particularly convenient location. With gas central heating and do..."
"A third floor two bedroom late 1990s apartment with useful allocated parking space, far reaching skyline views to the north and south, generous communal visitors’ parking spaces, current rental income stream, and an extremely popular as well as convenient location within a mile of the Chest..."
Arable land extending to about 15.6 acres.
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY!!!!Are you looking to invest in property , then this is the property for you, currently selling with tenant in sit currently paying £800 pcm, looking to remain long term if possible. Property itself is a good family home. with three good bedrooms and private rear gard..."
"A 2 bed beautifully renovated apartment on the ground floor with open plan living and an allocated parking space. This property benefits; spacious hall with a built in storage, large open plan living/dining/kitchen with a Juliette balcony looking out to the communal gardens. 2 double bedroom and ..."
"Forming part of a well-known retirement complex available for prospective purchasers of 55 years and above. This well-proportioned, two bedroom, first floor apartment sits in an enviable position within easy walking distance of Chester city centre and enjoying lovely views over the rooftops of c..."
"* TOP FLOOR APARTMENT WITH VIEWS ACROSS CHESTER SKYLINE & TOWARDS BICKERTON HILLS. A one bedroom fifth floor apartment forming part of a landmark development along City Road, conveniently situated within walking distance of the city centre, the Shropshire Union Canal and Chester railway station...."
"Investment opportunity for landlords. This property is currently let , PDA Estate Agents are delighted to offer this mid terraced three bedroom house for sale. Situated on Stratford Road in Blacon this home benefits from spacious accommodation and three good sized bedrooms. The property comprises..."
"3 BEDROOM home in CHESTER available to buy through SHARED OWNERSHIP from £141,500 for a 50% share, complete with MODERN BATHROOM and KITCHEN (with integrated oven and hob) and a turfed REAR GARDEN. Chester Business Park only a two minute walk away."
"3 BEDROOM home in CHESTER available to buy through SHARED OWNERSHIP from £140,250 for a 50% share, complete with MODERN BATHROOM and KITCHEN (with integrated oven and hob) and a turfed REAR GARDEN. Chester Business Park only a two minute walk away."
"A 2 bed ground floor maisonette located just off Hough Green, just opposite the entrance to Westminster Park within walking distance of the city centre. This property briefly comprises; entrance hall leading to the spacious main lounge. A separate kitchen and a wet room. There is a double ..."
"A two bedroom mid-terrace house, with pebbled front section, larger than average south facing lawned and deck to rear garden, and a very popular location just over a mile from the Chester city centre. THIS PROPERTY IS FOR SALE BY THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION, PLEASE SEE INFORMATION BELOW "
CLS Estates are pleased to offer this one double bedroom duplex apartment situated on the edge of Chester City Centre in Boughton. It is within easy walking distance of the historic city of Chester and also has its own local amenities. The main motorway network is easily accessed providing co...
"ATTENTION INVESTORS! GENERATE INSTANT INCOME ON THE BEAUTIFUL ONE BEDROOM APARTMENT. Spacious one bedroom apartment available, located in the heart of Chester."
"2 bedroom third floor apartment within walking distance to the city centre with no onward chain. Located just a short distance from Chester city centre. The property is within walking distance of the railway station, bus station, shops, bars, restaurants, racecourse, Grosvenor Park an..."
"ATTENTION first time buyers, this immaculately presented top floor apartment is offered with stunning views over Chester Racecourse from the balcony and NO ONWARD CHAIN. A one bedroom apartment with an allocated parking space is an ideal opportunity for first time purchasers or investors."
A rare opportunity! A one bedroom apartment in this amazing suburb with an open outlook.
"**AVAILABLE AGAIN THROUGH NO FAULT OF IT'S OWN** AVAILABLE FOR SALE WITH NO CHAIN - A MUST VIEW! Take a look at this deceptively spacious two bedroom home which is ready whenever you are! These properties are perfect for first time buyers, downsizers or investors as they can achieve around £750/8..."
"Attention first time buyers and investors, set within walking distance of the Historic City of Chester in a popular residential area. This one bedroom ground floor apartment has been completely renovated offering a modern and contemporary finish."
"**Being sold with a sitting tenant until November 2023 - paying £700pcm** A spacious 2 bed maisonette over 2 floors with a terrace to the rear as well as private parking and no onward chain, it also has recent upgrades with new Firestone roof and new boiler. It is positioned abov..."
"Well-presented and modern one-bedroom apartment in the ever-popular CH3 area. Perfect for a FTB or even an investor looking to add to their portfolio. Finished throughout to a good standard you could move in and drop your bags.  The property offers up a bright entrance hallway, a spaci..."
"A one-bedroom third-floor apartment, with single allocated parking space, courtyard aspect, and an extremely convenient landmark development location within walking distance of the railway station and Chester city centre. An ideal purchase for investors, this well-proportioned apartmen..."
"3 BEDROOM home in CHESTER available to buy through SHARED OWNERSHIP from £126,800 for a 40% share, complete with MODERN BATHROOM and KITCHEN (with integrated oven and hob) and a turfed REAR GARDEN. Chester Business Park only a two minute walk away."
"Spacious one bedroom 1st floor apartment located in the Shot Tower development off City Road. Accommodation is offered furnished and comprises, entrance hallway, open plan living area with table/chairs included, fitted kitchen including washing machine, double bedroom with bed/fitted wardrobe and..."
"NO CHAIN - A fantastic first-time buy or investment opportunity. This 3 Bedroom first-floor Maisonette sits in the Chester City Centre; Fantastic for those working in the city! There is also easy access to the train and bus station, making it IDEAL for commuters. The property briefly comprises ..."
"A SECOND FLOOR two bedroom 1980s apartment with single ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE, and a very convenient location within WALKING DISTANCE OF THE CITY CENTRE and Chester Racecourse. Representing an ideal purchase for first time buyers or investment purchasers seeking to acquire a buy to le..."
"A one bedroom modern style apartment which is a ready made buy to let investment SOLD with current tenant on a long term contract, generating a good monthly return on investment. There is a allocated parking space."
"A 1980s one bedroom ground floor flat with a long lease of 999 years with parking, a share in the freehold title, and an undeniably convenient location within a mile of the Chester city centre. Forming part of a purpose built development which is ideally suited for first time buyers as..."
"A spacious 2-bedroom, 2nd floor apartment within walking distance of both Chester city centre and the popular area of Hoole. With an open plan lounge/diner, stylish fitted kitchen and en-suite shower room to master bedroom."
"CLS Estates are pleased to offer this spacious ground floor one bedroom apartment which forms part of a grade II listed building, nestled canal side and within just a few minutes walk to both the Train station and the City Centre. Accommodation briefly comprises, entrance hallway, large lounge..."
"CLS Estates are pleased to offer this beautiful, fully furnished, one bedroom apartment within the delightful Georgian grade listed building of Newton Hall, Situated near the popular suburbs of Upton and Hoole. This light and airy apartment comprises of open plan kitchen/lounge/diner, double ..."
"A spacious retirement apartment in the popular Cedar House development. This well decorated flat has accommodation comprising entrance hall, living room, kitchen, double bedroom with fitted wardrobes and bathroom. Cedar House offers excellent benefits including a House Manager, residents lo..."
"This is a fantastic property for a first time buyer!! It is conveniently situated close to the Greyhound retail park, and forms part of a purpose built apartment block, with allocated parking. With-in a reasonable walking distance from the City center. It comprises; reception hall, living room, k..."
"A 1960s first and second floor duplex maisonette with inherent modernisation potential, aspects over an attractive green space to the south-west, and an extremely convenient location within walking distance of the railway station and city centre. Structured in the post-war decades this..."
"ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT situated within a RETIREMENT LIVING DEVELOPMENT for the OVER 60'S, with all the charm of CHESTER on your doorstep, close to Grosvenor Park and the River Dee."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN A first floor one bedroom early 1990s retirement apartment within a highly regarded complex just over the old Dee bridge. A well-known retirement complex for those of 55 years and over, Queens Park house is superbly placed for access to the historic Roman city of C..."
"3 BEDROOM home in CHESTER available to buy through SHARED OWNERSHIP from £113,200 for a 40% share, complete with MODERN BATHROOM and KITCHEN (with integrated oven and hob) and a turfed REAR GARDEN. Chester Business Park only a two minute walk away."
"Kingswood is a stunning development built in 2015 comprising of 82 modern and contemporary apartments finished to a high standard. Each apartment is fitted with fire and smoke alarms, phone entry system for additional security and a 24 hour emergency call system. There are lifts to the..."
"3 BEDROOM home in CHESTER available to buy through SHARED OWNERSHIP from £112,200 for a 40% share, complete with MODERN BATHROOM and KITCHEN (with integrated oven and hob) and a turfed REAR GARDEN. Chester Business Park only a two minute walk away."
Wonderful 3 bedroom Mid Terraced house in the Kings Moat Garden Village development. The price advertised represents purchasing a 40% share of the home
"*INVESTMENT BUYERS ONLY* A one bedroom corner mews house with existing rental income, front and side lawned garden, and a popular as well as extremely convenient location to the south west of Chester. An ideal purchase for an investment buyer, this property is being sold with a tenant ..."
"A spacious retirement apartment in the popular Cedar House development. This well decorated and spacious flat has accommodation comprising entrance hall, living room, kitchen, double bedroom with fitted wardrobes and shower room. Cedar House offers excellent benefits including a House Manag..."
"A modern second floor two-bedroom apartment, in a popular established and convenient residential location to the north of Chester. With an attractive modern style and location that is replete with various local shopping facilities and schools, this apartment is ideally placed. The loca..."
**Attention investors** This studio ground floor apartment has been recently renovated and improved throughout. Situated in the quiet location of Bluebell Close Huntington the property is compact yet the use of space is incredibly clever. With a rental valuation of £625pcm the property is a ...
"Subject to ongoing tenancy, ample secure private parking; 1 bedroom modern apartment located in Saltney for investor or owner occupiers."
"Located at the heart of the popular Chester suburb of Saltney located within a 5/10 minute drive from the city centre, is this generously proportioned, two double bedroom, duplex apartment positioned above a parade of shops."
"* TOP FLOOR APARTMENT * PERFECT FOR A FIRST TIME BUYER * RESIDENTS PARKING SCHEME IN THE AREA * A modern one bedroom second floor apartment forming part of a popular development ideally situated within walking distance of Chester City Centre, the Shropshire Union Canal, a Waitrose supermarket, an..."
"FOR SALE VIA OUR ONLINE AUCTION ON THE 6TH MARCH AT 1PM. Well presented two double bedroom ground floor apartment is being sold with tenants in situ and achieving a gross annual yield of £7,200 pa."
"PDA Estate Agents are pleased to market this recently re-decorated one double bedroom flat, offered for sale with vacant possession and no onward chain. In brief there is a spacious lounge, modern kitchen, one double bedroom, fitted bathroom with shower and there is also a balcony with views over..."
"Two bedroom ground floor apartment close to the City Centre. The accommodation has UPVC double glazing and comprises: Modern open-plan kitchen area with living room, balcony, two double bedrooms and bathroom. The property has an allocated parking space."
A modern Studio apartment perfect for investors in the student market close to the city centre and the train station. This building is a5 student specific accommodation development. It is located just a short distance from Chester city centre. The property is within walking distance of...
"A superb investment opportunity for investment purchasers to acquire a ready to go tenancy, with the current tenant in situ since 2018, currently paying c£600 per calendar month. Well presented through-out, it is well located for local convenience's, and the City Centre. With gas central he..."
"ATTENTION INVESTORS! CIRCA 8% YIELD ON THIS SMART ONE BEDROOMED GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT IN SALTNEY. The apartment comprises in brief: entrance hallway, good sized double bedroom, bathroom and kitchen/diner and private electric gated parking. This apartment is also situated perf..."
"50% shared ownership top floor apartment with multiple balconies providing stunning views. Certain eligibility criteria will apply to the purchase of this property, further details are available from Your Housing Group. The property briefly comprises; entrance hall, Lounge Kitchen with Juliet bal..."
A ONE BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT WITH JULIETTE BALCONY OVERLOOKING GARDENS Mallard Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 50 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points ...
"A superb opportunity to purchase a minimum 50% - 75% share of a two-bedroom, ground floor apartment benefiting from one parking space. After completion there is the opportunity to acquire 100% ownership. Must meet eligibility criteria.
"
"A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT LOCATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR OVERLOOKING GARDENS BENEFITING FROM NEW CARPETS AND RE-FITTED SHOWER ROOM Arkle Court within a short walk of bus stops, Super markets, fuel station, barber, convenience store and take away restaurants are all nearby. Convenientl..."
A ONE BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT Mallard Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 50 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each property in the case of an eme...
"* AN IDEAL OPPORTUNITY FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS * A top floor studio apartment recently refurbished offering a superb view towards Chester Cathedral. The property is part of a ""Discount for sale scheme"" with Cheshire West and Chester Council, to own 100% of the property at a 30 % discount. THIS PROP..."
"* INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY * CURRENTLY LET FOR ACADEMIC YEAR 2022/23. A modern studio apartment forming part of a student specific accommodation development close to University of Chester, Chester city centre and the Chester Railway Station. This studio is located on the first floor and is finishe..."
"Located within a vibrant city centre location, Chedworth House, which itself forms part of 'The Square' development, close to the main Chester railway station and popular nightspots found along the Shropshire Union Canal which is a stone's throw away. Studio apartment being sold under the Discoun..."
"A top floor 1 bed apartment with balcony overlooking the Welsh hills which is perfect for first time buyers advertised as a 50% share but can be staircased to full ownership. The property briefly comprises; entrance hall, Large open plan lounge/kitchen with direct access to a balcony,..."
"Aspen Woolf are pleased to offer this amazing 24m2 Studio set within Northgate Studios, Chester. This is a purpose built investment opportunity in the under supplied overseas and postgraduate student property market. This beautiful studio set within the luxury development."
***CASH BUYERS ONLY*** Completed in September 2016 Northgate Point provides individually-designed luxury studio apartments for the next generation of UK and overseas students living in Chester. The development is 5-storeys in total with the 5th floor set back away from Trafford Street. <...
"A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT LOCATED ON THE SECOND FLOOR Arkle Court within a short walk of bus stops, Super markets, fuel station, barber, convenience store and take away restaurants are all nearby. Conveniently situated was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and..."
"Offered to market with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this first floor one bedroomed apartment which is situated within Mallard Court, a popular development for those aged over 60. Mallard Court is located with Upton, one of Chester's most popular areas and the development is positioned within a short walk o..."
"This is an ideal first time buyer ground floor apartment, certain eligibility required to purchase this 75% shared equity property ( please ask for further details). The ground floor apartment is situated close to Chester Racecourse, short walk from Chester City centre. Chester City centre h..."
"Attention all first time buyers looking for their first home, this is an ideal opportunity to purchase a 60% shared ownership first floor flat which offers easy to manage accommodation occupying a convenient and central location close to the City."
A well presented One bedroomed ground floor flat for those aged 60 and above located within the popular Homedee House development. The building is positioned within an easy walkable distance of the city centre and it's vast array of amenities and services. Homedee House features a range of facili...
"This one bedroom retirement apartment is conveniently located within the city centre, offering nearby amenities, walking distance of Chester Train Station and Bus Station. Homedee House consists of a Lounge/Dining room, Kitchen, Bathroom and a double Bedroom with an integrated wardrobe."
"Tenanted and fully managed student studio for sale, generating £2,857.00 net rental income (6.7% net) per year. Fully managed by an experienced student property management company. "
"A 1980s third floor studio style retirement apartment, with skyline views to the south, and an extremely convenient location just outside the city walls of Chester. Having the feel of a rooftop apartment, this particular flat has an appeal all of its own and is limited to occupiers of ..."
"Why pay high rents when you can buy 25% of this very well positioned upper floor duplex apartment, situated in a secure gated complex, just minutes walk from the City Centre. Close to the Shropshire Union canal and the Railway Station the apartment is perfect for a professional couple or person. ..."
***Fantastic Managed Investment*** This city center investment opportunity is perfect for someone wanting a hand off investment offing 7.5% return. We are offering this fully furnished student room/pod for sale to cash investors looking to start an investment portfolio or grow an existing port...
"A 25% share in a second floor two bedroom, two bathroom post-millennium apartment, within a landmark development under a mile from the Chester city centre and within walking distance of the railway station. Of special interest to first time buyers seeking to obtain an initial step on t..."
"Situated in the heart of Chester, Trinity Hall offers student accommodation pods and is very convenient for many of the Chester University campuses. Offering a brilliant investment opportunity and with a student in situ until August 2021, Humphreys are pleased to offer to the market this one bedr..."
This well-presented semi-detached house is set in the exclusive Keeper's Green development and boasts a nearby communal green as well as easy access into Chichester's city centre. The property has been developed into a charming home with an array of useful features making this a fantastic place t...
"An exceptionally well presented and substantial Grade II listed Georgian Gem of elegant proportions, in a prime city centre location, within a short walk of the level pedestrianised shopping areas and close to the delightful grounds of Priory Park and ancient Roman Walls. "
"Only 1/4 mile from Goodwood, this elegant home with an ANNEXE is surrounded by open farmland and sits right on the edge of the South Downs National Park."
"A handsome three/four bedroom family home in the north of historic Chichester, with beautifully appointed interiors and a swimming pool."
"A beautifully presented and generously proportioned ground floor 3-bedroom apartment within the city walls, having secured private parking"
"A detached Arts and Crafts residence of great character and distinction, built in a Tudor style between the wars. Constructed of traditional methods and materials, character features include the use of York stone, leaded light windows, oak beams, thumb latch doors, Tudor style fireplaces and a s..."
"A beautifully presented and significantly extended family home situated in one of the most popular and respected areas of north Chichester. The house has been extended on either side and the back with the addition of two further bedrooms and en-suites, a sun room, utility room and magnificent in..."
"Located on the northern edge of Chichester city centre, a spacious detached chalet bungalow with well presented accommodation and scope for enlargement subject to usual planning consents."
"Benefitting from an additional investment property producing an income of approximately £40,800 per annum, an attractive Georgian townhouse, Listed Grade II, with west facing garden and private parking, located within walking distance of the pedestrianised city centre, Oaklands Park and Chi..."
"Located in an excellent position on the northern fringes of Chichester, 18 Roman Fields forms part of a small private development constructed by Messrs Seaward Homes in 2016. This beautifully appointed detached property offers excellent accommodation with red brick and part tile hung ..."
"Located in a prime position within the walls of this historic cathedral city, an investment opportunity to acquire six recently converted apartments, individually let on residential Assured Shorthold Tenancy Agreements."
A stunning development with only 2 properties remaining! Available late Spring 2023 Contact Christopher Smeed to register your interest for the New Year.
OPEN MORNING - SATURDAY 11th MARCH - 10.00am - 1.00pm. Call to book your appointment.
"NO FORWARD CHAIN. A charming FLINT & BRICK detached PERIOD PROPERTY situated in a convenient location to the north of the city centre. THREE BEDROOMS, three receptions, conservatory. DOUBLE GARAGE, generous plot, SOUTH FACING GARDENS. EPC-E"
"A superbly presented detached house is set at the end of a quiet cul de sac in the highly sort-after area of West Broyle, located 1.7 miles northwest of Chichester city centre."
King & Chasemore are delighted to present to the market a stunning FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE tucked away in a sought after area and desirably located within walking distance to Chichester's city centre and popular award-winning schools. Extended and renovated by the current owner's this pro...
"‘Cropstones’ is a beautifully presented four double bedroom town house, situated in one of Chichester’s most desirable locations of Summersdale. The property offers flexible accommodation over three floors. On the ground floor is a generous size hallway and a modern ..."
"This wonderfully bright and spacious home (2309sqft or 214.5sqm) was completely remodelled back in 2017 to an exceptionally high standard creating an extremely flexible home with generously proportioned bedrooms and reception rooms, with, in particular, a large master bedroom with dressing room a..."
"A spacious three/four-bedroom detached house located just to the east of Chichester city centre on a generous plot at the end of the much sought-after Flaxman Avenue. This lovely family home has been significantly improved and extended by the current vendors. It offers generous, light, bright and..."
"A beautiful four-bedroom terraced home in the heart of Chichester, with two reception rooms and a pretty courtyard garden."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN. A generously proportioned 2,241 sqft DETACHED HOUSE in a much sought after location. TRIPLE ASPECT SITTING ROOM, kitchen/breakfast room, FOUR BEDROOMS, two bathrooms. TANDEM GARAGE. EPC-E"
"A superb four-bedroom 2000sqft+ detached house, located in a very generous plot with views over fields to the rear in the sought after village of Donnington but still within striking distance of the city centre and approximately 1 mile from the train station. The property has been extended and fu..."
"PRICE GUIDE £800,000 - £860000 4 BEDS/3 BATHS, DOUBLE GARAGE, CLOSE TO CENTRE OF CHICHESTER Aspire Country Homes are pleased to offer for sale this very attractive and individually styled semi detached home within walking distance of the centre of Chichester. The property is set over (cont.)"
"NO FORWARD CHAIN. An individual Grade II listed SINGLE STOREY RESIDENCE. Octagonal KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM, three bedrooms, two bathrooms. GARAGE."
Substantial Family home situated in the highly sought after village of Fishbourne. The house has been significantly EXTENDED and enjoys a LARGE REAR GARDEN as well as AMPLE PARKING and well presented interiors.
"YOUR HOME, YOUR WAY. An offer as individual as you are! Discover how you can make savings on selected homes, with a lump sum that can go towards your purchase costs; use it to reduce stamp duty or legal fees or upgrade your home with our Select range. Together, we can make it work for you!"
A substantially extended 5 bedroom detached house conveniently situated near to the A27 and only half a mile from Chichester train station and city centre. The internal accommodation has been significantly upgraded by the present owners and offers numerous smart features and air conditioning thr...
"FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOME featuring TWO EN-SUITE BEDROOMS, SEPARATE LOUNGE AND SNUG, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM and an INTEGRAL DOUBLE GARAGE."
"Recently renovated and extended to create a spacious family home, this detached chalet bungalow provides wonderful, open planned living and is definitely the home for hosting family parties! The property offers flexibility for buyers needing a home office or additional bedrooms, and is suitable f..."
Delightful 4 bedroom Grade II listed property situated within minutes of the historic East Walls and in the heart of the City. Spacious adaptable accommodation over three floors being offered with a pretty walled courtyard garden. 
"Situated in a quiet, highly sought after location, this detached bungalow is a fantastic place to call home. Nestled at the end of a private road, the property boasts a generous plot leaving ample space to extend and develop (subject to consents) and has plenty of space for off road parking. Feat..."
"A bright and well presented DETACHED BUNGALOW in one of the finest locations in Chichester. THREE BEDROOMS, two receptions. Excellent scope for EXTENSION/IMPROVEMENT (STPP), ample parking, 0.27 ACRE GARDEN. EPC-E. Please call Henry Adams for further information"
"Located at the end of a private lane, off one of Chichester most attractive and desirable roads, this well presented detached bungalow sits on a good sized plot, has a garage and offers enormous potential to extend (STPP). Entrance hall | Living room | Kitchen | Utility room | Dining roo..."
"An impressive & stylish home with high ceilings, situated on this most sought after development. This fine Georgian style home has 1490sqft with plenty of natural light, oozes elegance and class. I love the central staircase rising up to the galleried landing. A home with garage & two par..."
"No onward chain! A 3-4 bedroom apartment located in a highly sought-after development, within 2 minutes' walk of Bishops Palace Gardens and the city walls Serviced by a communal lift this well-proportioned apartment is split over 2 floors and offers approximately 1700sqft of living space. The..."
A beautifully presented and skilfully extended four bedroom house with a large south facing garden and home office/studio set just to the south of Chichester. Located in the village of Donnington which offers a good selection of local shops and amenities and yet still within a stroll of Chicheste...
"An extremely well presented four-bedroom detached family home with an open outlook, located within a highly desirable area . Situated less than 100yds from the canal, it gives easy access to Chichester City centre and train station and is within the Kingsham Primary School catchment. The propert..."
"YOUR HOME, YOUR WAY. An offer as individual as you are!Discover how you can make savings on selected homes, with a lump sum that can go towards your purchase costs; use it to reduce stamp duty or legal fees or upgrade your home with our Select range. Together, we can make it work for you!"
"**GUIDE PRICE £700,000 - £720,000** | Potential for an Annex | Five/Six Bedroom Detached House | Highly Sought After Location | Two/Three Reception Rooms | Kitchen/Dining Room | Utility Area | Downstairs W.C. | Two Bathrooms |..."
This beautifully presented property has recently been significantly updated by the current owners and now provides light and well-appointed accommodation arranged over two floors. The property benefits from a welcoming reception hall with Richmond Whittaker laminate oak flooring and glazed doubl...
White & Brooks are delighted to bring to the market this immaculate three bedroom end-of-terrace house built on traditional lines in 2012 and positioned in a quiet residential street overlooking a large park in the centre of historic Chichester. The accommodation is set over three floors off...
"A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED four-bedroom semi-detached house located on a generous plot with views over fields to the rear, in the sought after village of Donnington, but still within striking distance of the city centre and approximately 1 mile from Chichester train station. The property has been sk..."
"Welcoming to the market this exceptional three bedroom detached family home situated in an exclusive development comprising of just six, three and four bedroom detached houses, all of which are complete with garages. This property is being offered with no forward chain, perfect for those in a pro..."
"1,763 sqft DETACHED HOUSE. Flexible accommodation, 3/4 BEDROOMS, close to train station and local primary school. WEST FACING GARDEN, off-road parking. EPC-C"
A charming 3 storey 4 bedroom town house with gas central heating situated in this highly sought after gated development overlooking the Chichester canal in the heart of the city centre and less than 400m from the train station. Internal accommodation is well laid out and on the ground floor th...
"A SPACIOUS family home, boasting an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING room with FRENCH DOORS leading into the garden. A HIGH SPECIFICATION THROUGHOUT, separate GARAGE & DRESSING ROOM to bedroom 1. Find out more..."
"Substantial DETACHED family home with stunning interiors and spacious principal rooms across both floors. The house benefits from OFF ROAD PARKING, large LANDSCAPED GARDEN, GARAGE and occupies a commanding position overlooking the neighbouring green."
White & Brooks are delighted to offer to the market this substantial three-bedroom period townhouse situated within the heart of Chichester City Centre. The accommodation is arranged over four floors and in brief comprises of a lower ground reception room which could be used for several purpo...
"A 3 storey, 3 bedroom end of terrace town house situated in this award winning gated development in Chichester city centre enjoying outstanding views over the canal basin and only 350m from the train station. Internal accommodation is well laid out and on the ground floor there is a third bedroo..."
"Open plan Kitchen / Breakfast / Family room with breakfast bar*GET £18,900 STAMP DUTY PAID* Separate LAUNDRY room * Downstairs WC * Garage & allocated PARKING spaces * EN-SUITE to Principal Bedroom and Bedroom 2 * Dressing area to Principal Bedroom"
"An attractive Edwardian semi detached house with potential to modernise, situated in this desirable area of Summersdale. NO FORWARD CHAIN Entrance hall | Sitting room/Bedroom three | Kitchen | Lounge/Dining room | Utility room | WC | Two first floor bedrooms | Study | Bathroom"
"A superb DETACHED HOUSE on the sought after MINERVA HEIGHTS development just to the north of the city. The Pembroke is a 4 BEDROOM, 2 BATHROOM property which has been UPGRADED by the current owners with extended counter tops in the kitchen and some internal doors downstairs. The outlook to the re..."
"We are proud to present this Five Bedroom Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £620,000 - £650,000*"
"DETACHED FOUR BEDROOM family home. TRADITIONAL ARCHITECTURE with SPACIOUS OPEN PLAN LIVING including a SEPARATE LOUNGE, plus EN-SUITE to the master bedroom along with two further doubles and a single bedroom."
"GUIDE PRICE £600,000 - £625,000 | This superb semi-detached house is set over two floors with three bedrooms, spacious ground floor living accommodation, utility room, gorgeous West facing rear garden, ample off road parking and all in such a fantastic location close to the best local schools"
Chain free purchase available in the Parklands area. This semi-detached bungalow is perfect for buyers downsizing or looking for something with potential to be developed (subject to consents). The property boasts ample off road parking along with a detached garage and a sizeable garden plot which...
An immaculately presented and substantial five bedroom detached house just slightly to the east of Chichester city centre. Completed in 2019 this superb house still benefits from the remainder of the NHBC warranty and is presented in immaculate condition. The property has very well laid out accom...
"White & Brooks are pleased to welcome to the market this beautifully presented semi-detached family home, situated in a popular residential location within walking distance to Chichester City Centre. In brief the accommodation comprises of a spacious hallway, with a bedroom and modern shower ..."
"A top floor penthouse apartment oiffering 1,404 sqft/130.4sqm of accommodatrion set in a modern development, just a 700m walk to the City Centre Cross. Overlooking the attractive and well-maintained communal gardens with a private parking space."
"Modern three bedroom detached bungalow situated in a highly sought after location benefiting from off road PARKING, Garage and open plan living space. The property is presented in IMMACULATE order throughout with large light filled rooms."
"A well-proportioned three-bedroom semi-detached property in the highly sought after Summersdale area to the North of Chichester. The property has been under the current ownership for almost 20 years and offers huge scope for extending (STPP) the layout briefly comprises an entrance porch, dining ..."
"Winterbourne House is a delightful unlisted period home in the heart of Chichester city centre, with brick and flint walls under a tiled roof. It is believed that the house dates from the early 18th century, and was originally two adjoining buildings and a stable with a hayloft above. The prop..."
"A SUBSTANTIAL and EXTENDED 3 DOUBLE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME in the popular Stockbridge area of Chichester, which lies just to the south of the city. The house could do with some minor updating throughout."
"A beautifully appointed and elegant ground floor, duplex apartment which was recently refurbished by its current owner. It forms part of a former, large country house and is set in around 3 acres of mature parkland grounds. Entrance hall | Elegant lounge with mezzanine | Beautifully fitt..."
"Beautifully presented family home situated in a highly sought after area benefiting from OFF ROAD PARKING, WEST FAING garden, OPEN PLAN living space and four bedrooms."
"A well-presented four bedroom semi-detached house located just slightly to the south of the city centre in a popular quiet residential location. The property has spacious accommodation arranged over two storeys with a bay fronted sitting room to the front, study, ground-floor W.C. and an open pla..."
"A beautifully presented and extended four-bedroom, semi-detached house built in 2018 by Bargate homes located in a quiet location in the sought after Donnington area of Chichester, which is a 15-minute walk to the centre. The property has light and bright accommodation arranged over three storeys..."
A charming DETACHED EDWARDIAN 3 BEDROOM HOUSE within walking distance of the city centre. The house retains a number of period features including stripped pine floors and open fireplaces.
"A very well presented detached house, with four bedrooms two bathrooms and excellent receptions areas, in this highly sought after village some two miles to the west of the city centre. On the ground floor, the front door opens to a porch, then onto an entrance hall with a cloakroom. The spacio..."
FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED home with a SPACIOUS INTERIOR including LARGE SEPARATE LOUNGE and OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM. First floor boasts 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS with an EN-SUITE to the master.
"Tucked away in a peaceful cul-de-sac, this well-presented detached house offers spacious rooms and flexible living space to suit a variety of buyers. The property boasts a charming kitchen/dining room which is a wonderful space to enjoy and is ideal for hosting. In addition to this, this home ben..."
King & Chasemore are delighted to present to the market a generously sized FOUR BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE offering easy access to local schools and transport links. On the ground floor you are welcomed by a large ENTRANCE HALL leading into the open-planned KITCHEN/DINER. The mod...
A GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT overlooking the Chichester Canal with the benefit of SECURE UNDERGROUND PARKING and OUTSIDE SPACE. Large dual aspect sitting room with French doors to PRIVATE PATIO. TWO BEDROOMS both EN-SUITE. EPC-C
"Filled with potential, this 1930's semi-detached house has huge potential for expansion (subject to consents) with plenty of examples along the road. The property boasts excellent transport links for commuters and easy access into Chichester's city centre via the canal and foot bridge. The stunni..."
"Offered with no Forward Chain. Detached bungalow set in a generous plot offering scope for modernisation, this home also benefits from having planning permission granted for demolition of the existing building and construction of a detached four-bedroom house.Existing Bungalow comprises of: Entra..."
A beautifully presented and spacious penthouse apartment with lift and exceptional views over the historic city centre of Chichester to include the Cathedral and Priory Park.
"White and Brooks are excited to welcome to the market this beautiful 1950’s detached three bedroom family home, situated in an extremely convenient location, within easy walking distance of Chichester City Centre and all its central amenities. In brief the accommodation comprises to the gro..."
"A superb second floor apartment located in a central position in Church Square at the end of East Street, a prestigious development built by Seaward Properties. This well-presented property offers excellent accommodation benefitting from a spacious reception hall with cloakroom, a good..."
"A charming, Grade II Listed terraced cottage in a sought-after location, a short distance from the City centre."
An exceptionally well-presented detached bungalow located a short distance from Chichester City Centre. 
THREE BEDROOM HOME with and EN-SUITE TO EACH along with a WALK-IN DRESSING ROOM to the master. Ground floor boasts an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM along with SEPARATE UTILITY and CLOAKS ROOM as well as a SEPARATE LOUNGE and INTEGRAL GARAGE.
"Chain free! A spacious detached house with a delightful garden and off-road parking, located within a modern gated development close to the renowned Chichester Festival Theatre to the North of the City. The property has well-proportioned accommodation arranged over two floors including a generous..."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Bowyer is the perfect double-fronted *ENERGY EFFICIENT CHAIN FREE FAMILY HOME* with *3 DOUBLE BEDROOMS & ONE SINGLE*, an *OPEN PLAN* kitchen, family and dining area with *INTEGRATED KITCHEN APPLIANCES* and *FRENCH DOORS*"
"A STUNNING family home, boasting an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING room with FRENCH DOORS leading into the garden. A HIGH SPECIFICATION THROUGHOUT, EN-SUITE & DRESSING ROOM to bedroom 1. Find out more..."
"A beautifully presented and deceptively spacious three-bedroom end of terrace town house with an integral garage, located on the Goodwood Estate in the village of Westhampnett approximately 1.5 miles to the east of Chichester. The property one of the larger builds on the development and is situat..."
"1,124 sqft elegant UPPER GROUND FLOOR apartment enjoying an elevated position in a Grade II* listed building close to the FESTIVAL THEATRE and city centre. TWO BEDROOMS, two bathrooms, GARAGE."
"A well-proportioned and brilliantly light link-detached family home with potential, sold with no onward chain. The property boasts generous room sizes, garage with store to the rear and a delightful rear garden in addition to it's desirable location in the East Broyle Estate just north of Chiches..."
"Beautifully balanced, both inside and out, the three bedroom Amberley combines a peaceful environment with a practical living space. Step inside and you'll see how that balance continues throughout, with a large open plan kitchen / dining room to the left of the hall and a full wid..."
"The Lincoln takes flexibility to a whole new level with three bedrooms and three floors that you can arrange in any way you want to suit your family and your lifestyle. Downstairs is the perfect blend of family time and personal space, with a lively, open plan kitchen / dining room for..."
FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED home with OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING FAMILY area and a SEPARATE LOUNGE and an EN-SUITE MASTER BEDROOM.
"A LARGE family home, boasting an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY room with FRENCH DOORS leading into the garden. A HIGH SPECIFICATION THROUGHOUT, EN-SUITE & WARDROBE to bedroom 1. Find out more..."
Substantial bungalow situated on the highly sought after PRIVATE Marchwood estate to the north of Chichester within easy reach of the South Downs National Park and the city centre. Residents benefit from the use of both a SWIMMING POOL and TENNIS Court.
"A chain free terraced house set in an exclusive estate in Chichester. Offering excellent sized bedrooms as well as ample storage, this home would be perfect for someone looking to downsize. The property benefits from a beautiful, courtyard-style garden and is only a short walk from Oaklands Park ..."
"This detached house hasn't been to the market in over 40 years! It offers space, easy access into the city centre and is located in a fantastic school catchment area. The home has been extended with a conservatory and benefits from a useful, attached garage offering the potential to convert or ex..."
"From the impressive wood cladding that enhances the roofline to the decorative door cornice that adds elegance to the entrance, The Warwick has an authentic aura that underlines the sense of quality and craftsmanship that is evident throughout. Yet practicality will also be at the hear..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £502,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £760,000"
"Beautifully presented semi detached chalet bungalow on the cusp of Chichester city centre with OFF ROAD PARKING, GARAGE, OPEN FIRE and stunning interiors throughout. The property is offered in immaculate condition and offers easy access to SHOPS, TRAIN STATION, SCHOOLS and HOSPITAL."
"Offers In Excess Of £500,000 | A spacious and superbly presented three-bedroom family home perfectly positioned in one of the city's most sought-after locations. Positioned within a green and attractive road which is incredibly quiet for somewhere so central. Viewings are highly recommended."
"Located within large grounds of just under a quarter of an acre, a rare opportunity to acquire a substantial detached four bedroom bungalow (approx. 1,500 sq ft) with the benefit of off street parking and being within a short distance to the city centre."
"White & Brooks are pleased to welcome to the market this immaculate three-bedroom semi-detached family home located just a short walk from Chichester City Centre. In brief, the accommodation comprises an entrance hallway and a spacious open-plan living room with a dining room adjacent to it. ..."
"Located within a short walk of Chichester's main shopping precinct, a delightful Grade II listed cottage with 3 bedrooms, 2 cellar rooms and a west facing garden."
Attractive Period Cottage situated within the CITY WALLS a stones' throw from Priory Park. Arranged over three floors in GOOD CONDITION throughout with MODERN FITTED kitchen and COURTYARD GARDEN. Offered CHAIN FREE.
"An attractive Grade II listed terraced cottage offering charm and character throughout, benefitting from a west facing garden, set in the heart of Chichester’s historic city centre. NO FORWARD CHAIN Lounge | Dining room | Kitchen | Two bedrooms | Bathroom | West facing rear garden"
"A well presented four bedroom semi-detached house located on the Goodwood Estate in the village of Westhampnett approximately 1.5 miles to the east of Chichester. The accommodation is arranged over three floors with a light and bright sitting/dining room overlooking the rear garden, cloakroom and..."
"Chain free! Situated within close proximity of Chichester city centre, in a quiet cul-de-sac location with undisturbed views over the historic Roman Amphitheatre, a surprisingly spacious three-bedroom end of terrace property. On the ground floor there is a good-sized kitchen leading to an adjoin..."
"Immaculately presented three double bedroom DETACHED CHALET STYLE BUNGALOW and set within a PRIVATE CLOSE to the west of Chichester city centre. Close to local shops, schools, pubs and the water at Fishbourne creek. Offered CHAIN FREE."
" A grade two listed town cottage just outside the city walls and within the conservation area. The property is extremely well presented with accommodation of 1269sqft (117.9sqm) comprising an entrance hall, sitting room with wood burning stove, dining room and a galley kitchen leading to the br..."
"A detached bungalow in this peaceful residential road within half a mile of local shops and about a mile to the south of Chichester city centre. With sealed unit double glazing throughout, the property has a sitting room of over 16 ft in length with sealed unit double glazed door opening onto th..."
A beautifully presented three bedroom house with two allocated parking spaces set in an enviable position with views to parkland to the rear in the Graylingwell Park development to the north of Chichester city centre. The property has lovely high ceilings and very well proportioned space arranged...
"£24,750 Deposit Top-Up available on this impressive Kentdale home with fully integrated kitchen with appliances. An ideal 4 bedroom home which will appeal to growing families in search of extra space."
A very well appointed top floor apartment located in a central position in Church Square at the end of East Street. A prestigious development built by local builders Seaward Properties. This well-presented apartment offers comfortable accommodation with an attractive southerly aspect ...
"A beautifully restored and improved Grade II period cottage with a south facing garden backing onto the ancient city wall. Charming open plan sitting room/ kitchen, dining room, first floor bathroom, ground floor shower room. Residents' permit on-street parking. EPC-N/A"
"Nestled in the beautiful Indigo Park development, this spacious semi-detached house boasts light and airy accommodation as well as a sizeable rear garden. Downstairs benefits from open-planned social spaces and the second floor has a separate sitting room making this home ideal for families. The ..."
"Auction Sale - 28/03/2023 Of interest to developers or investors. Three large one bedroom flats (2,164 sq ft) with potential for reconfiguration to provide 3 x 2 bedroom flats. New 999 year lease. Vacant "
"This beautiful two-bedroom detached cottage is a 5-minute walk from the centre of the historic City of Chichester, as well as being located opposite a huge park and the internationally renowned Chichester Festival Theatre. The large kitchen/dining room is at the heart of the house with French do..."
"The Richmond - a DOUBLE FRONTED property set in an enviable position on the edge of Chalkhill View. This 3 BEDROOM home offers a large DUAL-ASPECT LIVING ROOM, master bedroom with EN-SUITE BATHROOM and TWO ALLOCATED PARKING SPACES."
Stunning ENERGY EFFICIENT 3 BEDROOM HOME with Open plan kitchen / dining room with FRENCH DOORS to the GARDEN*WE'VE GOT SOME AMAZING OFFERS ON SELECTED HOMES* Downstairs WC * Allocated PARKING spaces
"NO ONWARD CHAIN. 1,551 sqft SEMI-DETACHED CHALET HOUSE offering FLEXIBLE ACCOMMODATION. Dual aspect kitchen/dining room with VAULTED CEILING. 3/4 BEDROOMS, garage, parking. EPC-D"
Stunning 3 bedroom energy efficient home *WE'VE GOT SOME AMAZING OFFERS ON SELECTED HOMES*Open plan kitchen / dining room with FRENCH DOORS to the rear GARDEN and separate LAUNDRY room *Allocated PARKING spaces
Light-filled open plan Kitchen / Dining with separate Laundry room and rear garden access *WE'VE GOT SOME AMAZING OFFERS ON SELECTED HOMES FIND OUT MORE TODAY!*Spacious lounge with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden * Garage & parking spaces * EN-SUITE and built-in wardrobes to Principal Bedroom
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** Enjoy *THREE STOREY LIVING* with *THE GILDER*, an *ENERGY EFFICIENT* home with *2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS & TWO SINGLES* and *EN SUITE* to bedrooms 1 and 2. An *OPEN PLAN* kitchen, dining and family area with *INTEGRATED APPLIANCES*"
A beautifully presented 3 STOREY TOWNHOUSE in a much sought after development to the east of Chichester on the GOODWOOD ESTATE. The property has been SIGNIFICANTLY ENHANCED by the present owners with one example being the superb bespoke cabinets in the study/4th bedroom. There are 3/4 DOUBLE BEDR...
"A bright and spacious first floor retirement apartment with two bedrooms, two bathrooms and private balcony, situated in this highly desirable development in the heart of Chichester. The flat has been decorated and re-carpeted throughout. Entrance hall | Storage cupboards | Sitting/Dini..."
"Beautifully finished family home situated in an attractive modern estate in a quiet village location. The house benefits from GARAGE, parking, modern FITTED KITCHEN, ENSUITE and the remainder of it's NHBC WARRANTY."
"White & Brooks are excited to offer to the market this detached bungalow, set in a popular residential location. The property has the benefit of a wonderful, landscaped rear garden, which is of excellent size.The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, leading to a generous living room meas..."
White & Brooks are pleased to welcome to the market this immaculately extended three bedroom detached family home situated in a mature residential development just a mile to the south of Chichester. The living accommodation to the ground floor boasts a spacious living room with huge double gl...
"Located just a short walk from Chichester city centre, bus and train stations, a beautifully presented terraced cottage which has been updated by the present owners and now provides light, bright accommodation and a delightful well stocked rear garden."
"A very well-presented 3 bedroom semi-detached character property, within a stone's throw of central Chichester. The property offers great living space over three storeys. On the ground floor is an open plan sitting/ dining room, leading through to a good sized kitchen with access to the garde..."
"Situated close to Chichester City centre this spacious modern townhouse is arranged over three floors, offering five bedrooms and three bathrooms, a well-fitted kitchen diner, and a good-sized double-aspect lounge. Garage and parking. Currently rented out until July 2023 with a good yield."
"This immaculate three-bedroom mid-terrace house is located in 85 acres of parkland at Graylingwell Park in the popular area of Summersdale a mere 15-minute walk into the centre of historic Chichester with its a wide variety of cultural, leisure and shopping facilities. With views over the Grayli..."
"Located in the beautiful Indigo Park development, this semi-detached house features a contemporary open-plan kitchen, family, and dining room as well as a separate living room - perfect for those who love hosting. Stunning French doors lead out onto the rear garden and the dining room benefits fr..."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Calligrapher is a well-balanced 4-bedroom home that features a contemporary open-plan kitchen, family, and dining room, two handy cloakrooms, two en-suite shower rooms, a stylish family bathroom, French doors to the rear garden"
"A chain free! three-bedroom. semi-detached house located towards the southern end of Parklands Road and within striking distance of the city centre and the local schools. This property, still with a lot of original features offers great potential as a family home and huge scope to extend if requi..."
"***LAND INCLUDED IN SALE*** This very well-situated, four bedroom Semi-Detached House is for sale INCLUDING LAND located at the rear of the property. Perfect for Investors and Renovators, the property features a loft conversion and the potential to renovate and extend further. "
"Welcoming to the market this extended, character three bedroom end of terrace family home with driveway parking, located in Bognor Road, Chichester and a short stroll from the City Centre which benefits from ample shops, restaurants and bars. On the ground floor the accommodation comprises a fitt..."
"A well-proportioned 3 BEDROOM home in this unique location with so many amenities withing easy reach. The Rutland offers a COSY living room, separate kitchen/dining area and stunning EN-SUITE."
"Located in a recently finished development, this spacious semi-detached house boasts easy access into Chichester's city centre whilst still being situated in a leafy development with a communal cricket pitch. The property benefits from plenty of storage, a lovely en-suite and a garage with off ro..."
"GUIDE PRICE £450,000 to £475,000. A 3 bedroom detached house offering fantastic scope for improvement situated on a large plot less than half a mile from Chichester city centre. The property requires updating and subject to consent it could be significantly extended to provide a spacious family..."
"A skilfully designed and well presented townhouse with a carport, additional parking bay and enclosed south facing garden located on a popular cul-de-sac just to the north of the city centre. "
"Semi detached chalet style bungalow situated in a quiet and secluded residential close to the south of Chichester. Benefiting from LOFT CONVERSION, REAR EXTENSION and off road parking."
"A SEMI-DETACHED house in a CUL-DE-SAC location close to the heart of the city centre. THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS, en-suite, garage and SOUTH FACING GARDEN. EPC-C"
"A fully modernised three-bedroom semi-detached chalet bungalow with the added benefit of driveway parking for multiple cars situated on the border of Chichester and Fishbourne, within less than a mile of the highly desirable Bishop Luffa School. This home is set over two floors, each room flooded..."
A well-presented spacious three-bedroom town house in the sought-after location of Somerstown slightly north of the city centre and next to the Festival Theatre and Oaklands Park. The property has been suitably modernised and updated by the current owners over the last couple of years which inclu...
"Positioned towards the bottom of the road, this charming terraced house boasts period charm with thoughtful and beautiful touches throughout. The property benefits from a cosy wood burner which warms the whole home, making it the perfect place to host guests before walking across to the theatre o..."
A modern and well presented property in a townhouse design (approx. 1187 sq ft) featuring four double bedrooms. No onward chain. The flexible accommodation is complimented by an enclosed rear garden and an attached garage with parking.
The 4 bedroom Monkford is designed with families in mind. This home is available with our Deposit Unlock scheme*
"This three bedroom detached house is situated in Westhampnett and ideally located within close proximity to Goodwood. This extremely well-presented property comprises a hallway, cloakroom and a double aspect sitting room to the front of the property. A stunning open plan modern fitted kitchen/din..."
Finding it hard to save for a deposit? Get some help with our Deposit Top-Up scheme on this 4 bedroom Monkford home with detached garage and driveway parking
"This spacious three-bedroom flat is being offered with no forward chain and is located in the sought-after area of Summersdale, just north of the centre of historic Chichester. You enter the attractive brick/timber property via its own front door, with stairs up to the first floor and the entran..."
*UNMISSABLE OFFERS ON SELECTED HOMES*Open plan kitchen/dining with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden * Spacious 15ft lounge * Allocated PARKING spaces * Principal bedroom with EN-SUITE shower room * Downstairs WC * Ideal for FIRST TIME BUYERS *
"This 3 bedroom Yewdale with flint detailing is a particular family favourite with plenty of space for contemporary living. Plus save £21,750 with our Deposit Match scheme."
*3 BEDROOM DETACHED HOME* AMAZING OFFERS ON SELECTED HOMES*Open plan kitchen/dining with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden * Spacious 15ft lounge * Allocated PARKING spaces * Principal bedroom with EN-SUITE shower room * Downstairs WC * Ideal for FIRST TIME BUYERS
A Three-bedroom Grade II listed end of terrace house situated in the sought-after location of Parchment Street slightly to the north west of the city centre. This pretty cottage has accommodation arranged over two stories with two reception rooms and a kitchen on the ground floor and three bedroo...
"An extended 3 bedroom semi detached house with self contained 1 bedroom annexe situated in this tucked away location less than 1 mile from both the train station and city centre. Internal accommodation offers a 14ft 3 lounge, separate dining room, re-fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, 3 ..."
A much improved and EXTENDED SEMI DETACHED CHALET BUNGALOW still requiring some minor updating and is well proportioned with a lovely rear garden.
We are excited to offer to the market this charming grade II listed cottage located within walking distance of Chichester City Centre. The property is situated on a corner plot as well as being set in a quiet location and has the potential to improve. The ground floor accommodation comprises a sp...
"This spacious three bedroom semi detached house is situated in a quiet close but within walking distance of the city centre, mainline station and good schools. The property has been extensively improved and refurbished to provide a great family home. Book your viewing online 24/7!"
"GUIDE PRICE £425,000 to £450,000. A superbly presented 3/4 bedroom semi detached house constructed in 2020 and situated on this popular modern development only 1.5 miles from Chichester city centre. Internal accommodation is well laid with the ground floor offering a 20ft kitchen/family room wi..."
"A CHAIN FREE beautifully presented, spacious, three double bedroom maisonette, with its own attractive, low maintenance private garden, garage with power and light, as well as off-street parking. The property is located in a quiet sought after residential area, just a short 10-minute walk to the ..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase this beautifully presented and extended family Home, located in a cul-de-sac of just three houses in the village of Donnington, on the outskirts of Chichester with a variety of amenities on its doorstep including a Convenience Store, a Post Office, a Hairdressers, a..."
"Offering flexible living over three floors, The Hawthorn accommodates everyone in contemporary comfort. "
"The Tanner is a stunning, energy efficient three bedroom with an open-plan kitchen and dining area with French doors, and a separate living room. This home features 2 double bedrooms plus 1 single with an en suite to bedroom 1, and a family bathroom for the rest. *10 YEARS NHBC WARRANTY* *BRAND NEW"
"Beautifully presented FOUR bedroom home which has been recently EXTENDED and REFURBISHED with south facing garden, off road parking and offered CHAIN FREE."
"White & Brooks are delighted to welcome to the market this well presented semi-detached town house situated in the sought after Shopwhyke Lakes Development. In brief the accommodation comprises to the second floor, a double size bedroom featuring an en-suite shower room as well as a dressing ..."
"A recently renovated 3/4 bedroom home offering well-presented and light accommodation, delightful south facing garden and ample driveway parking, set on a popular road just east of Chichester’s historic city centre. Entrance hall | Sitting room | Kitchen/Dining room | Utility room | Stud..."
"Well presented ground floor apartment, situated in this convenient location on the outskirts of Chichester. The accommodation briefly comprises, entrance hall, spacious living/dining room, which is open plan to the kitchen. There is also a double bedroom and separate bathroom. The apartment furth..."
"Save £12,360*. The Easedale is a traditional double fronted 3 bedroom home with a flexible layout to appeal to both couples and young families."
"GREAT RENTAL OPPORTUNITY! Currently a licenced HMO. A well-presented, chain-free, three/four-bedroom, semi-detached house located in the highly sought-after location of Cambrai Avenue close to Chichester City Centre. The property is arranged over two floors, with a bay-fronted sitting room, dinin..."
"A bright, spacious, and well presented 3 bedroom terraced house with garage and parking, forming part of a charming private estate about 1 ½ miles to the northeast of Chichester city centre and close to the glorious Goodwood Estate."
A 3 double bedroom semi detached bungalow situated in this popular residential no through road offering easy access to both the A27 also less than 1 mile from Chichester city centre. Internal accommodation is well laid out and offers further scope for improvement. On the ground floor there is a ...
White & Brooks are delighted to welcome to the market this beautifully presented three bedroom end of terrace house situated on the popular Graylingwell Park. On entry you will find hallway with storage and cloakroom. The ground floor further benefits from lounge to the front of the property ...
"A beautifully presented THREE BDEROOM PERIOD COTTAGE conveniently situated about 1/2 MILE FORM THE CITY CENTRE SHOPS. Open plan sitting/dining room with FEATURE OPEN FIREPLACE, classic SHAKER style kitchen. Enclosed SOUTH WEST rear garden. EPC-E"
"An extended 3 bedroom house situated less than 1km from Chichester city centre. The property is very well presented and accommodation includes a 16ft lounge, separate dining area, kitchen, downstairs shower room, 3 bedrooms and a bathroom. Externally there is off road parking to the front for 4..."
"A superb 4/5-bedroom end-terrace house offering immaculately presented living accommodation with ample off-street parking just minutes away from the Goodwood Estate, Rolls Royce, University and the beautiful Roman market town centre of Chichester. As you walk in through the front door, besides..."
DISCOVER OUR MOVE-MAKING OFFERS! *Open plan kitchen/dining with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden * Spacious 15ft lounge * Allocated PARKING spaces * Principal bedroom with EN-SUITE shower room * Downstairs WC * Ideal for FIRST TIME BUYERS *
"A period semi detached cottage of great character, complimented by a large mature rear garden, standing within walking distance of the city centre. Entrance hall | Through lounge/dining room | Kitchen | Bath and shower room | Three bedrooms | Gas central heating | Double glazing "
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £396,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £600,000"
"A very well situated semi-detached bungalow, offering scope for modernisation and extension (STPP), standing in this popular area of Donnington within walking distance of local shops and the city centre. NO FORWARD CHAIN Entrance hall | Living room | Kitchen | Two double bedroom..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN. An EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED family house, complemented by a LARGE REAR GARDEN and a gated front drive providing OFF-ROAD PARKING. Ideal main home or buy to let investment. FOUR BEDROOMS, two reception rooms, separate utility, and ground floor cloakroom. EPC-C"
NO ONWARD CHAIN. A fabulous PROJECT OPPORTUNITY with a 0.14 acre garden situated about 1 mile south of the city centre in Donnington. This attractive THREE BEDROOM semi detached house requires extensive MODERNISATION and has space to extend (subject to local authority consent). Private drive and...
A most attractive and characterful Grade II listed period cottage located on a sought after road within an easy walk of Chichester's historic city centre and famous Festival Theatre.
"An immaculately presented end of terrace five-bedroom house, which has been extended to offer flexible accommodation, ideal for a family. Located adjacent to woodland in the popular village of Fishbourne, just 5 minutes from historic Chichester, this modern property is arranged over three floors..."
"A lovely light and bright three bedroom semi-detached cottage located within easy walking distance of the city centre. The property offers flexible accommodation arranged over two storeys. On the ground floor there is a study/bedroom to the front with separate shower room, a fitted kitchen/dining..."
The Thespian is the perfect *ENERGY EFFICIENT CHAIN FREE* 3-bedroom home that features *2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS & ONE SINGLE* with an *EN SUITE* to bedroom 1. This home comes with an open-plan kitchen and dining area which feature *FRENCH DOORS*. Along with a *SEPERATE LIVING ROOM* with *BAY WINDOW*.
"A three bedroom, chain free, mid-terraced house on a popular and quiet residential road close to Chichester city centre. The property offers spacious accommodation arranged over two floors and has 100' garden."
"This property is a spacious semi-detached house located in the Indigo Park estate. Featuring an open-plan kitchen/diner with elegant French doors leading to the rear garden as well as a separate front-facing living room with the addition of a bay window, this home has plenty of space for a growin..."
A very well presented MODERN TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM HOUSE situated on an EXCLUSIVE DEVELOPMENT just to the northern side of the city and being within walking distance of the City Centre. The house has private parking and is offered for sale with vacant possession.
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £376,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £570,000"
"This gorgeous semi-detached house sits in the stunning Indigo Park development and boasts spacious accommodation and ample storage throughout. This modern family home offers owners a spacious, open-plan kitchen/dining room, plus a sizeable living room - ideal for entertaining and relaxing. Situat..."
"Save £12,000 with our mortgage contribution scheme on this 3 bedroom Gosford home which is traditional on the outside, stylish and modern on the inside"
"AN IMMACULATELY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE just slightly to the east of Chichester city centre, COMPLETED IN 2020 this superb house still benefits from the remainder of the NHBC warranty and is presented in immaculate condition. The property has very well laid out accommodation s..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN. Close to the CITY CENTRE, a TERRACED HOUSE requiring COMPLETE MODERNISATION. Two/three bedrooms, enclosed rear garden. EPC-F"
A well presented end of terrace 3 bedroom house located in the sought after development of Graylingwell Park benefitting from a short walk to the north of the city. The property offers superb flexible and spacious accommodation set over two floors with a beautifully fitted kitchen with integral a...
"**GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £425,000** Features Spacious terraced town house close to Chichester city centre 3 bedrooms Ground floor bedroom with door to sunny rear garden 1st floor lounge Fitted kitchen and dining room Gas central heating Windows and external doors ..."
"Chain free! A chance to secure a semi-detached chalet bungalow in the desirable area of Donnington. This property benefits from a garage and driveway, and is located on a great size corner plot. The home offers fantastic scope to be developed (subject to consents) so the new owner can really put ..."
A comfortable family home full of light and space within a short walk from Bishop Luffa school (OFSTED - outstanding in all areas). The location combines an easy walk into the town centre of Chichester or three minute walk to the beautiful harbour at Fishbourne.  This home provides easy...
"Save £11,250 on this 3 bedroom home with our Key Worker* scheme making the Gosford a perfect choice for first time buyers or a young family."
"Semi detached chalet style bungalow benefiting from OFF ROAD PARKING, GARAGE, LARGE FRONT GARDEN and offered chain free."
"A delightful two bedroom ground floor apartment located in the much favoured Bernardsgate development in Summersdale. Summersdale's post office stores, doctor's surgery and bus transport are all within short walking distance whilst the city centre along with its shopping precincts offers..."
St. Agnes Place was constructed circa 2004 to a high standard and is located a short distance to the east of Chichester vibrant city centre. This light and airy apartment offers modern and practical city living and has the added benefit of allocated parking and a pretty communal garden. The garde...
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Chandler is a stunning *ENERGY EFFICIENT CHAIN FREE* home with *3 DOUBLE BEDROOMS & ONE SINGLE*, an *EN SUITE* to bedroom 1 and a *MODERN FAMILY BATHROOM* with *ROCA SANITARYWARE*, an *OPEN PLAN* kitchen and dining area"
"A lovely 2-bedroom Grade II listed period cottage located in a sought-after, quiet area of Chichester, just to the north of the centre, but still within easy walking distance of the main shopping area and local amenities. The property is vacant and chain free and has a light and bright feel throu..."
"CHAIN FREE and LARGE GARAGE PARKING TO THE REAR. A well-presented, two-bedroom end of terrace house located in the highly sought-after location of Cambrai Avenue close to Chichester City Centre. The property is arranged over two floors, with a bay-fronted sitting room, dining room, kitchen and co..."
"Offering flexible living over three floors, The Elder accommodates everyone in contemporary comfort. A spacious sitting room with French doors leading to rear garden, stunning bedroom 1 with fitted wardrobe and en-suite. Don't miss out! "
"NO ONWARD CHAIN. A newly refurbished TERRACED HOUSE in a small private cul-de-sac about 1 mile west of the city centre. OPEN PLAN kitchen/dining/living room, cloakroom, FOUR BEDROOMS, en suite, bathroom, TWO PARKING SPACES. EPC-C"
"*The Tailor* is a modern, energy efficient and chain free family home that features an en suite to bedroom 1, French doors to the rear garden, an open-plan kitchen and dining area, plus a spacious front-facing living room - ideal for entertaining and relaxing. *10 YEARS NHBC WARRANTY* *BRAND NEW*"
"White and Brooks are pleased to offer for sale this three-bedroom end-of-terrace family home, situated within walking distance of Chichester city centre. Extensively refurbished, this deceptively large property offers three double bedrooms, with the stunning primary taking up the whole second fl..."
Welcoming to the market this well-presented and spacious three-bedroom semi-detached family home benefits from two garages and is being offered with no forward chain. Ideally situated in a modern development and is within walking distance of Chichester City Centre. The accommodation comprises a h...
"White & Brooks are pleased to welcome this recently modernised mid-terraced property to the market, situated in a popular residential location and within walking distance of Chichester City Centre. The accommodation briefly comprises an entrance porch, hallway, and a downstairs cloakroom. The..."
"White & Brooks are delighted to offer to the market this traditional three-bedroom semi-detached house, located within walking distance of the centre of historic Chichester. The property is Sussex flint fronted, with the hallway leading onto a spacious living/dining room, complete with a bay..."
"CHAIN FREE. A bright and airy RETIREMENT APARTMENT overlooking COMMUNAL GARDENS. New carpets and decoration, TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS, communal facilities including parking, residents' lounge, laundry room and attractive gardens. Guest suite and manager. EPC-C"
"NO ONWARD CHAIN. A newly refurbished TERRACED HOUSE in a small private cul-de-sac about 1 mile west of the city centre. OPEN PLAN kitchen/dining/living room, cloakroom, THREE BEDROOMS, en suite, bathroom, TWO PARKING SPACES. EPC-C"
"The charming Crofton has that lovely COTTAGE FEEL, offering 2 BEDROOMS, a BRIGHT KITCHEN/DINING ROOM with patio doors onto the garden making this the perfect home for a couple or small family. The Crofton also benefits from TWO PARKING SPACES."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £363,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £550,000"
"With 3 bedrooms, the Gosford is perfect for anyone looking for a little extra space and this home boasts a west facing garden"
Stylish 2 BEDROOM ENERGY EFFICIENT HOME * AMAZING MOVE-MAKING OFFERS* Open plan kitchen/dining with FRENCH DOORS to rear garden * EN-SUITE to principal bedroom * Built in storage to landing * Downstairs WC and laundry area * Allocated PARKING *
"A superbly presented and recently redecorated GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT in the sought after Roman Quarter development, located in the HEART OF THE CITY, within the ancient Roman Walls. The property has a bright southerly aspect with a LARGE OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/SITTING/DINING ROOM with a door onto a PR..."
"Buyers Fees apply - see brochure for details. Situated in a popular location, just outside of Chichester, this semi-detached chalet bungalow has everything needed to be a great place to call home. With fantastic sized bedrooms and living spaces as well as an integral garage and additional parking..."
A well presented semi-detached two bedroom/two reception room bungalow located in a highly regarded cul-de-sac setting and is being offered with no forward chain. The well-presented living accommodation is accessed via a spacious entrance hall which leads to all rooms. The spacious living room wi...
A well-presented spacious three/four bedroom maisonette located just to the north of Chichester centre within the City Walls. The property has been suitably updated by the current owners over the last couple of years which includes a newly fitted kitchen and a modernised shower room. The accommo...
"**NO ONWARDS CHAIN** King & Chasemore are delighted to present to the market a very well-situated Three Bedroom Semi-Detached House located on the doorstep of Chichester’s City Centre, popular theatres and parks. The FAMILY HOME is set over two floors and has been modernised ..."
A charming GRADE II LISTED MEWS COTTAGE forming part of an EXCLUSIVE COMMUNITY comprises just eight cottages. TWO BEDROOMS. Exclusively for buyers of 60 years and over. Beautifully maintained communal courtyard garden. Parking. CONVENIENT FOR CITY CENTRE.
A THREE BED SEMI-DETACHED property conveniently located near to the HOSPITAL and UNIVERSITY. The property benefits from a GARAGE and OFF ROAD PARKING and is being sold with NO FORWARD CHAIN.
"King & Chasemore present to the market a very well-situated two bedroom terraced cottage located within a sought-after area of Chichester's City Centre. The perfect purchase for investors, renovators, first time buyers and person's looking to downsize. On the ground floor there ar..."
NOW READY TO MOVE INTO ! SHOW APARTMENT AVAILABLE TO VIEW - CALL TO BOOK YOUR PERSONAL APPOINTMENT. An exclusive development of just 6 apartments. Plot 1 - ground floor 2 bedroom apartment with 2 parking spaces.
"Stylish terraced house within walking distance of city centre with 2 beds, open plan kitchen/living room, courtyard garden and carport."
"No Onward Chain! A very pretty well presented two bedroom semi-detached cottage located within striking distance of the city centre. This property has accommodation arranged over two stories, the ground floor includes a fitted kitchen, cloakroom WC and a spacious living/dining room with a firepla..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £337,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £510,000"
"A well-proportioned 3 bedroom link detached house with a south facing garden, a garage and driveway parking. ***NO ONWARD CHAIN*** Entrance hall | Sitting room | Dining room/Kitchen | 3 bedrooms | Bathroom Garage | ..."
Come and explore this energy efficient 2 bedroom home with open plan living / dining room* FANTASTIC OFFERS TO HELP YOU MOVE*Contemporary styled fitted kitchen * Downstairs WC * Allocated PARKING spaces * EN-SUITE shower room to principal bedroom * Built-in STORAGE cupboard
"A charming two bedroom character end of terrace, conveniently located along the North city wall of Chichester. "
A superbly presented FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT in the delightful SUMMERSDALE area of Chichester about 1 mile to the north of the city centre. The property has a large SOUTHERLY FACING BALCONY with views over the well maintained communal gardens.
"A beautifully presented two double bedroom multi aspect apartment with a delightful south facing balcony, a garage and a well-kept communal garden, located within the popular Summersdale area of the city. ***NO ONWARD CHAIN*** <..."
"Chain free, semi-detached house located in Chichester, offering easy access to local schools and transport links. This property offers ample inside and outdoor space making it perfect for family life. Presented to a lovely standard, you could pick up the keys and move straight in - this would mak..."
"A very pretty two bedroom end of terrace house, with the added benefit of a usable loft room, located within striking distance of Chichester city centre and the train station. The property has accommodation full of charm arranged over three stories with a sitting room, dining room, fitted kitchen..."
"A well-presented, three-bedroom, mid-terrace house with views over neighbouring fields, located in the sought after and quiet area of Donnington, within an easy cycle or walk along the canal tow path into the centre of Chichester. The property has been updated in recent years, including replaceme..."
A 2 double bedroom end of terrace house situated in this tucked away cul de sac position only 1 mile from the University and hospital and 1.5 miles from the city centre. The property has been extensively improved by the present owners and internal accommodation includes an enclosed entrance lobb...
**IDEAL INVESTMENT/FIRST TIME PURCHASE** | Two Bedroom End of Terrace House | Living Room | Kitchen/Dining Room | Brick Built Conservatory | W.C./Utility Room | Bathroom | Corner Plot | Potential to Extend (STPC) | Garage
Buyers Fees apply - see brochure for details. This delightful ground floor apartment with allocated parking is part of the highly sought after William Cawley Mews development. Inside offers light and airy rooms including a sizeable lounge and a separate study. The property is only a short walk fr...
A well situated end of terrace house standing on a cul-de-sac in Fishbourne. *** NO ONWARD CHAIN *** Entrance hall | WC/cloakroom | Kitchen/breakfast room | Sitting room | 3 bedrooms | En-suite shower room | Family bat...
"King & Chasemore are delighted to present to the market a very spacious Three Bedroom End of Terrace House located within close distance to Chichester’s City Centre, popular theatres and parks. The FAMILY HOME has an extended ENTRANCE PORCH leading through to the light and ai..."
***NO FORWARD CHAIN*** King & Chasemore are delighted to present to the market a very well-situated Two Bedroom End Terraced House. Within very close proximity to Chichester's City Centre the property lies within a gated community. This modern property is set over two floors and c...
"The Gables, Fishbourne by Seaward Homes. An exclusive development of just 6 apartments. Plot 5 a 2 bedroom apartment with 2 parking spaces. READY TO MOVE INTO - ASK FOR DETAILS!"
"Set in a sought after, quiet residential location and under a mile from Chichester City Centre, is this recently refurbished ground floor apartment. As you walk through the front door of this home you will be taken back by both, the condition and size. With a living area of over 720 sq..."
"Situated in the west of the city, an extremely spacious purpose-built 3 bedroom ground floor apartment."
"A modern two bedroom house located to the east of Chichester city centre. The property has very well laid out accommodation arranged over two floors, on the ground floor a fantastic kitchen with built in appliances, cloakroom and good size sitting/dining room with double doors to the westerly asp..."
"Set in the desirable Shopwhyke Lakes development, this end of terrace house would make an ideal first home or rental investment. The accommodation is light and airy throughout, and it also benefits from a lovely sized garden to the rear. The property has allocated parking, plus it is only a short..."
"An immaculate two-bedroom second floor apartment with parking situated in the sought after St Agnes Place development, built in 2003 by Berkeley Homes and within easy striking distance of Chichester city centre. The property has particularly well-proportioned accommodation with the second bedroom..."
"A mid-terrace two-bedroom house, situated in Donnington, just south of the A27 and the centre of historic Chichester. A large porch leads into the hall and into a stylish modern kitchen. The open plan living/dining room has ample space for relaxing and entertaining and benefits from patio doors..."
"A spacious two-bedroom flat, located in one of most sought-after apartment blocks within the city walls of historic Chichester. Situated on the second floor, the property has been renovated throughout and has a long entrance hall leading onto a large living room with a feature fireplace, a West ..."
"Chain Free! Tucked away in a peaceful cul-de-sac, this sizeable terraced house would suit a number of buyers. With ample storage and a spacious kitchen/diner, this home is perfect for families - especially as it also benefits from a sunny, easy to maintain rear garden. The property boasts light a..."
"White & Brooks are pleased to welcome to the market this beautiful one bedroom retirement apartment situated in a central location, close to all the essential amenities and public transport. The development is within easy reach of the local shops, supermarkets and tourist attractions, so you ..."
***NO ONWARDS CHAIN*** King & Chasemore are delighted to present to the market a very well-situated Two Bedroom Semi-Detached House. Within very close proximity to Chichester's City Centre the property lies within a sought-after location. The property is set over two f...
A THREE BED terraced property conveniently located near to the HOSPITAL and UNIVERSITY. The property is being sold with NO FORWARD CHAIN.
"A three bedroom mid-terraced house with investment opportunity located within striking distance of the City Centre, train station and Chichester Canal. The property has spacious accommodation with a entrance hall to the front, separate sitting room and dining room, kitchen, conservatory leading o..."
" White and Brooks are pleased to offer for sale this purpose-built ground-floor apartment situated in a very popular development in leafy Summersdale, close to the centre of historic Chichester. The accommodation comprises two double bedrooms, the primary with an ensuite, a fam..."
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000 to £325,000. A 4 bedroom house currently let to students (tenancy ends summer 2023) conveniently situated only half a mile from the university and 1 mile from the city centre. Internal accommodation offers an entrance lobby, 14ft 7 lounge, 11ft 4 downstairs bedroom, 11ft 3 ..."
"A vacant period 2 bedroom end terraced house requiring refurbishment, located in a popular residential area within walking distance of local amenities and city centre. Ideal for owner occupation or letting investment at approximately £1400 PCM."
"Set in a quiet location, within easy reach of Chichester City centre and walks along the South Downs National park, leaders are delighted to market this delightful Three bedroom home. The property is set over three floors and benefits from a modern double glazed entrance porch leading into t..."
"Modern two double bedroom house set in a popular development on the GOODWOOD ESTATE. Benefiting from EN SUITE, parking, modern fitted kitchen and paved garden the house is offered in excellent order throughout."
"** NO FORWARD CHAIN ** This 3 Bedroom link detached Bungalow offers appx 850sqft of accommodation and is located in the popular village of Fishbourne. Situated in a cul-de-sac, the property is within easy reach of Chichester City Centre and all its amenities. The bungalow is deceptive and has b..."
"A modern and beautifully presented ground floor apartment with two bedrooms and allocated parking, set in the attractive and contemporary Roussillon Park development, just north of Chichester vibrant city centre. Open plan kitchen / Sitting room | Inner hall | Bedroom one | Bedroom two |..."
"A characterful semi-detached period cottage, with the benefit of an enclosed rear garden, situated on a quiet road within level walking distance of Chichester’s historic city centre. No onward chain."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £297,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £450,000"
"White & Brooks are pleased to offer this two-bedroom ground floor apartment in a quiet secluded setting within a short walk of Chichester City Centre and with no forward chain. In brief, the accommodation comprises a covered porch, light and airy entrance hallway, spacious living-dining room,..."
"***INVESTORS ONLY*** FABULOUS NEWLY CONVERTED TOP FLOOR APARTMENT WITH VAST ACCOPMMODATION....the apartment has been very well fitted with stylish units, and the OPEN PLAN KITCHEN is a real feature. Early viewing is essential to fully appreciate the SPACE and STYLE of this super flat."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £294,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £445,000"
"Well-presented 3 bedroom flat located in Chichester, West Sussex. ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** SHARE OF FREEHOLD ** Comprises of: Warm and welcoming entrance hall Bright and spacious living room Well-appointed kitchen/diner with base and wall units Generously s..."
We are excited to offer to the market this charming grade II listed cottage located within walking distance of Chichester City Centre. The property is need of full modernisation throughout and is being offered for sale to cash buyers only. The accommodation on the first floor comprises a double b...
A light 2 bedroom mid-terraced house with a low maintenance south facing garden and a garage. *** NO ONWARD CHAIN *** Entrance hall | Kitchen | Reception room | Downstairs WC | 2 Bedrooms | Bathroom | South-facing garden | G...
"A beautifully presented CHAIN FREE two bedroom end terraced house located just under 1 mile from Chichester City Centre. The property offers light and well-proportioned accommodation comprising a fitted kitchen, generous sitting/dining room leading to the double glazed conservatory on the ground ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £280,000 to £290,000. A 2 double bedroom end of terrace house situated in this popular residential area just 1 mile to the north of Chichester city centre near to both the university and hospital. Internal accommodation is well laid out and offers a 14ft 7 lounge, 17ft 7 kitchen, ut..."
"A beautiful CONTEMPORARY FIRST FLOOR 2 BEDROOM APARTMENT located at the southern end of the city centre in a modern DEVELOPMENT by St Cross Homes Limited. Superbly presented, the property is an ideal investment or first time purchase."
"A beautiful CONTEMPORARY FIRST FLOOR 2 BEDROOM APARTMENT located at the southern end of the city centre in a development by St Cross Homes Limited in 2020. Superbly presented, the property has lovely kitchens with high quality units incorporating handle less soft close doors and drawers and pelme..."
"***NO ONWARDS CHAIN*** King & Chasemore present to the market a very well-situated two bedroom terraced house. Within very close proximity to Chichester's City Centre, theatres and easy access to the A27 by-pass, the property lies within a sought-after location. Perfec..."
"A beautifully renovated terraced house overlooking a communal green and positioned in a pleasant, residential cul-de-sac. This property offers 2 allocated parking spaces as well as easy access into Chichester's city centre. Inside, the home boasts a spacious family bathroom and excellent sized be..."
A particularly handsome and spacious first floor apartment (approx. 718 sq ft) situated within a former rectory with the benefit of off street parking and being level walking distance to the city centre.
"**INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY** A particularly stylish and contemporary apartment, converted from a period Victorian building, sold with tenants in situ paying £1,175 pcm with the tenancy running until August 2023. Bright open plan living/dining kitchen | Utility cupboard | Two double bedroom..."
***NO ONWARDS CHAIN*** King and Chasemore are delighted to welcome to the market a delightful upper floor TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT which is located at the foot of the South Downs and on the edge of the Goodwood Estate and set within 85 acres of glorious Parkland. Converted to Luxury Apar...
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Holbein is a modern 2-bedroom apartment that features a contemporary bathroom - which benefits from a towel warmer - a balcony, and a spacious open-plan kitchen, living, and dining room."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Rossetti is a spacious 2-bedroom apartment that features a modern bathroom, outdoor balcony space, and an open-plan kitchen, living, and dining room. The kitchen benefits from stylish fitted units, plus an integrated appliances."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Gainsborough is a 2-bedroom apartment that features a dual-aspect open-plan kitchen, living, and dining room - which benefits from an adjacent balcony - excellent storage space, and a modern bathroom."
A two bedroom split level apartment set in the sought-after location of Lyndhurst Road just outside Chichester city centre. The property has a private entrance and benefits from parking for two cars and its own courtyard garden. The accommodation is arranged over two floors. On the first floor...
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Murphy is a modern 2-bedroom apartment that features an open-plan kitchen, living, and dining room - which benefits from an adjacent outdoor patio space - excellent storage facilities, and a stylish bathroom "
"An attractive one bedroom, brick and flint period cottage with a large west facing rear garden and potential to extend (STPP), set on a popular road close to Chichester’s historic city centre. NO FORWARD CHIAN Lounge | Kitchen | Conservatory | Bedroom | Bathroom | Gas central h..."
"*PERFECT FIRST TIME BUYER HOME* The Pourri is a modern 2-bedroom apartment that features a dual-aspect open-plan kitchen, living, and dining room - which benefits from an adjacent patio - excellent storage space, and a modern well-equipped bathroom. *ENERGY EFFICIENT HOME* *10 YEARS NHBC WARRANTY*"
"*PERFECT FIRST TIME BUYER HOME* The Chaberton is a spacious 2-bed apartment that features an outdoor patio space, modern bathroom, and an open-plan kitchen, living, and dining room. The kitchen comes complete with a Zanussi single oven/hob, hood, fridge freezer, and dishwasher. *ENERGY EFFICIENT*"
A two bedroom mid terraced house situated on a popular development about one mile from the city centre. An ideal first home of buy to let investment the property. double glazed conservatory overlooking south facing rear garden. no onward chain. EPC-D
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £254,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £385,000"
"A spacious, ground floor apartment located in the beautiful Indigo Park development. This property features a dual-aspect kitchen/living/dining area with integrated appliances and a contemporary bathroom. For those who enjoy outdoor living, the home boasts an adjacent patio - perfect for relaxing..."
"Vacant and chain free! A spacious, second floor apartment only a short walk from Chichester's city centre. The property benefits from residents' parking and a garage plus a private balcony, all set in pleasant communal gardens. With a secure phone entry system, and excellent public transport link..."
"***NO ONWARDS CHAIN*** King & Chasemore are delighted to present to the market a delightful one bedroom apartment located on the doorstep of Chichester's city centre. The ground floor apartment is marketed with no onwards chain and is an ideal purchase for first time buyers, invest..."
A spacious ground floor apartment forming part of a modern purpose-built development a short walk to the west of the city centre with open plan living room/kitchen with double doors opening onto a small terrace and southerly aspect communal garden.
"A delightful one-bedroom garden flat situated in a much sought-after City centre location within walking distance of lots of fabulous shops, amenities, bars and restaurants. This is the ideal home or investment property with a share of freehold."
"A superb first floor, west facing, two bedroom retirement apartment in the city centre. It has been improved further with a new kitchen and bathroom in 2021. For sale with no forward chain. The apartment is part of a small and select development and incredibly convenient for the mainline railway ..."
Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this lovely two bedroom first floor apartment overlooking the communal garden. The property offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout and is presented in fantastic order. The Lounge offers ample space for living and din...
"A beautiful CONTEMPORARY SECOND FLOOR 2 BEDROOM APARTMENT located at the southern end of the city centre in a DEVELOPMENT by St Cross Homes Limited. Superbly presented, the property has lovely kitchens with high quality units incorporating handle less soft close doors and drawers and pelmet light..."
"An excellent northerly facing, first floor retirement apartment overlooking communal gardens in this McCarthy and Stone assisted living development. Good size entrance hall | Sitting/ dining room | Kitchen | Two bedrooms | Bathroom and shower room | Night storage heating | Double glazin..."
"MODERN FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT, 999 year lease, BUILT 2021 WITH REMAINDER OF 10 YEAR NHBC WARRANTY, striking distance of the city, OPEN PLAN LOUNGE DINER, light and spacious, BALCONY, cycle store, ALLOCATED PARKING, communal grounds, GREAT FIRST PROPERTY/LOCK UP AND LEAVE, viewing essential."
"An excellent westerly facing, second floor retirement apartment (served by a lift) in this McCarthy and Stone assisted living development. Entrance hall | Lounge/dining room | Kitchen | Two bedrooms | Bathroom and shower room | Night storage heating | Double glazing House Manage..."
"An opportunity to acquire a spacious dual aspect, two bedroom retirement apartment, in this popular assisted living development. Large entrance hall | Two storage cupboards | Lounge with Juliet balcony | Kitchen | Two double bedrooms | Bath and shower room | Night storage heating | Dou..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN. A bright GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT in an attractive development ¾ mile from the city centre. Own private entrance, TWO BEDROOMS, contemporary kitchen and ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE. EPC-C"
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Redpath is a contemporary 1-bedroom apartment that features a spacious bedroom, excellent storage capacity, and a well-equipped bathroom. The open-plan kitchen, living, and dining area is perfectly designed for socialising"
"*PERFECT FIRST TIME BUYER HOME* The Ventoux is a modern 2-bedroom apartment that features an open-plan kitchen, living, and dining room - which benefits from an adjacent balcony space - a dual-aspect living space, and a contemporary bathroom. *10 YEARS NHBC WARRANTY* *ENERGY EFFICIENT HOME*"
"A modern and contemporary, westerly facing two bedroom retirement apartment, which has been completely refurbished throughout to a very high standard, standing in this convenient position within walking distance of Chichester City centre. Entrance hall | Linen/Utility cupboard | Sitting..."
"Offered with VACANT POSSESSION, a well presented purpose built, 2 bedroom, ground floor apartment within walking distance of the city centre."
"*PERFECT FIRST TIME BUYER HOME* The Colombier is a 2-bedroom apartment that features an open-plan kitchen, living, and dining room, an adjacent balcony, and a stylish bathroom. The kitchen comes complete with fitted units and integrated Zanussi single oven/hob/hood, fridge freezer, and dishwasher."
"Chain free! Set in charming grounds just outside the historic city walls, this first floor apartment has sizeable rooms including a fantastic lounge/dining room. With allocated parking, plus spaces available for visitors, this property is ideal for investors looking to add to their portfolio. At ..."
A spacious top floor flat (approached via a lift) forming part of a period building in the centre of Chichester overlooking Southgate. Spacious entrance hall | Open plan living/dining room with kitchen | Two double bedrooms | En-suite shower | Main bathroom | Electric heating | Bike s...
"PUBLIC NOTICE - 3 Blakes Cottages, Main Road, Fishbourne, PO18 8BD. We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £240,000 on the above property. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before exchange of contracts takes..."
"GUIDE PRICE £230,000 - £240,000 | A rare opportunity to acquire a superb purpose built apartment with two double bedrooms and one bathroom situated in the extremely popular Church Square of Chichester City Centre moments from Chichester's mainline railway station."
"Chain free! This ground floor flat is ideally located for those looking for easy access into Chichester's city centre, being only a short walk to the shops and close to the hospital. The property offers allocated parking - a premium in the city centre - and benefits from communal gardens which ar..."
"*** END OF CHAIN*** King & Chasemore are delighted to market a very well-situated upper floor apartment located on the doorstep of Chichester's city centre. The top floor apartment is marketed with no onwards chain and is an ideal purchase for first time buyers, investor's and persons looking..."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Pesselino is a modern 1-bedroom apartment that features a spacious open-plan kitchen, living, and dining room, contemporary bathroom, and excellent storage facilities. The living space benefits from an adjacent patio."
Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this lovely two bedroom second floor apartment overlooking the communal garden. The property offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout and is presented in good order. The Lounge offers ample space for living and dining ...
A fantastic FIRST FLOOR apartment situated on the outskirts of CHICHESTER on a MODERN DEVELOPMENT. The property benefits from ALLOCATED PARKING and communal BIKE STORE.
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £215,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £325,000"
Wonderful 3 bedroom semi-detached house in the Madgwick Park development. The price advertised represents purchasing a 50% share of the home
"*PERFECT FIRST TIME BUYER HOME* The Tabor is a modern 1-bedroom apartment that features a spacious open-plan kitchen, living/dining room, excellent storage facilities, and a contemporary bathroom that benefits from Roca and Mira sanitaryware, Bristan chrome-finish brassware & stylish wall tiling"
King and Chasemore are delighted to present a recently renovated one bedroom apartment at St. Richards Lodge. The retirement accommodation is located on the ground floor and accessed via the communal. There is a generously sized living/dining area with plenty of space for home furnish...
"Chain free, first floor retirement flat in the heart of the city centre. Located in an age restricted (over 55s) development, this property offers elevator assistance to all floors along with a site manager to aid residents. Easy access to local shops and restaurants make this home ideally locate..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £182,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £275,000"
"A beautifully proportioned first floor flat, served by a lift with a South-Westerly aspect out to the stunning communal gardens. This popular retirement development is just a short walk from the Chichester Festival Theatre, Cathedral and the many attractions of the City centre. Good siz..."
"This one double bedroom, ground floor, garden, retirement apartment is located just outside the city walls, is beautifully and stylishly presented, and enjoys a bright and open double aspect to the west and north. It is located just along from the communal laundry room and the communal lounge as ..."
A spacious second floor retirement apartment close to the centre of Chichester. Conveniently located near the lift. Entrance hall | Spacious sitting room | Kitchen | Shower room | Two double bedrooms | Night storage heating | Double/triple glazing Laundry room | Residents loun...
"A bright southerly facing ground floor retirement apartment in this popular development just off Westgate, within walking distance of all the city centre facilities. Entrance hall | Sitting room | Kitchen | Bedroom | Shower room | Private patio | Night storage heating | Double glazing"
"A charming and elegant, ground floor apartment with a private courtyard in addition to a communal garden, quietly located just to the north of Chichester’s historic city centre. NO FORWARD CHAIN Entrance hall | Sitting room | Kitchen | Bedroom | Bathroom | Private south west fac..."
"White and Brooks are delighted to offer to the market this one bedroom ground floor flat situated within the heart of Chichester and is being offered with no forward chain. In brief, the layout provides an entrance hallway, kitchen with built in appliances, a living room, bathroom and a good size..."
"A bright, spacious and larger than average top floor retirement apartment which has been decorated throughout, situated in this desirable development just a short distance from Chichester City centre. Large entrance hall | Lounge | Kitchen | Bedroom | Bath & shower room | Electric heat..."
"Forming part of a beautiful detached former Rectory in a tucked away location within walking distance of the city centre, a light, bright apartment with the benefit of private enclosed garden being sold with no onward chain."
"A light, bright city centre apartment within a few minutes walk of the main shopping precinct."
PURPOSE BUILT APARTMENT on the cusp of Chichester city centre within easy walking distance of shops and the station. Offered chain free.
"Located in a convenient position for Chichester city centre, 19 Caernarvon Road is a well-presented first floor apartment located in a popular residential area. The apartment benefits from a recently modernised kitchen and bathroom, L-shaped sitting/dining room and a bedroom. "
Wonderful 2 bedroom semi-detached house in the Madgwick Park development. The price advertised represents purchasing a 50% share of the home
A well appointed ground floor retirement flat with the advantage of french windows opening onto a patio with communal gardens beyond. The Maltings is a popular retirement development close to Westgate and a short distance from the city centre with all of its facilities. Entrance hall | ...
"GUIDE PRICE £170,000 to £180,000. A purpose built first floor flat situated next to St Richards hospital and only half a mile from the city centre. Internal accommodation offers a 13ft 3 lounge, kitchen, double bedroom and shower room. Externally there is residents parking & a brick built stor..."
A first floor retirement flat (served by a lift) overlooking the beautifully kept communal gardens in the popular development of Byron Court. Entrance hall | Sitting room | Kitchen | Bedroom | Wet room | Night storage heating |Double glazing House Manager | Table service restau...
"A bright and well presented, second floor retirement apartment in this popular development just a short distance from the city centre. Entrance hall | Sitting room | Kitchen | Bedroom | Bath and shower room | Night storage heating | Double glazing House Manager | Table service r..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £165,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £250,000"
"Located in a popular area to the east of the city centre, this two bedroom first floor apartment offers a surprising amount of accommodation, which briefly comprises the entrance hallway with storage cupboards, a generous sitting room, open to a separate dining area, a fully fitted kitchen, mode..."
"Investment Opportunity - a two bedroom upper floor apartment within striking distance of Chichester City Centre. The property has neutrally decorated accommodation comprising two bedrooms, bathroom with a shower over the bath, sitting room and an a separate dining space and a fitted kitchen. Outs..."
A first floor one bedroom retirement flat (over 60 years of age) situated in this popular development within Chichester city centre enjoying delightful views over the communal gardens. The apartment underwent considerable refurbishment 2 years ago and is offered for sale with vacant possession a...
"A well presented and spacious top floor retirement flat in this popular assisted living development, with windows overlooking the communal gardens. Entrance hall | Storage cupboards | Lounge/dining room | Kitchen | Bedroom | Bath and shower room House Manager | Table service re..."
"An attractive and very well situated south easterly facing second floor retirement apartment, in this popular assisted living development of Byron Court. Entrance hall with large storage cupboard | L shaped sitting/dining room | Kitchen | Bedroom | Wet room | Night storage heating | Doub..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £152,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £230,000"
"£150,000 is for a 50% share purchase, the full property price is £300,000. The minimum CASH DEPOSIT you will need is £60,000. Turn any freehold property into part buy –part rent with Leaders Estate Agents and ‘Your Home’. You simply need 20% cash deposit o..."
"A well-presented terraced house close to the Goodwood Estate, this property has an excellent sized rear garden and is shared ownership (advertised price represents a 40% share). Offering spacious accommodation throughout plus ample storage, this property would make an ideal first home. This terra..."
"FREE SITE FEES FOR 2023! Surrounded by eleven lakes, Lakeside Holiday Park is set within close proximity of Chichester City Centre, this quiet site is open for 11.5 months a year. As an owner, you would become an exclusive member of the owners club which allows exclusive use of the outdoor s..."
"A first floor, westerly facing retirement apartment, situated in this popular assisted living development in Chichester. Entrance hall | Lounge | Kitchen | Bedroom | Bath and shower room | Night storage heating | Double glazing House Manager | Table service restaurant | Residen..."
"A delightful, dual aspect, retirement apartment, located just a long from the Cathedral and the main shopping precinct. There is a spacious dual aspect sitting room and a modern kitchen. The double bedroom has a fitted wardrobe and the bathroom has been converted into a shower room. The heating..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £149,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £225,000"
"A bright and well presented first floor retirement apartment, set within this popular development with attractive communal grounds, just a short distance from Chichester City Centre. Entrance hall | Sitting/Dining room | Kitchen | Bedroom | Shower room | Night storage heating | Double g..."
"A particularly well positioned, top floor retirement flat (served by a lift) with views to the south and east looking out to Chichester Cathedral. Entrance hall | Two storage cupboards | Bright dual-aspect lounge/dining room | Kitchen with window | Bedroom | Bathroom | Night storage hea..."
A light and spacious first floor (served by a lift) retirement flat facing in a westerly direction and standing in this very popular development within walking distance of the City centre. Entrance hall | Large storage cupboard | Living/dining room | Kitchen | Double bedroom with built-...
King & Chasemore present to the market a competitively priced one bedroom upper floor retirement apartment with garden views. Situated in a sought-after area on the doorstep of Chichester's city centre within walking distance of the town centre and nearby to the train station. The...
King and Chasemore are delighted to present this competitively priced one-bedroom first floor apartment at St. Richards Lodge. The retirement accommodation is accessed via the communal stairs or lift & boasts a generously sized living area with plenty of space for home furnishings...
"A well presented, westerly facing top floor retirement apartment, situated in this popular development within walking distance of the city centre facilities. Entrance hall | Sitting/dining room | Kitchen | Bedroom | Modern shower room | Night storage heating | Double glazing Ho..."
"This ground floor, west facing, retirement flat is located in an excellent position within the city walls in the centre of the city, and is close to the main shopping centre and the cathedral. It is very well presented and is decorated and has brand new carpets. It within a highly sought after de..."
A completely redecorated second floor retirement apartment (served by a lift) with new flooring and lighting throughout in a central position in Chichester with views across to the Cathedral spire. Entrance hall | Large walk-in airing and storage cupboard | Well proportioned sitting/dini...
"A conveniently situated and well presented second floor retirement apartment, located just a short walk from the both the city centre and good public transport links. Entrance hall | Sitting room | Kitchen | Bedroom | Bathroom | Night storage heating | Double glazing House Mana..."
"An easterly facing top floor retirement flat which overlooks the communal gardens, situated in this popular Churchill development. Entrance hall | Good size lounge/dining room | Kitchen | Bedroom | Shower room | Electric heating | Double glazing Communal gardens | House Manager ..."
"This super RETIREMENT FLAT has been the subject of extensive improvements in recent times and it now has the benefit of a MODERN KITCHEN and BATHROOM. The apartment, which is situated on the Second FLOOR, has the benefit of the use of a lift, as well as a stair case. It has a DOUBLE BEDROOM and g..."
"A bright southerly facing first floor retirement apartment, situated in this popular development, within walking distance of the city centre facilities. Entrance hall | Storage cupboard | Sitting room | Kitchen | Bedroom | Shower room | Night storage heating | Double glazing Ho..."
"A beautifully presented first floor retirement flat, which has been recently decorated throughout, situated in this popular development just a short walk from Chichester City Centre. Entrance hall | Large walk-in storage cupboard | Sitting/Dining room | Kitchen | Bedroom | Bath and sho..."
"A particularly spacious second floor RETIREMENT FLAT, occupying a convenient location just south of the train station. The property has a large RECEPTION ROOM, along with a double bedroom and bathroom/wet room. There are some excellent facilities to be enjoyed by the residents, including a RESTAU..."
King & Chasemore present to the market this competitively priced one bedroom upper floor apartment. Situated in a sought-after area on the doorstep of Chichester's city centre. Within walking distance of the town centre and nearby to the train station. The accommodation boasts a g...
"Avalible with NO FORWARD CHAIN. Leaders are delighted to present this one bedroom retairment property. Located in the heart of Chichester this flat is a short walk away from the town centre, Parklands Doctors Surgery and Tesco Superstore. when entering the flat you are gree..."
"FREE SITE FEES FOR 2023! Surrounded by eleven lakes, Lakeside Holiday Park is the place to be! Set within close proximity of Chichester City Centre, this quiet site is open for 11.5 months a year. As an owner, you would become an exclusive member of the owners club which allows exclusive use..."
"A 1 bedroom first floor maisonette with garden including the freehold of ground floor flat, offered with vacant possession. Located in a popular residential area close to the city centre. Ideal for owner occupation or letting investment with an estimated rent of £750 PCM, gross yield 8.1% PAX."
**PITCH FEES FOR 2023 ALREADY PAID IN FULL** King & Chasemore are delighted to present to the market an immaculate THREE BEDROOM Park Home located on the popular Lakeside Holiday Park with stunning lake views. This exceptionally well-presented lodge compliments TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS...
"A vacant and chain free retirement flat! This light and spacious first floor flat is set in a purpose built development in central Chichester. Benefitting from an on-site warden, secure entry system and access to a residents' lounge, this property really is ideal for retirees. The development als..."
A well situated ground floor retirement flat with access to communal garden and own front entrance within walking distance of the Cathedral City of Chichester. Entrance hall with storage cupboard | Living room | Kitchen | Bedroom with built-in wardrobes | Bathroom Communal garde...
"A first floor 1 BEDROOM APARTMENT for those who are over 60 years old. The property requires refurbishment however would make an idea bolt hole/weekend retreat as well as a permanent home. The development in Henty Gardens, just off Westgate is within a short stroll of the city centre and it's co..."
"A well situated first floor retirement flat, with its own entrance at ground floor level, within walking distance of the Cathedral City of Chichester. Entrance hall | Landing with storage cupboards | Sitting room | Kitchen | Bedroom with built-in wardrobes | Bathroom | Night storage hea..."
Situated on the north east of the City a purpose-built AGE RESTRICTED one bedroomed apartment.
White and Brooks are delighted to offer to the market this well presented two bedroom park home situated in the heart of Chichester. The property comprises of two double bedrooms with the primary benefiting from an en suite. Excellent size dual aspect living room and a sun room that leads out ont...
New 2 bedroom houses in Chichester with Shared Ownership. Shares available from 25%
"**A MUST SEE!!** King & Chasemore are delighted to present to the market an IMMACULATE Three Bedroom Park Home located on the popular Lakeside Holiday Park. This exceptionally well-presented Park Home compliments a DOUBLE MASTER BEDROOM with fantastic storage, SECOND BEDROOM with ..."
"2 bedroom park home situated in a quiet location. 2 good sized bedrooms, an open plan kitchen/diner and a large lounge space. Enquire today for more details!"
"Well presented two bedroom park home, situated in the sought after cathedral city of Chichester. The property comprises of two bedrooms with the primary benefiting from an en suite bathroom. There is an open plan living room/ kitchen and a separate bathroom. The park home further benefits from p..."
"White & Brooks are delighted to offer for sale, this immaculately presented park home in a highly sought after area close to Chichester. This park home is the perfect retreat to relax and unwind. The Living room is open plan to the Kitchen/Diner with attractive seating. There are two twin bed..."
"Situated on the sought after Lakeside development is this exceptionally well presented modern two bedroom lodge. The accommodation briefly comprises two bedrooms with build in storage, ample plug sockets and aerial points. The master benefitting from an en suite bathroom with a bath an..."
A secure UNDERGROUND single PARKING SPACE in the heart of CHICHESER town centre.
A parking space situated inside the City walls located in an underground car park set back from St. Johns Street and a short walk to the shops on East Street.
"PRICE GUIDE £400,000---£425,000 This spacious freehold house is located in a desirable area close to the heart of Colchester's busy city center. It has been lovingly converted into three self-contained flats, perfect for buyers looking to invest or live in one apartment while renting out the oth..."
-Prime development or investment opportunity near Colchester’s Town Centre -Large office building with extensive car parking. -0 5 miles from High Street extending to 1 56 acres. 
"**Portfolio Sale** Located in a prime position to the South of Colchester lies this excellent and rare opportunity to acquire 10 modern apartments in Ballantyne Drive, Hythe Quay, Colchester. Set within a popular modern development, within close proximity of the reputable University Of Essex a..."
"Introducing a luxurious 5-bedroom detached property, situated in the highly sought-after area of Lexden. This stunning property is the epitome of luxury living, boasting an array of impressive features that will take your breath away. As you enter the property, you are welcomed by a spac..."
"A handsome Victorian villa of grand proportions, which was formerly the residence of the Bishop of Colchester, located within the prestigious leafy residential neighbourhood of Lexden"
"Classical Georgian family home totalling approximately 3,225 sq ft in a prime position."
A handsome five bedroom unlisted family home with accommodation extending to around 3640 sq ft with ample secure parking.
"An extended five bedroom, three reception, three storey 1920's detached family home with good size West facing garden complemented with a superb garden room"
"Part of our Signature collection, a bespoke gated development of just eight contemporary 4-bedroom detached homes designed by award-winning local architects, Stanley Bragg. Built by Seven Developments to a high standard with excellent attention to detail, located on the edge of urban Colchester,..."
"Built by award-winning Oak Home Developments, The Croft is an exclusive gated development of just five 4 & 5 bedroom luxury detached homes in sought after Braiswick, Colchester."
Superb executive home located within easy reach of Colchester city centre and local amenities.
"Believed to be the former residence of the local carriage maker, occupying impressive grounds of over a 3rd of an acre is the is fine early c19th II four storey gault brick Regency town house with two excellent outbuildings"
"An extremely rare chance has arisen to purchase this magnificent five bedroom detached 3,500 square ft residence set in the heard of Old Lexden, currently being constructed by highly reputable local developers using traditional methods and with superb attention to detail.Internally you ..."
"A stunning four double bedroom, Victorian style three storey town house located in the heart of Lexden. Inside the property has high ceilings, superb Nicholas Anthony kitchen with dining and seating areas and stylish sitting room. All bedrooms come with en-suite"
"An exceptionally well-presented five-bedroom (two en-suite) detached neo-Victorian style individual property offering 2,475 sq ft of accommodation with three ground-floor reception spaces and further benefitting from a detached double garage, ample private parking and enclosed gardens. Great acce..."
"A well presented four bedroom, two reception family home located in the sought after Kings Park gated development being within a short walk to all local schooling and the city centre"
"A stunning Grade II* Listed Georgian fronted townhouse in the heart of Colchester’s historic centre. This stunning Grade II* Listed house dates from the 17th and 18th Century, being part timber framed with a red brick facade. Main entry is a central pedimented door case with ion..."
"Trinity Townhouse is located in Trinity Street, which consists of a range of fashionable clothing boutiques, numerous tea rooms, the local library, and small specialist shops. The house itself has at various times been used as offices, an art gallery, a doctors surgery and now serves as a trul..."
"This particular property is situated to the north of Colchester, close to good primary and secondary schooling and with shopping facilities for day to day needs nearby. There is good access to the A12/A120 interchange leading to London M25 and A14 to the north. Colchester General Hospital is a..."
"Early viewing is advised of this HMO investment opportunity, conveniently situated in the Hythe area of Colchester, close to Hythe Station. The property benefits from 11 bedsits and currently has 11 tenants living at the property. The property benefits from rear garden and communal washing room."
"This beautifully presented family home resides on one of Colchester’s most sought-after roads, which offers direct access to both the A12 and the North Station and is also within walking distance to many private and public schools of high regard. This spacious residence has undergone a complete t..."
"Boydens are delighted to bring to market this beautifully presented five-bedroom detached residence situated in the highly sought after Lexden area to the West of Colchester. Built in the 1960’s, the property was substantially extended in the 1970’s and now offers an overall floor area of approxi..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase an exceptionally beautiful home in the popular village of Braiswick. There is easy access to both the A12 and mainline railway which gets you to London in under an hour. Within a short walk of the property, there are a wealth of amenities, including golf clubs and a..."
"** GUIDE PRICE 280,000 - £290,000 ** Located in the heart of Highwoods is this immaculately presented, two double bedroom, end of terrace home. Having been maintained excellently by the current owners the home is ready to move straight in. On the ground floor there is a good siz..."
"* Guide Price £500,000 - £525,000 * An attractive three bedroom detached Victorian home set in this highly sought after residential location close to Castle Park, Colchester city centre and stations with services to London Liverpool St offering many attractive period features."
"No chain! A well proportioned five bedroom, four reception family home being within walking distance of Holmwood House and a short drive to Marks Tey station and the A12. The property enjoys superb far reaching views over Colchester taking in sights of Town Hall and Jumbo Water Tower"
"Part of our Signature collection, NO ONWARD CHAIN. A fantastic five bedroom detached family home situated on Chitts Hill, in the sought after borough of Lexden within close proximity to excellent schooling and amenities. Having benefited from later extensions, the property offers a generous and f..."
"Part of our Signature collection, this impressive and conveniently located six bedroom family home with garden studio is within walking distance of excellent schools and amenities, just 3 miles from both Marks Tey and Colchester train stations."
"The Appleton is located on a QUIET CUL-DE-SAC and boasts a SOUTH FACING GARDEN, Large OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING area with a UTILITY and double doors leading to the SEPARATE LIVING ROOM with FEATURE FIREPLACE and WOOD BURNER. The MASTER BEDROOM has an EN-SUITE and FITTED WARDROBE also in bedroom two.."
This rarely available period property occupies an enviable position at the bottom of a private road in the highly sought after Stanway area of Colchester. This characterful property dates back over two hundred years and began its life as a two-bedroom coach house with accommodations to the first ...
"The Appleton is located on a QUIET CUL-DE-SAC and boasts a SOUTH FACING GARDEN, Large OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING area with a UTILITY and double doors leading to the SEPARATE LIVING ROOM with FEATURE FIREPLACE and WOOD BURNER. The MASTER BEDROOM an"
"Guide price £725,000-£750,000. An exceptional *DETACHED FAMILY HOUSE* is well-presented throughout offering *SUBSTANTIAL ACCOMMODATION*. Situated in this *EXCLUSIVE CUL-DE-SAC OFF EASTWOOD DRIVE* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
Purplebricks are delighted to offer this spacious four double bedroom detached house which is located to the north of Colchester with easy A12 access. The property occupies a really nice plot with a large frontage with plenty of off street parking leading to the side of the property to the doubl...
"Located on highly sought-after Mill Road in Mile End, Colchester - this exceptional town house offers accommodation over three floors, comprising two reception rooms, kitchen, garden room, cloakroom, four bedrooms - with ensuite to principal - and family bathroom. The property also benefits from ..."
"Located in the heart of the highly sought-after residential Highwoods area of north Colchester, this family home offers accommodation comprising living room, dining area, kitchen and utility, study, cloakroom, conservatory, principal bedroom with ensuite, three further bedrooms and shower room. ..."
"Including a OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING AREA with handy utility, SEPARATE LIVING ROOM with FIREPLACE, BONUS ROOM ideal as a STUDY, DOUBLE FITTED WARDROBES to ALL BEDROOMS with an EN SUITE to the MASTER. TAKE THE VIRTUAL TOUR TODAY!"
"Part of our Signature collection, a stunning conversion of a late Edwardian property into two semi-detached homes having been sympathetically refurbished retaining many original features and combining with contemporary aesthetics to provide light and airy living spaces. This wonderful property ha..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £650,000-£675,000 *** Located just a short walk to Highwoods country park we are delighted to offer this modern Four bedroom detached family home benefiting from double garage with ample off road parking being within easy access to the A12 and Colchester City centre. "
"We are delighted to offer this beautifully presented 2 bedroom detached bungalow with separate 1 bedroom detached annexe on a large plot in the sought after Lexden area. Offering quick access to the A12, town centre, train station and local amenities, but tucked away in a quiet cul-de-sac, this h..."
"***PHASE 2-RELEASED***PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE***SHOW HOME OPEN***
***Contact our office for your appointment slot*** Layer Park, a sophisticated collection of contemporary new homes each crafted to cater to every aspect of 21st century living. Set on the peaceful yet well-connected border of Col..."
" **PHASE 2 NOW RELEASED - SHOW HOME OPEN - APPOINTMENT REQUIRED** Layer Park, a sophisticated collection of contemporary new homes each crafted to cater to every aspect of 21st century living. Set on the peaceful yet well-connected border of Colchester, where this vibrant, thriving new ci..."
"**Guide Price £650,000 - £675,000** Ever so rarely available, this executive four bedroom detached residence sits proudly in a prime North-Colchester position, off of Eastwood Drive and in the heart of the most pleasant of neighbourhoods. Renowned for excellent schooling, with The ..."
"VIEWING REFERENCE: MC0527 - Situated in the heart of Highwoods, Colchester is this wonderful four bedroom detached family home which boasts ample living space, excellent A12 access, local shops amenities & schooling situated nearby. 
"
"A well presented TWO BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW with the benefit of a SEPARATE ONE BEDROOM DETACHED ANNEXE situated to the rear of the garden. The property is located in the ever popular Lexden area of Colchester, offering excellent access to the A12, city centre, train station, local shops and am..."
"**SHOW HOME NOW OPEN TO VIEW & PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE** Layer Park, a sophisticated collection of contemporary new homes each crafted to cater to every aspect of 21st century living. Set on the peaceful yet well-connected border of Colchester, where this vibrant, thriving new city meets t..."
Introducing the Heritage Range of properties from Mersea Homes nestled in an area surrounded by open space and adjacent to protected woodland. The Harrier Heritage with upgraded specification will be a home like no other. Call to book your appointment with Amanda or Angela. 
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this imposing *DETACHED FAMILY HOUSE* provides *SUBSTANTIAL ACCOMMODATION* with viewing highly recommended. Situated in this *EXCLUSIVE LOCATION OFF EASTWOOD DRIVE* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"Detached 6-bed HMO currently with £44,400.00+ income P/A 2 en-suites 2 garages All rooms are full with professional tenants. Brand new boiler fitted with a 10-year guarantee. All rooms have solid oak furniture and everything is top quality. Floor 3- Bedroom 1 - 6.35x3.37m Bed..."
"**Guide Price £625,000 - £650,000** Reimagined, contemporary and exceptional are just three words to describe this impressive four-bedroom detached residence, favourably positioned to the North of Colchester and within easy access of an array of schools, shops, amenities and leisur..."
NO ONWARD CHAIN - This beautiful FIVE Bedroom Detached family home situated in the Bellway development previously known as Avellana Place on the popular North side of Colchester being conveniently located for the A12/A120 and Colchester General Hospital.
"GUIDE PRICE £650,000 - £675,000. A spacious FIVE BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOUSE conveniently situated for the main A12 trunk road, Northern Gateway and Colchester´s mainline railway station (London Liverpool Street approximately one hour). The property is offered for sale with NO ..."
"Situated to the north of Colchester within easy access of great primary and secondary schooling is this modern five bedroom, three reception room, detached three storey house with detached double length garage, driveway and garden."
Connells are pleased to present to market this beautiful four bedroom detached house in the sought after Highwoods area of Colchester.
"**Guide Price £600,000 - £650,000** Hidden down a peaceful lane proudly sits this excellent three bedroom detached bungalow, boasting exceptional mature grounds, approaching an impressive 0.5acre (circa.) plot. Picturesque and offering an abundance of outdoor space, it's grounds ar..."
"This well presented, four bedroom detached family home is located on the west side of Colchester offering easy access to local shops, pubs, restaurants, A12/A120, popular schooling and within walking distance, you'll find Tollgate retail park. Marks Tey train station is not far, offering a com..."
"Situated within easy access of Colchester North station is this impressive five bedroom detached family home with lounge, kitchen/diner, cloakroom, utility room, five bedrooms, three ensuites and family bathroom. The property further benefits from a detached garage and parking for two/three vehic..."
"**Annex Potential** Words cannot describe how amazing this executive large 4-bedroom detached property is.
Located within easy access to town and station and with stunning views over the river.
This extensive home really does have the wow factor in every way starting with the views.
Once inside ..."
"An executive four bedroom detached family home set back from Eastwood Drive offering well-presented good size living space throughout with a good size enclosed garden, detached double garage and ample off-road parking close to Highwoods Country Park and in the catchment area for Gilberd Secondary..."
"Echelon Walk is situated in the ever popular Whitmore Park development in Severalls and is conveniently located close to the A12, David Lloyd, Colchester's North Station and local amenities. In excess of 2400 sqft this stunning Edwardian property benefits from ample sash windows, creating a light..."
"Executive living at it's finest is offered with this impeccable three double bedroom Edwardian town house, forming part of this iconic conversion and offer over 2400 sqft of spacious accommodation. In the heart of North Colchester and within moments of Colchester's Northern Gateway - soon to b..."
"** Guide Price £585,000 - £600,000 ** A delightfully positioned four bedroom detached house located off Church Lane, offering spacious accommodation and a mature slopping garden of around 90ft in depth."
"Occupying an enviable position on Lexden Road within close proximity of Colchester town centre is this fully refurbished four bedroom detached home with accommodation briefly comprising: Entrance hall, living room, separate dining room, kitchen, four bedrooms, family bathroom and separate w.c. ..."
This well-presented four bedroom detached family home occupies a prominent position on Lexden Road within walking distance to Crouch Street and the town.CHAIN FREE
"This *EXCEPTIONAL DETACHED HOUSE* is *BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT* making the *PERFECT HOME FOR GROWING FAMILIES*. Situated on the *POPULAR TURNER RISE ESTATE* the property is ideal for *COLCHESTER NORTH STATION*, Highwoods Country Park, *COLCHESTER GENERAL HOSPITAL* and the A12/A120."
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this exceptional *DETACHED BUNGALOW* is beautifully presented offering *GENEROUS FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* with early viewing absolutely essential. Situated on the *SOUGHT-AFTER ST JOHNS ESTATE* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SHOPS*, schools, bus routes and the A12/A120."
" A detached property offering stunning views of the Highwoods country park to the rear, five bedrooms, two reception rooms, a bathroom and a shower room."
"** GUIDE PRICE £550,000 - £575,000 ** This superbly presented, four bedroom executive detached family home is situated in the popular Stanway district to west of Colchester's historic City Centre. Stanway is a very well served community with excellent access to some of the City's mos..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £550,000 - £575,000** We are delighted to offer this exceptional and large family townhouse style home tucked away on a sought after and exclusive development. Offering fantastic panoramic views from both sides, generous living space throughout and ideally sit..."
We are delighted to offer for sale this extended double-bay fronted detached family house situated in the sought after residential area of LEXDEN. The property is presented to the market in extremely good condition throughout and viewing is highly recommended. Benefits include GROUND FLOOR SHOW...
"**Guide Price £550,000** Purplebricks are delighted to present this delightful four bedroom period detached cottage, dating back to the late 1600s, set on a large sized plot, in the sought after west Colchester! Situated a short distance from Tollgate shopping centre which offers a varied rang..."
"The Hingham includes INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, DOWNLIGHTS and a HEATED TOWEL RAIL. The open plan home features FRENCH DOORS to the garden from the living room and an adjoining utility room. Upstairs there's FOUR DOUBLE bedrooms. The Master has an EN-SUITE & a FI"
"This exceptional *FOUR/FIVE BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE* is *BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT* offering *GENEROUS FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* and situated in an *EXCLUSIVE CUL-DE-SAC*, being ideal for local schools, Northern Gateway Leisure Park, Colchester General Hospital, North Station and the A12/A120."
"Guide Price: £550,000-£600,000 Positioned to the historical city of Colchester is this impressive Grade II listed four bedroom mid-terraced townhouse, sitting over three floors. Boasting a plethora of character and period features including exposed beams, sash windows, authentic cast iro..."
"***GUIDE PRICE OF £550,000 to £600,000***This Grade II listed four bedroom, town centre family residence forms part of Colchester's history, a truly aesthetically pleasing building, full of character, with views across Castle Park and the Castle itself. This particular home ..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £180,000 - £190,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are pleased to present to the market this two bedroom terraced property, situated in the highly sought after area of Stanway, within walking distance to a great selection of schools..."
"Patrick James are delighted to offer this exceptionally well presented four/five bedroom detached family home located in the popular South Colchester area. Offering spacious and modern accommodation throughout & great views over Middlewick Ranges, this home offers four great sized bedrooms, E..."
"A contemporary double bay fronted, four bedroom detached family home located in a prominent south Colchester position, within minutes from the Colchester Town Centre, Train Station and excellent local schooling. Offering an abundance of accommodation throughout, this spacious home would be ide..."
"We are pleased to bring to the market this four bedroom detached home in the leafy area of Lexden. The property has been extended to the ground floor and offers good living accommodation although needing some modernisation. The property has a driveway for two cars, garage and gas central heatin..."
"This attractive detached town house occupies an excellent location within easy reach of the A12, Colchester General Hospital and mainline railway station with straightforward links to London's Liverpool Street Station. the centre of Colchester is within a comfortable driving distance wit..."
"Guide Price £525,000- £550,000 This stunning detached home boasts a prime position on this popular Bellway development on the north side of Colchester, with views to the front of communal green/park, and views to the side of a wooded copse. Offered for sale with no onward c..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £525,000 - £550,000 ** Harris + Wood Chesterwell are delighted to offer for sale, this four/five bedroom, three storey townhouse, situated on the popular and picturesque Forest View development. The location provides excellent access to the A12, Colchester's general ho..."
"This stunning four double-bedroom detached home is situated in a peaceful location, perfect for those seeking a tranquil retreat from the hustle and bustle of everyday life. The property boasts ample living space, with each of the four bedrooms offering plenty of room to relax and unwind. "
"** Portfolio Sale ** Situated in the extremely sought-after Maldon district lies this excellent investment opportunity, offering a former five bedroom mid terrace Victorian bay fronted house, now divided into five apartments within striking distance of Colchester's historic & exciting city..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £525,000 - £550,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this well-presented, four bedroom detached family house, situated offering excellent access to the A12, A120, Colchester Business Park, Colchester General Hospital, the popular Gilber..."
A truly iconic home of considerable stature. Improved by the current owners own hands you can only but appreciate the love that has gone in to creating something truly special here. You must see this aspirational yet utilitarian home
"**Guide Price £525,000 - £550,000** A handsome and aesthetically pleasing five bedroom detached family home, which also benefits from a self-contained one bedroom annexe and is situated to the West of Colchester in the popular district of Stanway. This home is within easy access of..."
A six bedroom Grade II listed home with a one bedroom ground floor annexe. Ideal family home or great potential for a HMO.
"Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN, Gallant Richardson are pleased to offer for sale this established, spacious three bedroom detached bungalow. Situated on a corner plot in the extremely sought after area of Lexden. Being within very close proximity to the Colchester Royal Grammar School, Hig..."
"The Grove at Chesterwell is a highly desirable collection of spacious 2,3 & 4 bedroom homes set in a beautifully landscaped surroundings and designed for countryside living. Please call Amanda to make your appointment to view. "
"Boydens are pleased to bring to the market this four-bedroom, detached property in “The Orchards” off of Ipswich Road, it was completed in 2019 by Bellway Homes. Ideally situated to the North of Colchester town centre and with fantastic commuter links via the A12 and Colchester North Station."
This beautifully presented four-bedroom family home occupies an enviable elevated position in the sought-after Poets Corner area to the West of Colchester. This spacious residence offers versatile accommodation across two floors with floor to ceiling windows which floods the living space with nat...
"£10,000 CASHBACK INCLUDED * EDGE OF DEVELOPMENT LOCATION * GARAGE & DRIVEWAY * LARGE OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY AREA * SPACIOUS lounge with BAY WINDOW * FRENCH DOORS to the garden from kitchen * Master bedroom with FITTED WARDROBES and EN SUITE * F..."
"**Guide price £500,000 to £525,000** Stunning detached family home, offered for sale in immaculate condition and with no onward chain. This is a must view!"
"
Purplebricks are delighted to offer this very well presented and excellent sized five bedroom link detached property situated in a quiet cul de sac location in the sought after Stanway area to the west of Colchester. This lovely family home offers accommodation spread over three floors includi..."
"This Exceptional *DETACHED HOUSE* is particularly well presented offering *SUBSTANTIAL FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* with viewing highly recommended. Situated in the *SOUGHT-AFTER MYLAND AREA* the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"Located in a quiet position in one of the most sought after area's of Highwoods, within easy reach to a wealth of amenities, is this very sizeable detached bungalow. Sitting on a generous plot the property comprises of a entrance hall, spacious living room, kitchen/diner, utility room, sun room, ..."
"This stunning two bedroom town centre apartment was built in 2018 and is situated within walking distance of the train station and local amenities. The property benefits from open plan living, two double bedrooms, en suite & allocated parking."
"Early viewing is advised of this spacious, attractive semi detached family home situated on the south west side of Colchester. The property offers spacious living accommodation throughout, four double bedrooms, en suite to master bedroom, generous south facing rear garden, off road parking & garage."
"This spacious five-bedroom family home is located in the popular district of Stanway with excellent access to the A12, popular schools and local shops. The property benefits from a recently fitted Wren kitchen and replacement boiler, ample parking and a garage. This stunning family home ..."
"Situated in the beautiful Lexden Park with stunning views over the lake sits this deceptively spacious and well presented, three/four bedroom terraced town house. Being set over three floors, this would be ideal for anyone looking to move straight in without having to lift a finger. L..."
"This deceptive property offers a wealth of internal space aswell as a generous rear garden. Situated in the popular and sought after Prettygate, this four bedroom property has a big emphasis on social space. Formerly used as a care home, this space could be used as a great business pre..."
"LARGE PLOT BACKING ONTO FISHING LAKE is this extended detached three double bedroom bungalow being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN in the village of Rowhedge with views over the river and set down a private road. The property offers character features including fireplaces and sash windows, three double..."
"We bring to the market this well-presented and modern bungalow situated on Layer Road. The property benefits from large open plan kitchen/family room with bi-folding doors and glass lantern. There is a separate lounge with bay window, three double bedrooms, en-suite and utility room. Early vie..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £500,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this beautiful, four bedroom detached house situated in the sought after, Old Heath area of Colchester providing a range of useful schools, shops and amenitie..."
"Situated in the highly desirable North of Colchester is this impressive five bedroom detached family home. Benefitting from convenient access to Colchester's thriving town centre, Turner Rise Retail Park as well as the A12. Located within walking distance of Colchester's General Hospital with eas..."
"Situated in the highly desirable Prettygate area to the West of Colchester is this impressive detached four bedroom family residence. Boasting an abundance of local amenities to the surrounding area of Stanway and with convenient access to Colchester's main city centre, with easy routes to the A1..."
"The Whiteleaf is a gorgeous family home. The kitchen/breakfast/family room enjoys an open aspect through French doors. There is a living room, dining room, cloakroom and utility. Upstairs there are four double bedrooms, with bedroom one benefiting from an en suite, a bathroom and storage cupboards."
"*NEW TO THE MARKET!* The Milliner is a brand new 4-bedroom house that features a modern open-plan kitchen, dining and family area, a separate living room, an en suite to bedroom 1 and a well-equipped family bathroom. French doors in the dining area and living area. *10 YEARS NHBC WARRANTY*"
"
Final selection of three-bedroom Shared Ownership houses now available in Colchester. 
"
"The Bixley is a SUPERB 4 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME boasting an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING AREA with a handy UTILITY AREA, a SEPARATE LIVING ROOM, AN IMPRESSIVE MASTER BEDROOM with FITTED WARDROBE and EN SUITE, THREE FURTHER BEDROOMS plus ample parking wi"
"Established four bedroom detached house located in a popular part of Stanway close to Stanway Green. The house offers good sized accommodation, pleasant gardens, large garage and gas heating."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this four bedroom detached family home, situated in the sought after location of Prettygate, with good access to popular local primary and secondary schooling. The city centre itself offers a varied ..."
"*** DISCREET MARKETING ***
** FOUR BEDROOM PROPERTY **
* GOOD CONDITION, GARAGE AND DRIVEWAY * Idyllically located towards the North of Colchester in the popular Myland area and within easy access to the A12, the Gilberd School and Highwoods Country Park is this immaculate and well proportioned ..."
Purplebricks are delighted to offer this spacious bay fronted semi detached house which is situated in popular location of Lexden. The property has been extended over the years and provides great accommodation and also has a large rear garden with sheds and car port to the rear. The accommodat...
"Situated to the north of Colchester's City centre is this well presented and spacious four bedroom detached family home. Built by Crest Nicholson in 2016, and conveniently located offering excellent access to the A12, General Hospital and North Station, which offers direct ..."
"Guide Price £475,000 - £500,000 This superbly presented detached family home offers an entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen/diner, cloakroom and conservatory. On the first floor there are four bedrooms and a family bathroom. The property benefits from a garage and b..."
"Temme English are delighted to present this STUNNING, extended three bedroom semi-detached family home situated on the popular 'Athelstan Road'"
"Having been fully renovated throughout to a high standard, is this two bedroom detached bungalow in Stanway. Location here is ideal for access to local amenities, good schooling, shops, Tollgate and Stane retail parks, hairdressers and access to local public transport links are within easy wal..."
"An impressive three bedroom detached bungalow with driveway and garage located down a quiet cul-de-sac to the West side of Colchester, not only is this property located within walking distance to local shops and amenities, you will find the A12, Tollgate retail park as well as the city centre all..."
"Perfectly proportioned, the Alnmouth has a stylish open-plan kitchen/dining/living room. It features flexible first-floor rooms, a good-sized family bathroom, handy storage cupboards and parking. Ideal if you are a first-time buyer looking for a fresh modern home you can make your own."
"Location is key with this extended four bedroom semi detached family home, ideally located within close proximity of good schooling, local shops and supermarkets, Tollgate retail park, A12/A120, excellent public transport links and easy access to a choice of train stations which offer dir..."
"Located within a small cul-de-sac location in Stanway, is this five bedroom link detached family home. The property's position allows for excellent access to a wealth of amenities including walking distance to pre-school, primary and secondary schooling as well as bus routes. Just a short driv..."
"* Guide Price £475,000 to £500,000 * A fine example of a stunning three bedroom, semi-detached bay fronted home. Positioned in one of the most sought after roads, in the Lexden district and is within moments of arguably some of the countries finest comprehensive and private seconda..."
"Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market this unique plot which offers four generous bedrooms, off road parking to the front plus a carport situated to the side providing further off road parking. Perfectly situated to the North of Colchester's City Centre you are close to all local ameni..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £475,000-£500,000** Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this well presented, four bedroom detached family home situated in the highly sought after area of Stanway, close to ample schools, shops and amenities including Tollgates Stane R..."
" ** Guide Price £475,000 £500,000 ** This superbly presented four bedroom detached family home is situated on the popular Highwoods development in the North of Colchester close to all local amenities, offering a good size well presented living space throughout, large garden, garage and..."
"Extended and modernised offering a very contemporary way of living for all the family, is this four bedroom semi detached family residence. Occupying a pleasant position on the ever sought after Layer Road. Within striking distance of Colchester's historic city centre, access to train stations..."
"Guide Price of £475,000 - £500,000 A perfectly positioned semi-detached house is situated in the highly sought-after area of Lexden in Colchester and presents an excellent opportunity for those seeking a renovation project. The property is set on a large plot, providing ample outdoor spa..."
"A superbly presented three bedroom detached bungalow within a highly sought after and convenient location close to Tesco superstore, the General Hospital and A12 offering spacious accommodation on a corner plot with a conservatory and garage."
Who could resist this pretty 3 bed house in lovely location. Close to Chesterwell Plaza and new schools coming shortly. Overlooking open spaces with established woods for you to enjoy. Book your appointment to view and see why you can be part of the Chesterwell Community. 
"Situated to the west of Colchester city centre, offering excellent access to the main A12 trunk road, local shops and facilities, we are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom, two reception room detached bungalow with ensuite, gas central heating (not tested by Elms Price and Co), double..."
"Situated in the beautiful Lexden Park with stunning views over the lake sits this deceptively spacious, three/four bedroom end of terraced town house. Being set over three floors, this would be an ideal purchase for a family looking to create a house into their forever home. Lexden Pa..."
"Occupying a mature plot approaching 0.25 of an acre, a deceptively spacious detached bungalow offering a tastefully presented interior and benefitting from a delightful rear garden, carport, garage and off road parking."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this extremely well-presented three bedroom detached bungalow in the highly sought after area of Prettygate. The property benefits from NO CHAIN, three double bedrooms, large kitchen/diner, separate lounge, ample off road parking to the front and side.
"
"Positioned on a large plot to the south of Colchester, is this three bedroom detached bungalow. This location is popular for local schooling, access to the City Centre, Tollgate retail park, public transport links and Mersea Island is also located only a short drive away, offering an array of ..."
We are delighted to bring to market this HUGE four/five bedroom family home situated in this popular West side location of Stanway. This four bedroom home offers versatile living accommodation arranged over three floors
"Stunning five bedroom family home, laid out over three floors in a Town House style, with a family bathroom and an en-suite shower room, high quality fitted kitchen/diner and a generous rear garden. This is a must view!!"
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this unique three bedroom townhouse, situated to the north of Colchester, with excellent access to both Colchester's mainline stations, A12 and General Hospital, as well as local schools, shops and other amenities. Internally t..."
"The Charnwood Corner features a stunning open-plan kitchen/diner and an impressive living room with French doors opening into the garden. A utility room, WC and storage cupboards make it practical as well as stylish. Upstairs are three bedrooms - one is en suite - a family bathroom and more storage."
"This three bedroom detached chalet bungalow, which is in need of updating throughout is located in the popular and sought after location of Stanway Green. Perfectly placed within walking distance of the green, close to The Stanway School, as well as within close proximity to local shops and re..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer this spacious four bedroom detached house which is situated on the popular St. Johns development in Colchester. The house has great sized accommodation which comprises: entrance hall with stairs to the first floor, large living room with French doors to the re..."
"Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market this very well presented, four bedroom detached family home. The current owners have modernised the accommodation throughout and would be ideal for anyone looking to move straight in without having to lift a finger. Upon entering this residence, yo..."
"This fantastic *EXTENDED DETACHED HOUSE* is *WELL-PRESENTED THROUGHOUT* providing *SUBSTANTIAL FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* with early viewing highly recommended. Situated on the *SOUGHT-AFTER ST JOHNS ESTATE* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *BUS ROUTES* and the A12/A120."
"Enjoying a generous plot size of approaching 0.25 acres (STS), this family home offers three double bedrooms, two reception rooms, large conservatory, and en-suite shower room to the main bedroom. EPC D."
"** GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000 ** Situated in the highly desirable development in Stanway close to local amenities including restaurants, supermarkets and shops plus the A12 with links to Chelmsford and beyond sits this well presented, three bedroom detached family home. "
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this spacious semi-detached family house, situated in the popular Lexden district of Colchester within close proximity to the popular schools of Phillip Morant, St Benedict's, Stanway Secondary and Home Farm primary. Shopping facilities a..."
"**Guide Price £450,000 - £475,000** A versatile example of an excellent four/five bedroom town house, occupying a favourable position within the favourable 'Kingswood Heath' development in a prime North-Colchester position and a home that is simply that not to be missed. Presented ..."
Situated in the ever popular St. Johns area is this fully renovated four bedroom detached chalet bungalow.
"Four Bedroom House located on the ever popular new Braiswick Park development, being within easy walking distance of Colchester North Station with its direct links to London Liverpool Street inapprox 45mins. Colchester City centre is also in easy access with its multiple shopping facilities. The ..."
"Elegant, charming & aesthetically pleasing, this handsome three bedroom 'bay-fronted' Victorian terrace property has it all. This exquisite home is positioned in the Maldon Road District of Lexden, Colchester and within minutes of some of the countries finest private & comprehensive sc..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £450,000 - £475,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this well-presented four bedroom semi-detached house, situated just off Maldon Road, close to Colchester city centre and within Hamilton Primary School catchment. The city centre is..."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this well-presented three bedroom detached bungalow, occupying an impressive position to the south-east of Colchester, enjoying undisturbed field views. The bungalow is within easy reach of Colchester's city centre, local co-operative s..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £450,000 - £475,000** We are delighted to offer this four bedroom detached family home, situated towards the end of a quiet cul-de-sac in the popular Highwoods area. Falling within catchment area of the sought after Gilberd School and offering great links to t..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £450,000-£475,000***
Located to the North side of Colchester within close proximity to the general hospital and North station we are delighted to offer this Four bedroom family home which is well presented throughout and benefits from a driveway leading to a carport and g..."
"Occupying a non estate position, this spacious detached house offers a tastefully presented interior, attractive garden, parking for numerous vehicles and a detached double garage."
"An outstanding three bedroom detached bungalow situated in the highly desirable area of Prettygate. The bungalow is within close proximity to local shopping facilities, is being offered to a high standard internally, and with no onward chain. "
"Positioned to the West of Colchester is this well presented four bedroom family home. Located on London Road within Stanway this home is within walking distance of Stane Retail Park and Tollgate Retail Park which offers a wealth of shops, resturants and much more. Also close by is the A12/A120..."
"A*HIGH-QUALITY DETACHED FAMILY HOUSE* is *EXCEPTIONALLY WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT* offering *GENEROUS ACCOMMODATION* with *VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED*. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION* convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *BUS ROUTES* and the A12/A120."
"Temme English are delighted to present this four-bedroom family home sitting at the end of a quiet CUL-DE-SAC, situated just a stone's throw from the historic City centre, station and prestigious schooling and with access to adjacent countryside walks. Being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The proper"
"The Clayton features a stunning open plan kitchen diner and an equally impressive living room. A utility room, WC and storage cupboard ensure it is practical as well as stylish. Upstairs you will find three bedrooms, a large bedroom one with an en suite, bathroom and a handy storage cupboard."
"A well presented and extended four bedroom semi-detached family home, located to the south of Colchester. with additional detached annexe accommodation to the side. Internally the ground floor accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, spacious living room, conservatory, study/fourth..."
"
A brand new collection of 3-bedroom Shared Ownership houses now available in Colchester.
"
"**Guide Price £425,000 to £450,000** - Situated within easy access of Colchester North station is this extended and beautifully refurbished four bedroom town house."
"Yopa is pleased to offer this Five Double Bedroom Townhouse in the sought-after location of CO4. The property is stretched over 3 floors and is immaculate throughout. Garage, carport, and a good size rear garden with rear gated access."
"**Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000** Situated in the Blackheath district of Colchester's vibrant and exciting city centre, this extended and improved four bedroom semi-detached family home commands a favourable position within this cul-de-sac. Offering versatile living for the expan..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN, southside of Colchester, verstaile DETACHED BUNGALOW, three bedrooms, bathroom, kitchen lounge and conservatory, SOUTH WEST FACING GARDEN measures 59ft x40ft approx gargae and DRIVEWWAY FOR MULTIPLE CARS, potential to extend and improve subject to planning. "
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this substantial five bedroom semi-detached house, situated on the popular St Johns development to the north of Colchester, being close to popular primary schooling, shopping facilities and good access to the A12 and station with mainline..."
"VIEWING REFERENCE: MC0527 - We are delighted to bring to market this beautifully presented four bedroom detached home located in the sought after area of St Johns, Colchester
"
"** WE WOULD SUGGEST THAT THIS PROPERTY IS AVAILABLE TO CASH BUYERS ONLY, THIS WOULD BE DUE TO THE SUSPECTED SLIGHT SUBSIDENCE OF THE SITE TO THE FRONT LEFT CORNER OF THE BUILDING WHICH IS CURRENTLY BEING MONITORED **** GUIDE PRICE OF £375,000 TO £400,000 **This e..."
"An extended four bedroom detached family house in this sought after location with three reception rooms, three bathrooms, large garage / workshop, good size gardens and ample parking with car port. "
*NO ONWARD CHAIN* *OPEN DAY: SATURDAY 18TH MARCH* This exceptional family home is presented in excellent condition throughout. 
"Offered with no onward chain is this spacious modern three bedroom detached bungalow just to the south of the town centre benefitting from an ensuite to master, conservatory, ample parking with in and out driveway and double garage."
"** GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000 ** ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Situated in the heart of Colchester sits this three bedroom, semi detached family home. This would be a great opportunity for a family looking to create a house into their forever home, being set in a popular location, you ar..."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this substantial four/bedroom town house, situated providing excellent access to the A12, General Hospital, local schools including The Gilberd secondary school, shops and North station with mainline links to London Liverpool street. "
"Within walking distance of North Station with links to London and beyond, sits this extended and very well presented three bedroom detached family home. Braiswick is also conveniently located for excellent access to the A12 and Colchester General Hospital, with the City centre also being within ..."
"
A brand new collection of three-bedroom Shared Ownership houses now available in Colchester.
"
"
A brand new collection of three-bedroom Shared Ownership houses now available in Colchester. 
"
"***GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this beautifully presented, three bedroom, semi-detached bungalow, situated in a highly popular position in the Prettygate area, within walkin..."
"GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000. NO ONWARD CHAIN...we are delighted to offer for sale this extended three bedroom semi-detached bungalow which is presented to the market in a high standard throughout. The property is in the sought after residential area of Prettygate and offers conveni..."
"Guide Price £425,000-£450,000. We are delighted to present this three bedroom DETACHED bungalow situated to the West side of Colchester on the popular 'Westlands'"
"An exceptional three bedroom detached residence occupying a pleasant elevated position on the ever sought after Maldon Road, within striking distance of the Town, Station and excellent local schools. The property has been extended and heavily improved by the current owners to a fabulous standard,..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000** ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Positioned in the highly popular Prettygate area, within walking distance to local shops, amenities and local bus routes is this immaculately presented, three bedroom semi detached bungalow. The current owners have fully renova..."
"Guide Price £425,000-£450,000. This excellent *END-TERRACE TOWNHOUSE* provides *SUBSTANTIAL FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* spread over three floors. Situated in the *SOUGHT-AFTER MYLAND AREA* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"Delighted with the opportunity to offer this luxury Penthouse Apartment, boasting over 2,000 square ft of accommodation and having been designed and finished to an exceptionally high standard only the current owner has since upgraded and redesigned many features to make the property even ..."
"Situated in the sought-after area of Prettygate is this stunning three bedroom semi-detached bungalow. To the West of Colchester, the property is located in close reach of various local amenities including shops, schooling and with convenient access to Colchester's town centre. With easy bus rout..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000** We are delighted to offer this generously sized three bedroom detached bungalow. With brand new kitchen, separate utility and modern features throughout including underfloor heating. This home has been lovingly refurbished with high atten..."
"Commanding an excellent position within the ever popular 'Kingswood Heath' development, in a prime North-Colchester position, sits this incredibly spacious four bedroom end of terrace town house. Soon to be within striking distance of Colchester's eagerly anticipated Northern Gateway, this hom..."
"Stunning detached three bedroom bungalow, located to the West of Colchester's City Centre. Ideally placed for access to local amenities and a range of local attractions including Colchester Zoo, Mersea Island and Colchester's Castle park. For sale with No Onward Chain"
"** Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000 ** Situated in this sought after location is this renovated and extended three bedroom semi-detached bungalow offered to modern contemporary living standards and open-plan living with stylish kitchen and bathroom, re laid patio, turf and no onward chain. "
"Within striking distance of Holmwood House Co-Educational School and favourably positioned along Chitts Hill in Lexden, this imposing circa 1950s property would make without question an excellent family home. Spacious and well-presented throughout, it offers generous living and bedroom accommo..."
"Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000 Situated on a quiet cul-de-sac in Lexden is this beautifully presented, extended three-bedroom semi-detached family home. The property benefits from an abundance of local amenities within a short distance of Stanway’s ever-developing retail parks..."
"This excellent *ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT* is *WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT* making the *IDEAL HOME FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS*. Situated in a sought-after location *OVERLOOKING HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* the property is convenient for *VARIOUS LOCAL SHOPS*, Colchester North Station and the A12/A120."
"GUIDE PRICE £425,000 to £450,000
We have pleasure in offering for sale this extended detached family house featuring four bedrooms with en suite to master, lounge with multi fuel burning stove, large kitchen breakfast room, dining room and study.  The pro..."
"This exceptional *DETACHED HOUSE* provides *GENEROUS FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* and is *WELL-PRESENTED THROUGHOUT*. Nestled in a *SOUGHT-AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various amenities, *BUS ROUTES* and the A12/A120. An early internal inspection is highly recommended."
"**GUIDE PRICE £425,000-£450,000** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this good size three bedroom detached bungalow, situated conveniently close to local shops, amenities and transport links with direct access to Colchester's historic city centre. "
"Situated in the sought-after location of Stanway presents this substantial four-bedroom home offering brilliant kerb appeal and a wealth of space throughout. Through the front door you are met by a porch and entrance hallway leading to evenly distributed reception rooms including a kitchen, dinin..."
"GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000. We are delighted to market this modern and immaculately presented three bedroom detached property in the desirable position of Millers Lane. The property benefits from open plan living space, external office with power and light, raised decking and a..."
A spacious duplex three bedroom apartment situated in this desirable development in Lexden a short distance from Colchester town and offered For Sale with no onward chain. 
"Situated in the highly sought-after Stanway area, is this beautifully presented and well-proportioned four-bedroom detached property. Offering an abundance of local amenities close by including doctors and dentist surgeries. With retail and entertainment options, benefiting from Tollgate Retail P..."
"This stunning 1930s built box bay window semi detached house is situated in a popular position offering good access to Colchester's city centre. The property benefits from two reception rooms, three good size bedrooms, off road parking and generous garden."
"We are delighted to offer this WELL-PRESENTED three bedroom detached house situated in the sought after area of BRAISWICK. The property is within easy reach of Colchester´s mainline railway station (London Liverpool Street approximately one hour), shops and facilities. "
"The Whinfell is a semi-detached, four-bedroom home boasting a kitchen/dining room and bright living room with French doors leading into the garden. Bedroom one has an en suite, there’s a family bathroom and a downstairs WC. Along with five storage cupboards this home is practical as well as stylish."
"An appealing three bedroom link detached house offering a smartly presented interior with the benefit of gas fired central heating, an impressive 20' 3"" kitchen/breakfast room, en-suite shower room and garage."
" Purplebricks are delighted to offer this good size, four bedroom link detached family home, situated on this highly sought after modern development within a short distance to Colchester's North Station with mainline links to London Liverpool Street, The General Hospital and Colchester's histori..."
"Boydens are delighted to bring to market this extended three bedroom semi-detached residence, situated to the north of Colchester, backing onto Highwoods Country Park. This well presented family home benefits from spacious accommodation across two floors. "
"Plots 21 and 22 have flooring included. A three-bedroom home, the Chester link has everything you need for modern living. Downstairs is a kitchen/dining room, spacious living room, storage cupboard and a WC. The first floor has a generous bedroom one and en suite plus three more bedrooms."
"Chesterwell, the number one destination in north Colchester, ideal for commuting or just enjoying your environment with plenty of green open spaces to explore at your leisure. Call now and make an appointment with Angela or Amanda. "
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £400,000 - £435,000 *** ** EXTENDED ** Jackson and Co are proud to present this four bedroom family home located down a quiet cul-de-sac to the south of Colchester, the property benefits from having a single story extension as well as a study and en-suite, you will ..."
Temme English are delighted to present this substantial FIVE BEDROOM semi-detached home situated in this increasingly popular Shrub End location
"Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000 A beautifully presented three/four bedroom semi-detached townhouse is finished to an extremely high standard throughout and is positioned on a popular family-orientated development in Highwoods. Internally this home has been recently refurbished throughout..."
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this delightful *LINK-DETACHED BUNGALOW* is well-presented throughout and set in a *CHARMING CUL-DE-SAC* within the *SOUGHT-AFTER MAGDALEN WOOD* on the *POPULAR ST JOHNS ESTATE*. The property is ideal for *VARIOUS LOCAL SHOPS*, schools, bus routes and the A12/A120."
"* NO ONWARD CHAIN * An attractive double bayed Victorian semi-detached family home with loft conversion, situated in this highly sought after location and offering many period features being close to Hamilton Rd Primary School and the City centre."
"GUIDE PRICE £400,000-£425,000. An idyllic, quaint, character filled four bedroom detached property located to the south-east of Colchester in the popular Old Heath area, which has existed since Saxon times and was originally called ‘Old Hythe’"
"GUIDE PRICE £400,000--£420,000-Boydens are delighted to bring to market this well-presented three-bedroom detached bungalow ideally located in the quiet cul-de-sac in the popular Stanway area within easy reach of the A12."
"***GUIDE PRICE £400,000 TO £425,000***** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** INTERNAL PHOTOS TO FOLLOW **This modern three bedroom detached bungalow is to be found in a quiet cul de sac position off of London Road in Stanway, a village to the West of Colchester. Location her..."
"**Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000** Rarely available, this substantial three bedroom detached family home is situated to the South of Colchester and nestled within Roman Fields, in a peaceful cul-de-sac position. A pleasant neighbour with an array of large family homes, it is withi..."
"*Guide price £400,000 - £425,000 * An exceptional extended three bedroom semi-detached family home situated on this desirable location of St Johns close to popular primary schooling and shopping facilities being offered in superb decorative order throughout. "
"Guide Price £400,000-£425,000. Occupying a *GENEROUS PLOT* this fantastic *DETACHED CHALET STYLE BUNGALOW* with *SUBSTANTIAL ACCOMMODATION* with the potential to make the *PERFECT FAMILY HOME*. Situated in a *POPULAR LOCATION* convenient for *VARIOUS SHOPS*, local schools, and the A12/A120."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom town house, situated within walking distance of Colchester's historic city centre and provideing excellent access to the town train station with mainline links to London Liverpool Street, Doctors surgery, Pharmacy and t..."
"**Portfolio** **Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000** Perfect for Investors, this portfolio comprises of two one bedroom flats and a single two bedroom flat, all located in the same detached and previously converted block. Currently achieving a NET yield o..."
"Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market this well presented, five bedroom semi detached house. The spacious accommodation is set over three floors and would be ideal for a growing family looking to nestle down in a popular location. The generous lounge is a great space for entertaining a..."
"**Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000** We are pleased to offer this generously sized and versatile three / four bedroom family home in the highly sought after Gilberd School catchment area. Offering a high specification and modern kitchen / diner, a living room with a view, a ..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £425,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom detached bungalow, situated in the sought after area of Stanway within easy reach of the A12 dual carriageway, Stane Retail P..."
Move straight in to this stunning three bedroom town house located on the Highwoods development on the north side of Colchester
"Guide Price of £400,000 - £425,000. Situated at the end of a cul-de-sac in the highly popular location of Stanway, is this well-presented three bedroom detached bungalow. With easy access to the A12/A120 for major city links, as well as an abundance of local amenities, restaurants, and e..."
"Early viewing is advised of this spacious town house situated within close proximity of the city centre with its range of shops, restaurants, bars and amenities. The property benefits from spacious living accommodation, three/four bedrooms, en suite to master, enclosed garden and garage."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £400,000 TO £425,000 ***This three/four bedroom detached family residence is presented with a stylish finish and includes modern features throughout, in the popular district of Stanway. An area desirable for those looking for good schooling, access to the A12..."
**CLOSE TO NORTH STATION**MODERN DETACHED HOUSE**GARAGE AND PARKING**VIEWING ESSENTIAL** Purplebricks are delighted to offer this immaculately presented modern three bedroom detached house which is situated in North Colchester/Braiswick boarder with excellent primary schools close by and the ab...
"Guide Price £400,000 to £425,000. Backing on the Gilberd School playing fields. This three to four Bedroom town house, offers Entrance Hall ground floor cloakroom, useful bedroom four / study, well-appointed Kitchen Breakfast room, First Floor lounge, bathroom and Bedroom T..."
"This *EXCEPTIONAL TOWNHOUSE* is *BEAUTIFULLY-PRESENTED THROUGHOUT* providing *GENEROUS FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* spread over three floors. Situated in the *POPULAR MYLAND AREA* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK*, Colchester North Station and the A12/A120."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this three double bedroom detached house, situated in the ever popular area of Lexden, to the west of Colchester. The property occupies an excellent position within close proximity to local schools i..."
"**Guide Price £400,000-£425,000** Situated in the popular district of Stanway and positioned at the end of a private road off Tudor Rose Close is this well presented three bedroom detached bungalow. The bungalow boasts three generous bedrooms, a spacious lounge, modern fitted kitchen an..."
"Set in the heart of the Maldon Road district, nestled pleasantly along a peaceful and aesthetically pleasing street resides this deceptively spacious, three bedroom detached bungalow. With accommodation on one level, it offers a wealth of both bedroom and living space throughout.Highlig..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £425,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this four bedroom semi-detached family home, situated just a short distance to Colchester's city centre with good access to popular local primary and secondary schooling, shops and am..."
Purplebricks are delighted to offer this spacious and extended detached bungalow which is situated close to the popular St.Johns area to the north of Colchester. The property is offered in immaculate condition and has been completely transformed by the current owners with a new kitchen and showe...
"** GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £425,000 ** We are delighted to offer this three bedroom detached family home benefiting from garage and driveway, conservatory, three good size bedrooms with an En-suite to the master. The rear garden is a generous size being South West facing."
"**Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000** We are delighted to offer this outstanding portfolio opportunity, comprising of three separate maisonettes in one detached block of a converted building and ownership of the freehold. All three are presently let with long term tenants in ..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £425,000 ** Set in a popular location close to all local amenities sits this four bedroom detached family home. The accommodation is deceptively spacious throughout and would be ideal for a family looking to nestle down. The dining room to the rear of the pro..."
"Guide Price £400,00 - £425,000 This modern 3-bedroom townhouse is situated in the desirable Stanway area of Colchester, offering a convenient and comfortable lifestyle. The property boasts a stylish and contemporary design, with ample living space spread across three floors. On ..."
"Situated within a sought after area, within easy access to the A12 and walking distance to local shops and amenities, is this three bedroom detached bungalow. Upon entering the home, via the enclosed porch, you are greeted with a welcoming hallway which provides access to all of the accommodat..."
"Town and Country are pleased to present this beautifully presented, three bedroom detached bungalow situated in the popular area of St Johns. St johns offers a list of outstanding primary schools and also easy access to the A12 alongside a short walking to Highwoods Country Park. This property is..."
"***SAVE £6,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** This brand new home really does have it all, complete with a modern interior including bay window to the living room, INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, downstairs cloakroom and an en suite to bedroom 1. *SOUTH FACING GARDEN & DRIVEWAY WITH GARAGE*"
"***SAVE £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** Secure this brand new DOUBLE FRONTED HOME today, complete with driveway parking, a WEST FACING GARDEN, a dual aspect living room with French doors to the garden, integrated kitchen appliances, UTILITY ROOM and an en suite to bedroom 1."
"STYLISH 2.5 STOREY NEW ENERGY EFFICIENT HOME * £5,000 CASHBACK INCLUDED * MASTER ON ENTIRE TOP FLOOR WITH EN SUITE *  OPEN PLAN kitchen/dining area with FRENCH DOORS to the garden. Separate UTILITY area. SPACIOUS lounge"
"*Guide Price £390,000 - £410,000* *Offered tenants in situ or no chain* Positioned in Northern Colchester this property would make a fantastic investment or a brilliant family home. Currently used as an HMO bringing in £2600pcm this property provides ample ..."
"Early viewing is advised of this modern three bedroom semi detached house benefiting from accommodation arranged over three levels. The property benefits from spacious living accommodation, cloakroom, en suite to master bedroom, rear garden, allocated parking and garage."
"A good size four bedroom semi-detached family home situated within a walking distance of Colchester North Station and the Oaks Hospital offered in good decorative order with ground floor cloakroom, kitchen/diner, modern shower room and garden with summer house."
"**Guide Price £390,000 to £400,000** Occupying a pleasant position set back from the road, a spacious four bedroom detached town house offering excellent family accommodation arranged over three floors. "
"This three bedroom modern town house is located within walking distance to Colchester city centre and train station. On entering the property, there is an entrance hallway with doors through to the kitchen, lounge/diner and downstairs WC and a staircase to the first floor. The kitchen..."
"A three bedroom semi-detached moderm family home with garage and a large rear garden. The property offers an entrance hallway, cloakroom, kitchen and lounge/diner to the ground floor. There are two double bedrooms, an en-suite shower room and family shower room to the first floor, and ..."
"Martin & Co are pleased to present this RECENTLY BUILT, modern, three double bedroom, semi detached house with a large private rear garden, an attached single garage and covered driveway that can accommodate multiple cars. *VIEWINGS BY APPOINTMENT ONLY*"
Situated in the sought after Abbey Fields area of South Colchester is this stunning three bedroom converted military building which is full of character and exclusivity
"***SAVE £6,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** This brand new home is chain free and comes complete with a spacious living room with bay window, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN & DINING ROOM with integrated appliances, plus an en suite to bedroom 1. Outside boasts a PRIVATE GARDEN and driveway parking. "
"SOUTHSIDE OF COLCHESTER, walking distance to Abbey Fields, semi-detached, BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED, accommodation over three floors, FOUR BEDROOMS, kitchen, utility area, bathroom, OPEN PLAN LOUNGE AND DINING ROOM, garage and driveway"
"LOCATION LOCATION! PRETTYGATE - Perfectly positioned in a cul de sac, within the very popular area of Prettygate, is this extended three bedroom bay fronted semi detached home perfect for family living - Guide Price £385,000 - £400,000. Good sized accommodation includes large lounge, ..."
"This *DETACHED HOUSE* is well presented with *SUBSTANTIAL ACCOMMODATION* making the *PERFECT FAMILY HOME* viewing recommended. The property is situated in a *SOUGHT AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"We are delighted to offer chain free, this extended three bedroom detached home on a corner plot in the popular St Johns area. Offering a South facing rear garden, good room sizes throughout, an integral garage and driveway. It would benefit from updating the décor. Located within a short ..."
"Chesterwell, fast becoming the number one destination in Colchester, new schools coming, close road and rail links, plenty of green open space, The Plaza in the planning with the latest Co-op at your fingertips. Buyers Weekend 11 & 12 March Call for your appointment "
"Situated in the sought-after modern development is this stylish three double bedroom semi-detached home a short distance from Tollgate shopping district, A12 and popular primary and secondary schooling. "
"We are delighted to offer for sale this bay-fronted semi-detached house situated just off Layer Road. The property is in excellent condition throughout and viewing is recommended; benefits include driveway and garage, shower room with separate WC, Hamilton Primary School catchment. "
"**LAST THREE REMAINING - EXCLSUIVE OFFER AVAILABLE** (Apartment 53/Plot 49) McCarthy & Stone offers retirement living to the highest of standards. Raising the benchmark and exceeding all expectations, Lancer House is positioned in the heart of Colchester's City Centre and offers tranquil, ..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £375,000-£400,000** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this well-presented three bedroom detached house, situated in the ever popular district of Stanway, to the west of Colchester's city centre, known for highly regarded schooling and ..."
"
Two-bedroom Shared Ownership house available now in Colchester
"
"***GUIDE PRICE £180,000*** One bedroom cluster house - Located in the popular area of Highwoods, offering convenient access to local amenities as well as the A12."
Temme English are delighted to present this four/five bedroom family home set over three floors situated to the South side of Colchester close to local schooling and amenities
NO CHAIN! MORE INTERNAL PHOTOGRAPHS TO FOLLOW. We are delighted to present this fantastic three bedroom DETACHED bungalow situated in this NON estate location to the West side of Colchester in Stanway
"Beautifully presented and offered to market in excellent order, this three bedroom semi-detached family home is positioned in Prettygate, a favourable district of Colchester's vibrant city centre and home to some of the city's most favourable comprehensive education, as well as being within st..."
"This excellent *SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE* provides *AMPLE FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* making the *PERFECT HOME FOR GROWING FAMILIES with viewing highly recommended. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* in the *ROACH VALE AREA* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops and the A12/A120."
"£375,000-£400,000 Guide Price.This fantastic *EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE* is *BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED* offering *AMPLE FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* with *EARLY VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED*. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION* convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000 An incredibly spacious link detached bungalow in ever popular North Colchester. Three impressive double bedrooms, recently upgraded bath/shower room, 22' lounge plus the kitchen and connecting breakfast room, garage to the rear and no chain !!"
Three-bedroom detached family house located on the popular Poets Corner development in Lexden. The house does require some updating but has gas heating and double glazing.
INVESTORS ONLY - A good size three/four bedroom town house situated within walking distance of Colchester town centre and Abbey Fields. Offered for sale with no onward chain. 
"** GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000 ** Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market this exceptional, three bedroom detached family residence. The current owners have created such a beautiful home throughout and would be ideal for anyone looking to move straight in without having t..."
"Guide Price £375,00 - £400,000 This four-bedroom semi-detached home is ideally located in the south/west area of Colchester, an area that offers convenient access to local shopping facilities, bus routes and Hamilton Primary School. Colchester's town centre is only a short distance away ..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000 ** Situated in the popular Longridge Park to the North of Colchester with excellent access to local schools, shops and amenities sits this deceptively spacious, four bedroom detached family home. The accommodation has been well maintained..."
"Situated on an impressive plot, this four bedroom detached home commands a fantastic position in the ever popular 'Longridge' district of Colchester city. Presenting itself as the ideal family home, this property boasts a wealth of reception and bedroom space throughout, as well being spoilt w..."
"This three-bedroom property is located in the popular and sought-after area of Lexden, just a short distance to the West of the city centre. It is in the catchment area for Hamilton Primary School, making it a great choice for young families. "
"Offered to the market with no onward chain and being situated in the popular Roman Fields development you are within easy access to the A12 with easy links to Chelmsford and beyond, train station, local amenities and schools sits this well presented, three bedroom detached family home. "
"**GUIDE PRICE £375,000-£400,000** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom semi-detached house, situated to within walking distance of the highly regarded Hamilton primary school, as well as local shops and amenities. The property is loc..."
"*** Guide Price £375,000-£400,000 *** Located in the popular Riverside development and within a short walk to Colchester City Centre is this stunningly refurbished, three bedroom, semi detached family home. Over the past twelve months every inch of this home has been modern..."
"A simply stunning link-detached family home, perfectly positioned in North Colchester for North Station, Superstores, A12/A120/ A133 access and the town centre is close-by also. With a garden room extension and a picture perfect finish, this is too good to miss"
"* Guide Price £375,000 to £400,000 * The perfect combination of period charm and contemporary finish are featured throughout this exceptional Victorian three bedroom, semi-detached bay fronted residence. Positioned in one of the most sought after roads, in the Lexden district and i..."
"Located in the sought after Westlands Estate close to local amenities sits this deceptively spacious, three bedroom semi detached house. The accommodation consists of an entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen/diner, bathroom plus three good size bedrooms. Externally, there is a garage and d..."
"GUIDE PRICE £375,000 to £395,000
As the sellers sole agents, we have pleasure in offering for sale this detached family home on the ever popular highwoods development conveneniently situated to the Gilberd School, Colchester North Station and A12 links.  ..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £375,000-£400,000** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this five double bedroom detached house, situated to the east of Colchester providing excellent access to nearby schools, shops, amenities, Hy..."
"Positioned within the heart of Prettygate, is this two bedroom detached bungalow. Offering a wealth of amenities within close proximity, including a public house, library, good schooling, shops, plus bus routes, this location really is an ideal spot.Having recently undergone full refurb..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this three bedroom semi-detached house, situated within walking distance of excellent local schools and Colchester's city centre with a variet..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £375,000 - £400,000 ***This stunning example of a three bedroom home is located on a highly desirable and family orientated development in Stanway, to the west of Colchester. Offering excellent access to local shopping facilities, restaurants and popular s..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £375,000 - £400,000 *** Located to the West side of Colchester we are delighted to offer this Four bedroom family home benefiting from a 70ft rear garden, Conservatory and with the main house having undergone much improvement by the current owners over recent years...."
"**Guide Price £375,000 - £400,000** Residing in the ever popular Longridge Park Development, this impressive four bedroom detached family home is ideal for the modern day expanding family and is within easy access to an excellent choice of primary and secondary schools, as well as ..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £375,000-£400,000***
Located in the 'Hamilton Road school catchment area' we are delighted to offer this well presented three bedroom semi-detached Victorian house which benefits from off road parking, original features throughout, established rear garden with detached st..."
"This exceptional *DETACHED HOUSE* is *BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED* providing *GENEROUS ACCOMMODATION* making the *PERFECT FAMILY HOME*. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* in the *ROACH VALE AREA* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops and the A12/A120. Viewing is highly recommended."
"A spacious four bedroom town house, located in the very popular area of Stanway to the West of Colchester City Centre. With preferred schooling, Tollgate and Stane retail parks, as well as the A12 all close-by. This is the right place in the right place!!"
Offering versatile spacious well presented accommodation is this four/five bedroom period property a short distance from mainline railway stations and city centre with off road parking and a good sized rear garden.
"An impressive residence located within walking distance to Colchester centre, the home has been recently refurbished to a magnificent standard featuring four bedrooms, large garden space, modern bathroom, driveway and garage. The popular Abbey fields is also on the door step for the fitness enthu..."
"**LAST THREE REMAINING - EXCLUSIVE OFFER AVAILABLE** (Apartment 36/Plot 33) McCarthy & Stone offers retirement living to the highest of standards. Raising the benchmark and exceeding all expectations, Lancer House is positioned in the heart of Colchester's City Centre and offers tranquil, ..."
Located in the ever sought-after area of Stanway is this beautifully presented two bedroom detached bungalow. Having undergone a stunning refurbishment over the last few years this home is ready to move straight into and has been finished to the highest of standards. A large lounge which leads in...
"This excellent *SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE* provides *GENEROUS FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* with viewing highly recommended. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* on the *ST JOHNS ESTATE* the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, bus routes and the A12/A120."
"This four bedroom extended family home is situated on the ever popular St Johns development to the north of Colchester and benefits from excellent access to local schooling, hospitals and A12 road links.  There is extensive parking along with a integral garage, early viewing is recom..."
SOUTH FACING GARDEN * MASTER WITH EN SUITE * OPEN PLAN kitchen dining area with FRENCH DOORS * UTILITY area & CLOAKROOM * Family bathroom with separate BATH and SHOWER.
"A three-bedroom link-detached property in the sought-after area of Highwoods, to the North of Colchester town centre, benefitting from off-road parking, garage, open-plan living, and an en-suite to the principal bedroom."
"The three-bedroom Danbury has a modern open plan kitchen/dining room with garden access and a spacious front-aspect living room. Upstairs there are three bedrooms - bedroom one has an en suite - and a family-sized bathroom. Appealing to families, first-time buyers and young professionals."
Three bedroom semi-detached bay window Victorian house in sought after Lexden. Close to Town. Parking & garden.
"Nestled within a quiet cul-de-sac, a delightful two bedroom detached bungalow located in the City of Colchester."
"Situated in a prominent position, within striking distance of Colchester's town centre, is this spacious 3 bedroom family home. Occupying a generously sized plot, there is ample space both inside and out."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £350,000 - £375,000 ***Find this three bedroom home located in the highly regarded St Johns area to the north of Colchester and situated close to local amenities. The nearby Highwoods development is within easy reach with its Tesco Superstore and..."
"We are delighted to offer this completely unique Duplex First Floor Maisonette in the sought after and historic Dutch Quarter in Colchester City centre. Offering lots of character, large room sizes, high ceilings and original features mixed with modern contemporary kitchen and bathroom, this home..."
"A wonderful detached family home in a sought after cul-de-sac and North Colchester location. Three bedrooms, conservatory extension, garage and parking for multiple vehicles, great access to the A12, North Station, Colchester General Hospital and preferred schooling"
In need of some modernisation is this extended four bedroom semi-detached house nestled at the end of a quiet cul-de-sac in the popular district of Stanway. The property is within easy reach of good local amenities and popular school catchments. 
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £350,000 - £375,000 *** This beautifully presented three bedroom semi detached family home is located in the popular Stanway area to the west of Colchester. Built on 2020 by Taylor Wimpey Homes the property comprise of a entrance hall, spacious living room, high spe..."
"Situated in a cul-de-sac position is this three bedroom family home on the popular Highwoods development within walking distance to the country park, Gilberd Secondary School and Tesco Superstore offering a good size garden and detached garage. "
"Beresfords are excited to present this spacious three bedroom semi detached house boasting a brilliant location in the centre of Colchester, with no onward chain. Through the front door you are met by an entrance hall leading to a large lounge/diner featuring a bay window and sliding doors to the..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000** We are delighted to offer this fantastic, extended character family home in one of Colchester’s most sought after roads. A road steeped in history and charm immediately next to the historic Colchester castle and its park and within ..."
"Guide Price of £350,000 to £360,000. This stunning three-bedroom, three-storey townhouse is a testament to quality and style, built by the renowned Persimmon Homes. The property boasts spacious and well-appointed living areas, perfect for modern-day living and families due to having a se..."
"Stunning two bedroom semi-detached home on the new Castellum Grange development, a short distance from the City Centre along with a multitude of local attractions, transport links and amenities. Massively upgraded by the current owners"
"This is a beautifully-proportioned three-bedroom home. Downstairs there’s a front aspect kitchen and a spacious living/dining room with French doors leading into the rear garden. The first floor is home to a generous-sized bedroom one complete with an en suite, and there are two further bedrooms."
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Set in a prime location and offered to the market with no onward chain sits this well presented, three bedroom terraced house. Set within walking distance to the City Centre offering an array of amenities to enjoy plus the mainline train station with links to London Liverpoo..."
Situated to the south of Colchester and set back from the road is this three bedroom detached house with garage and parking.
A stunning two double bedroom penthouse apartment occupying a wonderful position with views over Colchester's historic castle.
"Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market this deceptively spacious, three bedroom semi detached house. Upon entering this family home, you are welcomed by a large driveway which in turn leads to the garage providing off road parking for multiple vehicles. The accommodation has..."
"Situated in a popular location close to all local amenities including supermarkets, shops and the A12 with links to Chelmsford and beyond sits this well presented, three bedroom detached family home. Colchester's City Centre is only a short drive away offering a further range of amenit..."
"Oakheart are delighted to bring to the market this unique duplex coach house. The property is situated in the highly desirable area of Highwoods, with great access links to the ever-growing northern gateway development and the A12 all while being a short distance away from Turner Rise Retail park..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000 ** Located to the north/east of Colchester in a popular location, close to schools and a wealth of amenities, is this beautifully presented detached family home. Internally the property benefits from a entrance area with coat storage, ground floor cl..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000 ** Offered to the market with no onward chain sits this four/five bedroom, detached chalet bungalow. The accommodation has been well maintained throughout and would be a perfect purchase for a homemover or an investor looking for a great opportunity...."
"**Guide Price £350,000 - £375,000** An excellent opportunity has arisen to acquire this three bedroom semi-detached family home, residing in the ever popular Prettygate district of Colchester City. Renowned for a choice of excellent schooling, as well as being within walking distan..."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this modern three bedroom house, situated in this highly sought after area to the north of Colchester with easy access to local schooling, the General Hospital and Colchester's mainline railway station with mainline links to London Liverp..."
"Temme English are delighted to present this STUNNING three bedroom, semi-detached, bay fronted home situated in this ever popular Old Heath location situated stones throw from the Old Heath recreation ground and within easy access of the historic city centre/station."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £350,000 TO £375,000 ***Offered for sale in the very heart of Stanway is this two bedroom detached bungalow. Stanway is popular for many reasons, mainly for its large array of local shops, amenities and highly regarded schools. Tollgate retail park is with..."
"This bungalow should not be missed out on, being offered for sale with NO onward chain and the size of accommodation really needs to be viewed internally to be fully appreciated"
"This modern detached family home offers much, a clever garage conversion coupled with an insulated timber link through building, gives the property the perfect home office/gym as well as a TV or games room. This is on top of a generous lounge, study area and kitchen diner. Outside there is parkin..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000 ** This superb three bedroom modern home is situated on Gavin Way in Highwoods, offering excellent access to the A12, General Hospital and North station with it's mainline links to London Liverpool Street. The location is also positioned perfectly f..."
"This charming *SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE* is *BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT* making the *PERFECT HOME FOR GROWING FAMILIES* with early viewing highly recommended. Situated on the *SOUGHT-AFTER ST JOHNS ESTATE* the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, bus services and A12/A120."
"A unique opportunity to purchase chain free this turn of the 19th century period property that retains a host of its original period features which include, sash windows, stripped interior doors, picture rails and fireplaces. The property is in need of renovation works to bring it back to it's fo..."
"***Guide price £160,000 - £170,000*** A two bedroom top floor flat which is offered with a tenant in situ. This property offers a modern fitted kitchen, bathroom, one allocated parking space and visitor spaces."
"** GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000 ** Set in a popular location close to local amenities and the train station sits this well presented, three bedroom detached family home. The deceptively spacious accommodation comprises an entrance hallway with doors leading off to the ba..."
"This beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached house is located within the popular location of New Town in Colchester, within walking distance to the city centre and train station with direct links to London Liverpool Street. As you enter the property there is a living room wi..."
"Saxons are offering this two bedroom detached bungalow located in the sought after Prettygate area on the west side of Colchester. Requiring some light modernisation/updating, this well proportioned property also benefits from ample off road parking with garage and is on offer with no onward chain."
*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE - THURSDAY 11TH MAY - 11am – 4.30pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* A beautifully presented TWO bedroom second floor apartment with TWO BALCONIES with outlook towards the rear of the development. Lancer House is a retirement living plus development with an ON-SITE RE...
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market with no onward chain this spacious, three bedroom terraced town house. Colchester's City Centre is only a short drive away offering an array of amenities to enjoy plus the mainline train station with links to London Liverpool ..."
"Beresfords are delighted to offer this fantastic 3 bedroom family home in a highly sought after location. Offering catchment of the sought after Gilberd secondary school and easy access to the A12, hospital, mainline train station to London and highwoods county park - this family home couldn't be..."
"Prettygate bungalo*** Guide Price-£375,000*** A rare opportunity to purchase an established detached bungalow in the ever popular Prettygate area of Colchester"
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom detached bungalow, situated to the south of Colchester, providing easy access to local schools, shops, amenities and bus routes, as well as being a short drive from the A12 corridor towards London & Ipswich and Colche..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £350,000 - £375,000 *** Jackson and Co are extremely pleased to announce to the market this three bedroom property, situated in the heart of Prettygate, Offering NO ONWARD CHAIN. With plenty of potential this property would be ideal for a family home, as well as bein..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £365,000 ** Situated to the South of Colchester, located in the very popular Solace development close to local amenities sits this well presented, four bedroom, terraced family home. The accommodation is spacious throughout and is set over three f..."
Temme English are delighted to present this deceptively spacious three bedroom semi-detached home positioned in a NON ESTATE location to the west side of Colchester. 
"This property is ideally located in the popular area of Stanway, offering easy access to a wide range of local amenities, including shops, supermarkets, restaurants and schools. The nearby A12 provides easy access to other parts of Colchester and beyond, making this an ideal location for commuter..."
"An enviable two double bedroom apartment, set within this excellent retirement complex, recently opened and offering high specification fitments throughout, with the benefit of supported living if required. This apartment is located on the second floor, with lift access and has the rare benefi..."
"Beresfords are delighted to bring to market this exceptionally well presented three bedroom, two bathroom, semi detached family home. The property is a former show home of the development, offering unique features such as additional internal space and landscaped front and rear gardens with mature..."
"**Guide Price £350,000 to £375,000** - A stylish and remodelled three bedroom double fronted family home situated a short distance from Gilberd secondary school, General Hospital and North station offering open plan living, good size lounge, ensuite to master with garage and parking."
"This three double bedroom detached Victorian house is situated within walking distance of Colchester's historic city centre. The property benefits from spacious living accommodation, character features and a kitchen which requires refurbishment. Externally there is off road parking and rear garden."
Semi-Detached Home - Good Sized Living Room - Modern Kitchen - Downstairs WC - Master Bedroom With En Suite - Additional Bedroom - Family Bathroom - Garden With Outbuilding - Two Allocated Parking Spaces - Excellent Transport Links
"Jackson and Co are pleased to present this excellent three bedroom family home which is detached and located in the sought after Longridge area. The property offers two driveways along with a garage, two reception rooms, an impressive garden and would be an ideal purchase."
"Situated to the west of Colchester in the sought after location of Stanway and being offered for sale with no onward chain is this well presented two bedroom detached bungalow with generous bedrooms and living accommodation, ensuite to master bedroom, off road parking, garage, and garden. "
"Guide Price £350,000 - £375,000. An immaculately presented two double bedroom townhouse arranged over three floors, which has undergone a full refurbishment by the current owners. Walking distance to the the city centre and mainline railway station."
"£5,000 CASHBACK, FLOORING + APPLIANCES INCLUDED * SOUTH WEST FACING GARDEN * MASTER EN SUITE * STUNNING OPEN PLAN kitchen / dining area, with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden. Separate UTILITY area and CLOAKROOM. Master is complete with EN SUITE shower ..."
*** INVESTMENT OPPITUNITY *** Established HMO which is very well situated for Colchester North mainline railway train station and Colchester General Hospital
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this *EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW* offers *SUBSTANTIAL ACCOMMODATION* with potential to make the *PERFECT FAMILY HOME*. Situated in a *POPULAR LOCATION* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SHOPS*, schools, bus routes and the A12/A120. Viewing is highly recommended."
"***GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom detached house, situated in the highly sought after area of Lexden, conveniently close to a range of local schools, shops and amenities including Tollgate's Stane R..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £270,000- £280,000*** Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this two bedroom terraced house, situated to the north of Colchester. The property's location provides excellent access to North Station with mainline links to London Liverpool Street an..."
"* FLOORING & INTEGRATED APPLIANCES NOW INCLUDED * Ideal for first time buyers or growing families. STUNNING OPEN PLAN kitchen / dining area, with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden. Separate UTILITY area and CLOAKROOM. Master is complete with EN SUITE shower room. ..."
"A fabulous three bedroom extended semi detached house offered to a very high standard throughout just to the south of the town centre with a stylish kitchen/utility room, external office, off road parking and good living space throughout."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £340,000 - £365,000 *** ** INVESTMENT ONLY ** An impressive, five bedroom, licensed HMO located within easy access to Essex university, Hythe station, and local shops and amenities. The property is currently let for £2262 per calendar month and offers a yield o..."
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: Semi Detached House Fitted Kit...
"Chesterwell an area of Colchester that is fast becoming a community, close to all amenities including the newly built Chesterwell Plaza which will house a number of small retail outlets. Plenty of green open spaces to enjoy. Call Angela or Amanda and book an appointment. "
"Saxons are delighted to offer this stunning duplex apartment located in arguably one of Colchester's most prestigious developments. Overlooking the River Colne and within walking distance of Castle Park and the City Centre, this spectacular property offers spacious and light accommodation........."
"Located within Colchester’s popular waterfront Hythe area is this four bedroom townhouse available with no onward chain. With spacious rooms throughout the property comprises of a kitchen and lounge on the ground floor, with four bedrooms, bathroom and en-suite across the first floor and se..."
"(Apartment 19/Plot 17) McCarthy & Stone offers retirement living to the highest of standards. Raising the benchmark and exceeding all expectations, Lancer House is positioned in the heart of Colchester's City Centre and offers tranquil, peaceful and secure living within it's well equipped ..."
"A two bedroom semi-detached bungalow to the West of Colchester, with potential to extend to both the rear and side."
"FINAL 2 BED ON THE DEVELOPMENT * MASTER WITH EN SUITE SHOWER * 2 PARKING SPACES * 2 DOUBLE BEDS * SOUTH FACING GARDEN * SPACIOUS lounge, OPEN PLAN kitchen / dining area with FRENCH DOORS to the garden. UTILITY area."
"Viewing is highly recommended. This wonderful *SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE* is beautifully presented throughout providing *IDEAL ACCOMMODATION FOR GROWING FAMILIES*. Situated on the *SOUGHT-AFTER ST JOHN'S ESTATE* the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *BUS ROUTES* and the A12/A120."
"*CALLING ALL INVESTORS!* •4-bedroom semi-detached home with potential for 5 bedrooms •Tenants in-situ providing an 8% yield •Chain Free •Easy access to The University Of Essex, local shops & transport links"
"Guide Price of £325,000 - £350,000. Positioned to the south of Colchester, within close proximity to Abbey Fields offering plenty of outdoor facilities, is this three-bedroom family home. Also located close by is Colchester's Town Centre which offers an array of shops, restaurants and en..."
Purplebricks are delighted to offer this extended three/four bedroom semi detached house situated in the Shrub End to the south of Colchester. The property has been extended previously that has provided an additional living room or ground floor bedroom and a wet room. The accommodation comprise...
"A two bedroom semi-detached bungalow located on the popular west side of Colchester. The bungalow occupies a pleasant cul-de-sac position in this highly regarded area, with shopping facilities and amenities nearby for day to day needs. Tollgate Retail Park is a short distance away offe..."
"This three bedroom semi detached family home is situated on the east side of Colchester within close proximity of local primary school. The property benefits from well presented and spacious living accommodation, three bedrooms, rear garden with outbuilding/office and off road parking for two cars."
"** GUIDE PRICE £325,000 - £350,000 ** Set in a popular location close to local amenities and only a short drive away from Colchester's City Centre and the mainline train station sits this well presented, three bedroom detached family home. The accommodation is deceptively ..."
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market with no onward chain this well presented, three bedroom semi detached family home. Upon entering this residence you are welcomed by a generous driveway providing off road parking for multiple vehicles which in turn ..."
"New to the market is this mid-terraced town house with flexible accommodation comprising of four bedrooms, kitchen/diner, and separate lounge. There is a large driveway for numerous cars and due to its proximity to Essex University could make a worthwhile investment property. "
This has to be the biggest house and plot for this budget in CO4 !! Not only that but it is beautifully presented and chain free. Need room to grow? Could you extend/develop if needed? (STPP) Click or call to view before it goes
This is a rare and unique opportunity to own this well presented three bedroom penthouse apartment in the popular CO2 postcode of Colchester Town. With it's 49ft wide balcony and views over Colchester and the Hythe a viewing is highly recommended at your earliest convenience.
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this excellent *DETACHED HOUSE* provides *AMPLE ACCOMMODATION* with the *POTENTIAL TO MAKE THE PERFECT FAMILY HOME*. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* off Ipswich Road the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *BUS ROUTES* and the A12/A120."
Investment Purchase Only - This 5 bedroom HMO is offered to investment buyers with student lets agreed for the 21/22 term. The ex local authority mid terrace has undergone a considered conversion and as a licensed HMO provided good return for the current owner.
"Situated close to the city centre is this good size well presented three bedroom family home offering four piece bathroom, ensuite shower room, converted loft, well fitted kitchen and conservatory."
"Guide Price £325,000-£350,000. Temme English are delighted to present this large three bedroom home situated within walking distance to the town centre and station, it is also close to open space with ‘Abbey Fields’ and the ‘Old Heath Recreat"
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £325,000 TO £350,000 ***Positioned to the West of Colchester is this well proportioned four bedroom semi detached family home. Located on London Road within Stanway this home is within walking distance of Stane Retail Park and Tollgate Retail Park whi..."
"**GUIDE PRICE 325,000 - £350,000** Located close to Colchester Train Station is this exceptionally spacious home. Offering versatile accomodation and four bedrooms. REF(NBC220776)"
"A spacious three-bedroom terrace house, in a popular family residential area, built-in 2014 this house is situated over three floors, the master bedroom and ensuite have the entire top floor to themselves. Off street parking to the front and also in a private resident's parking area...."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a spacious 2-bedroom semi-detached bungalow with a stunning westerly-facing garden, off-street parking and a garage. This home occupies an attractive position in Prettygate Colchester and with its excellent local amenities and fantastic transport links, this tru..."
"*Offered Chain Free* Ideally located on a quiet road in the heart of Colchester city, this 3-bedroom home is characterised by its unique design and generously sized plot."
"NO CHAIN...we are pleased to offer for sale this four bedroom mid-terraced house situated just off Mersea Road. The property benefits from gas central heating (not tested by Elms Price and Co), double glazing and SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN. Viewing is recommended. "
"East Links Residential are delighted to bring to the market this good sized Three Bedroom Family Home, located in the popular Riverside Estate and within close proximity of Colchester Town Centre."
" This modern detached house to the south of Colchester offers an entrance hallway with cloakroom, lounge and kitchen/diner to the ground floor. On the first floor there are three bedrooms, a family bathroom and en-suite to the master bedroom. We also understand there is parking av..."
"Located on the North side of Colchester stands this well presented, 3 bedroom home. This property has an abundance of offerings including easy access to the A12, within the catchment area for excellent schools, direct access to Highwoods Country Park and within striking distance of the city centr..."
"A North Colchester home of considerable stature with a layout that offers versatility. Three double bedrooms with the master taking up the whole of the ground floor, very generous wrap around (side and rear) garden, parking for multiple vehicles and garage. Chain free"
"*** Guide Price - £325,000 - £350,000 *** Located a short walk from Colchester Town Centre and all of its amenities is the Grade II listed townhouse, available with no onward chain. With many original features, including exposed beams and fireplaces,"
"***Guide price of £325,000 - £350,000*** A chance to buy this three bedroom detached house located on the ever popular Solus Development on the South side of Colchester"
"Early viewing is advised of this three bedroom detached family home having been renovated over the last few years by the owner. The property benefits from spacious living accommodation, three bedrooms, four piece family bathroom and enclosed rear garden measuring approx 100 ft."
"When only North will do... Superbly located family home providing exceptional access to the A12, North Station, The Hospital and Preferred Schooling. This is a chain free home too"
"Early viewing is advised of this end of terrace house with NO ONWARD CHAIN, offering an excellent investment opportunity. The property benefits from shower room and bathroom, spacious living accommodation, five bedrooms, gardens and allocated parking for several cars."
"**Guide Price £325,000 - £350,000** We are delighted to offer this well sized and extended three bedroom semi-detached house on the popular Westlands development in Stanway. Located near the picturesque Westlands Country Park and within walking distance of good schools and ..."
"A luxury third floor penthouse apartment occupying a prime position overlooking Colchester's historic castle, set in the centre of Colchester's thriving High Street. "
"**GUIDE PRICE £325,000 - £350,000** We are delighted to offer this modern 3 bedroom end of terrace home with off-road parking and good sized garden. Located within a short distance of the castle park, town centre, A12, train station, schools and local amenities. This proper..."
"What a lot it has got and what a plot it has got !! This three bedroom detached family home is in a prime non-estate location in North Colchester, perfectly poised for the A12, Colchester Hospital, North Station, Gilberd School and Turner Rise amenities. Check out the sweeping corner plot !!"
Purplebricks are delighted to offer this deceptively spacious three bedroom house offering ample living accommodation throughout whilst residing on a generous plot with a sizeable rear garden. Positioned conveniently within the popular estate offering superb access to local shops and amenities ...
"Boydens are delighted to bring to market this spacious three bedroom Victorian residence, located to the North of Colchester on the highly sought after Nayland Road."
"Located on the south side of Colchester heading out of the town towards Mersea Island is this three bedroom home. Location here is excellent as it is only a walk to the local primary school, excellent public transport links, easy access to local shops and other amenities. Also other benefits o..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this two bedroom, ground floor maisonette, situated in the centre of Colchester which offers a wealth of shops, bars, restaurants and easy access to North Train Station with mainline links to Londo..."
"The Kersey is a perfect FIRST HOME with TWO DOUBLE bedroom and an EN-SUITE to the Master bedroom. There is OPEN PLAN LIVING in the kitchen, dining and living area. Bedroom 2 could be used as a STUDY - great if you WORK FROM HOME, plus a GOOD SIZED BATHROOM. With the home is CARPORT PARKING"
"***GUIDE PRICE OF £315,000 TO £325,000***This three bedroom family home is situated to the south of Colchester on a popular family orientated development. With spacious living accommodation, en-suite, private rear garden and off road parking.On the ground floor you wi..."
"This investment opportunity is situated on the south west side of Colchester and is offered with no ongoing chain. The property is currently let out as a HMO providing five bedrooms, two en suites, bathroom, kitchen and self contained studio apartment with en suite."
A three bedroom semi-detached bungalow situated in the sought after residential area of PRETTYGATE. The property requires LIGHT IMPROVEMENTS and is offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. An early viewing is recommended. 
"We are pleased to offer this investment opportunity which is currently producing a yield of approximately 10% per annum. The property has been converted into a house of multi occupation and consists of five bedrooms with two en-suites, communal kitchen and self contained studio with shower room. ..."
"*IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS!* Secure this brand new home today, complete with a CHAIN FREE MOVE, 10 year warranty and modern interior including an open plan living and dining room, and an EN SUITE to bedroom 1. The private gardens are also NOT OVERLOOKED and this home comes with 2 parking spaces."
"** Guide Price £310,000 - £320,000 ** Beresfords are delighted to bring to market this exceptionally well presented, two bedroom semi-detached home. Located in the ever-popular Chesterwell development, this home is a must see. Having been maintained to an excellent standar..."
"We are proud to offer this Four Bedroom Semi-Detached Townhouse – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £310,000 - £340,000*"
"We are proud to present this Four Bedroom Semi Detached Town House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £310,000 - £340,000*"
"*NEW TO THE MARKET!* Secure this brand new home today, complete with a CHAIN FREE MOVE, 10 year NHBC warranty and modern interior including an open plan living and dining room, and an EN SUITE to bedroom 1. The private gardens are also NOT OVERLOOKED and this home comes with 2 parking spaces."
"This lovely semi-detcached home has much to offer. Located in Colchester, it boasts three bedrooms, two reception rooms and a double garage. It also offers ample off-road parking. This is the perfect opportunity for any home hunter. Viewing advised, we don't anticipate the property being on the ..."
"Nestled on a modern popular development in the heart of Stanway is this stylish end terraced house, comprising of two double bedrooms, open plan living space, cloakroom, and family bathroom. Offering convenient A12 access and excellent shopping facilities of tollgate centre on your doorstep. "
"We are delighted to offer this fantastic 3 bedroom semi detached family home in a fantastic location. It would suit residential buyers and buy-to-let investors alike. Although it is a semi detached home, it is attached from the back and boasts all the kerb appeal of a double fronted detached hous..."
"£300,000-£325,000 Guide Price. *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this charming *DETACHED FAMILY HOUSE* would make the *IDEAL HOME FOR GROWING FAMILIES*, viewing highly recommended. Situated in a *POPULAR LOCATION* and is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"* £300,000 to £325,000 Guide Price * Conveniently positioned within moments of Colchester's exciting and vibrant city centre, as well as a stones throw from Colchester's mainline station - offering links to London Liverpool Street within the hour, sits this excellent and deceptivel..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this spacious three bedroom semi-detached house, situated in the sought after area of Prettygate within easy access to local shops, amenities and ..."
On offer is this stylish and modern semi-detached family home on the a sought after development in Stanway. Offering excellent A12 access and the shopping facilities of tollgate centre on your doorstep this will make a great first time home.
"Guide Price £300,000 to £325,000 ***Investment buyers only*** Offered in good decorative order throughout is this spacious property offering itself as an excellent investment purchaser due to its location close to the University of Essex with the potential to achieve a sizeable income."
"Pleasantly positioned in a desirable cul-de-sac position and located favourably to the South of Colchester is this well maintained and excellently presented, three bedroom semi-detached family home - offering tremendous and flexible living accommodation, evenly distributed across two floo..."
"£300,000-£325,000 Guide Price. This fantastic *END-TERRACE HOUSE* is well-presented with *AMPLE ACCOMMODATION* making the *IDEAL HOME FOR GROWING FAMILIES*. Situated in a *POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA* convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops the A12/A120. An early viewing is highly recommended."
"** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000 ** Offered to the market with no onward chain and situated to the West of Colchester sits this deceptively spacious, two bedroom detached bungalow. In need of modernisation throughout this would be an ideal purchase for anyone looking to create a hou..."
"A priced to sell, chain free, detached bungalow with extensive parking, detached garage and in a prime Prettygate/Lexden location just yards from a local store, petrol station, chemist and post office and a short drive away from major stores"
"Connells are excited to bring to market this contemporary detached bungalow in the heart of Highwoods. With a private driveway, garage and a fantastic location; we highly recommend you view with us today!"
"Modern living at its best, The Morden's open plan kitchen, dining, living room is bright and ideal for the way we live today. Upstairs there are two nicely-proportioned bedrooms and a family-sized bathroom. Perfect for first-time buyers and young professionals."
Two bedroom apartment close to local amenities in a popular central location close to the University Of Essex
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** ** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £320,000 ** Sittang Close is situated a short drive away from Colchester's City Centre offering an array of amenities to enjoy including shops, restaurants and public houses, a perfect buy for first time buyers looking to nestle down in ..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this well presented, three bedroom family home situated within close proximity to Colchester's historic city centre, Castle Park and Town train station with its mainline links to Lo..."
Viewing Day Saturday 16th July 09:30-13:00 Appointment Needed Beautiful two bedroom terraced house located in the desirable area of St Marys in Lexden which is a short walk from the town centre
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000. A two bedroom detached bungalow situated to the west of Colchester's town centre in the sought after residential area of STANWAY, offering convenient access to the main A12 trunk road, Colchester and Marks Tey train stations. The property requires FULL..."
"Tucked away in this quiet cul de sac within a short walk to the beautiful nature reserve is this three bedroom family home.
As you arrive you are firstly greeted with the front garden, once inside, the entrance hall leads you through to the lounge, kitchen / breakfast room with a range of fitted ..."
"**Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000** Commanding an excellent position in Colchester's historic and vibrant city centre, offering peace and tranquillity and located off the very desirable Lexden Road, sits this deceptively spacious two-bedroom bungalow. Offered to the open market wit..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £300,000-£325,000. We are delighted to bring to market this STUNNING three bedroom end of terrace home situated to the South side of Colchester on just off the popular 'Willows' and close to an array of schooling/amenities. "
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000-£325,000. Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this excellent *SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE* is well-presented throughout making the *PERFECT FAMILY HOME*. Situated on the *SOUGHT-AFTER ST JOHNS ESTATE* the property is close to *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, bus services and A12/A120."
"** Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000 ** Nestled in the popular district of Lexden is this spacious and well presented two bedroom bungalow. The bungalow boast two well appointed bedrooms, a spacious lounge with French doors providing access into a large sun room, a separate kitchen, and a..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £300,000 to £325,000***Located in the heart of Stanway, a village to the west side of Colchester is this two/three bedroom family home. Offering a wealth of charm and character throughout coupled with a modern twist this property would make for the ideal f..."
"**Guide Price £300,000 to £325,000** - Offered for sale with no ongoing chain a well-presented three bedroom semi-detached house within easy reach of Colchester city centre and mainline railway station. "
Located on the very popular Highwoods development of Colchester is this three bedroom semi detached house
"Offered to market with no onward chain and positioned to the South of Colchester's city centre, on the 'St. Michaels' estate sits this spacious and recently upgraded four bedroom end of terrace family home. Ideal for the expanding family and offering a wealth of bedroom and living space throug..."
"Guide Price: £300,000 - £325,000 This well presented three bedroom semi-detached house is located within close proximity to Colchester Town centre. The property is a short walk to a number of independent shops and cultural sites including, galleries, museums, theatres, cinemas, and resta..."
"Early viewing is advised of this three bedroom character home situated on Bergholt Road. The property benefits from spacious open plan living accommodation, three bedrooms, first floor bathroom, large rear garden and allocated permit parking."
"Residing in a quiet location in Stanway to the west side of Colchester is this two bedroom home, ideal for a first time buyer. The area is perfect for those looking for good access to the A12/A120, public transport links, good schooling and shopping facilities. Tollgate retail park and Stane P..."
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this *EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE* provides *GENEROUS ACCOMMODATION* with the potential to make the *IDEAL FAMILY HOME*. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
" This stunning three bedroom terraced property is ideal for commuters and families alike- with spaciousness throughout and great transport links, this property needs to be seen. The property has three generously sized bedrooms, with one boasting an ensuite as well as having a fami..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £300,000 - £325,000 ***
* POTENTIAL FOR £2000pcm RENTAL INCOME * Jackson and Co have the pleasure of offering this very attractive three bedroom apartment with terrace, as well as stunning river views, underground parking for two cars, two en-suites, separate fa..."
"A quaint two bedroom semi-detached cottage dating back to the early 1900's and having been improved and upgraded sympathetically, whilst also incorporating modern and contemporary finishes. Residing to the much requested West side of Colchester and within easy access to an array of excellent p..."
"* Guide Price £300,000-£325,000* A fantastic opportunity to acquire this well-appointed and beautifully presented two bedroom detached bungalow. Occupying a favourable corner- plot position, this excellent home has been refurbished and re-imagined over the past eighteen months of i..."
"What a home !! A superb family home to the North East of Colchester. Three bedrooms, impressive lounge, modern black gloss kitchen, utility/home office, cloakroom and attractive landscaped low maintenance garden. Do not miss out - call now"
"** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000 ** Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market this very well presented and quaint, two/three bedroom terraced house. Situated in Lexden, down a popular road close to local amenities and only a short walk away from Colchester's City ..."
Situated on a modern development to the north of Colchester is this two bedroom end terrace house with open plan living and car port
"**Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000** Situated in the popular Highwoods/Mile End district, North of Colchester's city centre sits this deceptively spacious three/four bedroom terrace family home. Within striking distance of The Gilberd Secondary School, recently gifted with 'Outstand..."
"An appealing three bedroom semi detached house with good size rear garden, a smartly presented interior, garage and parking space."
"Guide price £300,000 to £325,000 Situated in the ever popular district of Prettygate and being offered for sale with no onward chain is this three bedroom semi detached house in need of modernisation throughout. "
"**GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £315,000** Palmer and Partners are pleased to offer to the market this stylish two bedroom apartment, located conveniently close to North Station with its mainline links to London Liverpool Street and Colchester's historic city centre which offers a rang..."
Stunning four bedroom mid-terraced house located to the North of Colchester's City Centre. Offering a perfect family home as well as an addition to a buy to let portfolio. Finished in impressive decorative order and ready to be moved into
"**Guide Price of £300,000 - £325,000** Situated on the popular Westlands development in Stanway to the West of Colchester, this family home ticks lots of boxes. Location here is key, a short walk can lead you to a selection of local amenities, some of the most popular schools in Colchest..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom semi-detached home ideally located to the south-west of Colchester. The property's location offers convenient access to local shopping facilities, bus routes and Hami..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000 ** Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market this exceptionally well presented, two bedroom semi detached family home. The current owners have converted the garage into a large kitchen/diner, a great space for entertaining friends and family a..."
"**Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000** Commanding an elevated position this charming three bedroom bay fronted semi-detached home is situated in the heart of Colchester City, moments from the vibrant centre and home to an array of independent shops, restaurants, bars and leisure facil..."
"Guide Price of £300,000 - £325,000. Positioned to the West of Colchester, in Stanway. This three-bedroom semi-detached property, The current owners have taken pride in presenting this home to its current standard with stylish decor as well as a modern kitchen & bathroom. The location here is idea..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £300,000 TO £325,000** Connells are pleased to present to the market, in our opinion, this well presented three bedroom family home situated just one mile from Colchester’s Town Centre and a short walk from the popular Abbey Fields"
"** *Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this well presented, two bedroom family home situated in the highly sought after area of Stanway, conveniently close to ample schools, shops and amenities with great access t..."
"We are delighted to offer this generously sized, extended three bedroom end of terraced home. Offering good road links to local amenities and the A12, this home is well situated. Downstairs there is a generous three room setup comprising of flexible living space. Upstairs there are th..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000** Situated in the very popular area in Stanway sits this very well presented, two bedroom, semi detached house. The A12 is a short drive away with easy access to Chelmsford and beyond, perfect for a commuter. The accommodation is modern throughout and..."
"Guide Price £300,000-£325,000. With *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this fantastic *END TERRACE HOUSE* is well presented throughout making the *PERFECT HOME FOR GROWING FAMILIES*. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, bus services, *VARIOUS SHOPS* and the A12/A120."
"Ezemove Ezelet are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom mid terraced Victorian house, situated in the sought after area of St Marys, and within walking distance to the City Centre. This property comprises of two double bedrooms and a single bedroom, open plan living room/diner, a galley..."
"A stunningly unique property being offered with no onward chain. This two bedroom, top floor apartment located in the heart of Colchester’s City Centre is unlike any other available in the market. The home comes with a large, modern open plan kitchen and living area with dual aspect views l..."
"This charming *TWO BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW* provides *IDEAL ACCOMMODATION* early viewing highly recommended. Situated at the end of a *SOUGHT-AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* on the popular *ST JOHNS ESTATE* convenient for the *LOCAL PARADE OF SHOPS*, bus services and the A12/A120."
"Recently renovated to a high standard throughout and situated to the north of Colchester, is this three-bedroom semi-detached property. With a newly fitted kitchen and bathroom suite as well as freshly laid carpet throughout. The property comprises two generous reception rooms in the way of a lou..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £300,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this three bedroom terraced property, situated within close proximity to local amenities including schools, shops and sporting facilities. Fo..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £300,000*** Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this three bedroom property, situated in the prestigious development of The Mill Apartments, providing excellent access to Colchester City Centre, local amenities and train stations wit..."
"Bright and Spacious, this beautiful three bedroom semi detached home is located in the south of Colchester is a fantastic home for first time buyers and families alike. With its gated drive, three bedrooms, separate diner with Kitchen & Lounge. We would highly recommend viewing to avoid disap..."
Offered with no onward chain and requiring modernisation and refurbishment is this two bedroom detached bungalow situated in a cul-de-sac position on the popular St Johns development to the north of Colchester.
"This two bedroom bungalow is situated in the popular Mile End area of Colchester, offering excellent access to North Station. The property is offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN and benefits from spacious living accommodation, two bedrooms, garden and garage."
"William H Brown are pleased to offer for sale this three bedroom mid terrace town house situated in the New Town area of Colchester, offering convenient access to the town centre and train station. The property benefits from spacious living accommodation, three bedrooms, en suite, garden & parking."
"**GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £300,000** We are delighted to offer this fantastic two bedroom semi-detached house, on the sought after Mile End Road. Located within a short walk of the train station, General hospital, Oaks hospital and local amenities; as well as a short drive ..."
Located in South Colchester is this surprisingly spacious three bedroom terraced home which benefits from having a conservatory extension as well as an en suite to the master bedroom
"Situated in a sought after location, this sizeable three bedroom home boasts a welcoming entrance way, spacious lounge, modern fitted kitchen, dining room and family bathroom. Whilst the first floor offers three double bedrooms. Externally the home benefits from a rear garden and the corner plot ..."
"Guide Price of £290,000 to £310,000. Situated to the West of Colchester in the district of Stanway, this spacious home is perfectly placed within easy reach of a selection of amenities, popular schooling and transport links making it a great location for multiple reasons. Internally the property ..."
NO CHAIN! Temme English are delighted to present this three bedroom double bay fronted semi-detached home situated in the ever popular St.Johns location situated close to an array of local amenities
"Temme English are delighted to present this good sized three bedroom semi-detached home positioned on a corner plot with GATED ENTRANCE, DRIVEWAY FOR AMPLE PARKING AND GARAGE. Situated to the South of Colchester in an"
"Meticulously designed, this two-bedroom apartment is situated within approximately 10 acres of woodland. Sitting on the top floor, the residence boasts impressive accommodation, fitted to a high specification throughout. Comprising of a generous entrance hall leading to a spacious lounge, a kitch..."
Situated in the popular New Town area of Central Colchester is this well presented three bedroom terraced home which boasts a spacious open plan living area and a single detached garage
"An excellent example of a deceptively spacious two bedroom, ground floor maisonette. Residing in the iconic 'Bell Tower', an imposing Grade II listed property, meticulously refurbished & reimagined by renowned local developers 'Knights Group', with enviable specifications considered throug..."
"This excellent *SEMI DETACHED HOUSE* is particularly *WELL PRESENTED* making the *IDEAL HOME FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS* with viewing highly recommended. Situated on the *POPULAR HIGHWOODS ESTATE* the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"Located to the south of Colchester town centre is this well presented three bedroom modern home backing onto Friday Woods, offering a refitted kitchen, large conservatory, ground floor cloakroom, spacious under stairs storage, modern bathroom suite with gas central heating and double glazing."
"Pantera Property offer to the market a three-bedroom mid terraced house, providing a rear garden."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN - Martin & Co, Colchester are pleased to present this MODERN, two double bedrppm, Mews house with off road allocated parking and within close proximity to the City train station and is located in the heart of Colcheser City. *VIEWINGS BY APPOINTMENT ONLY*"
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this well presented three bedroom semi detached Victorian property situated on the Stanway/Lexden border. The property boasts two reception rooms, a kitchen, downstairs bathroom, two generous double bedrooms, and a third bedroom/dressing room off the secon..."
"NO CHAIN! Temme English are delighted to present this three bedroom home situated on a large plot with further potential to enhance and expand. The property boasts large lounge, kitchen/diner, outside toilet and fanta"
"This end of terrace house is situated on the south side of Colchester and could be an ideal family home. The property benefits from spacious living accommodation, three good size bedroom, front & rear gardens, on road parking and the potential to hire a garage from the local council."
"**GUIDE PRICE £280,000-£290,000** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this two bedroom, end of terrace house situated in an idealistic position in Myland close to a range of schools, shops, amenities and transp..."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this well presented, three bedroom family home positioned to the South of Colchester, within walking distance to a range of schools and amenities including Monkwick Junior School and Thomas Lord Audley Secondary School, as well as John ..."
"COMPLETE CHAIN, A fantastic example of a spacious three bedroom family home or FANTASTIC investment opportunity. Situated in this popular location with local schooling nearby for a family or the University stones throw for INVESTMENT! "
"An excellent example of an extended three bedroom semi-detached family home, conveniently positioned to the South of Colchester and within walking distance of a variety of schooling and useful amenities. Well presented & offering a wealth of space throughout, the ground floor accommodation..."
"Sat in the heart of Colchester, a short drive away from the City Centre and Mersea Island offering a beautiful seafront to enjoy with ample amenities on offer sits this three bedroom semi detached family home. The sitting room situated to the rear of the property is a great space to enjoy, with F..."
"Guide price £280,000 to £290,000. An extremely well presented two bedroom detached bungalow situated to the west of Colchester in the sought after district of Stanway. The bungalow comprises of a modern fitted kitchen, spacious lounge/dining room, two generous bedrooms, a bathroom, driv..."
"Guide Price of £275,000 - £300,000. A spacious penthouse apartment which is situated within a popular Western Homes development to the East of Colchester. The property itself is within a short walk to the University of Essex, Hythe train station with Links to London Liverpool Street and a large T..."
"A two bedroom semi-detached house located in the popular area of Highwoods, with a range of amenities and schools nearby. The property offers an entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen/diner and spacious conservatory overlooking the garden. Upstairs there are two double bedrooms and a family..."
3 bedroom semi-detached family home in North Colchester. This perfect first time home is offered for sale with no onward chain
"Located in New Town is this spacious three bedroom, semi detached home. Offering excellent potential, the home is also just a short walk away from Colchester’s City Centre with an array of restaurants and shops with both Colchester City and Hythe Train Stations just a short walk away."
"We are pleased to offer this three bedroom family home located in the popular Longridge area, within close proximity of local schools, The property benefits from spacious living accommodation, three good size bedrooms & large rear garden with potential for parking."
"This superbly presented two bedroom terraced home in this popular location to the north of Colchester with great access for the A12, General Hospital and Colchester North station."
"Situated to the South of Colchester is this deceptively spacious three bedroom middle terrace home, offering an abundance of both reception and bedroom space throughout. Within easy access of a range of local amenities and choice of schooling, this home presents itself as the ideal family home..."
"Situated in a sought after location is this stylish well presented two bedroom mid-terraced home close to Severalls Business Park, Colchester General Hospital and Gilberd Secondary School being an excellent first purchase. "
"A charming attached Grade II Listed cottage, of some character, occupying a superb position in Lexden Road adjacent to Spring Lane Park."
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND C ****TENANTS IN SITU**** We are delighted to offer to the market this pleasant 3-bedroom mid terraced house on Ladbrook Drive, Colchester. The property offers a well-adapted layout, offering spacious and comfortable accommodat..."
"An excellent two bedroom detached bungalow, positioned in central Colchester and within easy reach of the city centre and an array of useful shops, amenities and services. Offered with no onward chain this bungalow is ready to be occupied without delay and offers a generous amount of bedroom a..."
"This executive two double bedroom, first floor apartment is located in the highly desirable area of Braiswick, an area popular with families and professionals alike, with Colchester North Station a short drive away and an abundance of other amenities. This aesthetically pleasing block of apart..."
"East Links Residential are delighted to bring to the market this Three Bedroom House, located within a short distance of Colchester Mainline Railway Station and Colchester Town Centre"
INVESTOR SALE VIEWINGS FROM 14/11/22. A lovely two bedroom end terrace house in the incredibly popular Roberts Road/Abbey Fields area. With tenants in residence and viewings from the 14th/11/22 this one NOT to be missed
"We are delighted to offer this apartment situated off one of Colchester´s most sought after roads. The property benefits from two bedrooms, sitting room with French doors onto an enclosed garden, en-suite shower room to master, bathroom, kitchen and utility room. It also benefits from gas h..."
"This two/three bedroom property situated within walking distance of Colchester's north station features a large wedge shaped garage/workshop and a rear garden in excess of 100 feet in length, is offered for sale on a chain free basis.  Key available for viewing."
"Great value family home.. Whether you are looking at buy to live or buy to let, this home is not to be ignored. Wonderful space at a price that is right !!"
"**Guide Price £270,000 - £280,000** An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this deceptively spacious two bedroom middle terrace home, situated in the favourable district of St Marys, in the heart of Colchester's historic and vibrant city centre. Offered to market with no o..."
A two bedroom apartment set within this highly desirable development on the fifth floor with astounding views overlooking the River Colne. This luxurious apartment is within close proximity to Hythe Station and Essex University and boasts one allocated parking space with well maintained commun...
"**GUIDE PRICE £260,000-£270,000** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this three bedroom semi-detached house dating back to the 1800's. Located in this sought after area to the west of Colchester, conveniently close ..."
"An exciting and rare opportunity to purchase a wonderfully positioned and well presented ground floor apartment in the Old Lexden district of Colchester. Just yards from the shops, bars and restaurants in the town centre this home has it all and more"
"*Offers in excess of £260,000 Chain free move in ready* Located in the North of Colchester and offered chain free is this good sized end of terrace offered with vacant possesion. The accommodation comprises; lounge, kitchen/diner with breakfast bar, one double bedroom ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £260,000 to £270,000
We have pleasure in offering for sale this two bedroom semi detached cottage situated conveniently for both the Town Centre and Colchester's North Station with its fast and frequent service to London Liverpool Street.  Fea..."
"Situated in the heart of Highwoods sits this excellent two bedroom middle terrace home. Presenting itself as this ideal first time purchase, this two bedroom home is within walking distance of Highwoods Square - home to a Tesco Extra store, doctors/dentist surgery, post office and is well serv..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £260,000 to £270,000*** Offered with no onward chain is this well-presented two bedroom semi-detached bungalow providing off-road parking, covered car port and a garage with gas central heating and double glazing in this popular location to the north of Colchester. "
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £260,000 - £270,000 ***
** POTENTIAL RENTAL OF £1500pcm **
* YIELD OF 6.6% - 6.9% * Located in the popular Hythe area is this modern two bedroom high end apartment. The property benefits from being walking distance to Essex university, local shops and amenities...."
* Two Bedroom * Second Floor Modern Apartment * No Onward Chain * Open Plan Lounge/Diner/Kitchen * Balcony * Lift * Allocated Parking * Popular The Bridge Development
"Situated in the sought after area of OLD LEXDEN, offering convenient access to the city centre, a chance to acquire this TOP-FLOOR APARTMENT benefiting from ROOF-TOP GARDEN and NO ONWARD CHAIN. Viewing is highly recommended. "
A rare opportunity is available to acquire a building plot located to the South-East of Colchester's exciting city centre and is complete with full planning permission in a favourable residential area. The planning permission granted is for a substantial and aesthetically pleasing five bedroom...
Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer sale this stunning penthouse located in a prime position at the heart of the city centre. With delightful open plan living areas leading to a large balcony with superior and commanding views over the town centre and........
A well-presented three bedroom semi-detached home situated in a popular part of New Town in Colchester a short distance from the City Centre offering no onward chain and with garage / workshop. 
"Chain free two bedroom terraced house in the ever popular Abbey Fields/Berechurch location. This is a super starter home, next step up the ladder or buy to let"
"This three bedroom end of terrace house is situated on the Greenstead Estate offering good access to local schooling, amenities and University of Essex. The property benefits from spacious lounge, three bedrooms and enclosed rear garden."
"Situated in the popular New Town area and being within walking distance to Colchester town centre, is this well presented two bedroom end terrace house."
"Offers in Excess of £250,000. Walk To Colchester North Station, Colchester Castle Park and the Town Centre + Off Road Parking !! Two bedroom end terrace house perfectly located and an ideal buy to live or buy to let. Chain Free Too !!"
"** GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £260,000 ** ** DRIVEWAY & GARAGE ** Offered to the market with no onward chain and conveniently situated close to the city centre and the mainline train station with links to London Liverpool Street is this three bedroom, semi detached house. This would b..."
"** GUIDE PRICE 250,000 - £275,000 ** Being offered with no onward chain is this five bedroom mid-terraced Grade II listed property within walking distance of Colchester high street. The property is in need of modernisation, however the current owner has made a number of upgrades ..."
"A versatile and impressive three bedroom riverside duplex apartment with lift, balcony and parking. superbly located for the town centre and Colchester mainline station. Being sold with a tenant in situ as a going concern; rent specifics are available on request"
"Available with no onward chain is this excellent sized, three-bedroom terraced home. This property would be perfect for first time buyers or investors as well as being suited to a family."
A rarely available semi detached bungalow in ever popular Highwoods. The property has a tenant in situ currently paying £875pcm and will be bought as an investment purchase
Three Bedroom Terraced House - Available as Investment Only - 4.8 Return - Town Centre Location - Lounge with Feature Fireplace - Good sized Dining Room - Fitted Kitchen - Cont.....
"This 2 bedroom semi-detached property built in the 1900s boasts both character and charm. The house offers spacious living accommodations, a comfortable lounge, and a separate dining room with beautiful original fireplaces. The kitchen is situated at the rear of the property and offers a..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £260,000 ** Situated in the heart of Lexden sits this well presented, two bedroom top floor maisonette. The location here is key, you are within driving distance to the A12 with links to Chelmsford and beyond, Colchester's Mainline Train Station, ..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £250,000 - £275,000 *** We are delighted to announce this stunning three bedroom property which is located to the south of Colchester, the property benefits from a generous rear garden, stylish kitchen, first floor bathroom, three bedrooms and is located down a qui..."
"INVESTMENT PURCHASE Two bedroom end terrace home with garage on the highly desirable Highwoods development. Currently let and to be bought as a going concern. Viewing from March, more details available from the branch"
"Set to the North of Colchester sits this well-presented, two-bedroom semi-detached family home. Bergholt Road is within a few minutes walk to Colchester's mainline Train Station making this gorgeous home an ideal purchase for a young family or first-time buyers looking to get onto the property la..."
BRAND NEW Park Home (40'x20') | Residential development | Over 50s | Pet friendly | Fully furnished | Driveway | Shops and amenities nearby | Bottles gas | Great position | Corner plot | Semi retirement | Community living for like minded people | Coming soon
" Brand new 40' x 20' Prestige Sonata sited at Grange Farm Park. Grange Farm Park is a well-established family owned residential semi-retirement park estate just a half a mile from the historic walled town of Colchester in Essex. Comprising of 61 homes, this gently sloping estate has just been ful..."
"GUIDE PRICE £225,000 to £235,000. NO ONWARD CHAIN...we are pleased to bring to the market this well-maintained three bedroom terraced house in Highwoods. The property benefits from a cul-de-sac position, open-plan lounge/diner and gas central heating (not tested by Elms Price and Co). "
"Offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN, this spacious two bedroom Victorian mid-terrace property with additional loft room, situated in the popular area of New Town."
"**Guide Price £240,000** This two bedroom end of terrace house is perfect for first time buyers and is located within walking distance of Willow Brook Primary School. The property is 1.5 miles from Colchester City Centre and Train Station. The property has been well ma..."
A gardeners dream in waiting for the right buyer. This two bedroom end of terrace has been improved in very recent times by the current owners
"**Guide Price £240,000 - £250,000** **No Onward Chain** Situated in the sought after St. Mary's estate this modern three bedroom flat is looking for it's next owner. Offered with no onward chain, the property benefits from a great amount of internal space and allocated..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £240,000-£250,000** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this three bedroom semi-detached house, situated to the popular west side of Colchester. The location of the property gives easy access to Tollgate Re..."
"Viewing Reference: MC0527 -- VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE !!!  -- Situated on the highly sought after 'Pracedo Development' we are delighted to bring to market this well presented two bedroom freehold coach house. The home boasts open plan living space, two well proportioned bedrooms, b..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £240,000 - £250,000** Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this two bedroom terraced property, situated within close proximity of Colchester's historic city centre. The property's location offers excellent access to local amenities including ..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £240,000-£260,000*** We are delighted to offer this three bedroom end of terrace house located to the South side of Colchester benefiting from enclosed rear garden, parking bays to the front, no ongoing chain!!"
"Ideally located within easy reach of Colchester city centre, the University of Essex, and mere minutes away from historic Distillery Pond - which supported the local gin distillery - but has more recently become a wildlife haven. This terraced home offers spacious accommodation comprising living ..."
Boydens are delighted to bring to market this two double bedroom mid-terrace residence in the popular Highwoods area to the North of Colchester. This spacious family home would be ideal for a first time buyer or an investor.
"** TENANTS IN SITU - ATTENTION INVESTORS ** ** GUIDE PRICE £240,000 - £250,000 ** This two bedroom first floor coach house is located in the highly popular area of Stanway. Within walking distance to local primary and secondary schools, Tollgate Retail Park and within easy access to t..."
"**Guide Price £240,000 - £250,000** A deceptively spacious example of a two bedroom end of terrace home, positioned moments from the Colchester's City Centre and therefore moments from an array of shops, bars, restaurants and leisure facilities. This home is also well connected by ..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £240,000 - £250,000 ** Located close to Colchester Town is this incredibly spacious and well maintained home. With two bedrooms, bathroom and excellent sized lounge and kitchen area this would be a perfect home or investment. Available with no onward chain an..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £240,000 - £250,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market three bedroom terraced house, situated to the south of Colchester providing excellent access to nearby schools, shops and amenities. The prope..."
This fantastic 2 bedroom mid terrace property is only a short walk to the town centre and both Colchester Stations. Internally it has been well maintained and has a modern feel with two double bedrooms on the second floor and lovely shower room.
"One bedroom character cottage set in the popular district of Lexden with modernised kitchen, shower room and courtyard garden."
"Goodmove are delighted to present this three bedroom end terrace home for a quick sale. Located in an popular residential area in the South of Colchester close to a range of useful shops, schools and amenities including Mersea Road Clinic, Thomas Lord Audley secondary school, Monkwick J..."
***Investors only*** Connells are pleased to bring to market this two double bedroom apartment in the heart of Colchester.
"** TENANTED RETURN OF £1000 PCM ** Offered to the market with no onward chain and situated within walking distance to Colchester's idyllic City Centre and the mainline train station with links to London Liverpool Street within under an hour sits this well presented, two bedroom coach house...."
"A charming two bedroom end of terraced Victorian home, positioned in the heart of Colchester's city centre and therefore moments from an array of independent shops, boutiques, stores restaurants and bars. Deceptively spacious and presented to the open market with no onward chain, it would make..."
"(Apartment 1) McCarthy & Stone offers retirement living to the highest of standards. Raising the benchmark and exceeding all expectations, Lancer House is positioned in the heart of Colchester's City Centre and offers tranquil, peaceful and secure living within it's well equipped complex. ..."
"*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE - THURSDAY 11TH MAY - 11am – 4.30pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* *Viewings advised* One bedroom GROUND floor apartment with PATIO area, situated within the popular McCarthy & Stone's Retirement Living PLUS development."
Purplebricks are delighted to offer this this bedroom terrace house which is situated in the popular New Town area of Colchester within easy reach of the Town Centre and Colchester Town Train Station. The owner has recently had a new combination boiler installed and has started commencement on o...
"Easy like Sunday morning !! Looking for that easy investment property purchase? How about a spacious three bedroom apartment in possibly one of the most sought after areas in Colchester with a tenant in residence? I know, dreams do come true ! Call or click to view"
"** GUIDE PRICE £230,000 - £240,000 ** Situated in a popular location sits this exquisite, two double bedroom ground floor apartment, located within close proximity to Colchester's bustling City Centre offering an abundance of local shops, high street stores, train station with direct ..."
****Investors Only**** Two bedroom Coach House located to the South of Colchester's historic City Centre. Offered in our opinion in exceptional decorative order. this is a must view for any Investor looking to add to their portfolio
"Investors only - tenants in situ. Situated to the East of Colchester is this well appointed 2 bedroom mid terraced house, located close to Colchester Hythe railway station. This property would make an ideal purchase for investors."
"Jackson and Co are delighted to announce this excellent two bedroom ground floor apartment which is in an ideal location for Colchester town station and to Colchester centre, both of which are a 5-10 minute walk away.
The property benefits from an en-suite, bathroom, plenty of space and storage a..."
INVESTMENT PURCHASE ONLY...a two bedroom COACH HOUSE STYLE PROPERTY benefiting from carport and its own private garden. CURRENT TENANT PAYING £825.00 PCM. Agents note: all photos taken prior to current tenancy. 
"GUIDE PRICE £230,000-£240,000 For this BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED. two double bedroom ground floor apartment located within the original grounds of Abbey Gate and just a short walk from Colchester's City centre and Town railway Station. Feeling beautifully light and spacious, the apartment is of an o..."
"**INVESTMENT OPORTUNITY TENANTS IN SITU £1000 PCM** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this well-presented, two bedroom coach house, situated a short distance to Colchester city centre which offers a range of shopping..."
" Brand new 40' x 20' Stately Albion Badminton sited at Grange Farm Park. Grange Farm Park is a well-established family owned residential semi-retirement park estate just a half a mile from the historic walled town of Colchester in Essex. Comprising of 61 homes, this gently sloping estate has just..."
"Plots 100 to 114 ONLY are under the First Homes scheme, which are discounted by 30%. The Centurion offers the best of modern living with a spacious open plan kitchen/living room, two bedrooms (bedroom one benefits from an en suite), a main bathroom and two handy storage cupboards."
ATTENTION INVESTORS - SUPERB BUY-TO-LET INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY IN A GREAT LOCATION! A spacious three-bedroomed terraced property in the popular town of Colchester. Don't miss out and enquire today.
"Offering scope for modernisation and Improvements, a three bedroomed mid terrace house."
"Guide Price: £225,000 - £235,000. Charming two-bedroom mid-terraced property located to the north of Colchester's city centre, featuring allocated parking for two cars. Conveniently situated with easy access to local transport links and amenities, this property is ideal for modern livin..."
"Whether you are looking buy to let or buy to live - look no further. Ideally located close to local amenities, Colchester Town station and Colchester City Centre this two bedroom home has been loved by the current family owners and is now available chain free"
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY* Martin & Co are pleased to present this UNFURNISHED, top floor, two double bedroom apartment with a single garage located in the popular St Marys development in the heart of Colchester town centre. *Currently Tenanted until Sept 2023*"
"Located on the sought after Grange Farm Park in the popular Old Heath area of the south easterly part of Colchester, is this BRAND NEW TWO BEDROOM DETACHED fully residential LUXURY PARK HOME for the over 50's. It benefits from an en-suite to the master bedroom, allocated parking and its own priva..."
"New to the market this brand new park home. Located on a private residential site on the eastern side of Colchester, with easy access to supermarkets, local shops and resturants, bus service to Colchester town centre. Access to the riverside village of Rowhedge with its walks and Public Houses."
"Three bedroom terraced property located on the north east side of Colchester. The property would make a fabulous first home, next step or investment property"
We are delighted to market this Victorian two bedroom mid-terrace house within a five minute walk of Colchester´s historic city centre. The property is available with no onward chain. Excellent first time purchase or investment opportunity. 
"Located in a highly desirable location within a stone's throw from Colchester North Station, mainline to London Liverpool Street, close proximity to Colchester General Hospital and within walking distance to the town centre, is this previously used convenience store with planning permission for a..."
"*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE - THURSDAY 11TH MAY - 11am – 4.30pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* A bright and spacious one bedroom retirement apartment on the first floor, 1st apartment next to the lift. Double glazed opening door leads onto A SPACIOUS BALCONY. This development has a beautiful B..."
"Built in the 1930's and perfectly situated close to Colchester's City Centre and within walking distance to local amenities is this well presented, two bedroom terraced house. Perfect for first time buyers looking to get onto the property ladder, the accommodation consists of a spacious lounge/di..."
"NO CHAIN! We are delighted to present this chain free two bedroom home situated close to the popular Abbey fields, stones throw to the City centre/station and local schooling. "
 Blackwater Estates are pleased to bring to the market this extremely spacious two double bedroom first floor apartment situated in the sought after location of Prettygate and close to all amenities. The property benefits from new decoration throughout as well as new flooring. The apartment has...
"***GUIDE PRICE £220,000 - £230,000*** Situated to the south of Colchester City Centre, this immaculate first-floor apartment makes it perfect for a first-time or investment purchase. The property is within walking distance of Colchester City Centre and Colchester Town train station, whic..."
A stylish ground floor contemporary apartment set in this period Victorian conversion by Messrs Knights Developments in this sought after west side location. 
"This light and spacious ground-floor duplex maisonette is situated in a prime city centre location overlooking the River Colne, within walking distance of the railway station. "
"A stunning two bedroom duplex ground floor apartment, forming part of this superb modern development, set within striking distance of the Town Centre and North Station. The property is presented to the market in exceptional order throughout and makes the ideal purchase for investors and workin..."
"Connells are very excited to bring to market this fantastic three bedroom house on Old Heath Road. Perfect for first time buyers and investors, book your viewing now to avoid disappointment."
A beautiful ground floor later living apartment on the outskirts of the town centre with local amenities and a real sense of community. We would say this is more of a luxury hotel then an apartment building and the communal facilities as well as the main accommodation are just sublime
"Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer For Sale this stunning two bedroom property. This First floor apartment is situated in the highly popular town centre area, within easy reach of the High Street and Castle Park. Boasting two bedrooms, and a spacious living area. No onward chain."
"A chance to acquire this beautiful two bedroom mews house forming part of this fabulous conversion, set within the heart of Colchester Town Centre. Packed with charm, the property boasts a wealth of exceptionally spacious accommodation over two floors. An impressive entrance hall featuring an ori..."
"Situated to the South of Colchester City Centre, this stunning penthouse apartment makes for a perfect first-time buy or investment purchase. As you will see from the photographs the current owners have not only maintained the property to a high standard but heavily improved the recently built pr..."
"INVESTMENT PROPERTY - Martin & Co are pleased to present this MODERN, two bedroom, FURNISHED Coach House, with furniture included to the high standard, only 5 minutes walk to North Station and Colchester Hospital. PROPERTY TENANTED"
Boydens are pleased to bring to the market this two-bedroom duplex apartment/mews house.
"Offers to market with no onward chain, is this deceptively spacious two bedroom coach house, positioned favourably to the North of Colchester and within striking distance Colchester's mainline station, offering links to London Liverpool Street. This home also resides within close proximit..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £210,000 - £230,000 ** Offered to the market with no onward chain and situated close to the picturesque Abbey Fields and Colchester's City Centre offering an array of shops and restaurants sits this well presented one bedroom, first floor retirement apartment. The accom..."
"A truly beautiful one bedroom duplex mews house forming part of this stunning historic conversion undertaken by Lexden Restorations, set in a prime position adjacent to Abbey Fields and within walking distance of the Town Centre and Station. Internally you are greeted by a fabulous open plan livi..."
"**Cash buyers only** ***Guide Price £220,000 - £230,000*** Situated close to the University of Essex is this spacious and profitable five bedroom apartment achieving a yield of over 6.5%. Ideally located on the Beyond the Box complex there are many per..."
"* Cash buyers only * ***Guide Price £210,000 - £230,000*** Situated close to the University of Essex is this spacious and profitable five bedroom apartment. Ideally located on the beyond the box complex there are many perks that come to students rentin..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £210,000 - £220,000 ** Located on the Southern side of Colchester within 2 miles of the city centre, this modern two bedroom apartment located on the fourth floor. The property is offered in 'as new' condition and features include; built-in media wall, Juliet balcony, allocated par..."
"Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN, original 999 YEAR LEASE and no annual maintenance charges, this purpose built ground floor maisonette with private rear gardens would suit the buyer who is looking to put their own stamp on their new home. Benefitting from expansive private gardens to the fr..."
"Early viewing is advised of this well presented refurbished top floor apartment situated in the heart of Colchester, within walking distance of shops, restaurants and facilities. The property benefits from spacious living accommodation, two bedrooms and secure allocated parking."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £200,000 - £225,000 ***
** INVESTMENT ONLY ** Jackson and Co are proud to present this excellent two bedroom apartment located within excellent proximity to Colchester's North Station and Colchester's General Hospital. The apartment is currently let for £1200PCM..."
"Located in the centre of Colchester with two parking spaces is this beautifully presented, 'chain free' maisonette. Location here is perfect for access to the City centre where you will find a wealth of shops, bars, restaurants, as well as a number of popular attractions, plus access to North ..."
NO CHAIN! Temme English are delighted to present this one bedroom home with private rear garden positioned in an ever popular spot located in Highwoods
A stunning starter home located in a non estate position to the South of Colchester and with beautiful Bourne Pond and Mill on your doorstep. Put your furniture down and enjoy your first home !!
"Guide Price £200,000-£210,000. Temme English are delighted to present this ready to move in to two bedroom TOP FLOOR flat offered with NO CHAIN . The property boasts two double bedrooms one benefiting from En-Suite, a spacious lounge through to kit"
"** PART BUY PART RENT ** £200,000 is for a 50% share purchase, the full property price is £400,000. The minimum CASH DEPOSIT you will need is £80,000 Turn any freehold property into part buy –part rent with Leaders Estate Agents and ‘Your Hom..."
"Two double bedroom, GROUND FLOOR apartment with bathroom & EN-SUITE shower room to master bedroom & enclosed terrace area. PRIME LOCATION with path leading to Colchester North Station, close to Colchester General Hospital and easy access to the A12 & Town Centre. NO CHAIN. IDEAL INVES..."
"**Guide Price £200,000 to £225,000** - Occupying a superb position within close proximity to Colchester mainline railway station and city centre, a spacious two bedroom duplex apartment with accommodation arranged over two floors."
"A deceptively spacious ground floor maisonette offering outstanding accommodation with the benefit of two parking spaces and its own private courtyard garden, all within Colchester city centre with its superb range of amenities."
** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ** Tenant in situ presently achieving £875.00 per calendar month. Superb investment opportunity on this NEARLY NEW luxury apartment situated within the heart of Colchester City Centre. ***BEAUTIFULLY FINISHED*** Luxurious TWO bedroom apartment situated in a sought after ...
"Early viewing is advised of this modern two bedroom second floor apartment offering excellent access to Abbey Fields. The property offers good size living accommodation, two bedrooms, en suite and allocated parking."
"***INVESTMENT ONLY*** GUIDE PRICE £200,000- £210,000*** This delightful two bedroom second floor apartment is being sold with tenants in situation from September 2023 paying £1150pcm offering an annual yield of 6.7%. This property has no on-going chain."
"GUIDE PRICE £200,000 to £210,000. Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this attractive older style property located within a short walk of the City Centre. Currently with a tenant in situ, the property would ideally suit an investor purchaser. "
"***GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £210,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this well presented, two bedroom coach house, situated conveniently close to ample schools, shops, amenities and transport links including Asda Superstore, Tesco Extra, Colchester H..."
"Palmer and Partners are very pleased to present to the market this deceptively spacious and well-presented three bedroom ground floor maisonette, located to the east of Colchester. The property is within close proximity to various local schools, shops and amenities, as well as the Hythe train sta..."
"For sale with tenant in situ. This 2 bedroom quarter house with its own private garden to the rear. There is off road parking for two vehicles. Covered porch lounge, Kitchen breakfast room, two first floor bedrooms and Bathroom. Close to local schools shops and public houses."
"OPEN HOUSE - Saturday 18th March 15:00 - 16:00, contact us for details. Presenting a two bedroom coach house on the south side of colchester, built on the recent Solus development. This home is located close to great transport links, town centre and Colchester Zoo."
"*INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY* Martin & Co are pleased to present this MODERN, top floor, two double bedroom apartment with private South/West corner balcony and allocated parking available within close proximity to the Essex University and the local supermarket. *Property tenanted until August 202..."
"A stunning two bedroom apartment in a highly sought after development, set adjacent to Abbey Fields. The property was built in 2017 to a high specification and features a plethora of stylish and spacious accommodation throughout."
PRICED TO SELL !! Available either as an investment property or with vacant possession this end terrace house must be sold. Motivated seller seeks like-minded buyer
"A stunning two bedroom apartment forming part of this highly sought after development, set adjacent to Abbey Fields and within walking distance of the Town Centre and Station. The property was constructed in 2017 to an excellent specification and features an array of stylish and spacious accommod..."
"This is not your usual 2 bed apartment, offering very generous internal accommodation, outside terrace and offered for sale with no onward chain. Ideally suited for First time buyers and investors"
"A well-presented and spacious apartment situated in the sought after area of New Braiswick Park. The property benefits from two double bedrooms, en-suite, lounge with Juliet style balcony and allocated parking space. EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY OR FIRST TIME PURCHASE. "
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer this immaculately presented two bedroom apartment which has undergone a complete refurbishment by the current owners which includes a new kitchen, bathroom, en-suite, new flooring and redecoration. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall with storage cupboa..."
"2 bedroom park home in the historic town of Colchester close to local amenities including shops, post office and Tesco Superstore just a few mins drive . This beautiful park home is ideal for t..."
"Privileged with the instructions and built in 2016 is this stunning apartment, designed to bring London style living to Colchester and located in the highly sought after Dutch Quarter development in the centre of Colchester Town. We have the pleasure in offering for sale this modern, stylish &..."
Purplebricks are delighted to offer this immaculately presented two bedroom first floor apartment which has been much improved recently by the current owners with a new kitchen fitted with solid wood work tops and general decoration carried out which gives this flat a nice fresh feel. Located of...
"** PART BUY PART RENT ** £195,000 is for a 50% share purchase, the full property price is £390,000. The minimum CASH DEPOSIT you will need is £80,000 Turn any freehold property into part buy –part rent with Leaders Estate Agents and ‘Your Hom..."
"Offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN This modern and very well presented two double bedrooms top floor apartment is a must to be viewed.
Having only been recently built in 2021 this amazing apartment offers all modern features.
As you arrive you are firstly greeted with the security entrance door, once ..."
*** Attention Investors *** Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer this well presented and modern apartment located on the ever popular ALBANY GARDENS area of Colchester. This ideal INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY is currently let to students and the new owner can look forward to new tenants............
Situated on the popular Braiswick Park development is this spacious two bedroom ground floor modern apartment within a short distance to Colchester North Station offering itself as a good first purchase or buy to let opportunity with no onward chain. 
"GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £200,000. Connells are delighted to bring to market this immaculately presented one bedroom apartment conveniently situated in the heart of Colchester."
**Attention Investors** Two bedroom terraced house in New Town Colchester with tenants in situ. This home is ideal for the town centre and town station. Are you looking for an investment that will earn you an income from day one?
"Offered to the market with no onward chain and located close to Colchester's City Centre and the beautiful Castle Park sits this three bedroom, end of terrace house, perfect for first time buyers looking to get onto the property ladder. The accommodation comprises a lounge, kitchen/diner, utility..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £200,000 ** Located to the South side of Colchester's City Centre close to all local amenities sits this well presented, two bedroom top floor apartment. This would be an ideal purchase for first time buyers looking to get onto the property ladder..."
"Where a beautiful historic exterior meets a thoroughly modern interior for a unique place to live on the doorstep of Colchester City Centre. From the outside Domitian Court looks like the kind of stately home that a royal would call home! However, inside, this apartment is contemporary ..."
Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer this well presented and modern apartment located on the ever popular ALBANY GARDENS area of Colchester. This ideal INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY is currently let to students and the new owner can look forward to new tenants already confirmed for the next.........
"In need of renovation This 2 bedroom end terraced house, located on the south east side of Colchester City, local schools at Old heath and Monkwick are close by. The riverside village of Rowhedge with pleasant riverside walks and local public houses. Local shops in Old heath are also close by as ..."
"**Guide Price of £190,000 - £200,000** Quartermaster House is a tasteful Victorian conversion on the edge of Colchester’s Town Centre, making up one of just six individual homes within a gated Mews setting and a share of the freehold upon completion. Location here is key with Abbey Field..."
"An outstanding apartment, nestled in a small enclave. if you have never been, you may have never know it was there ! Walking distance to Colchester Castle Park and the City Centre, two bedrooms, some original features, landscaped grounds, parking. A must see"
"INVESTORS ONLY! ** OFFERS IN EXCESS OF £190,000 ** Offered for sale as investment only is this two bedroom, duplex apartment in the popular development close to Colchester town centre and the A12. Currently rented out for £820 pcm, generating a yield of 5.1% the property benefits from ..."
"**Offers in Excess of £190,000* INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY achieving a 6% yield This spacious ground floor apartment offers a fantastic investment opportunity with tenants in situ. The property is located in the popular location of Apprentice Drive within close distan..."
"Offered for sale by modern method of auction, early viewing is advised of this terraced family home situated on the east side of Colchester, offering good access to the University Of Essex. The property benefits from spacious living accommodatio, three bedrooms, cloakroom, garden & allocated parking"
"A one bedroom top floor apartment situated on a modern development within walking distance of Colchester city centre, Colchester town station and Abbey Fields. "
"Opportunity to purchase a two bedroom apartment with a tenant in situ at Dutch Quarter Apartments. Property to be sold subject to existing tenancy which is producing £10,800 PA"
"Attention investors, with tenants already in situ this property makes for a perfect investment with a rental yield of 7.5%. A modern and well presented two bedroom first-floor apartment located within close proximity to Colchester's mainline station. This apartment benefits from having a..."
"Saxons are delighted to offer this modern and well presented apartment which is located well within walking distance of Colchester's Mainline Railway Station. there is a spacious lounge/dining area with separate kitchen, two double bedrooms, En-suite and family bathrooms and allocated parking space."
Chain Free -- Two bedroom -- Ground floor flat -- Gas Central Heating -- Ensuite -- Allocated Parking -- Walking Distance to Colchester North Station (0.7mile)
Situated within walking distance of Colchester town centre and town station is this two bedroom first floor apartment offering no onward chain with views over Abbey Fields benefitting from good size lounge and kitchen and gas central heating.
"** GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £200,000 ** Offered to the market with no onward chain and situated in a popular location close to local amenities sits this well presented, two bedroom second floor apartment. Perfect for first time buyers the accommodation is ready to move straight into and..."
BRAND NEW Park Home (46'x12') | Residential development | Over 50s | Pet friendly | Fully furnished | Driveway | Shops and amenities nearby | Bottles gas | Great position | Corner plot | Semi retirement | Community living for like minded people | Coming soon
" Brand new 46’ x 12’ Stately Albion Chatsworth sited at Grange Farm Park. Grange Farm Park is a well-established family owned residential semi-retirement park estate just a half a mile from the historic walled town of Colchester in Essex. Comprising of 61 homes, this gently sloping es..."
"Brand new residential park home within walking distance of shops and amenities with Double Glazing LPG radiator heating fully furnished with carpets and furniture. This property is ready to move in to. offering hallway, fully fitted Kitchen with appliances, Lounge, two Bedrooms ,Shower Room, Mai..."
"Located within close distance of Colchester North Station, the General Hospital, The A12 and Turner Rise retail park. This first floor two bedroom, two bathroom apartment is, in our opinion, the investment purchase and it comes with tenants in situ"
Positioned just a just a short walk from Colchester North Station is this well presented and deceptively spacious three bedroom apartment
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Located within the prestigious Dutch Quarter in Colchester, perfectly located within walking distance to Colchester North Train Station, Town Centre and the picturesque Castle Park, ideal for family walks is this two bedroom, upper floor apartment. Upon entering the property..."
"This Grade II Listed character cottage is situated within walking distance of Colcheter's city centre, Castle Park and train station. The property benefits from two bedrooms, a further attic room and courtyard rear garden."
"Located on the sought after Grange Farm Park in the popular Old Heath area of the south easterly part of Colchester, is this BRAND NEW TWO BEDROOM DETACHED fully residential LUXURY PARK HOME for the over 50's. It benefits from allocated parking and a small rear garden area. The property is situat..."
"The perfect property for commuters, first time buyers or investors. Situated within walking distance of Colchester's North Station is this two double bedroom spacious apartment."
INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY.  This first floor apartment with en suite to master bedroom is currently let at £875.00 pcm until  November 2023.  The property is situated conveniently to St Botolphs railway station and Colchester Town Centre.  
Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer this well presented and modern apartment located on the ever popular Hythe area of Colchester. This ideal INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY is currently let to students and the new owner can look forward to new tenants already confirmed for the next academic year.
"**Guide Price £200,000 - £210,000** In a prime North Colchester position, this apartment is within easy reach of Colchester's anticipated Northern Gateway, soon to be home to an array of restaurants, leisure facilities and premium health club. It is also a served by an excellent bu..."
"A two bedroom apartment set within this highly desirable development, within close proximity to Hythe Station and Essex University. The property was built to an exceptional specification and enjoys an array of bright, beautifully presented accommodation throughout. Highlights include two doubl..."
"Situated within walking distance of the city centre, a chance to acquire this one bedroom mid-terraced house offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. An early viewing is recommended to avoid any disappointment. "
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £180,000 - £190,000 *** * INVESTMENT ONLY - TENANTS IN SITU * Situated within walking distance to the popular Essex university sits this well presented two bedroom apartment with balcony. The property benefits from two double bedrooms, en-suite, large open plan l..."
"INVESTMENT PURCHASE - TENANT IN RESIDENCE UNTIL JUNE 2023, CURRENTLY PAYING £850.00 PCM. A modern ground floor apartment located within close proximity of the town centre and town train station. Two double bedrooms, en-suite to master, allocated parking space. "
"***Guide price £180,000 - £190,000*** Connells are pleased to bring to the market this modern and stylish top-floor apartment, overlooking Colchester high street. Perfect for first-time buyers and investors - we highly recommend viewing this apartment before missing out. SOLD WITH NO ONWARD C..."
"***Guide Price £180,000-£195,000*** Connells Colchester are delighted to present this stunning High Street Apartment in the sought after 140 High Street development."
"Situated in one of the most popular rental locations in Colchester, this stunning apartment not only benefits from river views but has been maintained to a high standard by the current tenants. Locationally you couldn't be more well placed with the Hythe Train Station having links to London Liver..."
"** Guide Price £180,000 - £190,000 ** A superbly presented and spacious top floor apartment situated in this sought after residential location within walking distance to the University of Essex and Hythe Railway Station which offers links to London Liverpool Street. This Stylish apartme..."
"A highly desirable move-in-ready cluster house situated in Highwoods on the outskirts of Colchester. With a spacious bedroom, a reception room, fitted kitchen, bathroom and two parking spaces, the property looks out onto a quiet road. "
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this fantastic *QUARTER HOUSE* is well-presented making the *IDEAL HOME FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS*. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* off Enville Way the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"In the heart of Colchester town centre overlooking the bustling High Street, is this contemporary one bedroom modern apartment offering stylish accommodation and no onward chain."
"**GUIDE PRICE £180,000 - £190,000** ** INVESTORS ONLY – TENANT IN SITU ** We are pleased to offer this investment opportunity – a large modern 2 bedroom flat near the University of Essex with tenants in situ until October 2023 "
"***GUIDE PRICE £180,000- £190,000*** ***INCLUDES A SHARE OF THE FREEHOLD*** Palmer and Partners are delighted to bring to the market this good sized and extremely well presented two double bedroom ground floor apartment. Situated in the popular Stanway district to the west o..."
INVESTMENT PURCHASE : CURRENTLY TENANTED UNTIL JANUARY 2024. We are delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom first floor apartment within close proximity to Colchester´s mainline railway station (London Liverpool Street approx. 1 hour) and Colchester General Hospital. The property boas...
"Guide Price £180,000 - £190,000. Two bedroom top floor flat with security entrance. The property has a welcoming entrance hallway with storage cupboard and doors to lounge and door to balcony, fitted kitchen integrated appliances, two double bedrooms and a modern bathroom. ..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £180,000 - £190,000 *** Jackson and Co are proud to present this stunning two bedroom apartment with en-suite and family bathroom, the property also has the benefit of having a balcony as well as a large living area."
"Situated in an enviable position, within easy reach of Colchester city centre, and in walking distance of Colchester mainline railway station. This second-floor apartment benefits from accommodation comprising living room, kitchen, main bedroom with ensuite, further bedroom, family bathroom and J..."
"** SELLING WITH TENANTS IN SITU CURRENTLY PAYING £950 PCM ** Offered to the market with a tenant in situ or to potentially purchase with no onward chain sits this one bedroom, first floor apartment. Sat in a popular location you are close to all local amenities and only a short w..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain and situated to the North of Colchester, conveniently located close to the A12, North Station and all local amenities sits this well presented, two bedroom, first floor apartment. Perfect for first time buyers the accommodation comprises an entrance hall..."
"ATTENTION LANDLORDS Well presented and spacious two double bedroom apartment in Myland, North Colchester with an impressive open plan living/dining/kitchen arrangement and oversized garage. This property comes with a tenant in situ who has made this 'home'"
"This modern first floor apartment is situated in the heart of Colchester, offering excellent access to shops, restaurants and amenities, The property is currently being sold with a tenant in situ, achieving £950 pcm."
"Located in Colchesters historic City centre is this spacious, modern first floor apartment. This is an excellent investment opportunity with a tenant currently in situ and a monthly rental income of £950 PCM being achieve with a yield of over 6%."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £180,000 - £190,000 ***
** INVESTMENT ONLY **
* LET FOR £875 PCM * Jackson and Co are delighted to present this modern two bedroom apartment located in the ideal position for the commuter. Colchester's North station is approx 1 mile away and the A12 is also a s..."
" GUIDE PRICE OF £180,000 to £190,000 (FREEHOLD)
This one bedroom starter home/investment opportunity with gas fired central heating,  double glazed conservatory, private garden and two car parking spaces.  The property is conveniently situated o..."
"Stunning luxury 2 bedroom apartment in the centre of town, offered for sale with no onward chain and breathtaking views over Colchester"
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £180,000 - £190,000 ***
** INVESTMENT ONLY ** * YIELD 7.2% 7.6% * An excellent two bedroom, first floor apartment located in an ideal position for the Essex university. The property offers parking, two bathrooms and is easily located for all shops and amenities. Th..."
" ***GUIDE PRICE OF £180,000 - £190,000*** Jackson and Co are delighted to bring to the market this immaculate top floor, two bedroom apartment with en-suite to master and located within easy access to Essex University and the Hythe railway station. The accommodation is generously prop..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £180,000 - £190,000 *** Jackson and Co are proud to present this immaculate two bedroom property within easy access to Colchester's North station. The property benefits from parking, two good sized bedrooms, Juliet balcony and an open plan living area."
"**GUIDE PRICE £180,000 - £190,000** Benedict House is situated to the south of Colchester city centre offering a fantastic outlook over Abbeyfields whilst being close to amenities and the train station with direct links to London Liverpool Street. This first floo..."
"** Guide Price £180,000 - £190,000** **Investment opportunity currently achieving £1050 PCM until 2/2024** Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this two bedroom flat situated in the South of Colchester located conveniently close to Colchester&r..."
"Offered to the market is this well presented, two bedroom ground floor apartment, perfect for first time buyers looking to get onto the property ladder. The accommodation has been thoughtfully designed throughout and would be ideal for anyone looking to move straight in. Colchester's Town Centre ..."
"*** Attention Investors *** Saxons are offering for sale in the popular area of Stanway is this spacious bright and airy two double bedroom top floor apartment. The property is conveniently located for the A12, supermarkets, shops and is situated within desirable school catchments. The property....."
"An impressive modern two bedroom apartment, located close to Colchester's Essex University. Offering spacious open plan living and is offered for sale with no onward chain. Viewings are highly recommended to appreciate this impressive spacious property"
"GUIDE PRICE £185,000 - £200,000 A three bedroom ground floor apartment walking distance to North Station, Colchester Hospital and Turner Rise retail park. The property comes with a tenant in situ and will be sold as such"
"GUIDE PRICE £175,000----INVESTMENT ONLY ++++ RENTAL INCOME £750 PCM+++SHORTHOLD TENANCY AGREEMENT++++ SERVICE CHARGE INCLUDING GROUND RENT £1405.00 per year. Situated in the heart of Colchester town centre in the ever-popular Dutch Quarter is this spacious, 2-bedroom apartment."
"*** INVESTMENT ONLY *** ** GUIDE PRICE OF £175,000 - £190,000 ** A two bedroom ground floor apartment situated within easy reach of the University of Essex and Hythe Railway Station. You will find two bathrooms and an open plan living area. The property has the potential of £115..."
A Luxurious apartment situated in the popular Hythe area. Ideal for both students and commuters the property benefits from being a short walk to the University of Essex and Hythe Station providing easy access to London Liverpool Street
"A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR Salter Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 80 properties arranged over 5 floors each served by lift, being conveniently situated to the town centre with all amenities and Castle Park. The De..."
**CALLING ALL INVESTORS** This is a fantastic opportunity to purchase a buy to let with tenant in situ paying £825 per month
"A two bedroom ground floor apartment, located a short distance from Colchester's historic town centre, ideally suited to a first time buyer and investors alike. Offered for sale with no onward chain. This is a must view!"
"CHAIN FREE--Ideally located within easy reach of the popular Crouch Street shopping parade and Colchester's busy town centre is this beautifully presented, two-bedroom, retirement apartment. "
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £175,000 - £190,000 ***
** INVESTMENT ONLY **
* YIELD OF 7.2% - 7.6% * Jackson and Co are pleased to present this well presented two bedroom apartment situated within close proximity to Essex university and Hythe station. The apartment has two bathrooms along with a ..."
"Now available for residential buyers as well as investors. This ground floor apartment has a huge 979 year lease and is beautifully located for North Station, Colchester General Hospital, Turner Rise Retail, The A12 and the Town Centre. You must see this !!"
"CALLING ALL INVESTORS!!! Occupying a fantastic location within close proximity of Colchester's mainline railway station, this spacious two double bedroom flat offers a great investment opportunity, with a tenant in situ already"
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £170,000 - £190,000 ***
** INVESTMENT ONLY **
* YIELD OF - 7.4 % - 8.1 % * Jackson and Co are proud to represent this rarely available two bedroom apartment with two large terraces. Inside the property is of good condition with a large open plan living area, en-suit..."
Positioned in a popular new development toward the South of Colchester is this spacious two bedroom ground floor apartment. This stylish home enjoys spacious living accommodation throughout and also has the added benefit of a carport
* * * CLOSE TO RAILWAY STATION and NO CHAIN * * * A two bedroom apartment with open plan living accommodation with allocated parking
"Situated in highly sought-after north Colchester, this first-floor apartment benefits from its proximity to local amenities, including Colchester North mainline railway station. Accommodation comprises living room with Juliette balcony, kitchen, bedroom with ensuite, one further bedroom and a bat..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £170,000 - £180,000 ** Offered to the market with no onward chain and situated in the heart of Colchester sits this well presented, one bedroom first floor apartment. The well presented accommodation consists of an entrance hallway, spacious kitc..."
"This luxurious one bedroom apartment is situated in the heart of Colchester's city centre, offering excellent access to shops and amenities. The property is beautifully finished with a modern open plan design, well equipped kitchen, generous living space and contemporary shower room."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this well presented, two bedroom second floor apartment situated in an ideal position in Colchester, close to a range of schools, shops and amenities including Brinkley Grove Primary School, St Johns Playing Field, The Rovers Tye, St Jo..."
"Northwood are pleased to market this two bedroom coach house situated in WheelWright Place Highwoods, the property benefits from being double glazed throughout as well as having an allocated parking space. Please note the property is currently being let on AST. Call tod..."
"Situated within a stone's throw of Colchester North Station Situated to the North of Colchester, is this immaculate one-bedroom apartment which is conveniently located a stone's throw away from North Station, with direct links to London Liverpool Street and beyond. The property also pro..."
Investment Property Only - Well Presented Two Bedroom Top Floor Flat Overlooking Abbey Fields - Close To Town Centre - Viewing by Appointment Only
" This modern two bedroom ground floor apartment offers hallway, living room with patio doors out onto a large balcony, seperate fitted kitchen, two double bedrooms and a bathroom. This property also benefits from allocated parking, and is offered for sale with no onward chain."
"FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION ON WEDNESDAY 29TH MARCH AT 2PM. LIVE STREAMED VIA DEDMAN GRAY WEBSITE. BIDDING AVAILABLE BY TELEPHONE, PROXY AND ONLINE. ; RESIDENTIAL INVESTMENT: A VACANT FREEHOLD TERRACED HOUSE CONSIDERED TO BE IDEAL AS A BUY TO LET INVESTMENT OR HOME FOR OWNER OCCUPATION"
We are pleased to offer this good sized ground floor maisonette with private garden and overlooking a picturesque greensward. Offering two double bedrooms and good sized living space with extra study area. Please call now to book your viewing 
"**GUIDE PRICE £170,000 - £180,000** We are delighted to offer this fantastic investment opportunity, right next to Colchester’s mainline train station. Perfect for commuters but also offering great access to town centre, the A12, hospital and retail park, this two bed..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £170,000 - £180,000 ** ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** This one bedroom top floor apartment is conveniently situated close to Colchester's City Centre, schools and the mainline train station. The well presented accommodation consists of a spacious lounge/diner/kitchen, bedroom an..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £170,000 - £180,000 ** Located close to Colchester City Centre is this excellent investment opportunity. Located on the top floor the property is well presented throughout with two bedrooms, En Suite shower room, bathroom and an underground parking space."
A period Grade II listed one bedroom maisonette with accommodation over two floors offering attractive period features in the heart of the City Centre.
"**Guide Price £170,000 - £180,000** A opportunity to acquire an excellent first floor apartment, offering two very generous bedrooms and recently decorated and complete with stylish grey carpet throughout. Accessed via a secure telephone entry system, Stuart House is based in the c..."
"In a prime North Colchester position, this apartment is within easy reach of Colchester's anticipated Northern Gateway, soon to be home to an array of restaurants, leisure facilities and premium health club. It is also a served by an excellent bus network, to Colchester's mainline station, off..."
** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Superb opportunity on this NEARLY NEW luxury apartment situated within the heart of Colchester City Centre. ***BEAUTIFULLY FINISHED*** Luxurious one bedroom apartment situated in sought after city centre location. Space & light have been optimised with an open plan design co...
"Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this spacious two bedroom apartment, situated a short distance from Colchester's city centre and North station with mainline links to London Liverpool Street. There are shopping facilities for day-to-day needs at Turner Rise Retail Park and..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £170,000 - £185,000 *** ** HIGH END APARTMENT ** Jackson and Co are delighted to bring to the market this immaculate two bedroom apartment. The apartment features a large open plan living area with kitchen and breakfast bar. The property is located on the doorstep to ..."
"A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FOURTH FLOOR Salter Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 80 properties arranged over 5 floors each served by lift, being conveniently situated to the town centre with all amenities and Castle Park. The D..."
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** ** RECENTLY DECORATED, CARPETED & INCLUDES ALL WHITE GOODS ** Offered to the market with no onward chain and situated in a popular location close to Colchester's City Centre and the mainline train station with links to London Liverpool Street sits this two bedroom, top f..."
"..ATTN FIRST TIME BUYERS! EXCELLENT ACCESS TO A12 AND COLCHESTER TOWN BUS ROUTES - Take a look at this OPEN PLAN 2 bedroom first floor flat in Sayers Court Stanway, and you will see it is perfect for FIRST TIME BUYERS and INVESTORS - Located in the popular residential area of Stanway in West Col..."
"Located in Colchester City Centre is this one bedroom ground floor apartment. In modern condition the property comprises of a large open plan kitchen and living area, modern bathroom suite and spacious bedroom. The property is a short walk to the nearby train station and sits in the heart o..."
"This well presented two bedroom first floor apartment, within this attractive converted building within striking distance of the Town Centre & North Station. The property has been designed and built to an excellent specification, with superb attention to detail. Boasting allocated parking,..."
Two Bedroom First Floor Flat - Vacant Possession with No Onward Chain - Open Plan Kitchen/Living Room - Main Bathroom Serves Bedroom Two - En-Suite to Bedroom One - Juliet Balcony to Living Room - One Allocated Car Park Space - Viewings by Appointment Only
"Boydens are delighted to bring to market this two-bedroom, first floor maisonette, that can be found just off St John's Close, which is to the North of Colchester within easy reach of the A12."
INVEST IN THIS. An truly impressive maisonette currently let on an assured shorthold tenancy but could be bought with vacant possession. This home could also lend itself subject to any consent to be converted to a very large three bedroom. Own garden too !
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £165,000 - £175,000 *** Located in the popular investment area of the Hythe is this excellent two bedroom apartment within walking distance to Essex university, local shops and Colchester centre. Currently let for £950 and having a yield of 6.3% - 6.7% this inve..."
"This one-bedroom top-floor apartment is located in the heart of Colchester city centre, offering easy access to all the amenities and attractions the city offers. The apartment features a bright, airy living room with large windows, providing plenty of natural light and stunning city skyline view..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £165,000 - £175,000 *** Jackson and Co welcome this two bedroom top floor apartment to the market, the home offers a spacious living area and is within easy reach of local shops and amenities. "
"What a buy !! Two impressive bedrooms, generous lounge, separate kitchen, full bathroom. All this is a location close to ever popular Abbey Fields. What's not to love? Call now before you miss out. CHAIN FREE"
Situated within easy access of Essex University is this two bedroom ground floor apartment offered with no onward chain.
"NO CHAIN...A well presented ground floor apartment in the popular area of Abbey Fields. The property benefits from electric heating (not tested by Elms Price and Co), master bedroom with en-suite, open plan living area with dual aspect windows, one allocated parking space. The property, in our ..."
** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ** Tenant in situ presently achieving £700.00 per calendar month. Superb investment opportunity on this NEARLY NEW luxury apartment situated within the heart of Colchester City Centre. Luxurious one bedroom apartment situated in sought after city centre location. Perfec...
Recently refurbished one bedroom house on the outskirts of Colchester Town Centre. offered for sale with no onward chain. Ideal for first time buyers or Investors. This is a must view!
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this excellent *FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT* is *WELL-PRESENTED THROUGHOUT* making the *PERFECT HOME FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS* with early viewing recommended. Situated in a *POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SHOPS*, schools, *BUS ROUTES* and the A12/A120."
"*Guide Price £160,000 - £170,000* *OFFERED WITH TENANTS IN SITU* Immaculately presented and modern one bedroom ground floor apartment with a private rear garden. Built only four years ago, this property is stylish, modern and located in a convenient lo..."
"GUIDE PRICE £160,000---£170,000--- This spacious apartment is well presented throughout with an open plan living/kitchen area, a double bedroom, a family bathroom and a private west facing balcony with views over the River Colne."
"***£160,000 - £170,000***INVESTMENT ONLY - TENANT IN SITU PAYING £800.00 PCM***BEING SOLD AS PART OF A BUY TO LET PORTFOLIO*** Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this two bedroom, first floor apartment, situated to the south of Colchester within easy a..."
"Harris + Wood Chesterwell are delighted to offer for this exceptionally well presented one bedroom first floor apartment, situated within a short walk of North Station with its mainline links to London, Colchester general Hospital and the A12. Further amenities include nearby shops on Chesterwel..."
"INVESTOR SALE.. An attractive one bedroom ground floor maisonette in this delightful part of South Colchester with a tenant in situ. This property has two designated parking spaces, it's own very generous private garden, 957 year lease and is a ready to go investment. What's not to love?"
"** GUIDE PRICE £160,000 - £170,000 ** Offered to the market with no onward chain and situated in a popular location within walking distance to the Hythe Train Station, local amenities and only a short drive away from Colchester's bustling City Centre. The accommodation consists of an ..."
"INVESTORS ONLY. A two double bedroom first floor maisonette, in need of some modernization. There is also a private rear garden to the property. Please call to arrange a viewing."
"** GUIDE PRICE OF £160,000 TO £170,000 **This luxury two bedroom apartment, is situated in the prestigious development of The Mill Apartments, providing excellent access to Colchester City Centre and local amenities.The accommodation comprises of; entran..."
"Situated in the sought-after Mile End area, to the north of Colchester, this ground-floor apartment benefits from its proximity to local amenities. Accommodation comprises open plan living / dining / kitchen, two bedrooms and bathroom. The property also benefits from allocated parking. Groun..."
"***Guide price £160,000 - £180,000**** Connells Colchester are very pleased to offer this fantastic INVESTMENT ONLY opportunity with a current tenant in situ until July 2023."
"VIEWING REFERENCE: MC0527 - Located in the popular location of the Hythe, we are pleased to bring to market this well presented two bedroom top floor apartment. The home offers a spacious lounge diner, fitted kitchen, bathroom & is walking distance to the Hythe Railway Station & c..."
"*Guide Price £160,000* Ideal first time purchase or investment offered with no onward chain. This top floor two bedroom modern apartment can be found to the east of the city just off the Mersea Road and benefits from an allocated parking space and double glazing. "
"Two Bed Willerby Sheraton Elite (42x14) The Willerby Sheraton is one of the most sought after holiday homes on the market. This model exudes country house warmth at every turn, with its soft tartan interiors and walnut tones. This holiday home features a spacious environment throughout, and e..."
"**Guide Price £155,000 - £160,000** Residing in North Colchester in the district of Highwoods, within walking distance to Highwoods Square and therefore within close proximity to; a Tesco extra store, post office, dentist/doctors surgery and also served by an excellent bus network ..."
"Saxons Lettings & Management are delighted to offer for sale this modern, spacious and well presented top floor apartment which is ideally located for access to The University of Essex. Currently tenanted and achieving £700.00 pcm, this is an excellent investment opportunity not to be missed."
"** BUYER INCENTIVE ** THE SELLER WILL PAY TWO YEARS SERVICE CHARGE FROM DATE OF COMPLETION. We are pleased to bring to the market this third floor apartment in the sought after Mill Apartments development, within walking distance of Colchester town centre and Castle Park. The property benefits ..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £150,000 - £160,000** This one bedroom property is located in the centre of Colchester within walking distance to shops, amenities and train station. This property would be ideal for a first time buyer or investor and is offered with no onward chain. "
"Looking for that perfect investment close to Colchester City Centre, then this fantastic one bedroom maisonette is for you! Just a short walk into the City & Colchester train station, this modern property boasts great size accommodation and includes off road parking. Early viewing advised."
" **GUIDE PRICE £150,000 - £160,000** We are delighted to offer this fantastic investment opportunity. With a good EPC rating, 137 year lease, this good sized one bedroom apartment has a tenant in situ paying £820pcm until September 2023. "
Situated on a modern development to the north of Colchester is this two bedroom first floor apartment offered with no onward chain. 
"Set in the prestigious Colchester Country Park, Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this two bedroom luxury leisure home measuring 40ft x 13ft, located to the west of Colchester, just off of the A12. The holiday park provides excellent access to the historic city centre with ..."
**No Onward Chain** Town centre living with this well presented One bedroom apartment which is offered for sale with no onward chain
"Connells are pleased to present to market this well presented one bedroom apartment in south Colchester. This is a perfect investment property with tenant in situ. The property comprises of a modern fitted kitchen, a generously proportioned lounge/diner and double bedroom."
"Spacious two bedroom, two bathroom apartment located in the popular Solus Development to the South of Colchester's City Centre. This is a must view! NO ONWARD CHAIN"
Two Bedroom apartment situated close to Colchester Station
"This second floor apartment is situated in the popular Hythe area of Colchester and could be an ideal investment opportunity. The property offers well presented accommodation, one bedroom and there is a communal parking area."
*** INVESTMENT ONLY *** A superbly presented one bedroom third floor apartment situated along the banks of the River Colne and being within easy reach of the University of Essex. By nature of its location the property would make an excellent investment/buy to let purchase as rentable value shoul...
Now tenanted at £850.00pcm as advised by the vendor and available only for buy to let landlords. A sound investment for you just yards from Colchester North Mainline Station?
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** Ideally located apartment, situated in Colchester's town centre with its array of shops, restaurants, amenities and town train station. Ideal first time purchase."
"*Guide Price £150,000-£160,000* An opportunity to purchase a two bedroom second floor apartment, positioned at Colchester Hythe and therefore offering itself as the ideal investment or first time purchase opportunity. Requiring some tender love and care throughout but offering a fa..."
"Looking for an investment property? A lovely apartment with a tenant in situ, this home can be bought as a going concern with immediate return"
"**GUIDE PRICE £140,000 - £145,000** Located in Colchester City Centre is this one bedroom first floor apartment. REF(COS220295)"
"*Offers over £150,000* Buy To Let Investors! Modern 2 bedroom flat in North Colchester with tenant in situ"
"**GUIDE PRICE £150,000-£160,000** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this two bedroom second floor apartment, situated in the Hythe, within walking distance of a range of local shops and amenities. The property's ..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £150,000 - £160,000 ** Offered to the market with no onward chain and situated in the heart of Colchester close to all local amenities and the mainline train station with links to London Liverpool Street sits this one bedroom top floor apartment. The modern accommodatio..."
"**Attention Investors and first time buyers** I am delighted to bring to the market this beautifully presented and very spacious one bedroom ground floor apartment. It's been beautifully looked after by the current owner. It is in the prime location of St Peters Street, which is situat..."
"Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this spacious and well presented one bedroom apartment which is located in popular Hythe area of the City.Perfectly positioned for access to the University of Essex, City Centre and local amenities, the property is an ideal first time or........"
"Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this spacious and well presented one bedroom apartment which is located in popular Hythe area of the City. Perfectly positioned for access to the University of Essex, City Centre and local amenities, the property is an ideal investment......"
"CHAIN FREE: Superbly located within easy reach of the popular Crouch Street shopping parade and Colchester's busy town centre is this spacious well maintained, ONE BEDROOM, RETIREMENT RESIDENCE with a DINING AREA and JULIETTE BALCONY. The property has also just been freshly painted and has had ne..."
"CHAIN FREE: Ideally located within easy reach of the popular Crouch Street shopping parade and Colchester's busy town centre is this spacious, well-maintained, one-bedroom, retirement residence, providing accommodation for the over 60's"
" **INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY** Located in the popular Hythe area within easy access to Essex University and The Hythe railway station accessing London Liverpool Street, is this one double bedroom contemporary style second floor apartment. The property is currently let for £825 pcm giving a gr..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £140,000 - £150,000 *** Located within walking distance to The Essex University and being currently let for £875pcm until October 2023 and has a yield of 7% - 7.5%. This property is being offered with no on-going chain. "
"Located in the Hythe is this excellent investment opportunity offered with no onward chain. Located on the second floor the modern home has bright open plan, kitchen and living area with a spacious bedroom and bathroom. The property also has the additional benefit of a balcony and allocated parki..."
"**GUIDE PRICE OF £140,000 - £150,000** A very well presented one bedroom apartment, benefiting from river views and having allocated parking. The property is located on the fourth floor and is currently tenanted, paying 875pcm giving a total yield of 7% - 7.5%."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £140,000 - £150,000 *** Jackson and Co are proud to present this one bedroom first floor apartment located within easy access to the Essex University and a short distance to Colchester centre. The property also has the benefit of a garage and parking in front."
LANDLORDS LOOK NO FURTHER !! This two bedroom apartment comes ready to go with tenants in situ and a garage. Located just on the edge of the town centre and with excellent access to two train stations and the A12. What's not to like? Call to view before it goes
"GUIDE PRICE OF £140,000 - £150,000
*** INVESTMENT ONLY *** Located in the popular Hythe location is this immaculate one bedroom property within easy reach of local amenities and the Essex university."
"A one bedroom flat situated on the ""shoppers"" level of the complex which gives great access to the town without using the stairs or lift. Salter Court is a popular over 60's retirement complex ideally located within easy reach of the popular Crouch Street shopping parade and Colchester's busy tow..."
Offered For Sale with no onward chain is this one bedroom first floor apartment located to the south of Colchester in a cul-de-sac position and offered with a 25% of the Freehold.
INVESTMENT ONLY------RENTAL INCOME £736 pcm-----SERVICE CHARGE £675 pa----GROUND RENT £50 pa----SHORTHOLD TENANCY AGREEMENT-- LEASE LENGTH 91 YEARS---- This rarely avaliable one bedroom ground floor apartment can be found in the popular Claremont Heights development which is within easy reach of ...
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £140,000 - £150,000 *** ** INVESTMENT ONLY ** Jackson and Co are proud to present this third floor one bedroom apartment situated in the Hythe area. The property benefits from a large balcony, lounge as well as a double bedroom. "
"Two Bed ABI Ingleton (40x13) 2023 With a fabulous, fresh layout and designer detailing, The Ingleton lets you enjoy a space that’s chic and quite unique. With an inviting entrance that opens up into the breakfast bar, while touches of floral fabric add oodles of cosy charm. From ..."
"Boydens are delighted tobring to market this one bedroom, first floor apartment, situated within short walking distance of Colchester's historic city centre and would ideally suit a first time buyer, or buy to let investor. The property had recently been decorated and carpetted throughout."
"***GUIDE PRICE £135,000 - £145,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are pleased to present to the market this one bedroom ground floor apartment, ideally situated being close to Colchester station with mainline links to London Liverpool Street, as w..."
"Saxons are delighted to offer for sale this well presented and spacious apartment located in the ever desirable St Marys area close to Colchester City Center. Residing in this desirable retirement development, the property is on offer with no onward chain and is perfectly located for access to......"
 This substantial one bedroom second floor apartment can be found in the heart of Colchester's bustling High Street.
"** PART BUY PART RENT ** £130,000 is for a 50% share purchase, the full property price is £260,000. The minimum CASH DEPOSIT you will need is £52,000. Turn any freehold property into part buy–part rent with Leaders Estate Agents and ‘Your Hom..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this one bedroom apartment, built in 2018 and situated a short distance to Colchester city centre which offers a range of shopping facilities, bars and restaurants. The town railway station is also wit..."
"GUIDE PRICE £130,000 (LEASEHOLD)
This one bedroom ground floor maisionette features double glazing and a reserved car parking space to the rear.  The property is held on a 999 Lease and is offered for sale on a chain free basis, keys are availalble for viewing...."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £130,000 - £140,000 *** * TWO BEDROOM TOP FLOOR APARTMENT * IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS OR INVESTORS * COMMUNAL PARKING * APPROXIMATELY 1.6 MILES FROM COLCHESTER TOWN STATION * CLOSE TO AMENITIES * CLOSE TO SCHOOLS * EASY ..."
"**** Attention Investors **** Saxons are delighted to offer this modern one bedroom apartment which is perfectly located for access to the University of Essex, City Centre, supermarkets and local amenities. The property would make an ideal investment purchase and is currently tenanted."
"**Guide Price £130,000 - £140,000** A perfect opportunity has arisen with this fabulous block of apartments built in 2018 is this one bedroom apartment located within walking distance of two of Colchester's stations (Colchester Hythe and Colchester Town) with direct links to London..."
*Investors Only* Leaders are delighted to offer this two bedroom apartment for student only let. Situated close to the university is this well-kept and spacious two bedroom apartment. You have the local train station only a stone's throw away along with the town centre and a...
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this charming *OVER 65's FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT* provides *IDEAL ACCOMMODATION* with a *COMFORTABLE LOUNGE* opening onto the *COMMUNAL GARDENS* and being convenient for *LOCAL SHOPS*, Highwoods Country Park and *BUS SERVICES*. An early viewing is highly recommended."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £130,000 - £140,000 *** ** INVESTMENT ONLY ** Located within ideal proximity to Essex university is this one bedroom apartment. The property has a balcony and a open plan living area. The property is also currently let for £825pcm giving a yield of 7.07% - 6.6%. "
"Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer this spacious apartment ideally positioned for access to the University of Essex. This ideal ***Investment Property*** is currently tenanted and benefits from a large double bedroom, study/nursery room, modern fitted kitchen & bathroom."
This one bedroom first floor maisonette can be found on the ever popular Bergholt Road which has direct access to Colchesters North Station.
Situated within walking distance of the Essex University is this well presented two bedroom apartment which currently has tenants in situ
IDEAL STUDENT LET - Situated within walking distance of the Essex University is this well presented two bedroom apartment which currently has tenants in situ
"A RE-DECORATED AND RE CARPETED ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE THIRD FLOOR WITH JULIET BALCONY Salter Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 80 properties arranged over 5 floors each served by lift, being conveniently situated to the town ..."
"Occupying a superb position within walking distance of central Colchester, this established one bedroom first floor flat, offered For Sale, with no ongoing chain."
"Offers over £125,000.00 - Priced to sell ground floor maisonette that can be bought with the tenant in situ or bought to live in yourself. (Rent £730pcm). Close to town, town station and with allocated parking. CHAIN FREE"
"**Calling All Investors** Situated in the popular Highwoods area of North Colchester, is this well presented one bedroom maisonette which is for sale to INVESTMENT BUYERS ONLY!"
"A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FOURTH FLOOR. Salter Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 80 properties arranged over 5 floors each served by lift, being conveniently situated to the town centre with all amenities and Castle Park. The ..."
"*GUIDE PRICE £120,000 TO £125,000* This one bedroom top floor apartment is situated in the heart of Colchester, currently let out and achieving £620 pcm. The property could make an ideal buy to let investment opportunity and offers spacious open plan living space and no onward chain."
"FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION ON WEDNESDAY 29TH MARCH AT 2PM. LIVE STREAMED VIA DEDMAN GRAY WEBSITE. BIDDING AVAILABLE BY TELEPHONE, PROXY AND ONLINE. ; BUY TO LET INVESTMENT: A TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT CURRENTLY LET PRODUCING AN INCOME OF £10,020 PER ANNUM. AN 8.3% YIELD OF THE GUIDE PRICE."
"*Shared Ownership* £120,000 is for a 50% share purchase, the full property price is £240,000. The minimum CASH DEPOSIT you will need is £48,000. Turn any freehold property into part buy –part rent with Leaders Estate Agents and ‘Your Home&rsquo..."
"*£120,000 TO £125,000* This one bedroom top floor apartment is situated in the heart of Colchester's town and is currently let out, achieving £625 pcm on an assured shorthold tenancy. The property could make an ideal buy to let investment and offers spacious open plan living space."
This retirement property is situated a short distance from Colchester's historic city centre and the well renowned Castle Park.
A spacious and beautifully maintained one bedroom apartment enjoying wonderful views over St Mary's with and nestled in a popular retirement development in the heart of Colchester Town Centre. The property enjoys excellent sized accommodation throughout and great communal facilities ...
"A THIRD FLOOR, ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT Salter Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 80 properties arranged over 5 floors each served by lift, being conveniently situated to the town centre with all amenities and Castle Park. The Development Manag..."
"East Links Residential are delighted to bring to the market this One Bedroom Ground Floor Flat, located ideally for Colchester North Station and Colchester General Hospital. Being offered with no onward chain and with tenant in situ."
This ground floor studio maisonette is situated in a desirable location and boasts a peaceful outlook over a communal garden. The property has been rented out for a number of years and some modernisation is required. There are two windows with provide the maisonette with natural light.
Wonderful 2 bedroom apartment in the Castellum Grange development. The price advertised represents purchasing a 50% share of the home
Situated within easy access of Colchester city centre is this one bedroom second floor apartment for the over 60's.
"This excellent *FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT* is particularly *WELL PRESENTED* throughout making the *IDEAL HOME FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS*. Situated in the *SOUGHT-AFTER MYLAND AREA* the property is convenient for *VARIOUS LOCAL SHOPS*, Highwoods Country Park, *COLCHESTER NORTH STATION* and the A12/A120."
"An excellent investment opportunity has arisen to purchase this generously sized studio apartment positioned favourably to the North of Colchester and within striking distance of an array of excellent local amenities, including Colchester's Northern Gateway and Leisure facilities, Ge..."
"***INVESTMENT ONLY - TENANT IN SITU PAYING £560.00 PCM*** Palmer & Partners are pleased to present to the market this one bedroom, first floor studio flat, situated to the north of Colchester in the sought after area of Highwoods, having excellent access to local amenities in..."
"A beautifully presented houseboat moored in the hythe area of Colchester. The vessel is a Dutch barge Tjalk type with a rounded stem and slab sides, and according to the owner was built in Gronigen in 1915 as a motor cargo vessel and converted to a houseboat in the 1960,s T..."
"*Sold with Tenant in Situ* Currently let and achieving a gross rental yield of 6% this first floor studio flat is available for investment purchase. Located in the sought after area of Highwoods to the north of Colchester, the property offers fantastic access to the A12. H..."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this one bedroom, first floor flat, situated to the north of Colchester in the sought after area of Highwoods having excellent access to local amenities including Tesco superstore, A12/A120, Colchester General hospital and Colchester Bu..."
"FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION ON WEDNESDAY 29TH MARCH AT 2PM. LIVE STREAMED VIA DEDMAN GRAY WEBSITE. BIDDING AVAILABLE BY TELEPHONE, PROXY AND ONLINE. ; REFURBISHMENT OPPORTUNITY: A VACANT FREEHOLD TWO BEDROOM END TERRACE HOUSE CLOSE TO THE CITY CENTRE IN NEED OF RESTORATION AND IMPROVEMENT"
"**GUIDE PRICE £100,000-£110,000** Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this one bedroom apartment, situated within close proximity of Colchester's City centre with its range of shops, restaurants, bars and amenities. Internally the accommoda..."
"CHAIN FREE: Superbly located within easy reach of the popular Crouch Street shopping parade and Colchester's busy town centre is this spacious, well-maintained, one-bedroom, retirement residence. Service Charge: £2362.78 pa --- Ground Rent £395.00 Length of Lease 109 years (125 from 2005)"
A spacious and well presented one bedroom apartment enjoying wonderful views over St Mary's with and nestled in a popular retirement development in the heart of Colchester Town Centre. The property enjoys excellent sized accommodation throughout and great communal facilities including living r...
You will find this ground floor studio apartment in the popular area of Highwoods located to the North Colchester. Whether it is buy to live or buy to let you do not want to miss this
"*Tenants in-situ* This well presented and spacious studio apartment is now available to view. Located in the preferred North side of Colchester is this studio apartment. Desired for its great access to the A12, brilliant transport links, and close to amenities, it should hav..."
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this excellent *FIRST FLOOR STUDIO APARTMENT* would make the *PERFECT HOME FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS*. Situated in the *SOUGHT AFTER HIGHWOODS AREA* the property is convenient for *LOCAL SHOPS*, Highwoods Country Park, *COLCHESTER NORTH STATION* and the A12/A120."
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this fantastic *GROUND FLOOR STUDIO APARTMENT* has been *REFURBISHED THROUGHOUT* making the *IDEAL HOME FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS*. The property is situated conveniently for *LOCAL SHOPS*, Highwoods Country Park, *COLCHESTER NORTH STATION* and the A12/A120."
NO CHAIN! We are delighted to present this one DOUBLE bedroom over 55's retirement flat situated just off the popular Ipswich Road and nestled close to an array of local amenities and bus routes into the City Centre
"Over 55's One bedroom retirement apartment, a matter of minutes away from Colchester's historic town centre. Offered for sale with no onward chain. This is a must view!"
"Well presented two double bedroom pent house apartment offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN.This Property benefits from City views, en-suite to Master, open plan living accommodation, allocated parking, within walking distance to local schools, shops & amenities."
"Offered for sale by MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION this first floor studio apartment is situated in the heart of Colchester, within walking distance of the town centre and town train station. With no onward chain, the property is currently let out and would offer an ideal investment opportunity."
"FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION ON WEDNESDAY 29TH MARCH AT 2PM. LIVE STREAMED VIA DEDMAN GRAY WEBSITE. BIDDING AVAILABLE BY TELEPHONE, PROXY AND ONLINE. ; LAND INVESTMENT: A VACANT FREEHOLD PARCEL OF LAND SIDING ONTO THE STREET IN A RESIDENTIAL AREA MEASURING APPROXIMATELY 255 SQUARE METERS"
"Situated in this highly regarded residential road just off Knoll drive, this deceptively spacious three bedroomed semi detached house offers excellent potential and is to be sold with no chain. There is gas central heating and uPVC double glazing and offers excellent scope for improvement and ..."
This is a rare opportunity to buy a block of apartments including the freehold. The entire property has been completely refurbished to a very high standard with a lot of consideration put into the finishes. Each apartment also has parking through the gated entrance. For more information or to ar...
"Cryfield Grange is a beautiful Grade II listed seven bedroom detached property situated in the highly sought after location of Cryfield Grange Road with easy access to Coventry and Kenilworth. Set on a plot of just under an acre, in a stunning rural location, this property really must be seen ..."
"A large and luxurious, modern family home boasting 4,926 sq. ft. of accommodation notably including a gymnasium with sauna, outdoor swim spa, breeze house and large garden room. Crackley Court is approached from Westwood Heath Road. The gated entrance opens to a large driveway with ample parking..."
A Spacious Six Bedroom Detached Family Home ~ Sold with Planning Permission for Two Additional Detached Dwellings ~ Fantastic Location ~ No Chain A truly unique and wonderful house with two approved building plots located in one of Coventry's finest locations. This is an incredibly rare ...
"Situated in one of the most prestigious roads in Coventry, on Stoneleigh Road, is Fieldgate. This remarkable home, which has not been on the market for numerous years, is your once-in-a-lifetime-opportunity to take ownership"
"A magnificent detached house on an extensive plot of 0.7acres. With in/out driveway the property boasts four reception rooms, cellar, beautiful handmade kitchen/breakfast room & utility. Six bedrooms over two floors & three high quality fitted bathrooms. Stunnig gardens to three sides &a..."
"Hidden down a long driveway off the very well regarded Westwood Heath Road, behind large electric gates two new high-tech and high-spec luxury residences sit on large plots with private landscaped gardens. Outside, a wrap-around terrace meets bi-fold doors for an easy flow ideal for summer. Scree..."
"An opportunity to purchase this modernised executive detached house in a quiet backwater on Gibbett Hill. With three reception rooms, quality fitted kitchen/dining room & utility. Four double bedrooms, three bathrooms(two ensuite). Attractive gardens, driveway & double integral garage. Vi..."
"An outstanding barn conversion forming part of this exclusive development, situated in a secluded courtyard setting within the heart of Baginton. This delightful property has undergone a superb and sympathetic refurbishment, blending a mix of charming character and modern living. There is an abun..."
Envisage sales and Lettings are delighted to offer this rare opportunity to purchase a large detached house in need of some modernisation that is located upon a substantial plot in the highly desirable area of Burton Green near Coventry. Viewing is essential to appreciate what this property offer...
"An exceptional and substantial detached family home, situated at the end of a cul-de-sac in one of Earlsdon's most sought after areas. The property offers generous and beautifully appointed accommodation throughout including an expertly converted garage creating a high quality home office/bedroom..."
"Spacious, versatile and situated within a delightful and prestigious cul de sac just off the Kenilworth Road, this detached and extended property is an ideal family home. With four first floor bedrooms, a spacious loft room and an adaptable ground floor office/bedroom five, the accommodation is w..."
"A beautifully appointed, spacious and well planned regency style family home | APPROX 3000 SQ FT | BENEFITTING FROM A RECENT FIRST FLOOR EXTENSION | Located near the BEST schooling | Ideal for home working HOME OFFICE | Located in a quiet cul-de-sac | Walking distance to War memorial Park| Exte..."
"**Investment Opportunity** 6 Renovated Dwellings Including 1 Two bedroom detached bungalow, One two bedroom apartment, three one bedroom apartments and one studio apartment with parking and freehold."
"Handles Property are delighted to offer for sale this spacious six bedroom detached family home located within a highly desirable area to the South of the city centre. Superb open plan kitchen/living area, large private garden, double garage. Viewing highly recommended."
EPC Grade F
"IMMACULATE EXECUTIVE FAMILY HOME SET OVER THREE LUXURIOS FLOORS, IN THE SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION OF CROMWELL LANE, POSITIONED ON A VERY GENEROUS PLOT CLOSE TO WARWICK UNIVERSITY WITH OVER 3100 SQFT OF LIVING SPACE. This beautiful five bedroom detached house is conveniently positioned on Cro..."
"A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED EXECUTIVE STYLE PROPERTY IN A SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION , approximately 9 years Comprising of five/six bedrooms, three bathrooms, beautiful open plan kitchen, large utility, 27ft lounge and separate family room, approximately 300ft rear garden, underfloor heating throughtout."
A rarely available detached family home located in an exclusive cul de sac just off the Kenilworth Road. Having been extended by the current owners and boasting over 2500sqft of accommodation the home offers further potential to extend (subject to the relevant consents)
"A prominent Freehold redevelopment opportunity on City Centre outskirts The subject property currently comprises 11 bedsits with individual shower rooms over three floors, main entrance, cellar, large, fitted kitchen/dining room and a first floor lounge. To the side and rear elevation th..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase this substantial detached family home, ideally situated on one of the city's most coveted roads"
"A fantastic development opportunity, located within walking distance of the city centre & station. Formerly a nursing home and offering a wealth of options to convert in to apartments or studios"
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a superb four bedroom detached family home situated in the sought after location of Cannon Park Road situated just off the Kenilworth Road, this property is ideally situated within easy reach of Warwick University, Coventry City Centre, Coventry Railway Station..."
"Excellent four bedroom detached family home - prominent corner plot position - located on the popular Swallows Nest Development off Browns Lane, Allesley - kitchen / diner - separate study/playroom - spacious lounge - en-suite to master bedroom - rear driveway & garage - guest cloakroom - immacul..."
"An excellent opportunity to purchase this traditional detached family home in this highly desirable location within easy access of the City Centre, Railway Station and War Memorial Park. The property has recently undergone a significant refurbishment program to create a wonderful family home whic..."
A Simply Stunning Detached Family Home Situated In The Desirable And Exclusive Location Of Asthill Grove In Styvechale - This impressive four bedroom home offers a vast amount of living space throughout and has undergone a complete renovation throughout including a luxuriously modern kitchen/dine...
"**Deceptively Spacious Detached Family Home on Sought After Cannon Park Estate**Self Sufficient Annexe With Balcony**Double Garage & Multi-Car Driveway** This incredible family home has so much to offer, very briefly comprising; Multi-car driveway, double garage with electric roller shutter secur..."
"ACDC Sales and Lettings have this outstanding unique five bedroom detached property. This property is in a fantastic location of Westwood heath, Coventry. The property comes with electric front gates as added security and a large driveway additionally a double garage. This fabulous property h..."
Outstanding Detached Home - Hidden Away In A Lovely Quiet Cul-De-Sac - Large Plot With Electric Gates - 6 Bedrooms - 2 En-Suites - Family Bathroom - WC - Lounge - DESIGNER OPEN PLAN KITCHEN / DINER - Conservatory - Office / Study - Utility - Double Garage - Large Garden - CHECK OUT MY FLOOR PLAN
A five bedroom detached house set on a generous plot with a small wooded area and a small paddock with stable. With three reception rooms and a large fitted kitchen. Three bathrooms and five first floor bedrooms. Two generous loft rooms. Deep fore garden and driveway. Plot extends to over 1.2 acres.
"An excellent opportunity to purchase a substantial modern executive detached family home, situated within a secure gated courtyard setting on this sought after select development. The property is situated on the outskirts of the City with excellent travel links including the nearby Tile Hill Rail..."
"This is a lovely four bedroom detached house set in an exceptionally fine garden plot in a very popular south of the city. Conveniently placed for access to Canley Railway Station, the A45 and connections to the Midlands Motorway Network. This spacious family home offers excellent accommodation o..."
"Like to entertain? This spacious family home offers plenty of space for friends and family to enjoy. Located in the highly sought after Canley Gardens area, the home is within walking distance of Canley Station and the cosmopolitan Earlsdon Street with its array of cafe's and shops"
"FOR SALE BY AUCTION: Terms and conditions apply*. Being sold via Secure Sale online bidding. Terms & Conditions apply*. Starting Bid £720,000. Two properties now co joined to create one spacious HMO (single agreement to Serco), this prime location period investment sits within walking distance..."
"Reeds Rains are delighted to present this incredible, four bedroom detached house located on Moreall Meadows, Coventry."
"A BEAUTIFUL FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED EXECUTIVE STYLE PROPERTY situated in the popular cul-de-sac location of Moreall Meadows, briefly comprising of reception hallway, guest cloakroom, lounge, separate dining room, breakfast kitchen, conservatory, space for several cars and double garage."
"A superb family home set within this highly sought after village, offering spacious and stylish accommodation throughout, along with a generous rear garden and views over the park to the front"
Deceptively spacious and well-presented detached home offers flexible family accommodation over two floors and the potential to extend further subject to planning.
"UNEXPECTEDLEY BACK TO MARKET AN IMMACULATE EXECUTIVE STYLE FAMILY HOME SET IN THE SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION OF SANDRINGHAM CLOSE JUST OFF WESTWOOD HEATH ROAD, POSITIONED ON A VERY GENEROUS PLOT, CLOSE TO WARWICK UNIVERSITY, KENILWORTH AND COVENTRY, OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN. Thi..."
**TWO BRAND NEW FIVE BEDROOM LUXURY HOMES WITH OVER 2000SQFT OF LIVING SPACE** COMING SOON 'Pickford View' please register for updates and receive your invitation to the pre-launch event. Pickford View is a stunning development of two luxury detached new build properties situate...
"This magnificent five bedroom detached property is situated in one of the most sought after locations of Canley Road and is within easy reach of Coventry City Centre, Leamington Spa and Kenilworth. The position boasts easy access to Warwick University, A46, A45 and Birmingham airport. Canley rail..."
"FOR SALE VIA ONLINE AUCTION: terms and conditions apply We are pleased to offer to auction these two properties now co joined to create one spacious HMO, this prime location period investment sits within walking distance of the city centre and the train station. With eighteen bedrooms, many of..."
"AN IMMACULATE EXECUTIVE FAMILY HOME IN THE SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION OF WHITEFIELD CLOSE JUST OFF WESTWOOD HEATH ROAD, POSITIONED ON A VERY GENEROUS PLOT CLOSE TO WARWICK UNIVERSITY WITH NEARLY 2230 SQFT OF LIVING SPACE. This magnificent five bedroom detached home has been cleverly extended ..."
"Envisage are delighted to offer this superb modern executive home in the desirable Westwood heath area the property overlooks woodlands to the front. This five bedroom detached home is comprised of he property comprises of entrance hallway, lounge with feature fireplace, dining room, study/ play ..."
"A WONDERFUL OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A FANTASTIC FAMILY HOME SET IN THE HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION OF DELAWARE ROAD. This spacious three bedroom detached home is located in one of Coventry's most sought after residential roads, within walking distance to Coventry War Memorial Park, King..."
A most impressive extended four bedroom semi-detached home ideal for a family with over 2200sqft of living space situated in the desirable and exclusive location of Asthill Grove in Styvechale. Asthill Grove is ideally placed being within walking distance of Coventry train station that has direct...
"Five bedroom semi detached property situated in the exclusive location of Asthill Grove, ideally located for Coventry Train Station, War Memorial Park and the City Centre. Potential for further extensions subject to planning permission."
"Looking for a spacious family home?
Located in the popular area of Allesley Park is this stylish and spacious family home that overlooks a green space and has been extended and improved to provide plenty of space for the whole family"
"Brook Court is a stunning development of three luxury detached barn style new build properties situated in the sought after location of Pickford Green Lane, Coventry. These homes have been carefully designed to provide excellent living space for families. Pickford Green Lane is perfectly situated..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase a recently constructed barn conversion located in a stunning rural location. Being available to purchase with no onward chain, benefiting from a new build guarantee and providing approximately 1900 sq ft of living space the property needs to be viewed to be fully....."
*** COMPLETELY RENOVATED DETACHED BUNGALOW ~ FOUR BEDROOMS ~ THIRD OF AN ACRE PLOT ~ EXCELLENT PRIVATE REAR GARDEN & PATIO ***
Well Presented Extended Semi Detached Family Home | Sought After Location Overlooking Playing Fields | Close To Excellent Schools & Local Shops| Double Glazing | Gas Fired Central Heating | Hallway | Lounge With A Feature Log Burning Fireplace | Dining Room | Fitted Kitchen & Sitting Area With A ...
"We are delighted to present a rare opportunity to purchase this stunning 4 bedroom detached home , that sits in 0.3 acres of land situated in the heart of Finham. This property has an entrance which is protected by electric gates which"
"A FORMER BED AND BREAKFAST AND NOW A HMO OPPORTUNITY, TWO MINUTES WALK FROM COVENTRY TRAIN STATION AND CITY CENTRE"
"A rare opportunity to purchase a recently constructed barn conversion located in a stunning rural location. Being available to purchase with no onward chain, benefiting from a new build guarantee and providing approximately 1700 sq ft of living space the property needs to be viewed to be fully..."
"STUNNING REAR GARDEN ON A FANTASTIC PLOT AVAILABLE WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN. An outstanding, four bedroom executive detached family residence, situated in this exclusive residential location of Innis Road just off Bates Road, Earlsdon positioned on a very generous plot. The property offers ..."
"A unique opportunity to acquire an immaculately presented, detached family home located in the sought after area of Eastern Green. Accessed via secure electric gates the property boasts a mature wrap around garden and versatile accommodation. The property comprises an entrance porch, a ..."
"*Attention Investors* GLB Are Pleased To Present This Modern 10 Bedroom Full HMO Licenced Property Until 26/07/2023 All en-suite rooms. Available In The Coundon Area – Excellent Location For Coventry or Warwick University As well As Major Supermarkets, Local Restaurants and Pubs. ..."
"A completely refurbished and extended four bedroom detached dormer bungalow set in a highly desirable location on the edge of countryside yet close to local train stations, local shops and excellent road connectivity. Generous open plan living area, adaptable bedroom/living spaces, downstairs sho..."
"Detached Property. Large Garden with woodland to the rear. Ample parking to the front.. Three Bedroom Detached Bungalow in semi rural sought after location. Two Bedrooms with En-suite and a further Family Bathroom. Ground floor master bedroom with EnSuite & Dressing Room. Spacious Lounge, Fitte..."
"**HIGH SPEC DETACHED 3/4 BEDROOM HOUSE**RENOVATED THROUGHOUT**HEAVILY EXTENDED** Up Estates are pleased to bring to the market a very rare example of a lovingly renovated and extended detached home on the ever popular Rugby Road, Binley Woods. You will struggle to find another home that has been ..."
Corner Plot with Excellent Potential ~ Four Bedrooms ~ Ideal Family Home ~ Excellent Local Schools A much improved detached home located in the heart of Finham on the sought after St. Martins Road. This particular property offers huge potential for extension to the side (subject to obtai...
"A superbly positioned extended detached family residence enjoying an unrivalled position within this much sought after country lane, featuring outstanding long range countryside views. Offering generous and well-proportioned room sizes throughout, the property which has both gas heating and doubl..."
"***WALKING DISTANCE TO WARICK UNIVERSITY***NO CHAIN***EXECUTIVE DEVELOPMENT*** Located in the prestigious area of 'Gibbett Hill' is this Executive four bedroom detached family residence. Within walking distance to Warwick University and close proximity to Canon Park Shopping area, Road access t..."
"A substantial extended detached family home situated on a prominent plot with excellent potential for updating/further extension, property is situated in this highly sought after location within Finham of the South side of the City with excellent local amenities and travel links nearby. The prope..."
"FANTASTIC INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY – Grade II 12 Bedroom Freehold HMO Listed Building – Great Location For Warwick/Coventry University & The City Centre. Renovations currently in progress in excess of £100k, This 12 bedroom spacious detached property has successfully been rented as a stud..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to present this immaculate four bedroom detached property in the highly sought after location. The quality of finish is evident throughout, matched with its sense of space, immediately evident from first walking through the entrance. The property offers multiple pocke..."
"The 5 bedroom Wayford is ideal for growing families, with room to grow with three double bedrooms and two further bedrooms"
"STUNNING, EXTENDED FAMILY HOME WHICH IS PERFECTALLY SET UP IF YOU ARE SEEKING TO LIVE ALL TOGETHER IN ONE HOUSE. What a beautiful property this is! Reserve your viewing slot now to avoid disappointment. Located within the highly regarded area of Allesley this property oozes kerb..."
"Freehold development opportunity for land on the north side of Shilton Lane, Shilton Coventry. The land is situated in a picturesque green belt open countryside location.
Total approximately 6.6 acres of land comprising existing properties, mix of consented land, stables and barns Available as en..."
"This traditional three bedroom detached property is located in a highly sought after residential area, within easy access of the city centre, Coventry train station and War Memorial Park. The accommodation on offer spans two floors and comprises a spacious entrance hallway, extended loun..."
"**A spacious Semi Detached Bungalow, sold with NO CHAIN and is available right away!**"
"Dating back to 1847 this property has been a big part of the history of Coventry, the current owners bought the property over twenty years ago and have left no stone unturned undertaking an extensive restoration. Today the property perfectly blends beautiful period features with modern family liv..."
"FOUR / FIVE BEDROOMS... DETACHED... SOUGHT AFTER ROAD & AREA... TWO RECEPTION ROOMS ( STUDY, PLAYROOM OR GROUND FLOOR ADDITIONAL BEDROOM )... GARAGE & OFF ROAD PARKING... UTILITY ROOM... BEAUTIFUL THROUGHOUT! What a beautiful property that is being offered for sale. Located in the sought aft..."
"HOME OF THE MONTH - £15,250 STAMP DUTY CONTRIBUTION PLUS £5,000 DISCOUNT! Home 33, the Whixley offers flexible and generous living spaces. The home features four double bedrooms and one single, with bedroom one benefiting from an en suite and built-in wardrobe. Other features are the open plan kitch"
"Benburys are pleased to present this beautiful four bedroom detached house in the popular location of Styvechale. The property has a spacious through lounge, play room, extended kitchen, utility area and cloakroom downstairs. To the first floor there are four bedrooms, a bathroom and separate toi..."
"This beautifully detached five double bedroom family home. Amenities within the village includes a mini-supermarket, a Post office, Pharmacy, Doctors Surgery, and Garden Centre also ideal for country walks and cycling. The location is also within easy reach of the Ricoh Arena Retail Park. An in..."
"***SIX BEDROOMS**THREE BATHROOMS & WC**THREE RECEPTION ROOMS*** A rare opportunity to acquire a well- presented six bedroom semi-detached property in the a desirable location of Cheylesmore, Coventry. Situated in close proximity to a range of local amenities including various shops, schools and i..."
A FANTASTIC FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN THE POPULAR AREA OF EASTERN GREEN
"**MORRISONS ESTATE EX SHOW HOME**DETACHED DOUBLE GARAGE**LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN** Up Estates are pleased to bring to the market a high spec, spacious family home based in the ever popular Morrisons Estate. Briefly comprising; Porch, Hall, Lounge, Home Office, Kitchen/Breakfast Room, Dining Room, ..."
"Exciting opportunity to purchase this detached bungalow with planning permission to heavily increase the current footprint (please see images attached) Situated in the sought after location of Cannon Hill Road just off the Kenilworth Road, this property is ideally situated within easy re..."
"A stunning, highly individual, split level detached home lying within this exclusive cul-de-sac. Beautifully maintained and fully modernised, this unusual home really needs to be seen to be fully appreciated, has both gas heating and double glazing, features a carport and single garage alongside ..."
"This most impressive, cleverly extended four bedroom, two bathroom detached home ideal for a family with nearly 2260sqft of living space, situated in the desirable and exclusive location of Fletchamstead Highway in Styvechale. Fletchamstead Highway is ideally placed being within a close distance ..."
"Foxbridge Gate is a stunning development of four luxury detached homes situated in the sought after rural location in Keresley, designed to provide ideal living space for a family. Foxbridge Gate is perfectly situated with great links to Coventry City Centre, Birmingham, Birmingham Airport and l..."
"Home 56, the Marlborough is ideally suited to modern family living, featuring ample flexible spaces. The elegant hallway provides access to the central living areas: an open plan kitchen and dining area with utility room and a spacious, light filled living room. Upstairs are four double bedrooms, wi"
"A Much Improved and Extended Five bedroom Semi-Detached home situated in a popular location to the west side of Coventry. Briefly comprising: spacious hall, lounge, cloakroom, refitted kitchen, spacious utility room, conservatory, garage, spacious landing, family bathroom, five bedrooms with the ..."
"A well-presented property located in the sought after area of Millisons Wood, close to local shops and amenities. Briefly comprising of lounge, open plan kitchen/ diner, study, four bedrooms; master with en suite, family bathroom, integral garage and good sized rear garden."
A FANTASTIC INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. 7 BEDROOMED FULLY LICENSIED HMO SITUATED IN THE CITY CENTRE
"NO UPWARD CHAIN - A MUST SEE PROPERTY!!! A fantastic opportunity to purchase a traditional 1950-1960's four bedroom extended detached home, situated in the sought after location of Cannon Hill Road just off the Kenilworth Road. Offered with no upward chain, this property is ideally situ..."
Substantial Corner Plot ~ Four Bedrooms ~ Huge Potential ~ Ideal Location ~ Excellent Schools Nearby A spacious family home located on a generous sized corner plot in this extremely sought after and well regarded residential location. There is tremendous potential to extended subject to...
"**TAKE THE 3D VIRTUAL TOUR**NO CHAIN**FIVE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**SEVEN BATHROOMS**DOUBLE GARAGE & MULTI-CAR DRIVEWAY**SAUNA HOUSE, HOT TUB & OFFICE** This is an incredible opportunity to purchase a deceptively spacious home in great condition on the sought after Binley Road. Very briefly this property..."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire this substantial 7-bedroom mid terraced property, in a prime City Centre location and being just only minutes away from Coventry University! The property benefitted from being a fully licensed HMO (Not Transferable) The property ground floor in brief co..."
"A LOVELY EXTENDED SIX BEDROOM END OF TERRACE FAMILY HOME SHARED OVER THREE FLOORS AND SET ON A GENEROUS PLOT, WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO FINHAM PARK SCHOOL. This beautiful family home is positioned in the sought after location of Green Lane, Finham which is close to local schools, shops,..."
"A SUPERIOR SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH AN HEAVILY EXTENDED GROUND FLOOR AND A DELIGHTFUL LARGE LANDSCAPED GARDEN. Maidavale Crescent is firmly established as one of the most favoured locations in the city. It is close to the train station, War Memorial Park and within the Finham Park..."
"Impressive! That's the only way to describe this lovely home and location. The home itself exudes classic character and charm but inside its the perfect marriage between contemporary modern styling with a sympathetic nod to the period of the property. A hot tub and sauna await the lucky viewers, ..."
"This extended, semi-detached property makes for the perfect family home and is situated in one of Coventry's most sought after residential areas. The accommodation is generous and comprises a porch, an entrance hallway, a lounge with a bay window, a second reception with patio doors lead..."
"A spacious four bedroom, semi detached family home with double glazing and gas central heating. Comprising of an entrance hall, spacious lounge with feature brick fire place and laminate flooring, fitted kitchen including an integrated electric oven and gas hob and a range of wall and base units ..."
Looking for your perfect family home? This could be perfect for you. Located in the highly sought after area of Beechwood Gardens is this extended and improved home with plenty of space over two floors and a large rear garden
"*** FLOORING INCLUDED*** AVAILABLE SPRING 2023 - A super four bedroom detached with a single garage centred around a community orchard, our idyllic new development, Pippinfields, in Pickford Green provides a countryside escape, just five miles from Coventry. Pippinfields will feature a s..."
"The Lavenham is an impressive 5 bedroom home with double garage, and come complete with integrated kitchen!"
HUGE POTENTIAL POSITIONED ON A GENEROUS PLOT WITH LOTS OF AVENUES TO INCREASE THE CURRENT FOOTPRINT (STPC) This lovely four bedroom detached family home is located on one of Finham’s prime roads of Jacklin Drive. The property is in need of some slight updating and modernisation and is wi...
"Steeples Green is an exciting new development of 2,3,4 and 5 bedroom homes in Eastern Green offering a mix of housing to suit all lifestyles. These beautiful homes are built to Lagan Homes exceling standards, combining exemplary design with meticulous attention to detail creating exceptional home..."
"This superb four bedroom semi detached family home offers the ideal opportunity for a family to locate into Coventry's premium location, Styvechale and must be viewed internally to appreciate the accommodation on offer."
"Steeples Green is an exciting new development of 2,3,4 and 5 bedroom homes in Eastern Green offering a mix of housing to suit all lifestyles. These beautiful homes are built to Lagan Homes excelling standards, combining exemplary design with meticulous attention to detail creating exceptional hom..."
"The Lavenham boasts a wealth of space, perfect for growing families. Let us help you move with our mortgage contribution scheme.*"
"A superb opportunity to create your idyllic family home.
Set within a substantial plot, with South facing garden that backs onto Hearsall Golf course, this home requires modernisation and offers a wealth of potential"
This extended four bedroomed character house offers fabulous accommodation arranged over two floors and comes with many original features and quality fittings throughout. The handsome property certainly has kerb appeal being set back from the road behind a brick block driveway with ample parking ...
"NEW RELEASE The Philosopher has four bedrooms - one of which benefits from an en suite shower room - an open-plan kitchen, dining and family area, a separate living room and a study. Contact our friendly team today to learn more about this new home and start your move today..."
STUNNING RENOVATED CHARACTER COTTAGE ORIGINALLY BUILT IN 1858. This charming cottage had been beautifully modernised throughout though still retaining its original character and features. Two/three bedroom mid terraced cottage positioned just outside the popular town of Kenilworth in Burton Gr...
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a traditional four bedroom semi-detached home situated in the sought after location of Cannon Hill Road just off the Kenilworth Road, this property is ideally situated within easy reach of Warwick University, Coventry City Centre, Coventry Railway Station, good..."
"A much loved family home and having been extended and improved over many years, this delightful, four bedroom, semi detached home overlooks the Earlsdon allotments behind Rochester Road and Beechwood Avenue."
"Viewing is essential to fully appreciate this immaculately presented and beautifully refurbished double bayed semi-detached home. In a highly sought-after location convenient for Earlsdon High Street, War Memorial Park, Coventry Train Station and the city centre. There in an entrance hall, with..."
"A fantastic four bedroom family home in a very popular location in Finham. Convenient for the A45 and A46, this property is perfectly located for easy access to the wider road network."
"The owners of this property specifically chose this particular plot off plan due to its secluded location and unoverlooked, private garden. A large driveway to the front allows parking for a number of vehicles."
"Built in 1896 and sitting within an exceptional and mature plot, this fine Victorian semi detached home offers space and versatility in abundance. With four double bedrooms all complimented by an en-suite shower room and a family bathroom, the property also benefits from three generous recepti..."
"NOW UNDER OFFER --- NOW UNDER OFFER. - FANTASTIC INVESTMENT - Beat article 4 coming next year to Canley - 9 bedrooms , 9 bathrooms"
"AVAILABLE January 2023- A super four bedroom detached with a single garage centred around a community orchard, our idyllic new development, Pippinfields, in Pickford Green provides a countryside escape, just five miles from Coventry. Pippinfields will feature a selection of luxurious two..."
"Home 34, the Romsey is an attractive family home. The downstairs benefits from a substantial, bright and airy living room. A versatile open plan kitchen and dining area provides ample space for relaxation and is ideally suited to family life. Upstairs are four bedrooms."
"A substantial semi detached family home, beautifully presented throughout, offering plenty of space for the whole family and ideally positioned for Memorial Park and Finham School"
"A BEAUTIFUL 1491SQFT EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH A DELIGHTFUL LARGE LANDSCAPED GARDEN. The Chesils is firmly established as one of the most favoured locations in the city. It is close to the train station, War Memorial Park and within easy reach to St Thomas More catholic pri..."
"Home 39, the Romsey is an attractive family home. The downstairs benefits from a substantial, bright and airy living room. A versatile open plan kitchen and dining area provides ample space for relaxation and is ideally suited to family life. Upstairs are four bedrooms."
"BRAND NEW TO THE MARKERT, A spacious semi detached family home in popular location. The property has been fully upgraded and renovated throughout, it comes with uPVC double glazing and gas-fired central heating On entering the property is a spacious hallway that allows access to the fr..."
Reeds Rains are delighted to present to the market this fantastic three bedroom family home which has been finished to an incredible standard located in the gorgeous village Burton Green.
"Immaculately presented 3 bedroom DETACHED home, nestled in a quiet cul de sac on the edge of this ever popular CALA homes estate. Located between Kenilworth & Balsall Common in the village of BURTON GREEN. 8 YEARS REMAINING ON NHBC WARRANTY"
"A beautifully presented and traditional single bayed semi detached property situated in this highly sought after location with good access to the War Memorial Park, Hearsall Golf Club and Beechwood Lawn Tennis Club. The property benefits from gas fired central heating, double glazing and the acco..."
"Cedar Gardens is a superb development of eight individually designed five bedroom detached family homes built to a high specification over three floors situated to the west of the City. Conveniently located close to local amenities, popular primary and secondary schools and close to the A45 linki..."
Stunning new build detached property located in the highly desirable village of Baginton - three bedrooms - three bathrooms - stunning open plan kitchen / diner - beautiful lounge with feature media wall - flexible accommodation arranged over two floors - utility & cloakroom - driveway for up to ...
"A five bedroom detached family home set in a quiet and tucked away cul-de-sac. Convenient to Tile Hill train station, Warwick University and excellent local commuter links. Offering a spacious hallway, living room, separate dining room and further sitting room with generous kitchen/breakfast, uti..."
"Four Bedroom Detached On A Super Plot - One Of Coventry's Prime Residential Roads - Great School Catchments - Great Links To Coventry, Kenilworth and Leamington - Must Be Viewed To Be Appreciated. A superb opportunity to purchase this four-bedroom detached family home set on a fabulous..."
Cedar Gardens is situated in a much sought after location giving easy access to the A45 leading to the Midland Motorway Network. A range of amenities are also close by along with popular primary and second schools. The development of just eight high quality homes is situated in a quiet cul-de-sac...
"Viewing is essential to fully appreciate this deceptively spacious and substantially extended double fronted semi-detached home with off-street parking for 2 cars, in a highly sought after location close to good schools, key road networks and local amenities. The property has been well maintained..."
"OFFERED FOR SALE AT A REDUCED STARTING PRICE OF £470,000 TO FACILITATE A SECURE AND SPEEDY SALE. This is a great opportunity to purchase this four bedroomed detached home in this popular location of Exhall. The property offers huge potential and has plans drawn up ready to extend (Granted 4..."
"Semi detached property situated just off Foleshill Road, close to local amenities and bus links, incorporating a spacious well proportioned family accommodation."
A substantially extended semi detached family home offering six bedrooms and three bathroom accommodation over three floors and situated in this highly popular location within Styvechale. The property is well placed within easy access of excellent range of amenities as well as being close to the ...
"AVAILABLE SPRING 2023 - A super four bedroom detached with a single garage centred around a community orchard, our idyllic new development, Pippinfields, in Pickford Green provides a countryside escape, just five miles from Coventry. Pippinfields will feature a selection of luxurious two..."
"AVAILABLE FEBRUARY 2023 - A super four bedroom detached with a single garage centred around a community orchard, our idyllic new development, Pippinfields, in Pickford Green provides a countryside escape, just five miles from Coventry. Pippinfields will feature a selection of luxurious t..."
"** DRASTICALLY REDUCED BY £15,000 ** CALL TODAY TO VIEW **  A superb opportunity to purchase this spacious four-bedroom semi-detached family home on a great plot, located in the highly sought after area of Stivichall. The property is short walk from the War Memorial Park, local..."
"EXTENDED STUDENT PROPERTY SET OVER THREE FLOORS WITHIN EASY ACCESS TO COVENTRY UNIVERSITY, WARWICK UNIVERSITY AND COVENTRY CITY CENTRE, SET IN THE HEART OF EARLSDON. We have been advised that there are currently tenants in-situ and a new six person tenancy in place for the next academic ..."
"HR Estate agents are proud to offer this Fully Extended side, rear, loft four/five Bedroom Semi-Detached House, with three reception rooms, Off road parking"
"This lovely mid terraced house is very desirable with the ground floor offering an entrance hallway with doors leading off to a lounge, separate dining room, a modern fitted kitchen with space for appliances and a downstairs W/C with a very useful utility area. On the first floor you will find..."
"A much loved home for generations, this impressive and substantial semi detached home sits within a tremendous West facing plot within a very popular catchment area to the South of Coventry itself."
"A superbly spacious four bedroom semi-detached house situated on one of Coventry's most sought after roads. Within easy reach of Coventry City Centre, Leamington and Kenilworth. This home is situated in great school catchments making this a wonderful prospect for a family. The property also be..."
"A five bedroom semi detached property situated just off Foleshill Road, close to local amenities and bus links, incorporating a spacious well proportioned family accommodation."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 18 MONTHS^*** The Luthier features an OPEN PLAN kitchen, dining and family area with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden for socialising, UTILITY ROOM, dedicated STUDY for home working and separate living room overlooking front of the home."
"A three bedroomed detached home situated in the popular village location of Binley Woods. Briefly comprising Hall, extended lounge, extended kitchen, Study, three bedrooms, bathroom. Gardens to the front & rear and direct access drive leading to the garage."
"A SUPERIOR 1541SQFT EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH A DELIGHTFUL LARGE LANDSCAPED GARDEN. A fantastic opportunity to purchase an extended five-bedroom semi detached family home set in the highly desirable area of Kenpas Highway, Finham. Within easy reach of Finham Park school and..."
"***NO CHAIN***EXTENDED***FINHAM SCHOOL CATCHMENT*** An extended four bedroom family home in a convenient location off Green Lane, Finham is this spacious property. This home has been in the same family for a very long time and now its time for a new family to enjoy and love it, like they did. ..."
"A unique and stylish detached home that has been much improved. Boasting 4 double bedrooms and a 42' Cinema Room! In the popular area of Eastern Green, close to local shops, woodland walks, great school catchments and a short drive to shopping parks"
"A rare modern-build, detached Cannon Park Home occupying a quiet cul-de-sac plot."
"****NO UPWARD CHAIN***** Six Bedroom detached property in Longford, close links to M6 / A444 / CBS Arena & Shopping Park, 2 reception rooms, modern kitchen, summer room, two bathrooms, cloakroom, garage, driveway to front, garden to rear "
"The spacious four bedroom Manford is ideal for growing families, with flexible living space throughout"
"This fantastic two/three detached dormer bungalow with plenty of potential located in the suburb of Cannon Park, within walking distance to Warwick University, local shops and amenities at Cannon Park Shopping Centre. Ideally located close to commuter links for the local motorway creating great a..."
"A beautifully presented four double bedroomed property, situated in the popular location of Eastern Green, with access to local shops, schools and amenities. Having luxury living dining/kitchen, utility, four double bedrooms and three bathrooms, NO CHAIN"
"*** FANTASTIC FAMILY HOME, 4/5 BEDROOMS ***"
"A LARGE FAMILY HOME LOCATED IN STYVECHALE, The property has been extended and benefits from having"
"SPACIOUS EXTENDED FAMILY HOME SET ON A LOVELY PLOT CLOSE TO PARKHILL PRIMARY SCHOOL, BIRMINGHAM AIRPORT AND ALL MOTORWAY NETWORK LINKS. This four bedroom detached property is conveniently positioned to all local amenities including a short walk to a park, bus routes and local convenience..."
"BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED, three/four bedroom, detached property with GATED DRIVEWAY, GARAGE AND SOUTH FACING LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN situated in the heart of the popular village of Binley Woods. Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Entrance hallway, modern fitted kitchen/diner, family lounge, cons..."
"A delightful three bedroom detached family home has plenty of potential, which is a sat on a fantastic plot and is situated in the highly desirable area of Allesley. The property is within walking distance Allesley Park golf course, local schools, amenities and the motorway network. This..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a traditional three bedroom semi-detached home situated in the sought after location of Cannon Hill Road just off the Kenilworth Road , this property is ideally situated within easy reach of Warwick University, Coventry City Centre, Coventry Railway Station, go..."
"Situated on the outskirts of the city is this deceptively spacious, detached three bedroom bungalow. The property offers great opportunity for further development and is located conveniently for access to Coventry City Centre, Rugby, Leamington and easy access to the A45 which is perfect for comm..."
"A STUNNING TURNKEY READY TOWNHOUSE built in 2019 by CALA HOMES in a superb location of BURTON GREEN is available with NHBC warranty and offered with High Specification including BOSCH appliances, LANDSCAPED gardens, vaulted dining room ceiling with skylights and NO UPWARD CHAIN."
"This cottage has many original features including exposed timbers and has been beautifully improved over recent years. The accommodation offers hall, two lounges, both with inglenooks, dining room open to the kitchen, utility room, landing, four bedrooms laid out over two floors with en suite to..."
"A superbly presented and renovated two bedroom double bayed end of terraced home which has central heating and double glazing throughout. From the entrance hall are stairs to the first and door leading through to the reception room which has a feature fire place and bay window, the stylish recen..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a traditional three bedroom semi-detached family home WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN, situated in the sought after location of Cannon Hill Road just off the Kenilworth Road. This property is ideally situated within easy reach of Warwick University, Coventry City Centre, ..."
"Home 40, the Seaton benefits from an open plan kitchen and dining room which provides direct access to the SOUTH FACING GARDEN, a separate living room and two parking spaces. The house also features THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS. Move in Summer 2023!"
"The Manford is a traditional 4 bedroom home, perfect for families. Let us help you move with our offers available.*"
"One of the appealing factors of Home 93, the Seaton is its open plan kitchen and dining room which provides direct access to the garden - and consequently views and natural light. Another is the generous bedroom one, which benefits from an en suite and built-in wardrobe."
"This delightful detached home has been extended and tastefully modernised and now boasts some desirable family features including a garden annex, a playroom, a study, downstairs WC and an impressive bathroom. The property benefits from an A rating in its EPC and is equipped with double..."
"Simply unique, this much loved and much improved property has seen a dramatic extension create an exemplary and incredibly versatile family home. The side and first floor extension has seen the property almost double in size with co-joined accommodation ideal for multi generational living. With f..."
"Situated just a short walk from the beautiful Allesley Park, this beautifully presented and extended detached bungalow enjoys a larger than average plot within this popular residential location. The gas centrally heated and double glazed accommodation comprises; porch, entrance hallway with dinin..."
"LARGE DETACHED BUNGALOW ~ 3 BEDROOMS & 2 BATHROOMS ~ PARKING & TANDEM GARAGE Situated in the delightful area of Allesley Park in West Coventry, this well appointed traditional bungalow occupies an impressive footprint and lies in a quiet cul de sac close to Allesley Park itself. "
"HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER PROPERTY WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO COVENTRY RAILWAY STATION, COVENTRY CITY CENTRE AND WAR MEMORIAL PARK. This beautifully presented and much improved spacious three bedroom semi-detached family home is conveniently positioned for all city living, within a stones thr..."
"An attractive city centre investment opportunity currently operating at around £40,000 p.a income."
"A superbly spacious four bedroom semi-detached house situated on one of Coventry's most sought after roads. Exminster road is positioned on a large corner plot giving you the potential to add value and extend (subject to planning permission). The property is situated in a quiet road, wi..."
* * * NO CHAIN - 20TH CENTURY EDWARDIAN HOUSE * * * Ideal for investment or a family home * * * Being offered to market a rare opportunity to purchase this beautiful characteristic semi detached property located in the ideal location of Brays Lane built in 1914. This extended property ...
"**BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED, HEAVILY EXTENDED FAMILY HOME**QUIET CUL DE SAC OFF BINLEY ROAD**GARAGE & MULTI-CAR DRIVEWAY**FOUR BEDROOMS & TWO SIZEABLE BATHROOMS** This is an exceptionally rare opportunity to purchase a spacious four bedroom semi-detached family home tucked away off of Binley Road, su..."
"A fully refurbished, semi detached family home situated on a corner plot, boasting a separate one bedroom annex and no onward chain. Worcester Close is situated in the ever popular Allesley. A stones throw from Allesley Primary School, great access to the A45 and neighbouring Birmingham...."
"Highly desirable and much sought after located within Earlsdon, only a moments stroll to the top of the High Street and short walk from the War Memorial Park - hugely attractive four bedroom 1930's semi detached family home - off-road parking and large tandem garage - accommodation arranged over ..."
"Set on quarter acre plot (approximately) in a rural location, but only approx. 1.5 miles from City Centre. The bungalow is in an enviable position at the end of a cul-de-sac."
A superb three bedroom detached family home sitting on a quiet corner plot. With open plan family kitchen and a home office that could be used as a fourth bedroom. Situated on the West side of the city with the train station at Tile Hill and The University of Warwick a short distance away. Local...
"PRIME LOCATION ~ 3 DOUBLE BEDROOMS ~ GARAGE ~ DETACHED - NO CHAIN Situated in the highly sought after area of Stivichall Grange in south Coventry, this very desirable property provides spacious family accommodation including 3 double Bedrooms, 3 reception rooms, as well as driveway and g..."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a four bedroom, detached family home located in one of Coventry's most desirable areas. The location offers good local schools, shops and amenities, is just a short drive from the city centre and if offered with no onward chain. The accommodation compr..."
"*** SUPERB FOUR BEDROOM EXTENDED HOME IN SOUGHT AFTER ALLESLEY LOCATION *** With living room, open plan kitchen dining area, WC, Utility, family bathroom, three first floor bedrooms, second floor fourth bedroom with en suite. Large rear garden/patio, driveway to front. Must be viewed to appreciate."
"An attractive detached dormer bungalow offered for sale in good decorative order throughout in a sought after location, briefly comprising: Entrance porch, reception hallway, lounge with feature fireplace, 28ft dining kitchen with doors leading to the lovely garden."
"With four bedrooms and an en suite main bedroom, the Rossdale is perfect for growing families. Let us help you move with our 5% deposit match scheme.*"
"A superb family home, offering space and style throughout, along with a generous and private rear garden. All located within easy reach of local amenities and Tile Hill Station"
Situated in this sought after tree lined residential road to the south of Coventry this most imposing double circular bayed three bedroomed semi detached family home enjoys a hobbies/loft room.  The property is deceptively spacious with a well planned design which must be viewed internall...
"THE CARLOW IS AVAILABLE AS A DETACHED AND SEMI-DETACHED HOME RESERVE A HOME WITH LAGAN HOMES AND RECEIVE A CONTRIBUTION TOWADS YOUR ENERGY BILLS AND A STANDARD FLOORING PACKAGE UPTO £12,000 OR £1,000 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE A MONTH FOR 12 MONTHS* Steeples Green is an ..."
"Situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac setting to the Eastern outskirts of the city, this immaculately presented five bedroom detached house represents ideal family accommodation and must be viewed internally to be fully appreciated. Only a few minutes drive from University Hospital as well as the M6,..."
"**OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** A beautifully presented four-bedroom detached family home, located on a generous plot and in the highly sought-after area of Eastern Green. This property is ready to move into with the accommodation comprising of an entrance hallway with access t..."
"A superb opportunity to purchase this spacious three bedroom semi detached home on a great plot with great potential situated in the very popular area of Styvechale, within easy reach of St Thomas More primary school and local amenities on Dawlish Drive. Briefly, the accommodation compri..."
Reeds Rains Coventry are pleased to offer with NO UPWARD CHAIN and immediate possession this superb investment opportunity in the City Centre within a minute walk of the Station and within ten minutes walk to the University. This could also be a traditional family purchase and offers many origin...
This exclusive development is situated just off Middleborough Road in Coventry. **Show Home Launch Saturday 18th March- call NOW to secure your appointment!** *Other House Types Available*
A beautifully presented detached home with gated driveway parking. The property also has an attractive wood burning stove which not only provides an attractive centre piece to the room but a practical solution to the every increasing home energy prices.
Very sought after location just off the Baginton Road in the heart of Stivichall - a stones' throw from St Thomas More Primary School - walking distance to War Memorial Park - fantastic size rear garden with gated side access - extended three bedroom semi detached family home - off-road parking w...
Evans Estates are Proud to Present this Four Bedroom Edwardian Town House Situated in the Tree Lined Avenues. The property with it's many period features must be viewed to be fully appreciated. The property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified). The accommodati...
"A LOVELY 1331.5SQFT EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH A DELIGHTFUL LARGE LANDSCAPED GARDEN. Arnold Avenue is firmly established as one of the most favoured locations in the city. It is close to the train station, War Memorial Park and within easy reach to Finham Park School The hous..."
"An extended four bedroom home. Comprising of; Kitchen, dining room, utility. Gas centrally heated and uPVC double glazing. Four bedrooms and bathroom to first floor. with master bedroom having en-suite. Gardens to front, side and rear. Direct access drive with ample parking and garage."
The Trusdale offers spacious living ideal for families. Let us help you move with our mortgage contribution scheme.*
"AVAILABLE SPRING 2023 - A super three bedroom detached centred around a community orchard, our idyllic new development, Pippinfields, in Pickford Green provides a countryside escape, just five miles from Coventry. Pippinfields will feature a selection of luxurious two, three and four bed..."
"*** INCENTIVES AVAILABLE*** READY FOR SPRING 2023 - A super three bedroom detached centred around a community orchard, our idyllic new development, Pippinfields, in Pickford Green provides a countryside escape, just five miles from Coventry. Pippinfields will feature a selection of luxur..."
"***SAVE UP TO £18,100 on this home!!!***This home comes with over £11,500 worth of upgrades, including flooring!Plus, you can save another £6,600 with our 'BIG 3' offer on Home 86!Owning your dream home could become a reality when you pick one of 'The Big 3' offers! Simply reser..."
"The Scrivener is an attractive family home that boasts an OPEN PLAN kitchen, dining and family area with FRENCH DOORS into rear garden, complete with an adjoining UTILITY ROOM, a front-facing living room, TWO DOUBLE bedrooms with EN SUITE to the master and modern family bathroom. GARAGE and DRIVE"
"Purplebricks are pleased to bring to market this well-presented Detached Bungalow situated in the sought after residential area of Binley. On entering the property through the porch, you step into a bright hallway leading to a spacious lounge area and then out to the large conservatory. Also..."
"Reeds Rains Coventry are pleased to offer to the market this IMMACULATELY PRESENTED DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS RECENTLY REFURBISHED MODERNISED THREE BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW. Located in this very sought after road in Binley Woods benefits include a Gas Central Heating System with a New Boiler, D..."
"Beautifully Presented Detached Family Home Situated Within A Sought After Setting Of Eastern Green. Tastefully Decorated & Highly Maintained Throughout. Accommodation Comprising Porch, Open Plan Kitchen/Dining, Large Living Room, Four Bedrooms, Two Bathrooms/W.C, Store, ORP & Delightful Rear Garden."
"**Incredible Social Living Kitchen Diner - Extended Detached - High Spec Throughout** Excellent opportunity to acquire a detached property with a host of impressive features throughout including bespoke designed lounge with media wall, downstairs utility & wc and refitted bathroom and ensu..."
"This lovely four bedroom detached family home is located on one of Finham’s prime roads of Mylgrove. The property is within walking distance of local shops, amenities and is located within the Finham Park School catchment area which is rated outstanding by Ofsted. The ground floor offers..."
"FOR SALE BY INFORMAL TENDER Site Area- 0.18 acres (0.073 hectares) Allesley Garage, 244 Birmingham Road, Coventry CV5 9HD Freehold development site with full planning permission for the redevelopment of existing garage site to provide two residential dwellings both detached."
HR Estate Agents are pleased to present the sale of this stunning extended 5 bed property on London Road
LAUNCH EVENT SATURDAY 11TH FEBRUARY FROM 11AM A handsome detached residence occupying a corner position and offering flexible accommodation. The home has been thoughtfully renovated and enhanced to include a one bedroom self contained annexe. Located close to great schools and amenities.
"***OPEN HOUSE SATURDAY 4TH FEBRUARY***
Are you looking to create your perfect family home? This detached family home is nestled down a private road within this sought after Allesley Green location. Offered to the market with NO ONWARD chain and require modernisation throughout"
"The Lawrence is one of our larger 3 bedroom homes for sale with FLOORING THROUGHOUT & 3 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, a spacious open plan kitchen and large rear garden"
"A very rare opportunity to acquire a three storey end of terraced property situated within the heart of Earlsdon and offering flexible accommodation. The centrally heated and double glazed accommodation briefly comprises; entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen, rear lobby and cloakroom. On the first f..."
"**TAKE THE 3D VIRTUAL TOUR**Spacious Four Double Bedroom, Three Reception Room Detached Home** UP Estates are privileged to offer this immaculately presented & deceptively spacious detached family home with detached garage & driveway. Benefitting from a private south facing garden, separate offic..."
***POTENTIAL OF FIVE STUDIO ROOMS***
A lovely semi detached victorian style family home set on the edge of this most attractive village. Enjoying good sized private gardens with own private side driveway with plenty of parking. Old brick pig sty at the bottom of the garden suitable for renovation.
"This spacious five-bedroom family home is situated in the sought-after area of Corbet Road, Daimler Green and is located within walking distance to Coventry City Centre and close to local amenities and the motorway network. this well-proportioned and improved property substantial accommodation th..."
A rare opportunity to acquire a three double bedroom semi-detached family home in one of Coventry’s most sought after streets within the popular and desirable suburb of Earlsdon
Potential care / foster home or large extended family house or potential development STPP - offers over please £400K
FOR SALE BY AUCTION: Terms and conditions apply. We are please to offer to auction this three storey property which briefly comprises of a ground floor retail unit / garage with a three bedroom accommodation across the first and second floor. This property is well located within easy rea...
The Trusdale offers spacious living ideal for families. Let us help you move with our energy bills contribution scheme.*
"Tailor Made Sales & Lettings are proud to bring to market this stunning family home in a premier Allesley Village location, set on a fantastic plot with stunning private rear garden. The Property is nestled in a corner of Milford Close, which is located just off of Birmingham Road in All..."
"This three bedroom semi detached property is situated in the popular residential area of Allesley and comes with a 150 foot garden and superb countryside views to the rear. The house is being sold with no onward chain. The property comprises hallway, front reception room and through loun..."
"A well presented double bayed semi detached family home in highly sought after residential location within close proximity to good local schools and amenities. The property also benefits from central heating and double glazing. Briefly comprising; hallway, through lounge/dining room with feature ..."
"A great opportunity to purchase this three bedroom semi-detached family home located in the highly sought after area of Finham. The property is within walking distance of many local shops, amenities and is located within the Finham Park School catchment area, rated outstanding by Ofsted. The prop..."
"Agreed are delighted to offer for sale this substantial four bedroom end of terrace house situated in the well sought after city of Coventry. The property is within walking distance of local schools and amenities. Offering four reception rooms and one bathroom, the property benefits from having g..."
"Stunning four bedroom detached family home on the entrance to the Swallows Nest development, off Browns Lane, Allesley - beautiful show home decoration throughout - home office - kitchen / diner - utility - lounge - guest cloakroom - absolutely immaculate rear garden - driveway & garage - en-suit..."
A rare opportunity to purchase this unique detached family home located in the desirable area of Eastern Green. The house was constructed in 1975 and has been owned from new by the current owners. the property offers plenty of space and potential and enjoys views over open fields to the rear
"Shortland Horne are delighted to offer for sale this superior detached, corner plot home that has been tastefully decorated and has a wonderful living space with a bright, stylish and contemporary feel. The accommodation comprises of an entrance hallway with doors leading off to a ground..."
**LUXURY INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY** Great Opportunity To Purchase This Stunning Large Luxury 5 Bedroom with 5 x En-suites and a full licensed HMO Property Located Within Walking Distance To Coventry University & The City Centre. The property has been designed to create the perfe...
"Marjorie Way is a large and lovely four bedroom home which ticks all the boxes for the growing family. Having an en-suite master bedroom to escape to, a spacious garden and a wealth of living accommodation, what more could you possibly need? Better still this fantastic home is set in a desirable ..."
"A well presented and deceptively spacious traditional semi detached family home situated at the top end of Dillotford Avenue close to the junction with Daventry Road. The property is well placed for excellent amenities with nearby shops, Manor Park Primary School and within easy reach of the War ..."
A stunning detached family home arranged over three floors built in 2000 and located in the highly sought after area of Eastern Green - large driveway providing ample off-road parking - en-suite to large master bedroom - 3 spacious double bedrooms - utility and downstairs WC - modern kitchen - ex...
"Situated with fine rural views to the rear, this delightful extended semi detached home offers three double bedrooms as well as a ground floor extension creating a kitchen dining room to the rear. With a block paved and gated driveway, landscaped rear gardens and a welcoming and bright entrance h..."
"Modern Detached House ~ Three Bedrooms ~ Poplar Location ~ No Chain ~ Excellent Decorative Condition This detached family home he's offered for sale in this popular development, built approximately 25 years ago by Bryant Homes. This particular property occupies a very desirable position ..."
Well presented three bedroom mid terraced property located in Lower Coundon - double garage to the rear with power and lighting - extended galley kitchen - modern bathroom - low maintenance astro turf rear garden - good school catchment area - two separate reception rooms - close to amenities.
A rare opportunity to purchase a substantial family home located on this ever popular road in Styvechale. The property would benefit from modernisation and offers the future owner a perfect opportunity to create their ideal family home
An executive detached family dwelling situated within a sought after cul-de-sac development of Longford. Tastefully decorated and highly maintained throughout yet served with an abundance of local amenities including close proximity to the Coventry Building Society Arena (Ricoh) & M6 motorway lin...
The Monkford is a four bedroom detached home ideal for families moving up the property ladder
"Set back off Terry Road, nestled amongst a small row of homes along a private pathway, this substanital property boasts almost 1300 sq. ft. of living space, is well decorated and is a perfect investment opportunity. The property is a stones throw from the Coventry University Campus making this a ..."
A rare opportunity to purchase this spacious family home located in this highly sought after Crescent. Located in Finham catchment and offered to the market with no onward chain
"Viewing is essential to fully appreciate this immaculately presented link semi detached family home in the highly sought after location of Styvechale, being convenient for good schools and key road networks including the A45 and A46. There is a large entrance hall, large modern open plan kitchen..."
"AN O'FLANAGAN HOME BACK ON TO THE MARKET, SPACIOUS END OF TERRACE TOWN HOUSE CLOSE TO THE CITY CENTRE, SHOPS AND BUS ROUTES. This beautiful property is conveniently positioned to Bablake School, Coventry train station and the motorway network. The ground floor offers an entrance hall..."
"Envisage are delighted to offer this well presented and versatile five bedroom, detached dormer bungalow in a very popular area. The ground floor is comprised of the entrance hallway 3 good sized bedrooms, a lounge, a main fitted kitchen there is also a secondary kitchen / utility area, a wet roo..."
"An extended, semi-detached family home boasting over 2,500 sq ft of accommodation spanning three floors. The property is located in the popular area of Radford and is offered with no onward chain. The property comprises an entrance porch, entrance hallway with stairs rising to the first ..."
"The Sawyer has THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS with EN SUITE to the master bedroom and modern family bathroom serves the others. A spacious OPEN PLAN kitchen, dining and family area ideal for entertaining with FRENCH DOORS to the garden. Separate living room and INTEGRAL GARAGE complete this family home."
A rare opportunity to purchase this outstanding investment property located within easy reach of the city centre. With SIX en-suite rooms and NO ONWARD CHAIN. Sold with vacant possession
"**Take a look inside this impressive, detached property which is presented to a high standard throughout.** The property boasts four double bedrooms, two reception rooms and a large kitchen which offers generous living accommodation throughout. Located in this popular and sought after location th..."
A post war three bed semi detached family home situated in this popular and convenient location within Styvechale. The property is well placed for local amenities with nearby shops and access to nearby St Thomas Moore Catholic Primary School and Roman Catholic Church. The property is offered for ...
"The Monkford offers spacious living, ideal for growing families. Let us help you move with our energy bills contribution scheme.*"
Driveway & Garage | South Facing Garden | 3 Generous Bedrooms | Large Garden | Popular Location of Binley Woods | Downstairs W.C  | Brick Built Store | Large Living Area | Applied Planning Permission | EPC Rating D
*** CORNER PLOT*** NO CHAIN*** Bairstow Eves are pleased to present a semi-detached bungalow situated on the popular Styvechale Grange estate wih huge potential to extend. The property is conveniently located for a range of local amenities as well as being within easy access of the City Cen...
"A beautifully presented link detached family home, situated on an ample sized plot within a sought after setting of Allesley Park. Tastefully decorated and highly maintained throughout. This is one property not to be missed! Book your appointment online now!"
"**Sought After Daventry Road**Traditional Bay Fronted, Halls Together Semi-Detached Home**Driveway & Lengthy Garage**Stunning Private Garden** This is a fantastic opportunity to purchase a well presented three bedroom semi-detached home on the sought after Daventry Road close to a wide range of a..."
"Having no onward chain... A good sized three-bedroom semi-detached home situated in a popular location to the South side of the city. Comprising: Hall, Extended Lounge, spacious Kitchen, cloaks, Three good sized bedrooms, family bathroom, separate WC, Garage and good-sized rear gardens. UPVC doub..."
**NO CHAIN **DETACHED **FOUR BEDROOMS **OPEN PLAN LIVING **HIGH SPECIFICATION **PRIVATE ROAD** Benburys are excited to bring to market this delightful three/four bedroom detached bungalow. Nestled at the end of a private road which is situated in the popular area of Stoke. The property in brief c...
"A considerably extended, double bayed semi-detached home occupying a superior edge of the city location, close to glorious open countryside. This very sizeable home offers huge potential and would benefit from some redecoration and updating in parts, however the property does feature the opportun..."
"AN IMMACULATE FAMILY HOME IN THE SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION OF CHAPELFIELDS AVAILABLE WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN. This fantastic five bedroom detached property is conveniently located to local shops, transport links & schools. With great access links to the A45 (Birmingham) & A4114 (Coventry City C..."
"Wilsons are delighted to offer for sale this five bedroom terraced property which is situated in the heart of Earlsdon. This property is ideally suited for a House of Multiple occupancy and has been refurbished with this in mind. The accommodation affords; stunning entrance hallway, two ..."
"Envisage are pleased to offer this extended 6 bedroom all en-suite HMO investment property in Earlsdon. the property comprises a modern fitted kitchen with open plan communal area, 6 ensuite bedrooms, currently tenanted, to arrange a viewing please call Envisage on . EPC RATING C "
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this superior, extended five bedroom end terraced family home, situated in the highly popular area of Coundon. The property offers over 1800 Sq. Ft of living space with light and airy rooms throughout and sits on a superb plot. Oakfield Road lies with..."
"A well presented four bedroom semi detached family home, situated in the sought after area of Eastern Green within close proximity to primary and secondary schools, local shop amenities, bus routes into Coventry City Centre, access to A45 providing easy access to Birmingham international Airport."
Three bedroom double bayed semi detached family home is situated in the popular residential area of Finham within the Finham Park school catchment. ** NO UPWARD CHAIN **
"Fully extended Six bedroom six ensuite HMO Terraced house comes fully furnished, Located in the middle Stoke area of Coventry. Receiving approximately £36,000 per year in rent. **NO CHAIN**"
"**BRAND NEW DEVELOPMENT**SHOW HOME AVAILABLE TO VIEW**Thoughtfully designed and crafted for modern living, the Hallam is a four bedroom detached family home, enveloped in light and space, this really could be the perfect new home and lifestyle you have been looking for. The impressive Kitchen/ Di..."
No summary available.
"An extended linked semi-detached family home situated in this convenient residential location within Styvechale. The property is found close to nearby amenities including regular buses, local primary school and access to the A45 dual carriageway linking the motorway network. The property benefits..."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** The Sawyer has THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS with EN SUITE to the master bedroom and modern family bathroom serves the others. A spacious OPEN PLAN kitchen, dining and family area ideal for entertaining with FRENCH DOORS to the garden. "
*** Check Out the Video Tour *** Fantastic Family Home *** Four Bedrooms… Extended … Two Reception Rooms… Downstairs Cloakroom… Modern Kitchen… Off Road Parking…Utility Area…Fabulous Sized Rear Garden… Great Further Potential *** We’re absolutely delighted to bring this spacious and very well mai...
"A modern four bedroom extended semi detached set over three floors, situated in the highly sought after location of Finham. Within close proximity to Finham Park School and local shops and amenities this home would be ideal for a family looking to move into the area. The ground floor of..."
"A superb opportunity to purchase this spacious three bedroom semi detached home on a great plot, with great potential, situated in the very popular area of Styvechale Grange, within easy reach of both Grange Farm and Stivichall primary schools and good local amenities. Briefly, the accom..."
Wonderfully presented 6 bed terraced house located in Coventry Comprises of: Warm and welcoming entrance hallway Well appointed kitchen with base and wall units Spacious and cosy living room Six double bedrooms all fitted with en-suite shower rooms Addi...
"A Good size Three Bedroom Detached house situated in the popular semi-rural Location. With Lounge, Extended Kitchen/Diner, Three First Floor Bedrooms, Fitted First Floor Bathroom. Front and Rear Gardens. Direct access to garage with ample off-road parking/drive, Gas central heating & UPVC double ..."
"The Hornsea is a detached home with the bonus of an integral garage. It's got a good-sized living room with double doors leading into a bright open-plan kitchen/diner - perfect for family life and for entertaining. It's practical too with a utility, downstairs cloakroom and three storage cupboards."
"Fully extended Six bedroom six ensuite HMO Terraced house comes fully furnished, Located in the middle Stoke area of Coventry. Receiving approximately £32,400 per year in rent. **NO CHAIN**"
Spacious Designed Home ~ Three Bedrooms ~ Popular Location ~ Sold with No Chain A spacious semi- detached house located in one of Coventry‘s most sought-after residential locations. Found on the aspirational south side of the city within the popular district of Stivichall served by excel...
Stunning Village Location - Canal Side Setting - Viewing Is Strongly Recommended For This Detached Family Home In The Ever Popular Village Of Ansty - Offered With No Upward Chain The Property Comprises - Entrance Hall - Open Plan Study / Dining Area - Separate Living Room - Large Breakfast Kitchen -
Situated in a semi rural location on the outskirts of Coventry this individual 2/3 bedroom Detached Dormer Bungalow is offered for sale with no chain. The property benefits from LPG gas fired central heating and double glazing and with plenty of off street parking. 
A Stunning Period Terraced Home Set In The Heart Of Earlsdon - Gorgeous Kitchen / Diner - Lovely Lounge - Ground Floor WC - 3 Double Bedrooms - AMAZING FAMILY BATHROOM - En-Suite - Gardens To Front And Rear - Gas Central Heating - UPVC Double Glazing - CHECK OUT MY FLOOR PLAN - Call Today
"**SPACIOUS FAMILY LIVING**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**THREE RECEPTION ROOMS**VIEWS OVER OPEN FIELDS**A very nicely presented extended detached family home with accommodation in brief comprising: Entrance Porch, WC, lounge, separate dining room, sitting room, fitted kitchen, utility room. On the first ..."
The three bedroom detached Amersham is ideal for those moving up the property ladder
"** FREEHOLD! ** Beautifully Presented, Executive Detached Family Home Situated Within A Sought After Development Of Weavers Wharf Little Heath. Tastefully Decorated, Highly Maintained Throughout With Heaps Of Local Amenities Including the CBS Arena (Ricoh) and M6 Motorway links."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this beautiful FOUR bedroom detached family home in the sought after area of Keresley within easy access to good local schools, local amenities and the motorway network. This lovely property briefly comprises of an entrance hallway with doors leading off t..."
"A beautifully appointed modern detached family home occupying an excellent corner location, within this much sought after development. Decorated to an exceptional standard, this very appealing home really must be viewed, has both gas heating and double glazing together with a broad block paved fr..."
"*INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY* This Stunning Newly Developed 5 Bedroom En-suite Property Is Available For Sale Within Walking Distance to Coventry City Centre & The University. The design of this property has been created to incorporate all the qualities of comfort, space and individ..."
"**FANTASTIC POTENTIAL**THREE BEDROOMS**THREE RECEPTION ROOMS**TRADITIONAL FAMILY HOME** This traditional detached family home has the following accommodation: Entrance Hallway, dining room, fitted kitchen, sitting room, sun room, utility room and guest WC. On the first floor there are three bedro..."
A fully refurbished turn key home located in this highly sought after location. Presented in immaculate order and priced to sell
"DETACHED HOUSE - THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS - CLOSE TO UNIVERSITY HOSPITAL - MUST BE VIEWED This detached house has come to market with three double bedrooms with the main bedroom having the benefit of an ensuite. The property is a good decorative order, and has both central heating and doubl..."
Plots 1 & 2 are a pair of semi-detached 4 bedroom eco efficient family homes set in the Charlesworth Gardens development off Job's Lane in the Tile Hill area of west Coventry. 1076sqf This beautiful 4 bedroom family home comprises of 2 x double bedrooms and 2 x single bedrooms. 
"This four bedroom, detached family home offers generous accommodation throughout and is located in the sought after residential area of Longford. The accommodation on the ground floor comprises an entrance hallway, a lounge, a recently fitted kitchen with integrated appliances and side ..."
"Situated just off Watercall Avenue, this post war three bedroomed semi detached house is to be sold with no chain. There is gas central heating and double glazing and the property offers excellent further potential and is accordingly priced. Incorporating entrance hall, bay windowed lounge/din..."
"This fabulous residence will thrill house hunters who appreciate modern design and crave space and privacy. We're obsessed with every room: it's warm, comfortable, and sociable all at the same time. Extending almost 1500 sq. ft, it ticks every box for even the most particular of families having a..."
"A WELL PRESENTED FIVE BEDROOM PROPERTY ALL WITH EN-SUITES, SITUATED IN A VERY DESIRABLE AREA IN COVENTRY, CLOSE TO WARWICK UNIVERSITY AND LINKS TO BIRMINGHAM. Freeburn Causeway is situated in Canley, close to Canley Train Station for daily commuters and within easy walking distance of ..."
"Reeds Rains Coventry are delighted to offer with NO UPWARD CHAIN AND IMMEDIATE POSSESSION this much improved and modernised family home with separate annexe next to President Kennedy School. This fabulous home offers Entrance Hall, Cloakroom, Dining Kitchen, Sitting Room, Three Bedrooms and a Ba..."
"UNIQUE INVESTMENT , A VERY RARE OPPORTUNITY TO ACQUIRE A FREEHOLD BUILDING IN THE HEART OF DOWN TOWN CANLEY:
The building consists of 3 x self contained flats currently rented out to a mixture of students and professionals. The rear of the existing building could be extended to add additional ac..."
"This four bedroom detached family home is located on the east side of the City just off London Road, being perfectly positioned for access to Jaguar Land Rover, the City Centre & motorway networks. **INTERNAL INSPECTION IS HIGHLY RECOMMENDED**"
"Very spacious and extended three storey modern town house INVESTMENT PROPERTY within easy walking distance of City Centre, Coventry University and Railway Station. Well presented with central heating and double glazing. Currently let out until August 2023 at £1600 pcm."
"This beautifully presented and extended end of terraced property requires a full internal inspection to be fully appreciated. The property is situated within the popular location of Eastern Green, with easy access to good local schools, the A45 and motorway network. The entrance hallway leads to ..."
"A superbly presented four bedroom semi-detached family home, which has been completely renovated and extended by the current owners to provide comfortable and spacious modern living and Offered with no upward chain. This beautiful bungalow is positioned in the ever so popular area of All..."
"A FABULOUS FAMILY HOME WITH ENORMOUS POTENTIAL TO ADD YOUR OWN CHARACTER!! This unique opportunity to purchase this beautiful three bedroom semi detached property situated in the highly popular area of Coundon which has so much potential, sitting on a superb plot. Briefly the downstairs..."
EXTENDED & MUCH IMPROVED FAMILY HOME / THREE BEDROOMS / REFITTED MODERN KITCHEN WITH APPLIANCES / TWO RECEPTION ROOMS / FITTED FAMILY BATHROOM / POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION / VIEWS OVER COUNTRYSIDE TO REAR / DRIVEWAY FOR SEVERAL VEHICLES / REAR GARDEN WITH REAR VEHICULAR ACCESS / CLOSE TO LOCAL ...
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a spacious, extended three bedroom semi detached family home, situated in the highly desirable area of Allesley. An ideal and convenient family location, Pangfield Park is situated to the west of the City and is within short walking distance of the pop..."
**SPACIOUS CORNER PLOT**TWO LARGE RECEPTION ROOMS**WC & BATHROOM**GARAGE & DRIVEWAY**RECENTLY FITTED KITCHEN**OVERLOOKING GREEN** This is a fantastic opportunity to purchase a spacious three bedroom semi-detached extended home on a corner plot overlooking green to front. This property very briefl...
"Life Investments are pleased to market this detached three bedroom property that is situated in one of the most desirable locations of the extremely popular Bannerbrook Estate.This property is in great original condition, occupies a desirable corner plot and is FOR SALE WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN!"
"Nestled in this highly sought after Stivichall cul de sac is this superb family home. The property has been well maintained throughout and offers plenty of space and potential, along with a generous South facing garden"
"A LOVELY EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH A FULL WIDTH REAR EXTENSION WITH A NEWLY FITTED ROOF, IN THE SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION OF FINHAM. OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN. Woodside Avenue South is a very popular location which is close to Coventry train station, The War Memori..."
"**HIGH SPECIFICATION**RENOVATED THROUGHOUT**FOUR BEDROOMS, TWO BATHROOMS** Tucked away in a quiet cul de sac is this immaculately presented, recently renovated detached bungalow. Very briefly comprising; front lawn, driveway, garage with electric, entrance hall, open plan lounge/kitchen/diner, be..."
"**** Attention Investors **** Shortland Horne Estate Agents are pleased to present this lovely six bedroom property which has been used has a guest house but can easily be converted in to a HMO, it has also been extended to make an extra two bedrooms. The property is situated in the City Cen..."
"The four bedroom Lydford boasts a wealth of space, ideal for young families. Let us help you move with our tailored incentives.*"
"The four bedroom Lydford boasts a wealth of space, ideal for young families. Let us help you move with our offers available.*"
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a well-presented three bedroom, semi detached family home. Sat on a fantastic plot in a very desirable location in Eastern Green. Farcroft Avenue is situated to the west side of the city and within easy reach of both the city centre and the A45, it als..."
Fantastic Family Home ~ Attractive Rear Garden ~ Extended Dining Room ~ Excellent Local Schools A traditional double bayed semi-detached home found in one of the city's most sought-after locations. With excellent schools close by and huge potential for further extension this property wou...
"Show Home Investor Opportunity!!!View Today - No appointment necessaryGuaranteed £25,200 cash back on completion or £1,400 monthly rent for 18 months with a rolling contract after offered after this timeOver £50,000 of show home upgrades includedLandscaped back gardenInterior design..."
"A Three Bedroom detached property located in a popular location. Compromising Hallway, Lounge, Kitchen, Three first floor bedrooms and bathroom, ground level WC, a Garage, Front and Rear gardens with pedestrian access to the rear. UPVC double glazed windows and gas centrally heated radiators. Vac..."
"The Monkford offers spacious living, ideal for growing families. Let us help you move !"
4 Bedroom Semi-Detached | An Ideal Location For Families with Schooling & Local Amenities on the Doorstep | Garage | Modern Kitchen & Bathrooms | Master Bedroom with En-Suite | Double glazed PVC-U | Travel Links | Generous Living Room | EPC B | Landsc...
**MATURE GARDENS**FIELD VIEWS TO THE FRONT**LOVELY BUNGALOW IN A SEMI-RURAL LOCATION** This detached bungalow is situated in the suburban Village of Ash Green in the Nuneaton and Bedworth district of Warwickshire. The Bungalow its self is situated on a quiet Lane with panoramic field views to the...
"This beautifully presented, semi-detached family home has been lovely maintained by the current owners and is located on the outskirts of the city in a highly sought after area. The property has accommodation over three floors with the ground floor comprising an entrance hallway with ac..."
"Set in this peaceful desirable location. You will need to act quickly if you do not wish to miss out on this family home that offers versatile accommodation. Offering no chain, Bairstow Eves are delighted to bring this property to the market. We know you will love this semi-detach..."
"*INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY* GLB Are pleased to market another fantastic luxury 5 bedroom HMO property, please be quick to avoid disappointment. This Stunning 5 Bedroom En-suite Property is Perfect As Coventry City Centre Is ONLY a 15 Minute walk! The property is designed t..."
"SEMI DETACHED HOUSE - EXTENDED ACCOMMODATION - FIVE BEDROOMS - NO ONWARD CHAIN - MUST BE VIEWED This much improved and extended semi detached house, in a great location close to lots of local amenities is offered with no onward chain. The property would be perfect for both buy to let inv..."
"**NO ONWARDS CHAIN**TWO BATHROOMS** A well-presented three/four bedroom semi-detached extended dormer bungalow located in a quiet cul-de-sac in the highly desirable area of Eastern Green. The area boasts walking distance of local convenience shops, Unicorn pub, and Park Hill Primary School. Ea..."
"*** IMMACULATE & EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME IN DESIRABLE EASTERN GREEN *** With two reception rooms, re-fitted kitchen, re-fitted bathroom with shower, modern gas central heating, recent double glazing and roof, conservatory to rear with garage driveway and large rear garden."
"**WELL EXTENDED FAMILY HOME IN FINHAM CATCHMENT AREA** Superb three bedroom semi-detached home in a sought after area of Coventry, ideal for families or couples. The ground floor being the heart after its clever extension provides a large family kitchen with access to the garden and a large liv..."
"Jubilee Green is an exclusive development of just 40 new homes, boasting an ideal location around a 10-minute drive from Coventry. The Thespian features TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS with EN SUITE to the master. An OPEN PLAN kitchen / dining area plus separate living room with BAY WINDOW. "
"Extended Three Bedroom Semi-Detached Property. Situated in a sought-after Village location. Close to local amenities and major motorway links. Comprising of: Spacious Lounge with Dining area, Siting Room, Fitted Kitchen, Utility and Cloakroom. uPVC double glazed and Gas centrally heated. Three B..."
"* Very popular location near Coventry Train Station* * Early viewing recommended to fully appreciate the space of this super family home or investment property* * NO CHAIN "" In a lovely neighbourhood. A wonderful spacious semi-detached extended home. This property ha..."
"Set on this popular road, just off the Ansty Road, sits a handsome 1930s property, rich in characterful features yet beautifully equipped for modern living. Generously proportioned and stylishly decorated, it has fabulous family home written all over it. This property is both spacious and bright,..."
"The three bedroom detached Easedale has been designed with flexible living in mind, with French doors from the lounge to the rear garden"
"***CORNER PLOT DETACHED BUNGALOW***OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN***QUIET CUL DE SAC ***LOCATED ON POPULAR SPOT IN WALSGRAVE***Accommodation in brief; entrance porch, hallway, modern shower room, fitted kitchen, two double bedrooms with fitted wardrobes, spacious living room, and stunning conservat..."
"A three bedroomed semi-detached home situated in the popular village location of Binley Woods. Briefly comprising Hall, lounge, kitchen, three bedrooms, bathroom and separate WC. Gardens to the front & rear and direct access drive leading to the garage."
"**BUNGALOW**THREE BEDROOMS**GREAT LOCATION** We are pleased to welcome this Three Bedroom, Semi-Detached property to the market. Situated opposite Ash Green Secondary School and close to the A444 and M6, this property comprises; entrance porch, hallway, stunning shower room with vanity unit, foun..."
"SAVE THOUSANDS WITH 'THE BIG 3 OFFER'!Owning your dream home could become a reality when you pick one of 'The Big 3' offers! Simply reserve Home 204 at Brindley Edge and choose from:1. Up to £420 a month towards your mortgage for 12 months*2. £5,000 towards your deposit**3. £5,0..."
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* A ready to move in three bedroom semi detached family home situated within the Cheylesmore area, providing easy access to the City Centre, War Memorial Park and Coventry train station."
"EXCELLENT LOCATION ~ 4 BEDROOMS ~ CHAIN FREE SALE Situated in the prime residential location of Finham in south Coventry, this sizeable semi detached property comes to market with the attraction of no onward chain, 4 Bedrooms and an extended Kitchen. Found on a very popular no t..."
"A traditional terraced home, located only a short walk from the Coventry War Memorial Park and Earlsdon High Street. The property offers excellent potential and is sold with no chain. The flexible accommodation briefly offers; a separate lounge with a bay window to the front, a spacious kitchen /..."
"Conveniently situated within walking distance of Coventry City Centre and Coventry University this mid terrace property benefits central heating, double glazing and a burglar alarm system."
"* * * NO CHAIN - CLOSE TO WARWICK UNIVERSITY * * * Leaders are delighted to bring to the market this stunning 4 bedroom house. Situated in the ever popular Canley area, this property is ideally located just a stone's throw away from Warwick University. This property is currently..."
"Detached family home in need of some modernisation throughout the property and is located within the residential area of Walsgrave, within easy access to the University Hospital, & local motorway network"
"This stunning house offers the perfect balance of space, style, and comfort. As you step into the property, you will be welcomed into the living room off of the hallway that leads to the heart of the home. The property features a beautifully designed study where the garage once was ..."
"**SPACIOUS FOUR BEDROOM HOME**LARGE GARAGE & DRIVEWAY**SPACIOUS GARDEN**WC, ENSUITE & BATHROOM**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS** This is an exceptional opportunity to purchase a beautifully presented four bedroom family home. Very briefly comprising; driveway, large garage, entrance hall, dining room, kitch..."
**NO CHAIN**DETACHED GARAGE & TWO GATED DRIVEWAYS**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**THREE RECEPTION AREAS**SIZEABLE CORNER PLOT WITH POTENTIAL TO EXTEND STPP** This is an exceptional opportunity to purchase a deceptively spacious three bedroom home on a beautiful corner plot. Very briefly this property com...
"***CORNER PLOT***ADDITIONAL LAND PURCHASED***AMPLE PARKING***VIEWING ESSENTIAL*** A spacious three bedroom semi detached, family home situated in the highly sought-after location of Nailcote Grange just off Banner Lane. This house is in a convenient location and has superb road connections with ..."
"WOW! Surely something you will be saying the moment you step inside this beautifully renovated bungalow. Take a look at the video tour to see the truly splendid finish of this great property! 
"
"**** CURRENTLY LET FOR CIRCA £2,000 PCM **** Suzanne Regan is pleased to offer for sale this spacious three storey 5 bedroom mid terraced house located in the popular CV1 postcode. Having 4/5 lettable rooms this property is currently let as a HMO, Achieving around £2,000 PCM . Having a commu..."
"An excellent opportunity for a buy to let investor to acquire this end of terrace HMO property occupying a prominent corner position within this popular and convenient location and currently generating £22,880 rental yield including bills. The centrally heated and double glazed accommodation, whi..."
"This four bedroom, detached family home is conveniently located to local schools, shops and amenities"
**BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED & EXTENDED BUNGALOW**TWO BEDROOMS**TWO BATHROOMS**EXTENDED KITCHEN**CONSERVATORY**DETACHED GARAGE**LARGE DRIVEWAY**LARGE SOUTH FACING REAR GARDENS**NO ONWARD CHAIN**We would like to introduce this beautifully presented and extended two bedroom detached bungalow. The pr...
"This much loved and extended semi-detached property is located in a very popular residential location of Winsford Avenue, Allesley Park. The property is superbly positioned and very close to Allesley Park, an excellent range of shops, great local schools and the A45 network road links, The family..."
"An opportunity to purchase a unique home, which has been recently improved but still with huge potential for further development subject to necessary planning permission."
Situated in a popular residential suburb of Coventry less than one mile from the city centre this property comprises a superb investment opportunity. The property was formally a post office with spacious living accommodation above that was converted a number of years ago. 
**Do Not Miss This Opportunity- Priced Competitively **Fantastic Family Home** No Chain *** Three Generous Bedrooms… Master EnSuite... Double Fronted… Two Reception Rooms…Conservatory… Downstairs Cloakroom… Modern Kitchen… Off Road Parking with In & Out Drive… Planning Permission for Two Storey E...
"*** INCENTIVES AVAILABLE *** READY TO MOVE IN FOR FEBRUARY 2023 - A super three bedroom semi detached centred around a community orchard, our idyllic new development, Pippinfields, in Pickford Green provides a countryside escape, just five miles from Coventry. Pippinfields will feature a..."
This three bedroomed detached property sits in a prominent position with open fields to the side. The property benefits from UPVC double glazing and gas fired central heating.
"LETTABLE INCOME OF AROUND £2,000 PCM Suzanne Regan is pleased to offer for sale this four bedroom terraced property in the secure gated development just off Gosford Street next to Fargo Village. Having five lettable rooms and currently let for circa £2,000 PCM this is a fantastic investment o..."
FIVE LETTABLE ROOMS... ACHIEVING OVER £2000 PCM... BASED OVER THREE FLOORS... CLOSE TO COVENTRY UNIVERSITY... GREAT INVESTMENT... SECURE ACCESS... CLOSE TO COVENTRY CITY CENTRE. Call us now to book your viewing at Kilby Mews. A purpose built secure development set in the heart of Stoke and next...
"An impressive four bedroom detached family home located in the highly desirable residential area of Eastern Green and situated in a cul-de-sac location. The property boasts generous accommodation throughout and comprises entrance hallway, lounge, dining room leading into a fitted kitchen..."
"The Lockwood Corner features a stunning open-plan kitchen/diner and an impressive living room with French doors opening into the garden. A utility room, WC and storage cupboard make it practical as well as stylish. Upstairs are three bedrooms - one is en suite - a family bathroom and more storage."
"Elevated five roomed three storey town house conveniently situated within walking distance of Coventry City Centre and Coventry University, currently managed by Coventry University Accommodation Group with four of the rooms earning £95 and one room £85 per week (approximately &poun..."
"Archer Bassett is proud to present a well-proportioned, superbly presented & recently constructed four bedroom detached family home which is within walking distance to local green belt and local amenities and comes with double glazing & central heating throughout. From the entrance hall is a grou..."
"**Substantially Extended Four Bedroom Family Home**Detached Double Garage & Driveway**Prime Finham Catchment For Both Primary & Secondary** This is an exceptional opportunity to purchase a spacious four bedroom family home. Very briefly comprising; driveway, entrance hall, open plan lounge/diner,..."
"Ideally situated off Earlsdon Avenue South and within easy walking distance of the centre of Earlsdon, this three, double bedroom, terraced property is an ideal family home. With both a bright and spacious kitchen breakfast room and a through sitting dining room, the property also benefits from h..."
"* * * NO CHAIN - CLOSE TO WARWICK UNIVERSITY * * * Leaders are delighted to bring to the market this stunning 4 bedroom house available. Situated in the ever popular Canley area, this property is ideally located just a stone's throw away from Warwick University. This proper..."
"Ideally situated for access in and out of Coventry as well as for those easy access to the M6 and The University Hospital, this impressive semi detached property sits within an extraordinary plot with almost limitless potential. A happy and much loved family home for many years the property is ve..."
 ATTENTION INVESTORS : Close to Warwick University - available for sale with tenants in situ - Very safe investment - beat the Article 4 deadline !!!
"*** INCENTIVES AVAILABLE*** READY TO MOVE IN FOR SPRING 2023 - A super three bedroom semi detached centred around a community orchard, our idyllic new development, Pippinfields, in Pickford Green provides a countryside escape, just five miles from Coventry. Pippinfields will feature a se..."
ONLY ONE REMAINING ... Sycamore Place - A modern collection of twelve 3 and 4 Bedroom Townhouses. Help to Buy available and Occupation March 2021 - saving Stamp duty!
"**Fantastic fully licensed HMO investment opportunity** Five bedrooms, three bathrooms, HMO semi-detached located in Canley near Warwick University **NO CHAIN**"
"Reeds Rains are pleased to offer this IMMACULATELY PRESENTED FOR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME LOCATED IN THE PLEASANT AND SOUGHT AFTER AREA. The accommodation offers, Entrance Hall, Living /Dining Room, Cloakroom, Well Fitted Modern Breakfast Kitchen, Landing, Four Bedrooms, Master With En-Suite,..."
"An extended, semi-detached property situated in the highly sought after residential area of Eastern Green, and offered with no onward chain. The location is ideal for a family, offering good local schools, shops, public transport and easy access to Birmingham Airport and the motorway network. "
"This stylish and well presented four bedroom mid terrace townhouse is available for purchase immediately, offering spacious accommodation over three floors. Being within close distance major transport links such as the M6, A444 & M69 whilst being in fair distance to the University Hospital. These..."
"AVAILABLE SPRING 2023 - A super two bedroom detached bungalow with parking centred around a community orchard, our idyllic new development, Pippinfields, in Pickford Green provides a countryside escape, just five miles from Coventry. Pippinfields will feature a selection of luxurious two..."
Evans Estates are Proud to Present this Four Bedroom Detached Family Home situated in the Whitmore Park area of the city and within The President Kennedy School Catchment. The property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified). The accommodation comprises of an ent...
"**ATTENTION INVESTORS OR FIRST TIME BUYERS, A LOVELY FOUR BEDROOM PROPERTY SET OVER THREE FLOORS WITHIN EASY ACCESS TO WARWICK UNIVERSITY WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** This very well presented end terraced town house, close to local shops, schools and the motorway network. The ground floor ..."
"SAVE UP TO £11,000 with this home. This home has over £3,000 of kitchen & bathroom upgrades, PLUS, save a further £8,000 with our BIG 3 offer.Upgrades included: Upgraded kitchen with Integrated appliances, 4 downlights to kitchen and a towel radiator to the bathroom.Owning your ..."
"Reeds Rains are pleased to offer with IMMEDIATE POSSESSION AND NO CHAIN this superb investment opportunity within minutes walk of the Coventry University and the City Centre . The Mid Terraced accommodation offers Entrance Hall, Bedroom, Living Room, Kitchen with Appliances, Shower Ro..."
"AVAILABLE SPRING 2023 - A super three bedroom semi detached centred around a community orchard, our idyllic new development, Pippinfields, in Pickford Green provides a countryside escape, just five miles from Coventry. Pippinfields will feature a selection of luxurious two, three and fou..."
"This three bedroom detached house, in a great location and with enviable views to the front, is offered for sale with the benefit of no upward chain."
"**RENOVATED THROUGHOUT**WORKSHOP & DETACHED GARAGE**DETACHED TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM BUNGALOW** This is an incredible opportunity to purchase a deceptively spacious, detached two double bedroom bungalow situated in a sought after and quiet cul de sac. Viewing is essential to appreciate the features of..."
"**NO CHAIN**FINHAM SCHOOL CATCHMENT** Suttons are proud to offer for sale, a well-presented three-bedroom semi-detached family home located in the popular area of Green lane. The property boasts a wealth of local amenities and transport links close by, such as A45, Coventry City..."
"*INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY* Envisage are pleased to offer large 6 Bedroom 3 storey property for sale, ideal for Investors looking at student or professional sharers market. Well located close to Coventry University and the city centre and excellent transport links. The property Is currently let with..."
"Located within the leafy suburb of Stoke Park, this beautiful, unique development benefits from secure gates leading to the apartments and newly built bungalows and mews houses. Steeped in history, with character and luxury, these homes are perfectly placed for Coventry City centre. Perfect for c..."
"Lovely four bedroom semi detached corner plot family home located at the top of Allesley Park, a short distance from the park entrance, three well respected schools and wide range of amenities - ample off-road parking - private gardens to the side & rear - three reception rooms - beautiful kitche..."
"Situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac setting to the Eastern outskirts of the city, this immaculately presented three bedroomed detached house represents ideal family accommodation and must be viewed internally to be fully appreciated. There is gas central heating and uPVC double glazing and the p..."
**CORNER PLOT**SPACIOUS GARAGE & SEPERATE WORKSHOP**GATED REAR DRIVEWAY & FRONT DRIVEWAY**THREE GOOD SIZED BEDROOMS** This is an exceptional opportunity to purchase an impressive end of terrace home on a spacious corner plot in a sought after part of Eastern Green. With fantastic scope for extens...
"The family-friendly Whitton four-bedroom home combines lots of practical features, with stylish touches too.Designed to give modern families the room they need to get together and space of their own, every detail of the Whitton four-bedroom home has been carefully thought out. The focal point of ..."
"5% deposit paid worth £15,647.50. ."
WOW - A Semi Detached Bungalow In A Highly Desirable Location - Completely Modernised To A Fantastic Standard - Gorgeous Large Kitchen / Diner - Lovely Lounge - 3 Double Bedrooms - Beautiful Bathroom - Stunning En-Suite - Gardens To Front & Rear - A MUST VIEW - CHECK OUT MY FLOOR PLAN & CALL TODAY 
"**Attractive Semi Detached – Social Living Kitchen/Diner Space – High Decorative Standard Throughout** Early viewing strongly recommended! This lovely family home has a host of excellent features throughout including a downstairs fourth bedroom/study, solid oak finishings including flo..."
"**NO UPWARD CHAIN** Three bedroom detached property located in a popular residential area of Coventry, being close to local amenities and within easy reach of the Ricoh Arena Retail Park."
"Three Bedrooms ~ Conservatory ~ Useful Ground Floor WC ~ No Chain Found in the highly rated suburb of Stivichall offering easy access to local road networks, shops and business developments, this exceptional property has been refurbished to the highest of standards and offers finished fa..."
**NO UPWARD CHAIN** This three bedroom semi detached property is located in the sought-after area of Allesley in Coventry in a cul-de sac location with a driveway providing off road parking and a landscaped rear garden.
"Situated within a quiet and convenient location, is this large, extended family home on Sutherland Avenue. Offered with no upward chain. 
"
"**DOUBLE FRONTED FAMILY HOME**FIVE BEDROOMS**EXTENDED ACCOMMODATION** This extended family home has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified) The accommodation comprises: Entrance hall, through lounge overlooking the front and rear aspect, further reception room and gu..."
"A BEAUTIFUL SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITHIN EASY ACCESS TO PRESIDENT KENNEDY SCHOOL, CARDINAL NEWMAN SCHOOL, HOLY FAMILY PRIMARY SCHOOL AND WHITMORE PARK PRIMARY SCHOOL. This very well presented and maintained three-bedroom semi-detached family home situated in the popular residential a..."
"***VASTLY EXTENDED SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME***SUPERB LOCATION FOR PARGATE PRIMARY SCHOOL***CONVERTED GARAGE***Accommodation in brief; entrance hall, study, living room, extended dining room, with bi-folding door, opening into extended snug, and extended kitchen, and ground floor shower room. Thr..."
"This beautiful four-bedroom townhouse oozes style and space, with internal living that spans over three storeys. Nestled in this ever popular 'Stoke Village' development this is quite simply a fabulous home in a great location and with almost 1400 sq. ft of accommodation available, it's perfect f..."
"THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO GOOD PRIMARY SCHOOLS.... This lovely semi detached family home is conveniently positioned to reach Birmingham Airport, A45 and Jaguar Landrover with the ground floor offering a Porch, entrance hallway, spacious lounge/diner leading int..."
"A BEAUTIFUL FAMILY HOME WITH EVERYTHING YOU COULD ASK FOR! Upon entry into the welcoming hallway, there is a handy downstairs WC preceding the stairs. The lounge diner runs the length of the property and provides a fantastic space to relax in the evening. The kitchen sits at the rear adjacent ..."
"**FOR SALE VIA ONLINE AUCTION METHOD - GREAT PRICE & INVESTMENT- CASH BUYERS ONLY** A top floor vacant two double bedroom flat in need of full modernisation and located in a quiet and popular location, close to a wide range of amenities and excellent transport links. ***£70 per..."
"Property Description Viewing is highly recommended for this immaculately presented and well maintained home, situated within a quiet close and being within the Finham park School catchment area and and easy access of the A45 and A46 road networks. The accommodation briefly comprises a spaci..."
"Stylish three bedroom detached family home occupying a large plot, having two reception rooms and two bathrooms with no onward chain. "
"**EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY OR FAMILY HOME** There is now the rare opportunity to purchase this ready to rent, 4/5 bedroom / 2 bathroom property situated in the popular Grafton Street of Lower Stoke, Coventry. This 3 storey property is well presented throughout, within walking di..."
"Reeds Rains Coventry are pleased to offer with NO UPWARD CHAIN and IMMEDIATE POSSESSION well presented and maintained two bedroom semi detached bungalow located in this much sought after area. The accommodation offers Entrance Hall, Living Room, Fitted Kitchen, Two Bedrooms, Bathroom and Conserv..."
"Reeds Rains are pleased to offer this FULLY REFURBISHED DETACHED TWO BEDROOM BUNGALOW located in this quiet cul de sac and in this much sought after area within walking distance to the many surrounding amenities. This lovely home, originally built in 1984 and since that time only having two owner..."
"* Very popular semi-rural location in Binley Woods * * Early viewing recommended "" A three-bedroom family home situated in the extremely popular location of Rugby Road, just a short walk to the Village Hall, Post Office and local shops, pubs and restaurants. Excellent local s..."
"Situated in a lovely no through road in the very popular Coundon area of Coventry, this extended and improved family home provides fantastic family accommodation set over 3 floors.With a terrific Kitchen/Diner overlooking the garden to the rear and a fourth bedroom in the converted loft, this is ..."
"Being offered for sale with the benefit of no onward chain, this traditional double-bayed semi-detached house offers three bedroomed accommodation and is conveniently located close to Kenpas Highway and within easy walking distance of Finham Park School. Whilst incorporating gas fired central he..."
"Stunning three / four bedroom family home / investment purchase. Very high end specification, would make a beautiful home or Boutique style HMO investment currently being advertised for £2200 pcm."
"***CLOSE TO LOCAL MOTORWAY NETWORK & UNIVERSITY HOSPITAL***VIEWING ESSENTIAL TO APPRECIATE THE SIZE*** Located in the recently completed Shilton Place development in the north of Coventry, is this stylish family home. Set within close proximity to Coventry University Hospital, Walsgrave Triangle..."
3 Bedroom Semi-Detached | Garage & Driveway | South Facing & Low Maintenance Garden | Good Sized Living Spaces | Gas Central Heating & Fully Double Glazed | Potential to Extend | Transport Links | Excellent Local Schools & Amenities | EPC D 
"This attractive three bedroom detached family home is positioned on a corner plot within a Cul-de-Sac, on a pretty housing development in Keresley, close to and with views over open countryside. The property is within the catchment of highly regarded schools including Holy Family primary school a..."
A UNIQUE SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE SITUATED IN A SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO ALLESLEY PARK
"A rarely available detached family home, offering a wealth of potential to create a stunning family home. Ideally positioned for local schools and amenities and offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN"
** Fantastic opportunity to buy a property ideal for conversion to student HMO **
Three Bedrooms ~ Two Bathrooms ~ Living & Separate Dining Room ~ Conservatory ~ Landscaped Rear Garden ~ NO CHAIN ~ Garage
"Located in one of Coventry's most desirable areas, just off the Kenilworth Road and opposite the War Memorial Park, is this well presented apartment offered with no onward chain. The property is positioned on the ground floor and is accessed via a secure intercom system. The accommodati..."
"Located to the north of Coventry with it's local motorway network is this four bedroom detached family home. Within easy access to the CBS Arena and shopping complex and University Hospital. Nuneaton, Bedworth, Coventry and Birmingham (as well as Airport) are all easily accessible. The truly ..."
"** DO NOT MISS OPPORTUNITY! ** IDEAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY! ** HMO POTENTIAL! ** CLOSE PROXIMITY TO COVENTRY CITY CENTRE! ** NO CHAIN! ** A deceptively spacious, three storey town house situated within a convenient setting of Radford. Ideal for an investment purchase as this dwelling is offeri..."
"*** SOLD AT AUCTION - £430,000 *** **ONLINE AUCTION** To be sold via unconditional ONLINE Auction on Tuesday 28th February 2023 (Visit auctionhouse.co.uk/online). BIDDING OPENS: 13:00 on Monday 27th February 2023 AUCTION ENDS: 13:00 on Tuesday 28th February 2023 GUIDE PRICE: £300,00..."
"A generously-proportioned detached property with minimal work required to achieve an enviable level of modernization throughout, this home is situated near the centre of Coventry city. Benefitting from superb transport links, the property’s 4 bedrooms are wonderfully cosy. The home also benefit..."
"Reeds Rains Coventry are pleased to offer this mature four bedroom semi detached family home located in this much sought after area. The accommodation offers Entrance Hall, Cloakroom, Living Room, Dining Room, Family Room Conservatory, Kitchen, Four Bedrooms, Bathroom and Shower Room. There is a ..."
"Luxury second floor apartment - lovely field views - located close to Tile Hill Train Station - direct links to Birmingham, London and Coventry City Centre - Two Bedrooms - Modern Bathroom - Juliet Balcony - close to Warwick University - allocated parking - perfect first time purchase"
"A period three bedroom terraced home having been decorated and recently re-carpeted throughout, offering an easy and low maintenance move for anyone looking to relocate within or into this sought after location. Within easy walking distance of Earlsdon High Street, Coventry Railway Station and th..."
"This family home is located in a very desirable area, it is well appointed throughout, has been lovingly cared for by the current owners, they have modernised and improved the home throughout and finished it to a high standard. Well proportioned rooms and a very private garden, you need to view t..."
"***INVESTMENT OPPPORTUNITY***
Ideally located for Coventry University and the City Centre is this FIVE ENSUITE DOUBLE ROOMS terrace home with SEPARATE ANNEXE. For further details contact HAART COVENTRY"
"A fantastic four bedroom semi detached town house situated on the popular Stoke Village development. The property comprises of entrance hallway, cloakroom, kitchen, lounge, four bedrooms, family bathroom and master bedroom with en-suite."
"Bairstow eves present an excellent opportunity to purchase a two double bedroom unique detached bungalow located in the sought after location of Binley. In brief the property comprises of entrance lean to , lounge, kitchen, conservatory, two double bedrooms and a family bathroom. The property has..."
Suzanne Regan is pleased to offer for sale this two bedroom bungalow located in a very peaceful and idyllic spot on the Coventry Canal and set on an exceptional plot with ample parking and a garage to the front and side of the property. Offered with no upward chain this really is a great investment.
"*** Check Out The Video Tour *** WOW….. What a Garden Space… A substantial, traditional semi detached family home, tucked away in the heart of Wyken. Set on a very large plot with endless scope - a viewing is a must. The property has been extended already, but with plenty of room to further impro..."
"SAVE UP TO £10,500 with this home. This home has over £3,000 of kitchen & bathroom upgrades, PLUS, save a further £7,500 with our BIG 3 offer.Upgrades included: Upgraded kitchen with Integrated appliances, 4 downlights to kitchen and a towel radiator to the bathroom.Owning your ..."
"**No Forward Chain**Detached Garage**Sought After Binley Woods Location** This immaculately presented two double bedroom semi-detached bungalow situated on a sought after road in Binley Woods is now available for purchase with no forward chain. Very briefly comprising; shared front driveway, side..."
"Situated just off Alderminster Road, this deceptively spacious five double bedroomed semi detached house must be viewed internally to fully appreciate the wealth of space. The property incorporates well planned family accommodation having gas central heating and uPVC double glazing and has bee..."
**IDEAL HMO PROJECT**CENTRAL STUDENT LOCATION**SIDE SPACE IDEAL FOR EXTENSION (STPP)** Up Estates are pleased to bring to the market this ideal opportunity for developers in a perfect student location on Welland Road. The property has been under the same ownership for many years whilst the surrou...
"FINAL MAKENZIE FOR SALE AT SPRINGFIELD GARDENS *Flooring throughout* With an extremely versatile layout, the Makenzie offers complete luxury across the top floor with a master bedroom suite. See what we mean with our virtual video tour now available! "
HMO LICENSED STUDENT HOUSE - Beat Article 4 coming in 2023 
**NO CHAIN**FOUR/FIVE BEDROOM END TERRACED**FULLY RENOVATED AND NEW EXTENSIONS** A fantastic opportunity for a lucky purchaser to buy a substantially extended and converted 4/5 bedroom end terraced property in a quiet cul-de-sac just off the Allesley Old Road. The property has just been completed...
"Situated just off Wigston Road in a pleasant residential area, this deceptively spacious two bedroomed detached bungalow must be viewed internally to fully appreciate the wealth of space. There is gas central heating with a new boiler (installed June 2022), uPVC double glazing and cavity wall ..."
"Situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac setting, this well appointed three bedroomed semi detached house represents ideal family accommodation. There is gas central heating and uPVC double glazing and an internal inspection is recommended to appreciate the wealth of space. Incorporating side entranc..."
"Wilsons are delighted to offer for sale this rare to find spacious family home in a quiet-cul-de-sac- in the sought after location of Finham. The property consists of a large open plan lounge/diner, downstairs w/c, modern fitted kitchen. To the first floor are three double bedrooms and a..."
"This deceptively spacious three bedroomed detached house represents ideal family accommodation and is to be sold with no chain. There is gas central heating and uPVC double glazing and is of well planned three bedroomed design incorporating hall, ground floor cloakroom, full width with lounge,..."
"What a home! nestled on this development in Binley is this gorgeous, re-furbished townhouse with garage, two and a half bathrooms, three double bedrooms and rear/side garden. This is three storey living at it's finest. You can literally get the key and move straight in!"
"Situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac setting just off Green Lane South, this two bedroomed semi detached bungalow is to be sold with no chain. The property occupies a pleasant position and is within a few minutes drive of Stoneleigh Village as well as the A45/A46 road networks. There is gas centr..."
"Reeds Rains are pleased to offer with NO UPWARD CHAIN AND IMMEDIATE POSSESSION this FOUR BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME LOCATED IN THIS MUCH SOUGHT AFTER AND CONVENIENT AREA . The accommodation offers Entrance, Living Room, Dining/Kitchen, Utility, Shower Room/W.C, Bedroom 4 (Formerly the ..."
"** DO NOT MISS THIS OPPORTUNITY! ** NO CHAIN! ** REFITTED CARPETS THROUGHOUT ** A beautifully presented, Victorian semi-detached spacious family home situated in the much sought after area of Stoke. Tastefully decorated and highly maintained throughout. The property is served by an abundance of ..."
A sensibly priced four-bedroom detached family home located in a small select modern cul-de-sac enjoying excellent access to popular schools and amenities. Requiring some modernisation.
"A recently refurbished and superbly presented modern three storey semi detached family home situated on this quiet, small, select modern development located within easy access of Allard Way. The property is well placed for a range of local amenities and is also within easy reach of excellent tran..."
"This property must be viewed internally to be fully appreciated. This four bedroom family home is located in Tile Hill Village and would be an excellent opportunity for families upsizing. The property comprises of good size lounge with dining area, kitchen, four bedrooms and a family bathroom. To..."
"Investment opportunity or family home, 3 bedrooms 2 bathrooms , "
"Situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac setting with an open green to the side, this well presented three bedroomed link detached house represents well planned accommodation having gas central heating and uPVC double glazing and warrants an internal inspection to fully appreciate the space and prese..."
"A perfect chance to create your dream home! This substantial three bedroom property is a perfectly-proportioned delightful semi, with bags of character, a natural flow and a garden setting to match the beauty of the nature reserve and trails that surround this home. There is updating required thr..."
"***CORNER PLOT*** ***POTENTIAL TO EXTEND STPP*** ***SOME MONDERNISATION & UPDATING REQUIRED*** UP Estates are pleased to offer to market this fantastic opportunity to acquire a four-bedroom semi-detached property located in the ever-popular area of Kersley End. Situated on a huge corner plot, giv..."
"Tucked away in a quiet spot of popular Binley Woods, sits this spacious three bedroom semi-detached family home."
"Evans Estates are Proud to Present this Three Bedroom Townhouse with En Suites off Every Bedroom. The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, lounge, kitchen diner and ground floor cloakroom. To the first floor there are two double bedrooms both with en suite shower rooms and a further famil..."
"Three bedroom well presented double bayed mid terrace family home is located in the desirable residential of Whitley, close to local amenities; Whitley Abbey school catchment and major motorway/bypass links are also in proximity for commuters."
"A unique opportunity to purchase a three bedroom semi detached home in the sought after location of Tamworth Road. The property is close to good local schools, convenient for key road networks and walking distance to the popular Coundon Park. .The accommodation includes a living room, dining roo..."
PLOT 52 THE BUXTON now available. NEW HOME built by a 5 STAR BUILDER. OPEN PLAN kitchen / dining area with UTILITY and CLOAKROOM. FRENCH DOORS to the garden. SPACIOUS lounge. EN SUITE to master bedroom. DRIVEWAY parking.
No Chain | Popular Location of Mount Nod | 3 Bedrooms & Loft Space | Master Bedroom with En-Suite | Generous Living Area with Log Burner | Garage & Driveway | South Facing Garden | Kitchen Diner | Conservatory | EPC D
"Bairstow Eves are pleased to offer this spacious immaculate four bedroom property that would be perfect for a family upsizing or an investment as the property is within two miles to Warwick University . The property comprises of lounge, kitchen/diner , downstairs wc, four bedrooms all including e..."
Three Bedrooms ~ Corner Plot ~ Drive and Garage ~ Extended Dining Kitchen ~ Ground Floor Shower Room A traditional double stoney bayed end of terrace home located on a sizeable corner plot. This property has huge potential to extend out to the side if desired and has the added benefit of...
"**IMMACULATE THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED**HIGH SPECIFICATION THROUGHOUT**TWO BATHROOMS AND WC** Up Estates are pleased to bring to the market a well presented three bedroom semi detached property in the popular modern development just off Lythalls Lane. Briefly comprising; Hall, WC with utility s..."
"A beautifully presented, spacious modern town house situated on the popular Stoke Village development, ideally situated for JLR Whitley, PSA Peugeot Citroen and the Coventry city centre. On entering the property, you step into a bright hallway. To the left of this, is the lovely kitchen facing t..."
RE LAUNCHED 2023 - A Delightful Three Bed House In The Popular Stoke Village Estate. The property was built 5 years ago and benefits from having 5 years left on the NHBC
"*** NO UPWARD CHAIN ***Simply stunning detached family home set within the private development of Priory Mill Walk, within easy access to good local schools, shops and the motorway network with two years NHBC guarantee remaining. The ground floor comprises of entrance hallway, ground fl..."
"Situated on a corner plot this three bedroom end of terrace family home is perfectly situated close to Warwick University, Cannon Park shopping Centre & motorway links."
Largely extended three bedroom detached family home adjacent to fields - modern kitchen / diner - two storey rear extension providing three double bedrooms on the first floor and additional dining room - extended sun-room - driveway & single garage - garden room/workshop - summer house - excellen...
Popular Location of Tile Hill | 3 Bedroom Semi-Detached | Driveway & Garage | Open Kitchen Dining Area | Separate Living Room | Private & Secure Generous Sized Garden | Well Equipped Kitchen | Large Corner Plot | EPC Rating D
"* NO CHAIN * Here we have a prime example of a lovely family home located in the sought after area of Binley bordering Ernesford Grange, benefitting from a newly renovated garage conversion into a second lounge/dining room with WC and utility. The property is conveniently located in a quiet no th..."
"**NO UPWARD CHAIN** Well presented semi detached property briefly comprising: ground floor w/c, lounge with archway to dining room, fitted kitchen, utility room, two double & one single first floor bedrooms and a family bathroom."
"Berkeley Court is an 18 month old development with 18 stylish apartments in the heart of Earlsdon. Positioned on Warwick Street (which runs parallel to Earlsdon High Street), Berkeley Court is located 200 yards from a parade of shops, restaurants and local amenities. There is a potentia..."
**BRAND NEW DEVELOPMENT** This home also benefits from flooring throughout your new home and a fantastic upgraded appliance package including an integrated fridge freezer and dishwasher. Enjoy contemporary and modern living that The Garnett at Springfield Gardens has to offer. Well proportioned w...
"**EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM END TERRACED**DOWNSTAIRS WC and FAMILY BATHROOM**OFF ROAD PARKING** Up Estates are pleased to bring to the market a very well presented, extended three bedroom end terraced property benefitting from a high specification, recent upgraded Worcester Bosch boiler (1.5 years o..."
A COMPLETELY REFURBISHED FAMILY HOME BENEFITING FROM HIGH QUALITY WORKMANSHIP THROUGHOUT! The open plan living and kitchen space that occupies the majority of the ground floor is a sight to behold and enables seamless transition between the spaces and their multiple uses. The kitchen and dinin...
"A very well presented, detached bungalow in a great location. Only a few minutes drive from University Hospital as well as the M6, M69, A46 and within walking distance to local amenities."
This beautiful semi-detached property has been owned by the same family since originally built – It’s seen many changes and styles over the years but there’s one thing that hasn’t changed – it’s truly a fantastic family home. It offers lots of space – and more potential for a growing family. Full...
"What a home! If you're looking for a place that you can literally move into and create magical memories, then a viewing is a must on this beautiful property - its perfect for families and even better, its being offered with No Onwards chain. This property has the benefit of a driveway wi..."
ONLY 5% DEPOSIT NEEDED.
"** FULLY RENOVATED THROUGHOUT WITH FULL WIDTH REAR EXTENSION *** Archer Bassett are pleased to offer this well presented three bedroom, double bayed family home located in the sought after area of Chapelfields. The property briefly comprises of an entrance hallway, lounge, spacious kitchen/diner..."
"Enjoying a very tucked away position within this much sought after cul-de-sac lies this modern extended, detached family home. With the benefit of off-road parking for several vehicles, the property has a good sized breakfast kitchen with double opening doors to the rear garden. Briefly the prop..."
"In a pleasant cul-de-sac setting on this small modern development, this freehold well presented and carpeted three bedroomed detached house is to be sold with no chain. There is gas central heating, uPVC double glazing and PVC soffits and bargeboards. Internal inspection is recommended to be f..."
"With stylish living spread over three well-planned floors, the Seaton three-bedroom home takes modern family living up a level.With three bedrooms and three floors, this home has space for everyone. Downstairs is all about family living. The contemporary kitchen/diner is a fantastic space that&ap..."
"5% deposit paid worth £14,447.50. .Online 360 tour available to view so you can see what you new home could look like. Hurry, over 80% of homes are now sold so don't miss the chance to secure your new place. Book an appointment to speak to our friendly Sales Executive."
"This three bedroom semi detached property is very well presented throughout having been modernised and re-furbished by the present owner. Being ideally suited to a first time buyer or investor the property provides potential buyers with :- entrance hallway, lounge, re-fitted breakfast kitchen....."
"A well presented 3 bedroom semi detached family home situated in the residential area of Aldermans green with large rear garden with feature pond and off road parking to front for 2 vehicles, **NO UPWARD CHAIN**"
"This property must be viewed internally to be fully appreciated. The property is close to local amenities and not far from University Hospital. The property comprises of lounge/diner, kitchen, downstairs WC, three bedrooms with the master en suite and a family bathroom. To the rear of the propert..."
"Reeds Rains are pleased to offer this WELL PRESENTED DETACHED FAMILY HOME located in this sought after and convenient area. The accommodation offers Entrance Hall, Cloakroom, Living Room, Dining Kitchen, Three Double Bedrooms, Ensuite and Bathroom. There is a Garage and Driveway to the front wit..."
"Located in the popular area of Binley is this three-bedroom home. There are very good road links to get you around and about the city. Local amenities include Warwickshire Shopping Park, supermarkets, local schools, a golf course and gym's / health centre. Within close proximity to the University..."
"**RECENTLY REDUCED FOR A QUICK SALE ** NO CHAIN ** MOTIVATED SELLER ** Situated within this peaceful backwater setting lies this stunning three storey period property built circa 1895, having been recently modernised to an exceptionally high standard. With many outstanding features, this property..."
"***NO CHAIN***RE-MODERNISED***TWO BATHROOMS***3 BEDROOMS***FLEXIBLE ACCOMMODATION*** Located within close proximity to university hospital, Jaguar Landrover at Whitley and with great road access to the A45 & A46 alongside the M1-M6-M40-M69 motorways is this semi detached dormer bungalow that is ..."
DOUBLE BAY SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME / EXTENDED & MUCH IMPROVED / THROUGH LOUNGE DINING ROOM / FITTED DINING KITCHEN / GROUND FLOOR SHOWER ROOM / DRIVEWAY & GARAGE / FITTED FAMILY BATHROOM / REAR GARDEN / SOUGHT AFTER RESIDENTIAL LOCATION / NO ONWARD CHAIN / INTERNAL VIEWING RECOMMENDED
"A superb opportunity to acquire this substantial four-bedroom semi-detached property, in a prime location and only a short distance away from Warwick University! The property benefitted from being a fully licensed HMO (Not Transferable) John Rous Avenue is situated in Canley, close to Ca..."
"""SUPER SPACIOUS BUNGALOW"" We are delighted to bring to market this fantastic two bedroom bungalow on a very spacious corner plot offering garden space to front, side and rear with off road parking and garage. With two double bedrooms that are front facing with fitted carpet, double glazed windows..."
"Reeds Rains Coventry are pleased to offer this WELL MAINTAINED AND PRESENTED three bedroom home located in this popular and sought after area. This lovely home offers Entrance Hall, Cloakroom, Dining Kitchen, Living Room, Landing , Three Bedrooms and Bathroom. To the rear there is a Patio Garden..."
"**REFITTED AND EXTENDED KITCHEN**REFITTED BATHROOM**LOUNGE DINER**NO STAMP DUTY** This very well presented three bedroom semi-detached family home has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified) . The accommodation briefly comprises: Hallway, Through lounge diner, extend..."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a spacious, modern three bedroom semi-detached family home. Situated to the west of the city in the very popular development of Bannerbrook Park, a perfect location for easy living. The property is within easy reach of popular local schools, shops and ..."
"*No Onward Chain* A fantastic opportunity to acquire this spacious extended three-bedroom end terraced family home situated in the highly desirable area of Allesley. Situated to the west of the City, the property is within walking distance of the popular Allesley Park, fantasti..."
"A large semi detached property located in the popular area of Coundon. In brief the property comprises: porch, entrance hall, lounge, separate dining room, utility room (access from the rear garden), W.C to the ground floor. Three double bedrooms and bathroom to the first floor. The property furt..."
"Three bedroomed detached home overlooking Green to the front with new roof, guttering & facias 2021, New boiler 2020 new fitted kitchen 2021 and new shower room 2021. Comprising: Porch, cloaks with WC, lounge, dining room, kitchen, three bedrooms and shower room to the first floor and rear access..."
"AVAILABLE ON SALES & LEASEBACK SCHEME ONLY - GET 6% YIELD IN RETURN*.SALES AND LEASEBACK SCHEME - Secure plot 2, The Caddington and get 6% yield from us in return. Make an investment today and start or add to your housing portfolio. Fixtures, fittings, flooring and landscaped garden included*!"
"The Windermere has a modern open-plan kitchen/diner, well-proportioned living room and three good-sized bedrooms. The top floor bedroom has the bonus of a spacious en suite. The enclosed porch, downstairs cloakroom, two storage cupboards and off-road parking mean it's practical as well as stylish."
"**NEW ROOF**A well presented three bedroom detached family home located in the popular area of Binley providing easy access to Binley Business Park, Warwickshire shopping park, Coventry Eastern bypass/M69, A45, M6 and A444. Briefly comprising of entrance hallway with storage cupboa..."
Popular Location of Eastern Green | 3 Bedroom Semi-Detached | Driveway | South East Facing Garden | Attention Families & First Time Buyers | En-Suite For Each Bedroom | Downstairs W.C. | Loft Conversion | 3 Double Bedrooms | EV Charging Point | EPC R...
****BOOKING VIEWINGS NOW**** Carters are very pleased to offer this well presented three bedroomed end of terrace property that is situated in this popular location which is close to the local amenities and the transport network giving access to Coventry and the M6 with its links to the Midla...
"Located in the sought after area of Walsgrave, on a peaceful cul de sac, you’ll find this spacious, 3/4 bedroom home with three bathrooms. Perfectly positioned for family life, it’s a short stroll to sought-after schools and all the amenities this popular neighbourhood has to offer."
"Investors: Tenants currently paying £2395 PCM total. A sizable six-bedroom semi approx. 1 mile from Coventry's City Centre, operating as an HMO and generating excellent revenue for its current owners for many years.."
"Located within close proximity to Junction 3 of the M6 motorway and with easy road access to Coventry city centre, University hospital and the north Warwickshire towns of Nuneaton & Bedworth. A spacious three bedroom detached family residence located in a quiet cul de sac. The property comprises..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to present this this well presented, three-bedroom terrace in a highly sought-after location within easy reach of local amenities. This property would make a lovely family home ideal for a first-time buyer. On entering the property is a traditionally tiled hallway. To t..."
Spacious three-bedroom detached family home built on a generous corner plot in the sought after Shilton Place development. Offering a refreshing blend of countryside walks and easy access to local amenities with local schools within walking distance
Wilsons are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom semi detached family home situated in the heart of Whitmore Park set back from the main road. The property has excellent potential for a growing family to extend over the garage or to the rear if required (STPP). The current gara...
What great value this Four bedroom family home offers! Halls together traditional end terraced home with attic conversion providing 4th bedroom with ensuite shower room and ground floor extensions to provide a cloakroom together with a larger family dining kitchen. Pleasant rear garden with a la...
"**Excellent Corner Plot - Ample Frontage, Parking & Potential - 1.5 Garage With Electric Door - Three Bedrooms -Spacious Lounge/Diner Reception Room - Sought After Location** Very few properties with this plot become available in this area, and make this property a superb opportunity to acquire ..."
"** DO NOT MISS THIS OPPORTUNITY! ** A deceptively spacious, semi detached family home situated within a sought after setting of Ash Green. Tastefully decorated and highly maintained throughout yet served with an abundance of local amenities including close proximity to Coventry Building Society..."
Situated in the popular area of Coundon and within a few minutes walk to Coventry city centre is this three storey town house. Coventry university is not too far away and Bablake private school is close by alongside several other local schools. Alvis retail park is nearby. This ideal family home...
"A fabulous family home. A sought-after location. And oodles of space. Abergavenny Walk has it all. Throw in two bathrooms, plenty of off-road parking and a fabulous landscaped garden and you may just have found your jewel in the crown."
"**NO CHAIN** This spacious family home must be viewied internally to be fully appreciated. The property is located in the Tile area of Coventry. The property comprises lounge, dining room, kitchen, downstairs wc, four bedrooms and a family bathroom. The property benefits from having a driveway an..."
Four Bedroom end of terrace house in a sought after location
**NO CHAIN**SUBSTANTIAL CORNER PLOT**THREE/FOUR BEDROOMS**EXTENDED SPACIOUS SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME**MODERN BATHROOM & WC**CIRCA 2 YR OLD BOILER WITH WARRANTY**SOUTH/EAST FACING GARDEN**DETACHED GARAGE & DRIVEWAY** This is an exceptional opportunity to purchase a deceptively spacious THREE/FOUR...
"Beautifully-presented three bedroom end terrace home on Cherry Tree Drive in Canley, Coventry. With off-street parking to the side, the home offers a kitchen, living room, downstairs WC, three bedrooms with en-suite to the master and a bathroom. Cherry Tree Drive is located close to local ameniti..."
A stunning City Centre family home boasting a most tasteful and elegant standard of finish throughout. The property has three / four bedrooms and simply must be viewed !!
"Priced to sell Fantastic investment, 5 bedrooms, 5 bathrooms, good communal space and a great location close to the university and local amenities. Fully tenanted, good return. call for more information"
"Priced to sell 5 bedrooms, 5 bathrooms and great communal space in a fantastic location close to the university and local amenities. Fully occupied HMO. Call for more details."
"What a home! nestled on this development in Binley is this pristine FIVE bedroom townhouse which boasts a modern and minimalist interior, which is perfect to move straight into.Inside. The crisp white tones throughout compliments the copious amounts of light which emanate throughout the rooms. Th..."
"Situated in one of the City's most prestigious and highly sought after developments, an extremely spacious and well presented three bedroom first floor apartment. Just south of the City Centre adjacent to Top Green and the War Memorial Park main entrance, the location allows easy access to all a..."
First floor luxury apartment in this prime south Coventry location overlooking Top Green by the Memorial Park and within easy walk of the Railway Station and City Centre.
"If you’re looking for a spacious, fantastic family home that benefits from the amenities of city living but with a countryside feel and lifestyle - this is the one. Located just on the outskirts of Coventry in Aldermans Green, this three bedroomed property is a must to view in person to get a rea..."
"SAVE THOUSANDS WITH 'THE BIG 3 OFFER'!Owning your dream home could become a reality when you pick one of 'The Big 3' offers! Simply reserve Home 203 and choose from:1. Up to £340 a month towards your mortgage for 12 months*2. Up to £4,000 towards your deposit**3. Up to £4,000 to..."
"***SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION***FOUR BEDROOMS***TWO BATHROOMS***LOVELY LOCATION IN ASH GREEN *** Accommodation in brief; Ground Floor - entrance porch, hallway, fitted kitchen with gas Rangemaster, bathroom, double bedroom, and spacious through lounge diner. To the first floor are three further bedro..."
An end terrace property situated in this popular location on the South side of the City. The property is well served by a range of local amenities including nearby local bus stop and close to Finham Park and Bishop Ullathorne Schools. The property is also within easy reach of the A45 dual carriag...
"What a home! If you are looking for a place that you can literally move into, then a viewing is a must on this beautiful property. From the moment you park on the drive and step inside you know that this home is something special. Inside it is a modern haven for family living."
"5% deposit paid worth £13,847.50. ."
"The Caddington is a three-bedroom home that offers forward-thinking homeowners' real space to grow.A classically proportioned family home, with lots of modern touches, the Caddington offers today's busy families the ideal place to call home. The large kitchen/diner with a well-equipped ..."
Purchase with just 5% Deposit.
JUST 5% DEPOSIT NEEDED .
"Reeds Rains Coventry are pleased to offer this IMMACULATELY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME LOCATED IN THIS SOUGHT AFTER AREA. The accommodation offers Entrance Hall, Fitted Kitchen, Living/Dining Room, Utility Lobby, Landing, Three Bedrooms and Bathroom. Garden to rear, Driveway a..."
"This large family home must be viewied internally to be fully appreciated. The property is located in the popular Binley area of Coventry. The three storey property comprises of lounge, kitchen, conservatory, family bathroom and four bedrooms with the master en suite. The property has allocated p..."
"This two bedroom link-detached bungalow is situated in the prestigious location of Allesley Village and is ideally located for access to local amenities, bus routes and open countryside. In brief the property comprises of a spacious lounge/diner with feature fire place, a well fitted kitchen wit..."
"For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Spacious Vacant Freehold Mid Terraced Property With 11 Bedrooms And Considered Suitable As A HMO Opportunity, Student Accommodation, Conversion To Flats or Family Home Subject To The Appropriate Planning Permission."
A great opportunity to purchase this well maintained family home in an excellent location for all local amenities and schools. This is a property not to be missed so make a early call to register your interest!!
"SECOND FLOOR LUXURY APARTMENT COMPLEX ~ EXCEPTIONAL LOCATION ~ CHAIN FREE SALE Seymour House lies within Tudor Court, a select development of high quality apartments built just over 20 years ago and with a lovely outlook across Warwick Road towards King Henry VIII private school and Top ..."
Fantastic three bedroom Semi detached family home - Beautiful open plan kitchen dinner - Three double bedrooms - Ensuite to master bedroom - Family bathroom - Lounge to the first floor - Driveway - Private rear garden - Popular Daimler Green location - Good links to city centre and motorway network.
**IDEAL LOCATION FOR WALSGRAVE HOSPITAL AND LOCAL SHOPS**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**INTEGRAL GARAGE AND DOWNSTAIRS WC** Up Estates are pleased to bring to the market a well presented and spacious three bedroom semi detached property in the popular Dorchester Way location. The property is situated wit...
"Beautiful 1930's double bay fronted semi detached, extended family home, elevated above the highly sought after Holyhead Road - ample off road parking to the rear - three reception rooms - modern kitchen & bathroom - large entrance porch - brick built conservatory - close to wide range of ameniti..."
"HMO Opportunity Comprising 1,937 sq ft The premises comprise a substantial terraced property set over three floors, having a communal living room, two kitchens, four shower rooms, eleven bedrooms and a rear garden area. The property offers fantastic potential to all investor..."
Evans Estates are Proud to Present This Three Bedroom Detached Family Home Offered with No Upward Chain. The property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified). The property was built in 2018 and still has five years approximately left on the NHBC guarantee. The ac...
"Situated in a small development on the edge of Copsewood, this well presented three storey four bedroomed town house is set in a secluded setting. There is gas central heating and uPVC double glazing and is currently let but is to be sold with vacant possession and no chain. Incorporating entr..."
"**No Onward Chain** *Virtual Tour Available* A fantastic opportunity to acquire an extended, well presented three bedroom, semi detached family home. Set in a desirable location on Holyhead Road. Holyhead Road is situated to the west side of the city and within easy reach of..."
"Situated just off Longfellow Road, this vastly improved and fully modernised traditional style double bayed extended terraced house which has been subject to considerable improvement over the past 12 months must be viewed to be fully appreciated. There is a new gas fired central heating system..."
"Bairstoweves are pleased to offer a three bedroom, link detached family home located in the sort after location of Eastern Green. The property compromises in brief an entrance hallway, a through lounge/diner with sliding patio doors leading out onto the rear garden, a fitted kitchen and a lean to..."
A fabulous opportunity to acquire a three bedroom semi detached property in the desirable and exclusive location of Silksby Street in Cheylesmore offered with NO CHAIN. Silksby Street is ideally placed within walking distance to Coventry train station which has direct routes to Birmingham New str...
"Investment opportunity. Gross annual income £16,740. Handles Property is delighted to offer for sale this three double bedroom townhouse with potential for a fourth bedroom. Flexible accommodation set over three levels. Sold with tenants in situ. Viewing highly recommended."
"~ Beautifully presented 3 bedroom semi-detached home. Fitted with motion censored alarm system, solar panels to the rear and garage. Located in the sought after area of Coundon. Close to local amenities and walking distance of Coventry Town Centre. ~"
"IDEAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - A Four bedroom terraced house located within easy access of Coventry University and Coventry City Centre. Comprising ; Lounge, Fitted Kitchen & Four Bedrooms, Two Ensuite and a separate Bathroom. The property benefits from a rear garden, double glazing and gas ..."
Property located in INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY NEAR WARWICK UNIVERSITY - CANLEY
"*** CHAIN FREE*** LOVELY SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM END TERRACE HOME ON A FANTASTIC PLOT, SITUATED WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO GOOD LOCAL SCHOOLS, SHOPS AND COVENTRY CITY CENTRE. This well presented three-bedroom, end of terrace family home is located in the sought-after area of Coundon and w..."
"**NO ONWARDS CHAIN**SOUTH WEST FACING REAR GARDEN** Suttons are proud to offer for sale a three-bedroom semi-detached dormer bungalow in the highly desirable area of Eastern Green. The property boasts easy access to A45, Coventry City Centre, Birmingham Airport and Park Hill Primary School. "
"This three bedroom substantial double bay semi-detached family home is set back from the road in an elevated position and is within easy reach of local amenities, public transport and local schools, with gas central heating and partial double glazing. To the ground floor the entrance hall has the..."
"Much improved & Extended Family Home, Sought After Location, Close To Schools, Shops & Transport Links, House Alarm, Double Glazing, Gas Fired Central Heating, Well Presented Throughout, Hallway, Lounge Dining Room With A Feature Fireplace, Extended Fitted Kitchen With Built in Appliances, Study/..."
"** CHECK OUT THE 360 VIRTUAL TOUR ** A well designed and extended modern semi-detached family home situated on this popular, small development, on the very edge of the city, close to glorious open countryside. With the benefit of both gas heating and double glazing, the property has a side drivew..."
"A well presented semi detached home in the sought after and convenient location of Binley Woods available with no upward chain. There is an entrance hall, through lounge dining room with doors into the rear garden, separate kitchen and utility/store room suitable for conversion. To the first f..."
"***MID TERRACED TOWN HOUSE***FOUR BEDROOMS INCLUDING MASTER WITH EN-SUITE***GENEROUS GARDEN***Spacious accommodation spread over three floors; entrance hall, dining room, kitchen/breakfast room, utility room, cloakroom, master bedroom and en-suite, and spacious living room to the first floor, wit..."
"A semi detached situated in the popular location of Eastern Green, being close to local schools and with easy access to the A45 and Tile Hill Train Station."
3 Bedroom Semi-Detached | Extended & Refurbished Throughout | Carport & Driveway | Open Plan Kitchen / Diner and Living Space | Good Bedroom Sizes | Double Glazed PVC-U & Gas Central Heating | South Facing Garden | Great Location for Families |&nb...
"Viewing is essential to fully appreciate this deceptively spacious and well presented terrace home in a highly sought-after location convenient for key road networks and good schools. In brief the accommodation includes an entrance hall, living room and a modern refitted open plan kitchen dining..."
"Carters are very pleased to offer this well presented three bedroomed semi detached property situated in this prime and sought after location which is close to the local amenities and the transport network giving access to Bedworth, Coventry, the M6 with its links to Birmingham and the Midlands. ..."
"A stunningly presented, extensive modern semi-detached family home positioned just outside of Coventry City Centre. On entering the property, your welcomed into a bright hallway. To the left of side, is the modern presented kitchen facing to the front of the property. To the right is the do..."
"Situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac setting just off Norman Avenue, this well presented and deceptively spacious two bedroomed detached bungalow is to be sold with no chain. The property has been well maintained and has gas central heating and uPVC double glazing and warrants internal inspection..."
"An attractive three-storey, three-bedroom home, the Souter has an open-plan kitchen/diner, living room and three bedrooms. Bedroom one on the top floor benefits from an en suite. The enclosed porch, downstairs WC, two storage cupboards and off-road parking mean it's practical as well as stylish."
A lovely three bedroom much improved end of terrce property in the heart of popular Coundon - extended open plan L-shaped kitchen / diner - log burner - cosy front lounge - attractive landscaped rear garden - off-road parking - excellent school catchment - well presented throughout - chain complete.
"New to the market this wonderful three-bedroom semi-detached family home neatly positioned in this popular residential area in Coventry. This warm and inviting property briefly comprises Off street parking, side access, Entrance Hallway, a large bright and spacious living room and separat..."
"Envisage are delighted to offer for sale this currently let spacious semi detached property, ideal investment or home, briefly comprised of Lounge with dining area, fitted kitchen, guest WC, four bedrooms, en suite to the master and family bathroom. Off road parking to the front and garden to the..."
"**No Onward Chain** *Virtual Tour Available* A fantastic opportunity to acquire a spacious, three-bedroom semi detached family home. Situated to the west of the City, the property is within easy reach of popular local schools, shops and amenities and only a short drive away from Cove..."
"A very substantial 1930's built end-terraced property occupying a large corner plot, with gardens to three sides. Extended to feature four bedrooms, the property should suit a young family will need some finishing off but offers great scope to personalise a generous sized character home, in a muc..."
"BEAUTIFULLY Presented, Recently Renovated TURN KEY Semi Detached Family Home In A Sought After Setting Of Cheylesmore. Tastefully Decorated And Highly Maintained Throughout. Accommodation Comprising Living Room, Open Plan Kitchen/Diner, Three Bedrooms, Family Bathroom, Garage, ORP & Rear Garden."
"A truly spacious 1930's extended halls together end of terrace family home located on the popular Norman Place Rd. Situated within close proximity to Christ the King junior school and parish church, Coundon Court and President Kennedy secondary schools. Jubilee Crescent shopping area with its va..."
"A two bedroom link detached bungalow with a spacious lounge/dining room and sliding patio doors that open into the rear garden. Kitchen with gas cooker and separate large utility room. Shower room. Low maintenance rear garden,driveway and garage. Gas central heating via combi boiler. NO ONWARD CHAIN"
Situated within the popular residential area of Potters Green is this three bedroom semi detached family home is located with close proximity to the University hospital Coventry and motorway networks.
"Suzanne Regan is pleased to offer for sale this immaculate & Spacious three bedroom semi detached house, with garage, parking, conservatory and a garden lodge. Having ample space and could be extended further for a growing family."
This well presented terraced family residence stands on a good sized plot with ample off road parking
**DOUBLE STOREY EXTENSION TO THE REAR**FULL WIDTH EXTENDED & REFITTED KITCHEN DINER**EXTENDED & REFITTED BATHROOM**GARAGE**This well presented double bay fronted family home has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified) The accommodation briefly comprises: Hal...
"Purplebricks are pleased to present this semi-detached family home within close proximity to Coventry University Hospital, Walsgrave Triangle business park, Showcase Cinema complex with Tesco's supermarket and various eating & drinking outlets. This property would make a lovely family home idea..."
***BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM VICTORIAN SEMI*** Viewing is highly recommended to appreciate this deceptively spacious Victorian semi detached home in a sought after and convenient location close to local amenities and key road networks. Catchment area for outstanding school (Sacre...
"This home is not only in a great location, but certainly has that 'WOW' factor. Offered with no upward chain and ready to move straight into. 
"
"**NO CHAIN**DOUBLE EXTENSION TO REAR**DOUBLE GARAGE**FOUR BEDROOMS**NEW ROOF & WINDOWS** This is an exceptional opportunity to purchase a deceptively spacious family home on the sought after Cheveral Avenue with no forward chain! Very briefly comprising; entrance hall, spacious family living dini..."
"GLB are Pleased To Market A Perfect 4 Double Bedroom With Ensuites Close To The City Centre And Coventry University With On Street Parking. HMO Licence Until 28/06/2025 Current Has 4x Students Within The Property Paying £450 Per Room, this will be re-marketed for next academic year a..."
This individual double fronted detached cottage style three bedroomed house represents well planned family accommodation which must be viewed internally to be fully appreciated. The property has been well cared for by the present owners for almost 50 years and has been extended to both th...
NO UPWARD CHAIN... VACANT... TWO/THREE BEDROOMS*... SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION... CLOSE TO UNIVERSITY HOSPITAL... CLOSE TO MOTORWAY NETWORK... BEAUTIFUL & IMMACULATE THROUGHOUT... CONSERVATORY. Matthew James are delighted to offer this immaculate detached property positioned in a quiet-cul-de-sac l...
"A beautifully presented, spacious modern semi-detached family home located just outside of Coventry City Centre.   On entering the property, you step into a bright hallway. To the left of this, is the lovely kitchen facing to the front of the property to the right is the downstairs WC. At the en..."
"The Marlow three-bedroom home has been cleverly designed to make everyday life easy and stress-free.  One of our innovative Lifetime Homes, the Marlow uses the space to not only give you generous-sized rooms, but also make moving from room to room easy. With level access throughout, once inside, ..."
"Benburys are pleased to present this beautiful family home, located in a quiet semi- rural area on the outskirts of Coventry. This much improved property briefly comprises of entrance porch, lovely lounge, spacious kitchen dining room, conservatory with by-fold doors, shower room, three bedrooms..."
Two Bedroom Detached Property in sought after semi rural location. Double Glazed & Gas Centrally Heated. Spacious Lounge. Fitted Kitchen. First Floor Fitted Bathroom. Gardens to Front & side of property. Direct Access Drive to Garage.
"Situated in a prominently residential suburb of Coventry some three miles from the city centre, this three storey four bedroom terrace house offers deceptively spacious decoration benefiting from double glazing and gas central heating but does require extensive refurbishment and updating."
"*** OFFERED WITH NO CHAIN*** A well-presented three-bedroom family home positioned on a good plot within the desirable location of Eastern Green, offering excellent access to local shops, schools and amenities, including offering easy access to the A45 and connections. The prope..."
"An ideally located detached bungalow lying within this quiet cul-de-sac, being perfect for anyone considering downsizing. The property, which would benefit from a little attention, has gas heating and double glazing, energy efficient solar panels together with an expertly converted garage creatin..."
"***SPACIOUS END TERRACE WITH THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS, GARAGE & CONSERVATORY*** in an inviting setting; a desirable residential Location only moments from COVENTRY UNIVERSITY Hospital and exceptional local amenities. A befitting Family Home being sold with ***NO CHAIN***. Contact Ben Herbert at MAISON "
"Are you in the market for a modern, extended and open planned home? Then look no further. Only by internal inspection can this home be truly appreciated. Situated within the sought after location of Walsgrave, which is surrounded by superb transporting links and amenities, we anticipate plenty of..."
Largely extended three bedroom well presented end of terrace occupying a large plot in Whoberley - driveway for two large vehicles - large garage and workshop to the rear of a gated side driveway - large garden - lovely extended open plan modern kitchen / diner - cosy lounge with log-burner - pla...
An attractively presented semi-detached bungalow situated in this convenient location within Styvechale close to the nearby A45 dual carriageway linking the motorway network. The property has been much improved with replacement uPVC double glazed windows and a new gas fired central heating system...
"*** EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE IN SOUGHT AFTER CV5 LOCATION NEAR ALLESLEY PARK *** With a lounge, dining room/fitted kitchen, snug, bathroom with shower, garden to rear with garage. Gas central heated & double glazed. No upward chain. Ideal family home near schools and shops."
"** RECENTLY REDUCED FOR A QUICK SALE ** A substantial double bayed semi-detached property occupying a commanding corner plot with the great benefit of a direct side driveway providing off-road parking and a good-sized garage. With the benefit of both gas heating and double glazing, the property i..."
**EXTENDED FAMILY ACCOMMODATION**DOUBLE BAY FRONTED**OPEN PLAN REFITTED KITCHEN DINER**REFITTED BATHROOM** We would like to introduce this extended three bedroom end terraced family home to the market. The property benefits from gas central heating and double glazing (as specified) The property ...
A SURPRISINGLY LARGE THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME. Located in a SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION. SOUTH FACING GARDEN. GARAGE AND PARKING. NO UPWARD CHAIN. GAS CENTRAL HEATING. DOUBLE GLAZING THROUGHOUT. PERFECT FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS AND INVESTORS.
"LewisOliver are proud to present this Three Bedroom, Semi detached Property situated in the popular residential area of Radford. Situated conveniently close to local amenities and schools. In brief the property comprises of; Entrance hall, Lounge, Kitchen, Three Bedrooms and Family Bathroom. Exte..."
"**NO CHAIN**EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME**MULTI-CAR DRIVEWAY & DETACHED GARAGE** This deceptively spacious, extended three bedroom semi-detached home is now available for purchase with no forward chain! Very briefly comprising; front lawn, multi-car driveway leading to detached garage, porc..."
"Stunning three bedroom semi detached family home located only a stones throw from Allesley Park - completely refurbished from top to bottom - open plan Kitchen / dining / living area, great for entertaining - driveway and single garage - low maintenance rear garden - modern bathroom - no onward c..."
"A recently improved and well presented, extended traditional double stone bayed end terrace property situated in an attractive off road position set back behind a pleasant service road. The property is conveniently located for a range of amenities and provides excellent access in and out of the C..."
"** RECENTLY REDUCED AGAIN FOR A QUICK SALE ** EXCELLENT OPPORTUNITY - NOT TO BE MISSED ** A beautifully presented and much improved semi-detached family home lying within this very pleasant and peaceful location. With glorious open spaces to the rear of the property including the River Sowe, the ..."
The 2 bed Ashenford is the ideal home for first time buyers or downsizers. Let us help you move with our mortgage contribution scheme.*
The Ashenford is a two bedroom starter home offering convenient accommodation for individuals and couples.
"This lovely three bedroom townhouse oozes style and space, with internal living that spans over three floors. Nestled in this ever popular development close to the Ricoh Arena, Retail Park, A444 & M6, this is quite simply a stylish home in a great location and with over 1200 sq. ft of accommodati..."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a three bedroom, semi detached family home located in the highly desirable area of Eastern green and offered with no onward chain. The accommodation comprises an entrance porch, hallway, 23ft lounge/diner with sliding patio doors leading out onto the ..."
"Great investment opportunity, Five bedroom Terraced house, Located in the middle Stoke area of Coventry. The property also has potential to be bigger if you have an eye for converting properties"
"An attractively presented, traditional, single bayed end of terrace property situated in this popular residential location, a stone's throw from Earlsdon High Street and with the distinct advantage of a first floor shower room, as well as a ground floor bathroom. The gas centrally heated, double ..."
"Beautifully presented throughout and ideally located with easy access to the A444 and the M6 this fabulous, detached, three bedroom family home demands attention. From the welcoming entrance hallway through to it’s spacious full width sitting room with French doors to the garden, the ground floo..."
"**NO ONWARDS CHAIN & 4 BEDROOMS, LARGE GARDEN AND BRICK-BUILT GARAGE** A well-presented four-bedroom semi-detached family home located in the popular area of Eastern Green, provid..."
"An attractive three bedroom mid terrace property situated within the popular area of Chapelfields within close proximity to local shops, schools and amenities including Alvis Retail Park and Lake View Park popular with families. The location also provides easy access to Coventry City Centre and o..."
"Superbly presented four bedroom, modern townhouse arranged over three floors - flexible accommodation with an en-suite ground floor bedroom or family room - utility - Kitchen Diner with integrated Fridge/freezer and dishwasher - en-suite to master bedroom - Jack & Jill bathroom - large walk-in wa..."
"* NO CHAIN! * Deceptively Spacious End Of Terrace Family Home Situated In Daimler Green. Accommodation Boasts An Impressive Living Room, Large Airy Conservatory, Modern Fitted Kitchen With Integrated Appliances, Cloakroom, Three Well Proportioned Bedrooms, Modern Family Bathroom & Two Parking Spots."
"Evans Estates are Proud to Present This Extended Three Bedroom Family Home Offered with No Upward Chain. The property is situated in the Coundon area of the city. The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, lounge , dining area and extended refitted kitchen diner. To the first floor there ar..."
"This wonderful single level home provides warm and cosy living accommodation and a great garden. Offered with no chain, with the bonus of a detached garage, and in a super popular location...book your viewing today."
*GREAT CITY CENTRE INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY* GLB Are Pleased To Present A Perfect 5 Bedroom Investment Property For Sale. Currently Housing Aspire On A Fixed Tenancy In Situ Until October 2023 At £1300 Net Rental Full HMO Licence Until March 2026 Fully Furnished Prope...
"Look no further for a fabulous 2-bedroom detached bungalow, in the quiet and desirable, location close to University Hospitals Coventry, Motorway links and amenities. This fantastic home has been well maintained throughout by the current owners and offers spacious accommodation, with the p..."
**FOUR BEDROOMS**TWO EN-SUITES**GARAGE & DRIVEWAY**PRESIDENT KENNEDY SCHOOL CATCHMENT** This three storey town house has the benefits of gas central heating and double glazing (as specified) The porperty is within walking distance to the arena shopping park and train station. The property ha...
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a turnkey 5 bedroom HMO property situated within this convenient location, having good access to Coventry City Centre and the bustling Earlsdon High Street and offering great facilities for the student and professional market with all furniture and fixtures and ..."
Superb Traditional Terraced Home - 4 Bedrooms - Bathroom - En-Suite - Lounge / Diner - Fitted Kitchen / Diner - Drive To Front - Garden To Rear - Gas Central Heating - UPVC Double Glazing - CHECK OUT MY FLOOR PLAN - Superb Local Amenities And School Catchments - Call Today 
"This spacious four bedroom semi detached property is located in the popular area of Chapelfields and is offered with no onward chain. The ground floor accommodation consists of hallway, lounge with bay window, fitted kitchen/diner, separate dining room/fourth bedroom with bay window and ..."
Beautifully improved and extended home that just needs to be viewed. Very high specification throughout with full width kitchen extension and quality integrated appliances. Dropped kerb for off road parking.
Bairstow Eves are pleased to offer this three bedroom semi detached family home. The property MUST be viewed internally to be fully appreciated. The property is located in the Wyken area of Coventry. The property has recently had a new boiler installed. The property also is very close to Univer...
"Bairstow Eves are proud to present this three bedroom semi detached family home situated in the Walsgrave area of the city. The property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified). The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, lounge , kitchen diner , conservat..."
"Located in a popular & modern estate close to shopping parks, play areas, Wyken Croft and great motorway links"
"Discover the perfect family home in the heart of Cheylesmore! This house is a charming three bedroom mid-terrace, offering a modern and stylish open plan living space, perfect for entertaining and relaxing with loved ones."
"***SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME***NO CHAIN*** Viewing is essential to fully appreciate this deceptively spacious four bedroom family home in a highly sought after location close to good schools, local amenities and key road networks. This making it an ideal purchase for professional couples and families..."
"Hidden away from the hustle and bustle, nestled in a peaceful cul-de-sac with a green and woodland to the front is this lovely and spacious detached bungalow. It is just perfect to move straight into, and with no ongoing chain, there is very little to stop you!"
"Reeds Rains Coventry are pleased to offer this well presented and maintained THREE BEDROOM HALLS TOGETHER MID TERRACED. Located in the much sought after area of Chapelfields this lovely home, which offers many of its traditional features, comprises Entrance Hall, Cloakroom, Sitting Room, Open Pl..."
THREE BEDROOM TERRACED FAMILY HOME / EXTENDED FITTED KITCHEN / THROUGH LOUNGE DINING ROOM / GROUND FLOOR WC/UTILITY / DRIVEWAY FOR TWO VEHICLES / OUTBUILDING PLAYROOM/OFFICE / FITTED FAMILY BATHROOM / REAR GARDEN / SOUGHT AFTER RESIDENTIAL LOCATION / INTERNAL VIEWING RECOMMENDED
Four bedroom modern townhouse located on the popular Bannerbrook Park development - Persimmon build arranged over three floors - offered with no onward chain - astro turf modern low maintenance rear garden - parking and single garage to the rear - separate dining / play room - first floor lounge ...
TOM BATES ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to bring to market this three bedroom detached property offering two reception rooms with living room and kitchen/diner.
"Located within easy reach of local parks and amenities is this deceptively spacious home. Boasting three bedrooms and a large first floor bathroom, along with a spacious lounge diner and kitchen"
"Located within walking distance to University Hospital Coventry is this three bedroom terrace home. Close proximity to several retail outlets including, Asda, Tesco's, Home Bargains and Aldi. Showcase cinema and Mega Bowl ten pin bowling and amusement centre are close by. Fancy a bite to eat the..."
"As you step into the inviting hallway you get a real homely feel and appreciate how much this bright and airy property has been lovingly refurbished. The spacious, open plan, lounge/dining room, kitchen is flooded with light and provides you with modern living with white walls and clean lines thr..."
"STUNNING FAMILY TOWN HOUSE IN THE DESIRABLE LOCATION OF BANNERBROOK WITH GREAT LINKS TO BIRMINGHAM This four bedroom end terrace family home is situated in the sought after location of Bannerbrook Park, Coventry with plenty of living space set over three floors and in great school catch..."
An immaculately presented and refurbished semi-detached dormer bungalow occupying a generous corner position and enjoying gardens to three sides. The property is situated within this popular location close to a range of local amenities and good local schools and has easy access to the A46 and mot...
This re-furbished mid terrace property is situated in the residential area of Coundon within the Coundon Court School Catchment area.
"This wonderful family home has been lovingly lived in and maintained, to a very high standard for many years by the current owner - ready to make their next move, we’re delighted to offer it for sale. Looking for a property to move straight into and make your own, then look no further - even bett..."
"**SOUGHT AFTER POETS CORNER LOCATION**EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM HOME**DETACHED GARAGE** This is a fantastic opportunity to purchase a deceptively spacious family home, viewing is highly recommended. Very briefly comprising; front garden, entrance hall, family living room, office, open plan kitchen/d..."
"***BEAUTIFUL HOME***OPEN PLAN KITCHEN***SPACIOUS LOUNGE***LOVELY GARDEN***VIEWING ESSENTIAL*** Located within close proximity to Coventry University Hospital, junction 2 of the M6 motorway and the start of the M69 motorway is this beautifully presented recently built (approximately four years ag..."
"This excellent terraced home offers two reception rooms, a fitted kitchen, four double bedrooms, a three-piece family bathroom and two en-suite shower rooms. Externally, the property boasts a large rear garden. This home presents a fantastic opportunity for a property hunter. "
"This four bedroomed modern terraced property is to be sold with no chain. There is gas central heating with a newly installed boiler and uPVC double glazing. Representing ideal first time buyer/family accommodation incorporating porch entrance, entrance hall, bay windowed lounge/dining room, k..."
"A LOVELY PROPERTY WHICH DATES BACK TO 1872, FULL OF CHARACTER SET ON A VERY GENEROUS PLOT WITHIN EASY REACH OF GOOD LOCAL SCHOOLS AND OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN!! This lovely three bedroom semi-detached property is positioned in the sought after location of Bennett's road south, Keresl..."
**NO CHAIN INVOLVED** An attractively presented and extended traditional double stone bayed mid-terrace property situated in this convenient position within Cheylesmore. The property is ideally placed for excellent access to a range of local amenities and benefits from uPVC double glazing and gas...
"The Barton is a lovely three-bedroom family home with a bright and modern open-plan kitchen/diner with French doors leading into the garden. The downstairs WC, three handy storage cupboards and an en suite to bedroom one mean it ticks the boxes for practical family living."
"***SPACIOUS THREE DOUBLE BDROOM SEMI DETACHED TOWN HOUSE***SECOND FLOOR WITH MASTER BEDROOM DRESSING ROOM & ENSUITE***OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN*** Accommodation in brief; entrance hall, cloakroom, storage cupboard, fitted kitchen, lounge diner, two double bedrooms and bathroom to the first flo..."
"**NO CHAIN**LARGE BEDROOM ONE WITH DRESSING AREA AND ENSUITE**PARKING AND GARAGE TO REAR** Up Estates are pleased to bring to the market this lovely example of a modern three storey townhouse in a popular area with great connections and local amenities. Briefly comprising; Hall, Kitchen/Diner, WC..."
An excellent opportunity to purchase this semi detached three double bedroomed dormer bungalow being offered for sale with immediate vacant possession and no further chain. The property is conveniently located within Cheylesmore close to a range of local amenities and also within easy access of t...
"An excellent, double bayed semi-detached property occupying a much sought and and convenient side-road, to the west of the city. Carefully maintained for many years, the property has both gas heating and double glazing and features a broad frontage with direct driveway providing essential off-ro..."
"** RECENTLY REDUCED FOR A QUICK SALE ** A superior, modern, three storey town house, situated in this peaceful cul-de-sac just to the West of the city centre. Featuring attractive front views towards a childrens playground, the property is tastefully decorated throughout, has gas heating and doub..."
"Shortland Horne are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £247,000 for Corbet Road. Anyone wishing to place an offer on this property should contact (Shortland Horne, 115 New Union Street, CV1 2NT before exchange of contracts. ** No Chain** This spacious three-be..."
Exciting Investment Opportunity ~ 5 Potential Lettable Rooms ~ No Chain ~ Sold with Vacant Possession A exciting opportunity to purchase a lucrative investment property requiring little in terms of refurbishment but offering loads in terms of space with potentially 5 lettable rooms (subj...
Set on a LARGER THAN AVERAGE PLOT within this QUIET CUL DE SAC is this well presented family home that offers HUGE POTENTIAL to extend further and create your perfect family home
"Situated within the very heart of Coundon, an appealing full height double bayed end-terraced home, offered with immediate vacant possession. With both gas heating and double glazing, this ideal family home has a full width extension to feature a spacious breakfast kitchen, a ground floor cloakro..."
"An extended, halls together single bayed mid-terraced family home situated within this very popular and peaceful side road, close to Hollyfast Road. With the benefit of gas heating and double glazing, the property has a broad block paved driveway providing essential off-road parking together with..."
"An extended three-bedroom end-of-terrace family home for sale, located in the popular area of Whitley, Coventry. The area benefits from being within walking distance of Jaguar Land Rover, Whitley Abbey primary school, and Asda supermarket. Easy access to Coventry C..."
Five-bedroom investment property in Ball Hill currently with expected tenants paying £1100 per calendar month until September 2023. HMO licence application pending.
"SPACIOUS END TERRACE FAMILY HOME CLOSE TO JAGUAR LAND ROVER, COVENTRY CITY CENTRE & COVENTRY TRAIN STATION OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN. This lovely traditional property is conveniently located in the popular area of Cornelius Street, Cheylesmore. The ground floor offers an entrance hall..."
"A substantially extended semi-detached property offering well presented three storey accommodation situated in this convenient location within Whitley close to local schools, David Lloyd Coventry health club and excellent travel links via the nearby A45/A444 dual carriageways. The uPVC double gla..."
**** MOTIVATED SELLER **** Suzanne Regan is pleased to offer for sale this spacious 2 bedroom bungalow located within the popular area of Styvechale . Offered with no upward chain and In need of some modernisation this is an ideal opportunity for a buyer that wants to put their own stamp on some...
"A fabulous opportunity to acquire a spacious, well maintained three bedroom terraced property set in a quiet cul-de-sac, in the sought after location of Coundon. The property is conveniently positioned close to many local shops and transport links and is within walking distance to Christ the King..."
"**VERY WELL PRESENTED & EXTENDED FAMILY HOME**OFF ROAD PARKING**REFITTED KITCHEN & REFITTED BATHROOM** This double bay fronted end terraced property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified) The accommodation comprises: Hall, through lounge, L-shaped extend..."
"Located within the popular family district of Foleshill is this extended three bedroom family home. Situated within a short walk to Foleshill Rd shopping area with its plethora of independent shopping outlets offering a variety of international foods and clothing. Also banks, travel agents, rest..."
"**** EXTENDED CORNER PLOT WITH GARAGE **** Suzanne Regan is pleased to offer, for sale, this three bedroom end of terraced home uniquely situated on a corner plot. Having three bedrooms, extended kitchen/dining room, through lounge/diner and a family bathroom. Parking for at least three cars and..."
"End of terrace property situated in a popular area of Longford being close to local amenities and motorway links. The accommodation briefly comprises of ground floor open plan living to include lounge, dining area and kitchen area. two first floor bedrooms, family bathroom and two loft bedrooms."
"HR Estate agents are proud to offer this Extended Three Bedroom Semi-Detached House, with two reception rooms, Off road parking, and Close links to the A45"
SUPERB 3 BEDROOM TERRACED HOME - MUST BE VIEWED This stunning property comes to market offering excellent accommodation through out. Walking into the property you are greeted by a stunning white tiled entrance which leads into a fantastic open plan kitchen/diner with a conservatory/famil...
"**Three Bedroom Semi-Detached Home**WC & Bathroom**Sought After Location** This well presented home in Walsgrave-On-Sowe is now available for purchase! Only a few minutes drive from University Hospital as well as the M6, M69, A46 and within walking distance to local amenities. This property is al..."
"Wilsons are delighted to offer for sale this four-bedroom terraced property situated in the heart of Courthouse Green. The accommodation affords; entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/dining room, downstairs shower room, three bedrooms and family bathroom to the first floor and fourth bedroom t..."
*** TRADITIONAL TERRACED HOME WITH HUGE POTENTIAL IN A FANTASTIC LOCATION ***
A REALLY BEAUTIFUL END TERRACED THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME THAT JUST HAS TO BE VIEWED
"Situated in a lovely no through road in the very popular Coundon area of Coventry, this End Terraced House with parking has wonderful views over Lake view park, and has three bedrooms and a good sized garden, with no onward chain."
"Located in the heart of Earlsdon is this beautifully presented and much improved home. Offering easy access to Earlsdon Street, Memorial Park and the mainline station"
"Situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac setting, this deceptively spacious and extended semi detached house warrants an internal inspection to fully appreciate the wealth of space. There is gas central heating and uPVC double glazing and the property offers excellent further potential by way of upda..."
Fully Refurbished Four bedroom House of Multiple Occupancy currently fully occupied. Comprising of four bedrooms all with En-suite and a communal kitchen area. This property is ideally suited for the university Hospital Coventry and Warwick.
Two bedroom semi detached family home is situated within a highly sought after location and must be viewed internally to appreciate the accommodation on offer
"Well presented three bedroom double bayed end of terrace is situated in the popular residential area of Wyken, close to all local amenities, Coventry University Hospital & motorway networks."
"**Three Double Bedrooms**Spacious Bath & Shower Room**Overlooking Green** This is a great opportunity to purchase a three sizeable bedroom terraced in close to a range of amenities in a sought after area. Very briefly comprising; entrance hall, lounge diner, kitchen diner & low maintenance privat..."
"**BRAND NEW DEVELOPMENT** This home is now available with flooring throughout and an upgraded appliance package including an integrated fridge freezer and dishwasher* The search for you new home ends here with our stylish Dekker. Step inside the front door and be welcomed by the inviting lounge, ..."
Three bedroom semi detached property located in the centre of Allesley Park - short walk to all the amenities Allesley Park has to offer - double garage to the rear - driveway for one off-road vehicles - no onward chain - perfect opportunity for a first time buyer looking to get on the ladder - d...
Stunning Two Bedroom Park Home ~ Luxurious Presentation Throughout With Private Parking & Gardens ~ No Lease ~ Over 50s
**CORNER PLOT** Bairstow Eves are pleased to offer this great sized three bedroom property that must be seen internally to be fully appreciated. The property is located in the Wyken area of Coventry in easy reach of local amenities. The property is close to University Hospital and has good ...
We are proud to offer this Three Bedroom Mid Terrace House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.
"Reeds Rains are delighted to offer with NO UPWARD CHAIN and IMMEDIATE POSSESSION this immaculately presented two bedroom second floor apartment located within walking distance to the city, memorial park and station. The accommodation offers Communal Entrance Hall, Lift and stairs to upper f..."
"**NO CHAIN**GATED DRIVEWAY & DETACHED GARAGE**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**WC & BATHROOM** This deceptively spacious three bedroom family home is now available for purchase with no forward chain! Very briefly comprising; gated front lawn with mature shrubbery, porch, entrance hall, kitchen/breakfast r..."
"A fantastic investment property, located in the highly sought after area of Earlsdon and offered with no onward chain. This traditional mid terrace home is currently let with accommodation comprising a ground floor bedroom to the front, a communal lounge, a fitted kitchen with access out..."
*Your Next Family Home* : A significantly extended and lovingly improved traditional double bay property. Walking distance from JLR Whitley and some fantastic schools.
"Reeds Rains Coventry are now pleased to offer a spacious well maintained end terrace three bedroom property located in this sought after and popular area. The accommodation which benefits from gas central heating system, double glazing, 24' through lounge and dining room, well fitted kitchen, ..."
"A well presented three bedroom semi-detached property. The property is extended and benefits from an extended kitchen and utility room, a downstairs WC, separate reception rooms, three bedrooms and an upstairs shower room. There is a store/garage to the side, a well maintained rear garden and gen..."
"This three bedroom semi-detached family home is in the popular area of Holbrooks. Easy transport links to the M6 and M69, the property would be ideally suited to a family. The accommodation briefly comprises; Hallway leading to kitchen diner, separate spacious dining area. there is a dow..."
"**NO CHAIN**SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME**QUIET CUL DE SAC LOCATION**DRIVEWAY & OUTBUILDINGS** This is an exceptional opportunity to purchase a good sized three bedroom semi-detached home in a sought after part of Styvechale, Cheylesmore, tucked away in a quiet cul de sac. This home very briefly com..."
"This immaculately presented modern home, originally built by the award winning O'Flanagan Homes, sits on a private driveway well set back from the road and has two allocated parking spaces."
**FOUR BEDROOMS**MASTER EN-SUITE**OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER & LOUNGE** This four bedroom terraced property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified) The accommodation comprises: entrance hall and through lounge/diner/kitchen. On the first floor there are three be...
"**NO UPWARD CHAIN** This well presented three bedroom semi detached family home is positioned in a quiet cul de sac location, just of Job's Lane on a larger than average plot and must be viewed internally to appreciate the accommodation on offer."
"TOM BATES ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to bring to market this fantastic three bedroom semi detached property in the heart of Coventry on Rookery Lane. The property offers off road parking to front, kitchen/diner, spacious living room with Conservatory to the rear overlooking a stunning garden space."
"The property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified). The property comprises of an entrance hall, ground floor cloakroom, open plan living with lounge and kitchen diner with built in appliance consisting of a washer dryer, fridge, freezer, dishwasher and built in..."
"**Double Bay Fronted - Halls Together - Original Minton Tiled Hallway - Three Bedrooms - Two Reception Rooms**  Situated just off Church Lane, this imposing end of terraced property is situated on this highly regarded road and incorporates well planned family accommodation with gas centra..."
Absolutely Stunning Semi Detached Home With Beautiful Modern Kitchen - 3 Bedrooms - Lovely Lounge / Diner - Drive To Front - Family Shower Room - Delightful Rear Garden - Gas Central Heating - UPVC Double Glazing - Superb Local Amenities And School Catchments - Call Today To View 
"A well presented semi detached 3 bedroom property built in 2012. Situated in a convenient location, Pleasant outlook to the greenery. this property is within close proximity to local schools, road networks and amenities. Sold with no upward chain. This property consists of an open plan ..."
"Situated opposite Ravensdale Road with Ravensdale Primary School within close walking distance, this double stone bayed terraced property is to be sold with no chain. There is gas central heating together and double glazing and has been well maintained and warrants an internal inspection to be fu..."
"This beautifully proportioned semi detached house offers copious amounts of space for a growing family and is literally a home to move straight into! With over 1,000 sq. feet of living space, this three bedroom family home has many more happy memories to be made. The style of this property, as we..."
NO CHAIN - End Terraced | Sought After Location | Ideal Family Home | Close To Local Shops & Excellent Schools | Double Glazing | Gas Fired Central Heating | Hallway | Lounge Dining Room | Kitchen | Landing | three bedrooms | Bathroom WC | Off Road Parking | Rear Garden | Garage
"Occupying a prominent corner position in a pleasant cul-de-sac setting, this well appointed modern three bedroomed end of terrace house is to be sold with no chain. There is gas central heating together with uPVC double glazing and is of a deceptively spacious and well planned design whic..."
"NO CHAIN -Three Bedroom Family Home in Kersley, Coventry, Drive, Garage, Through Lounge, Modern Kitchen, Family Bathroom, Garden To Rear"
"SPACIOUS BUNGALOW WITH A GENEROUS PLOT CLOSE TO JAGUAR LAND ROVER, COVENTRY CITY CENTRE & COVENTRY TRAIN STATION AND OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN. This lovely traditional semi-detached bungalow has huge potential and is conveniently located in the popular area of Crecy Road, Cheylesmore...."
A superb opportunity has arisen to purchase this delightful well presented bay fronted family home in this great location of Exhall. This is a property that must be viewed internally so call now to register your interest!!
"A three bedroom, mid-terrace property situated in Cheylesmore. Benefits include two reception rooms, UPVC double glazing, gas central heating, and a garden to the rear. The property is located in walking distance to the City Centre and Coventry railway station, and with easy access to the A45 and..."
"Evans Estates are proud to Present this Three Bedroom End of Terrace House. The property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified). The property is situated Bannerbrook Park. The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, ground floor cloakroom, lounge and kitche..."
"Reeds Rains Coventry are delighted to bring to the market this very well presented and much improved THREE bedroom semi detached in Wyken. The accommodation offers Front Garden, Entrance Porch, Open Plan Hall and Re fitted Kitchen, Living/Dining Room, Three Bedrooms and Re Fitted Bathroom. Genero..."
This is a fantastic opportunity to purchase this well presented traditional bay fronted semi detached home situated in this popular residential area of Ash Green. A internal viewing is highly recommended so call now to arrange a early viewing!!
A Stunning Period End Of Terrace Cottage - Built In The 1800S - Set Over 3 Floors - Stacked With Charm & Character - 2/3 Bedrooms - Lovely Lounge - Dining Room / Bed 3 - Open Plan Kitchen / Diner - SAUNA - Stunning Bathroom - Large Rear Garden - Gas Central Heating - UPVC Double Glazing - No Chain
"* * * NO CHAIN - IDEAL FAMILY HOME * * * If you're looking for a nicely presented family home, within out a sought after residential area then look no further than this attractive terraced home on Billing Road. Having been modernised throughout in recent years, the propert..."
"Attention Investors: A recently refurbished four-bedroom, four-bathroom terraced house just outside Coventry City Centre. Perfectly Located for student tenants."
Set in the heart of Earlsdon is this well presented period terraced home
RDR Dassaur are delighted to present this elegant four-bedroom Extended family home which has recently been fully renovated. This property has a sleek interior which carries through all the spaces of this home.
"**EXTENDED THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM HOME** This well presented property is now available for purchase and has so much to offer! Boasting curb appeal it comprises of; two car driveway with 7kw car plug point & side access, entrance hall with storage, family living room, kitchen breakfast room, utility..."
"FAMILY HOME CLOSE FINHAM PARK SCHOOL CATCHMENT, CLOSE TO JAGUAR LANDROVER & THE MOTORWAY NETWORK. This traditional double bay fronted three bedroom end of terrace property is situated in the highly sought after location of Beanfield Avenue, Finham. The ground floor comprises of an en..."
"**NO CHAIN**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**WC & BATHROOM**WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT**BEAUTIFUL OPEN VIEWS TO THE FRONT** Tucked away in a quiet cul de sac is this beautifully presented, deceptively spacious three double bedroom home in the sought after Glebefarm Grove. This property very briefly comprise..."
**NO UPWARD CHAIN** This end of terrace property is ideally suited for a family or as an investment given the size of accommodation on offer. This house needs to be viewed to be appreciated.
"Situated in this popular development just off Ansty Road, this double bayed three bedroomed semi detached house represents ideal family accommodation. There is gas central heating and uPVC double glazing. Incorporating recess porch, entrance hall, through lounge/dining room with patio doors to th..."
Attention Investors - Superb Period Terraced Home - 5 Lettable Rooms - 2 Bathrooms - Lounge - Fitted Kitchen - Gardens To Front & Rear - Full HMO Licence - Currently Let At £1350 Per Month - Superb Location For Coventry & Warwick University - Call Today 
"A well kept and presented three bedroom Semi Detached family home, tucked away on a quiet cul-de-sac at the top end of Allesley Park - rear vehicular access with double gates onto hardstanding for off-road parking or motorhome - beautifully kept rear garden - through lounge / diner - side utility..."
Elliott Quinn Estates are happy to bring to market this newly renovated three bedroom property.
"CHAIN FREE SALE ~ EARLSDON LOCATION ~ 3 DOUBLE BEDROOMS This spacious home is found just a short stroll away from Earlsdon Street with its fantastic restaurants, cafes and amenities. The house offers great potential with the scope to refurbish / modernise and add value. The property will..."
"Reeds Rains Coventry are delighted to bring to the market this Two Bedroom(which was formerly three bedroom) family home located in this popular and sought after area. This immaculately presented and much improved family home offers Entrance Porch, Entrance Hall, Living/Dining Room, Well Fitted ..."
**FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY**THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED DORMER BUNGALOW**CORNER PLOT**NO ONWARD CHAIN**This three bedroom semi detached dormer bungalow has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified) The property occupies a corner plot and the accommodation comprises: Hall...
"Reeds Rains are delighted to offer this Immaculately Presented and Much Improved Four Bedroom Mid Terraced located in this Much Sought After Area. The accommodation offers Entrance Hall, Living Room, Dining Room, Well Fitted Kitchen, Three Bedrooms to First Floor, Shower Room and a Fur..."
Attractive single bay fronted Terraced situated on a quiet cul-de-sac in the popular area of Chapelfields - Off-Road Parking for two vehicles - extended to the rear providing an open plan kitchen / diner - excellent school catchment area - short walk to Allesley Park & Lake View Park - modern kit...
"Wilsons are delighted to offer FOR SALE this three bedroom mid terraced double bay property situated in the heart of Stoke. The accommodation affords; entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, three bedrooms and family bathroom. There are gardens to the front and rear. <..."
Welcome to this much sought-after area of Whitley. This PRETTY BAY FRONTED END TERRACED property will be a perfect family or first home
"* Investment Opportunity Or Family Home* GLB Are Pleased To Market This Fantastic 5 Double Bedroom Property With Tenants In Situ. The Property Is Within Walking Distance To Coventry City Centre, Small Convenient Stores & Close To Jubilee Crescent With Shops & Supermarkets. <..."
"A great investment opportunity located within walking distance of the city centre and Coventry university, offered with no onward chain and HMO licence in place. The accommodation on the ground floor comprises a fitted kitchen, utility space, shower room, two double bedrooms with one boa..."
Situated in the residential area of Tile Hill this refurbished well presented three bedroom double bayed family home offers spacious accommodation throughout.
"**OPEN HOUSE** SATURDAY 11th FEBRUARY - CALL TO BOOK NOW!!
"
"Evans Estates are Very Proud to Present this Three Bedroom End of Terrace Family Home Situated in the Keresley area of the city. The property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified). The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, through lounge diner and refitt..."
"Suzanne Regan is pleased to offer for sale this immaculate three bedroom end of terraced house in Wyken with no upward chain. This fantastic property has three bedrooms, extended kitchen/dining room, modern shower room, spacious through lounge, front and rear gardens with garage and allocated pa..."
Located in a quiet cul de sac within the sought after area of Binley is this spacious end of terrace home that has been in the same ownership since it was constructed in 1958. The property sits in a generous plot and offers a wealth of potential. Offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN
"*** This property remains available and open to offers following the auction on 9th February 2023. Please contact the auctioneers for further details. *** ** IN THE ROOM AND LIVESTREAM** To be sold via Public Auction on Thursday 9th February 2023 at 6:30pm Village Hotel, Canley, Coventry CV..."
"OFFERED FOR SALE AT A REDUCED STARTING PRICE OF £240,000 TO FACILITATE A SECURE AND SPEEDY SALE. A rare gem has arisen to purchase this semi detached bungalow sitting on a generous sized plot. For sale with no chain, call now to register your interest!"
Three Bedroom / Two Reception Rooms / Garage - Cheylesmore
"Bairstow Eves are pleased to offer this well presented three bedroom single bay terraced property situated on a quite cul-de-sac in the popular location of Chapelfields. The ground floor comprises an entrance hallway , spacious lounge / diner , extended modern kitchen / diner leading to the well ..."
"*** NO CHAIN *** Bairstow Eves are pleased to offer this great opportunity to acquire a three bedroom, three storey, mid terrace property, situated in chapelfields just a short walk from both Coventry City and the popular Earlsdon Highstreet. The unique property on offer, comprises a gr..."
"Up Estates are pleased to bring to market this traditional, double bayed three bedroom semi-detached home to market. Boasting an extended family kitchen, perfect for entertaining and modern living, a spacious living area and a plethora of traditional attributes. Located in the ever popular area o..."
"A mid terrace property situated in the residential area of Earlsdon, being close to the City Centre & Coventry University with four lettable rooms, which makes it an ideal investment opportunity."
...EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY... FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS... BASED OVER THREE FLOORS... CLOSE TO COVENTRY UNIVERSITY... GREAT LOCATION... VACANT PROPERTY... NO CHAIN... ARCHITECTS PLANS AVAILABLE TO MAKE SIX BEDROOMS... A fantastic opportunity to acquire your next rental property. located cl...
"**LOFT ROOM**DETACHED GARAGE**LARGE OPEN PLAN LOUNGE DINER**WC/STORAGE** This is a fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bedroom end of terrace family home on Purcell Road. Very briefly comprising; entrance hall, lounge diner, WC, kitchen, lovely rear garden and detached garage to the ground ..."
MODERN THREE BEDROOM HOME / END TERRACED / MASTER EN SUITE / FITTED KITCHEN DINER / CUL DE SAC LOCATION / OFF STREET PARKING / MODERN FAMILY BATHROOM / REAR GARDEN / CLOSE TO MOTORWAY NETWORK / NO ONWARD CHAIN
"Deceptively Spacious Halls Together Mid Terrace Family Home Situated Within A Sought After Setting of Coundon. Accommodation Comprising Entrance Hallway, Two Impressive Reception Rooms, Modern Kitchen, Three Ample Sized Bedrooms, Modern Family Bathroom & Well Presented Fore & Rear Gardens,"
"Well presented single bayed traditional style three bedroom mid terrace is situated in the popular area of Radford, close to Jubilee Crescent with local amenities and transport links"
"Enjoying a conservatory to the rear, this two bedroom semi detached home would make for a perfect first time purchase, investment or for someone looking to downsize from a larger family home. To the outside the property offers a driveway providing off road parking leading to a garage and a lawned..."
"**MULT-CAR DRIVEWAY**DETACHED GARAGE**TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS**SEMI-DETACHED**SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION** UP Estates Coventry are proud to market this immaculately presented, two double bedroom semi detached home situated in an ever popular & convenient location. Within a stones throw to the University H..."
Attention investors - Close to Warwick University
3 Bedroom Terraced | Popular Location of Coundon | Attention Families & First Time Buyers | Excellent Local Schools & Amenities | New Boiler & Double Glazing | Tax Band B | Travel Links | Driveway | Front and Rear Garden | EPC D 
"A fantastic fully renovated three bedroom end of terraced home, situated in the sort after area of Longford"
Evans Estates are Very Proud to Present this Well Presented Terraced Family Home Situated in the Whitmore Park Area of the city and within The President Kennedy School Catchment. The property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified). The accommodation comprises o...
"Purplebricks are pleased to present this well-presented family home in a highly sought-after location close to good schools and key road networks, ideally suited for professional couples and families alike.  This ideal first-time buyer's property in an ideal location within easy reach of good pr..."
"A great opportunity to acquire a three storey, mid terrace property, situated just a short walk from both Coventry City and the popular Earlsdon Highstreet. The accommodation on offer comprises an entrance hallway with stairs rising to the first floor, a lounge, separate dining room, kit..."
*** MODERN *** REFURBISHED *** DETACHED BUNGALOW *** LUXURY BATHROOM *** BRIGHT AND SPACIOUS ROOMS *** BEAUTIFUL KITCHEN *** OFF ROAD PARKING *** LARGE GARDEN *** POTENTIAL TO EXTEND *** This wonderful three bedroom detached bungalow is very impressive on viewing. As you approach the pro...
* Property with Potential! * Highly spacious three-bedroom semi-detached home with lawful development certificate in place for a proposed change to a 6 bed 6 bath HMO.
"Immaculate Throughout…Three Bedrooms…Master En Suite…Downstairs WC…Kitchen / Diner…Off Road Parking…Great Size Rear Garden… This stunning property is nestled on the Weavers Wharf Development in the Little Heath area in Coventry. Modern and cosy, it’s ready to move in and create your new home. "
"This three bedroomed, end terraced property is ready to move into and call home. Tucked in a cul de sac location in the CV3 area of Coventry, it’s perfect for families. With a tick box of Three Bedrooms…Off Road Parking…Conservatory…Enclosed Rear Garden…PVCu Windows & Doors…EPC Rating C…Gas Centr..."
"***Check Out The Video Tour*** We’re absolutely delighted to offer for sale this traditional, halls together double bayed home. Located in the popular area of Wyken, with everything you need close by - it’s the perfect family home. Within easy reach of University Hospital Coventry too! S..."
"**ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS** Archer Bassett are pleased to offer this well presented three bedroom semi-detached family home located in the sought after area of Allesley Park. The property briefly comprises of a spacious lounge/diner, fitted kitchen, gas central heating and double glazing thro..."
"LOVELY FAMILY HOME WITHIN EASY REACH OF THE A45, BIRMINGHAM AIRPORT AND JAGUAR LANDROVER. This beautiful traditional double bayed three bedroom mid terrace property is conveniently positioned to good local schools and shops with the ground floor offering an entrance hallway, spacious lou..."
"Taylor Cole Estate Agents are delighted to offer 'for sale' this immaculately presented and extended end terraced residence located on this popular residential road. The property benefits from UPVC double glazing and gas fired central heating, with accommodation briefly comprising: entrance porc..."
Elliott Quinn Estates are excited to bring this beautiful 3 Bedroom property to market.
"**FIELD VIEWS TO THE FRONT**REFITTED KITCHEN**THREE BEDROOMS**Situated on a small development in Keresley this terraced property is a great family home. The accommodation comprises: Entrance hallway, ground floor W/C, lounge with doors opening onto the garden. Newly fitted ‘L’ shape k..."
Well Presented End Terrace | Occupying A Corner Plot | Ideal For A First Time Buyer | Close To Local Schools & Shops | Double Glazing | Gas Fired Central Heating | Porch | Hallway | Lounge Dining Room | Kitchen | Landing | two good size bedrooms | Bathroom WC | Gardens | Driveway | must be viewed
"This elevated double circular stone bayed terraced property has been well cared for by the present owners over the past 40 years and is to be sold with no chain. There is gas central heating and uPVC double glazing and is of a well planned design. Incorporating recess porch entrance, entrance ..."
"Fearn Malone are pleased to offer to the market this extended three-bedroom family that has been owned by the current owners for 52 years. This property is located within Stoke Green, which is a residential area located in the south-western part of Coventry. The area is known for its quiet and pe..."
"A three bedroom terrace home within close proximity to the City Centre being ideal for landlords and professional couples alike. There is the added benefit of solar pannels being owned outright. The property includes a kitchen breakfast room and separate living room. There are 3 bedrooms, a show..."
A fantastic opportunity to purchase a semi detached bungalow on the edge of Coventry. The property is within close proximity to the Arena retail shopping park with it's various retailers and eating outlets. Easy road links to the M6 and M69 motorways alongside the A444. This spacious home compri...
"THREE BEDROOMS... FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM... EXTENDED KITCHEN DINING ROOM... THROUGH LOUNGE DINING ROOM... PVCU DOUBLE GLAZING THROUGHOUT...NEWLY LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN... PERFECT FOR FIRST TIME BUYER OR GREAT INVESTMENT PROPERTY... CLOSE TO ALL AMENITIES... Located in Chapelfields, this lovely pro..."
"ATTENTION INVESTORS! An opportunity to buy a FULLY FURNISHED ready to go investment that was refurbished in 2020 throughout. It offers 4 lettable bedrooms , 4 piece bathroom and downstairs shower room. Currently achieving between £450 and £500 a room inclusive of bills"
"5% deposit paid worth £11,747.50. ."
"An attractively presented traditional character mid-terraced property, retaining many original features and being situated within the heart of this sought after location. Benefitting from gas central heating, the accommodation briefly comprises; splendid lounge with feature fireplace, kitchen/din..."
"A Three bedroom Double Bayed Terrace house situated to the East side of Coventry. Briefly comprising : Hall, through Lounge, Good size Kitchen, Landing, Three Bedrooms and first floor bathroom. Gas central heating, UPVC double glazing, Front & rear gardens and direct access drive."
"A Recently Modernised Three bedroomed End Terrace home situated to the East side of Coventry. Briefly comprising: Hall, through lounge, Kitchen, landing three good size bedrooms and bathroom. Front & rear gardens and large detached garage with good access to the rear. Gas central heating & Recen..."
"A three bedroom penthouse apartment with an impressive wrap around balcony with views over the city centre. The property is over 1000 sq ft internally and boasts an impressive Living / Kitchen / Dining with windows to three sides -. En suite to master bedroom, two further bedrooms with a spa..."
"A unique opportunity to purchase a three bedroom detached bungalow, situated down a private road off Nailcote Avenue, conveniently located for road networks, and Tile Hill train station. The bungalow is set in private gardens to four sides and offers huge potential for extension subject planning..."
"A much improved and attractively presented front single bayed mid terraced home with the rare benefit of both a ground floor cloakroom and first floor bathroom, situated in this popular and convenient location in the very heart of Earlsdon. With both gas heating and double glazing, the property ..."
Looking for a spacious bungalow in the Binley area? Then look no further as we have the perfect property for you!! Call the office without delay to arrange your viewing!!
HR estate agents are pleased to advertise this four bedroom serviced accommodation receiving £1350pcm ** NO CHAIN **
"Reeds Rains Coventry are pleased to bring to the market this WELL PRESENTED SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME situated in this much sought after semi rural area with open aspect views. The accommodation offers Dining Room, Living Room, Kitchen, Store Room, Three Bedrooms and Bathroom. To the rea..."
Shortland Horne are pleased to offer with NO UPWARD CHAIN AND IMMEDIATE POSSESSION this immaculately presented and much improved THREE BEDROOM family home location in this sought after and convenient area. This beautiful family home has been completely taken back to brick and extended t...
"GLB Are Pleased To Present A Perfect 3 Double Bedroom Family Home. The Property Is A Vacant Freehold Within A Great Location, Close To The City Centre, Large Super Markets, Retail Park & Motorway Links. The Perfect Home For A Family Or First Time Buyers With No Chain. T..."
"This three bedroom, end of terrace family home is offered with no onward chain and is located just a short drive from the city. The property comprises an entrance hallway with stairs rising to the first floor, a lounge with bay window, separate dining room and a fitted kitchen with acces..."
"**FULL WIDTH EXTENSION TO THE REAR**OFF ROAD PARKING**THREE BEDROOMS** This extended family home has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified) The property is in the President Kennedy School Catchment. The accommodation comprises: Hall, through lounge, with snug area t..."
"** DO NOT MISS THIS OPPORTUNITY! ** RECENTLY RENOVATED THROUGHOUT! ** IDEAL INVESTMENT! ** CLOSE PROXIMITY TO COVENTRY CITY UNIVERSITY! ** Accommodation comprising open plan lounge/dining room, modern fitted kitchen, three/four bedrooms, two bathrooms, uPVC double glazed, GCHS & rear garden."
**FULL WIDTH EXTENSION TO THE REAR**GARAGE TO THE REAR**OFF ROAD PARKING**NO CHAIN** This three bedroom mid terrace property has double glazing and gas central heating (where specified) The property is offered with no chain and situated close to Jubilee Crescent. The accommodation comprises: Hall...
"**SEMI-DETACHED**THREE BEDROOMS**EXTENDED KITCHEN**GARAGE**DRIVEWAY
Benburys are pleased to present this spacious three bedroom family home which offers good sized rooms throughout and is sold with double glazing and gas central heating. The property briefly comprises of entrance hall, lounge, k..."
**REFITTED KITCHEN**CONSERVATORY**REFITTED BATHROOM**GARAGE**DRIVEWAY** Well Presented Three Bedroom Semi Detached House. The property is situated in the Holbrooks area of the city and within The President Kennedy School Catchment. The property has the benefits of double glazing and ga...
"This 3 bedroom single bayed mid-terrace house is available to purchase with No Upward Chain. Located in the Stoke area of Coventry and close to schools, shopping amenities and bus links, this property is an ideal investment purchase or first time buy. The property briefly comprises of: ..."
"**NO CHAIN**ENSUITE, WC & BATHROOM**DETACHED GARAGE & PRIVATE GARDEN** This is a fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bedroom semi-detached home in a quiet cul de sac with no forward chain! Very briefly comprising; front lawn, driveway, detached garage, entrance hall, WC, living room, kitche..."
"**Wrap Around Garden**Three Bedroom Semi-Detached Home** Up Estates are delighted to bring to the market this Semi-Detached, Three Bedroom situated in close proximity to a range of local amenities including a large variety of shops, road routes and schools. Briefly comprising; Entrance Hall, Loun..."
"Here we have a fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bedroom property located in a popular area of Coventry within close proximity to a range of local shops, services and amenities. This property benefits from a social Kitchen/Diner, a useful Utility/Store area, off-road parking, and central ..."
"****GREAT SIZE PARK HOME BENEFITTING FROM A MASTER EN-SUITE, FAMILY BATHROOM AND UTILITY ROOM ALONG WITH STUNNING COUNTRYSIDE VIEWS IN ALLESLEY**** KEY Estate Agents are delighted to offer For Sale this three bedroom park home in the desirable site of Harvest Hill Park. Internally, the property b..."
A simply unique home ideally located for local amenities and schools. This spacious period home has been significantly improved throughout and must be viewed to appreciate the space and style on offer
"**SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME**GARDENS TO SIDE & REAR**DIRECT ACCESS TO A GARAGE** This semi detached property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified) The accommodation comprises: hall, guest cloakroom, lounge, fitted kitchen and conservatory. On the first floo..."
UNIQUE BEAUTIFUL PENTHOUSE APARTMENT... THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS... ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE... LARGE OUTSIDE BALCONY... MODERN KITCHEN WITH INTEGRATED APPLIANCES... TWO BATHROOMS... OPEN PLAN LIVING... This lovely City Centre apartment would be ideal for a buyer looking to live in the City ...
"Evans Estates are Proud to Present this Very Well Presented Two Bedroom Detached Bungalow. The property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified). The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, lounge and a refitted kitchen diner. There are two double bedroom and..."
Suzanne Regan is pleased to offer for sale this immaculate two bedroom semi detached house with garage situated in a quiet cul-de-sac position. No Upward chain
"**NO CHAIN**RENOVATED THROUGHOUT** This is a fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bedroom extended family home with no forward chain and benefitting from being modern throughout! This property very briefly comprises; front lawn with potential for a driveway, entrance hall, living room, open ..."
"Reeds Rains Coventry are delighted to offer this IMMACULATELY PRESENTED AND MUCH IMPROVED QUALITY SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME . This stunning home offers Entrance Hall, Cloakroom, Sitting Room, Newly Installed Dining Kitchen with appliances, Master Bedroom with Ensuite, Further Bedroom with Dr..."
**NO ONWARD CHAIN** THREE BEDROOMS**REFITTED KITCHEN**DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE**REAR GARDEN**NO STAMP DUTY** We would like to introduce this three bedroom semi detached family home to the market. The property benefits from gas central heating and double glazing (as specified) The property has the fol...
"Unexpectedly back to the market! Viewing is highly recommended for this well presented and improved terrace home, suitable for first time buyers and families alike, being conveniently located for good schools, walking distance to Walsgrave Hospital, local amenities and close proximity to key road..."
"**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM**EXTENDED FAMILY HOME**BEAUTIFUL PRIVATE GARDEN**DRIVEWAY & GARAGE** This lovely, extended family home is now available for purchase very briefly comprising; driveway, garage with electric, porch, open plan lounge diner, storage cupboard, kitchen breakfast room, sun room an..."
"*** SUBSTANTIALLY REDUCED FOR QUICK SALE *** An extended, traditional double bayed mid terraced property offering three storey accommodation situated in this convenient location within Cheylesmore. The property is well placed within walking distance of local shops, nearby Asda store and also with..."
"**NO CHAIN**DETACHED GARAGE**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**BEAUTIFUL FIELD VIEW** This is a fantastic opportunity to purchase an extended end terrace home with frontal field view in the sought after Allesley Park. This property briefly comprises; porch, entrance hall, kitchen breakfast room, lounge dine..."
"This semi-detached property is a great opportunity for first time buyers and families, positioned at the end of a cul-de-sac and offered with no onward chain. The accommodation on offer comprises an entrance hallway with stairs rising to the first floor, a lounge with access to under st..."
"Reeds Rains Coventry are pleased to bring to market this ideal first time purchase. Benefits include a Gas Central Heating and Double Glazing and a Double Garage to rear. The accommodation offers Entrance Hall, Living Room, Dining Area, Kitchen, Three Bedrooms, Bathroom, Gardens to Front and Rear..."
"CHECK OUT THIS NEWLY REFURBISHED HOME IN WYKEN, WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE OF ALL LOCAL AMENITIES! Upon entering, the 2 reception rooms are found on the right, both of similar size, 1 boasting a large bay window to the front illuminating the room with natural light. The kitchen is located at the ..."
"**Three Bedroom Family Home**Characterful Edwardian Features**South/West Facing Garden**Large Garden Room** This lovely family home on Harris road is now available for purchase very briefly comprising; entrance hall, lounge/diner, kitchen, south/west facing garden with store and large garden room..."
"*** MODERNISED THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACED HOME IN POPULAR COUNDON LOCATION *** With through lounge extended fitted kitchen, re-fitted bathroom with shower, good size bedrooms, garden to rear with double garage (motorised door), gas central heated, double glazed, with vacant possession & no chain."
"Viewing is essential to fully appreciate this immaculately presented and deceptively spacious single bayed terrace home in a highly sought after location suitable for first time buyers and families alike. There is an entrance hall, living room and a separate kitchen breakfast room with WC off. ..."
"**NEW KITCHEN**OPEN FIELD VIEWS**A well-presented three-bedroom, three bathroom terraced family home located in a quiet development in Keresley overlooking fields close to many local amenities such as the Hare and Hounds pub, President Kennedy & Cardinal Newman secondary schools, Beake Avenue ..."
"** NO CHAIN! ** CLOSE PROXIMITY TO UHCW! ** Deceptively Spacious End Of Terrace Family Home. Accommodation Comprising Large Airy Lounge/Dining Room, Fitted Kitchen, Three Bedrooms, Family Bathroom, Integrated Garage, Gated Off Road Parking & Great Set Of Local Amenities."
"Deceptively Spacious End Of Terrace Family Home Situated In Exhall. Accommodation Comprising Dual Aspect Lounge/Dining Room, Modern Fitted Kitchen With Integrated Appliances, Three Superb Sized Bedrooms, Contemporary Family Bathroom/W.C, Integrated Garage, Off Road Parking & Delightful Rear Garden."
TAKE A LOOK AT THIS BEAUTIFULLY MAINTAINED PROPERTY PERFECT FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS AND INVESTORS! To the front is a spacious yet cosy living room illuminated by a bay window and to the rear is a kitchen spanning the width of the home with ample cupboard space and access to a conservatory at the...
"A very well presented traditional single bayed halls together end of terraced property, conveniently situated within this sought after location close to the city centre and Earlsdon. There is generous living accommodation comprising; front lounge, delightful dining room with double doors leading ..."
"With a garage, parking area's and being sat within leafy, mature grounds, Holly Bank presents spacious, mid floor accommodation including three bedrooms, an impressive sitting dining room, a well equipped kitchen and a modern shower room."
"**WELL PRESENTED FAMILY HOME**THREE BEDROOMS**DRIVEWAY**GREAT FIRST TIME BUY**NO CHAIN** This three bedroom semi detached property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified) The accommodation comprises: lounge, and kitchen. On the first floor there are three bedroom..."
"This double fronted home on Lentons Lane is bursting with personality. It's a Four bedroomed home to make beautiful memories, celebrate and revel in life's milestones, and share many moments and laughs with your favourite people. Better still, this home is offered for sale with no upward chain!"
"A great sized three bedroom home, in need of modernisation but with loads of potential, for sale with no chain. A great location very close to Whitley Abbey Primary School, David Lloyd gym, supermarkets and the city centre."
A Superbly Presented Former Watchmakers Cottage - Accommodation Arranged Over Four Floors - Great Location With Easy Access Into The City Centre & Earlsdon High Street - Thought To Have Been Built Circa 1860 This Excellent First Time Buy Comprises - Living Room - Open Plan Dining Kitchen - Dining A
"Attention investors, close to Warwick University , please note this fine house is a non standard construction house , "
"SAVE THOUSANDS WITH 'THE BIG 3 OFFER'!Owning your dream home could become a reality when you pick one of 'The Big 3' offers! Simply reserve Home 199 at Brindley Edge and choose from:1. Up to £250 a month towards your mortgage for 12 months*2. Up to £3,000 towards your deposit**3...."
"Three bedroom semi-detached house located in Ladybird Avenue, Wood end, Coventry. Hallway, downstairs cloakroom, w/c and hand basin, Fitted kitchen/dining room. Spacious lounge with patio doors to the rear. First floor - two double bedrooms and a single bedroom. Family bathroom. ..."
Purplebricks are pleased to present this well-presented family home in a highly sought-after location set on a quiet no through road within easy reach of local amenities.  This ideal first-time buyer's property in an ideal location within easy reach of good Ofsted rated schools and is only 0.4 m...
Here is an opportunity to acquire an extended End Of Terraced House residence pleasantly situated within a highly favoured residential area with excellent local amenities.
**** INVESTMENT PROPERTY WITH 5 BEDROOMS AND SITUATED ON A LARGE PLOT *** Founders close is just off of Charter Avenue in Canley within 30-minute walk of the University. This 5 bedroom property would be a great investment whether
"This vastly extended and well presented three bedroom family home available to purchase with no upward chain. Located on a quite cul-de-sac in the Wyken Area of Coventry, the property is an ideal purchase for the expanding family. Briefly comprising to the ground floor:- Entrance porch ..."
"An opportunity to purchase a well presented three bedroomed terrace property. Comprising of; Lounge, Dining Area, Kitchen. Three bedrooms and bathroom to first floor. uPVC double glazed and gas centrally heated. Gardens to Front and Rear. VACANT POSSESSION/ No Chain The property has the benefi..."
"**ATTENTION INVESTORS!! - FIVE LETTABLE ROOMS** ** 3D TOUR - 3D FLOORPLAN - 2D FLOORPLAN ** Wilsons are delighted to offer for sale this excellent investment opportunity, within close proximity of Warwick university. The property has been modified to suit investors and create a great income an..."
"A much improved and well presented family home the benefits from stylish and spacious accommodation, large rear garden and no onward chain. Located within easy reach of local schools parks and shops"
"***IDEAL FAMILY HOME***REFITTED KITCHEN***REFITTED BATHROOM***NO CHAIN*** Located within close proximity to Coventry University Hospital, junction 2 of the M6 motorway and the start of the M69 motorway is this three bedroom halls together end of terrace family home. With local amenities close b..."
"**INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY** Thiss property is offered with NO CHAIN. The property would be ideal for a buy to let investor, there is an opportunity to let out as rooms. The property is within walking distance to the City Centre. The property comprises of two reception rooms, kitchen diner with uti..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to present this 3-bedroom semi-detached family home situated in the residential area of potter's green, located with close proximity to the University hospital Coventry and motorway networks On entering the property, you step into a bright spacious hallway. To the left ..."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a well presented semi-detached property with no onward chain. The home comprises of an entrance hallway with access to the ground floor WC, a lounge with stairs rising to the first floor, a fitted kitchen providing access out onto the rear garden, two d..."
"A spacious, extended three bedroom house, with double-glazing, gas fired central heating, extended kitchen, through lounge and a downstairs shower room as well as a family bathroom upstairs. There is also a garage to the rear. Easy access to the City centre, 'University hospital' in Wasgrave and ..."
A Superb Traditional Terraced Home - Superb Investment Or Family Home - Lots Of Original Features - 3/4 Bedrooms - Lounge - Breakfast Kitchen - Delightful Rear Garden - Gas Central Heating - UPVC Double Glazing - Available With No Chain - SUPERB INVESTMENT POTENTIAL - Call Today To View 
Attention First Time Buyers - A Very Well Presented Traditional Style Single Bay Terrace Home In Highly Sought After Location - Offered With No Upward Chain This Centrally Heated And Double Glazed Property Comprises - Welcoming Entrance Hall With Minton Tiled Floor - 24Ft Through Lounge / Diner - Re
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* A mid terrace family home located within the sought after area residential area of Earlsdon with driveway & garage. The accommodation briefly comprises: lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen, three first floor bedrooms & fitted bathroom."
Spacious semi detached bungalow located in a quiet cul de sac position and within easy access of the motorway network. Offered for sale with no upward chain.
"PUBLIC NOTICE Shortland Horne are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £210,000 for 20 Haytor Rise Coventry CV2 3LE. Anyone wishing to place an offer on this property should contact Shortland Horne, 306 Walsgrave Road Coventry CV2 4BL, before exchange of contracts."
A superb three bedroom town house situated a short walk from Coventry City Centre. This fantastic family property has been recently redecorated throughout and offers flexible family accommodation over three floors. Conveniently located close to Nause Mill park the property in brief comprises livi...
"*** SPACIOUS FAMILY SIZED ACCOMMODATION IN POPULAR CHEYLESMORE LOCATION NEAR CITY CENTRE *** With through lounge/dining room, spacious modern kitchen, ground floor bathroom, first floor shower room, traditional bedrooms, garden to rear with garage & off road parking."
"Located between Sewall Highway and Nuffield Road and excellently maintained by its current owners, this extended three-bedroom family home has been thoughtfully designed for the rigours of modern life."
"**IN THE ROOM AND LIVESTREAM** To be sold via Public Auction on Thursday 23rd March 2023 at 6:30pm Village Hotel, Canley, Coventry CV4 9GZ Just turn up and no need to pre-register. You can also register for telephone, proxy, internet bidding online. passport.eigroup.co.uk/bidder-registra..."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a traditional, double bayed mid terrace home, ideal for families and first time buyers and offered with no onward chain. The property is located in the highly sought after area of Wyken and comprises a lounge, a dining room with patio doors leading out..."
This well presented traditional style double bayed terraced property represents well planned accommodation enjoying two double bedrooms with the master bedroom previously being two bedrooms. Being immaculately presented and enjoys a larger than average brick built garage and is to be sold with...
"**NO CHAIN**THREE BEDROOM HOME**SPACIOUS GARDEN**OPEN PLAN LIVING** This is an exceptional opportunity to purchase a lovely three bedroom home close to an extensive range of amenities with no forward chain! Briefly comprising; front lawn, entrance hall, open plan lounge diner, kitchen with amenit..."
"This improved bay fronted home benefits from a light and spacious lounge diner, along with a re-fitted kitchen, re-fitted bathroom and a detached brick built garage. All within easy reach of local parks and schools and offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN"
"Situated just off Hipswell Highway overlooking Richard Lee primary and junior school grounds, this deceptively spacious three bedroomed semi detached house is to be sold with no chain. There is gas central heating and sealed unit double glazing and the property represents ideal family accommod..."
A well proportioned four bedroom family home which has been redecorated & re-carpeted throughout and further benefits from having a re-fitted kitchen & bathroom. To the ground floor is a spacious reception room with a full width kitchen/diner to the rear which has a range of fitted white high glo...
"*ATTENTION INVESTORS OR FIRST TIME BUYERS* A modern three-bedroom penthouse duplex apartment located in the popular Bishopsgate Wharf development, close to Coventry city centre. The accommodation comprises of spacious open plan kitchen/diner with views overlooking the canal, a fitted kitchen with..."
"Life Investments are pleased to present this spacious and well-presented three-bedroom semi-detached house located in the Holbrooks area of Coventry. Offering three double bedrooms, off road parking for multiple vehicles, a very large rear garden, gas central heating and uPVC double glazing."
"**THREE BEDROOMS**EXTENDED ACCOMMODATION** Double bay fronted family home in the popular Coundon area. The property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified) The accommodation comprises: Hall, through lounge/diner, extended fitted kitchen and sun room. To the first..."
Extended mid-terrace property offering spacious family accommodation with an additional loft room and situated in a popular residential location.
"**OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN**GARAGE TO THE REAR**VIEWS OVER OPEN FIELDS TO THE FRONT**A nicely situated end of terraced home with accommodation in brief comprising: Entrance hall, lounge, dining kitchen. On the first floor there are three bedrooms and a shower room. The property benefits from ..."
"Evans Estates are Proud to Present this Three Bedroom Terraced Family Home Offered with No Upward Chain. The property is situated in the Coundon area of the city and has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified). The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, lounge ..."
"***GREAT STARTER HOME***CLOSE TO MOTORWAY NETWORK*** Located within the popular area of Hawksbury Village is this charming two bedroom semi detached home. Set on a corner and offering a larger than normal garden for the size of house. Within close proximity to local amenities, schools, canalside..."
Must be seen This well presented semi-detached home must be seen to be appreciated. This spacious accommodation offers a good size lounge and kitchen diner. The first floor offers three good size bedrooms and a modern bathroom. This family home offers off road parking and a ...
This double circular stone bayed halls together semi detached house enjoys the advantage of direct access and a double width car parking bay and direct shared access to a detached garage. There is gas central heating and uPVC double glazing and is to be sold with no chain. The property incorpo...
"A traditional full double bayed mid-terraced property lying within the very heart of the popular suburb of Coundon. Offered with immediate vacant possession, the property will require general redecorating and tidying but offers huge scope for first time buyers to personalise and create a comforta..."
"**NO UPWARD CHAIN** This double bayed mid terrace property situated in the residential area of Wyken, close to local schools, amenities and transport links."
"A well cared for semi detached property situated on the northern fringe of Coventry convenient for the City Centre, Nuneaton and the motorway network."
"Suzanne Regan is pleased to offer for sale this recently refurbished two bedroom end of terraced house in Shilton Lane. Having been recently redecorated to a modern standard, this spacious property has two double bedrooms, modern bathroom, recently fitted kitchen/dining room with a useful utili..."
"Ideally located for local schools and amenities is this well presented 'bow bay' terraced home, offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN"
"This property has recently benefited from redecoration and viewing is essential!!!! Set in this popular area we love all this property has to offer. Boasting a refitted kitchen, downstairs WC and two reception rooms. the first floor offers three bedrooms and a family bathroom. "
"An attractive, well presented and improved modern semi-detached property in a quiet attractive block paved cul-de-sac. The property is extremely well placed on the Eastern outskirts of the City close to a variety of schools, shop and supermarkets, multiple bus routes, local pubs and restaurants a..."
**NO STAMP DUTY**FULL WIDTH EXTENSION AT THE REAR**THREE BEDROOMS**REAR ACCESS**GARAGE** We would like to introduce this three bedroom semi-detached family home to the market. The property benefits from gas central heating and double glazing (as specified) The property has the following family a...
"Purplebricks are pleased to bring to market this well-presented three-bedroom end of terrace family home. Situated in a sought after and convenient location suitable for first time buyers with driveway providing off road parking. On entering the property, you walk into a spacious lounge with st..."
"Bay-fronted, three-bedroom end terraced home with parking at the front and garage at the rear offered for sale in this popular residential location."
"Suzanne Regan is pleased to offer for sale this two bedroom semi detached house located in a peaceful cul-de-sac location. Having parking for two cars, a spacious kitchen diner, modern shower room, two double bedrooms, spacious lounge/dining room and a very handy utility with access to a great si..."
"Three bedroom detached family home is situated in a desirable location close to Coventry University Hospital, motorway links and local amenities."
"**NO CHAIN** This property is within walking distance to Coventry University and the City Centre. This would be an excellent opportunity for a first time buyer or buy to let investor. The property comprises of two reception roooms, kitchen with utilty area, downstairs shower room, two double bedr..."
"**EXTENDED KITCHEN DINER**THREE BEDROOMS**OFFERED WITH NO CHAIN**NO STAMP DUTY** Double bay fronted end of terraced property which has the benefits of gas central heating and double glazing (as specified) The property comprises; hallway, lounge/diner and full width extended kitchen diner. ..."
"HR estate agents are pleased to advertise this three bedroom, two ensuites, HMO receiving £1350pcm ** NO CHAIN **"
"Hr estate agents are pleased to advertise this three bedroom end of terraced property, tenanted at present for £925pcm. Located in the Stoke area of Coventry ** NO CHAIN**"
"**EXTENDED TO THE REAR**WELL PRESENTED FAMILY HOME**THREE BEDROOMS**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS** This well presented family home has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified) The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, lounge, fitted kitchen diner, then a further extended rec..."
"**NO CHAIN** Bairstow eves are pleased to present a three bedroom property in the Wyken area of Coventry. The property is close to local amenities, walking distance to Coventry University Hospital and has easy access to M6 Motorway links. This property would be ideal for a first time buyer ..."
3 Bedroom End of Terrace | Attention First Time Buyers & Investors | Renovation Opportunity |  Off Road Parking/ Large Garage | West Facing Garden | Good Sized Living Spaces | Downstairs Shower Room | Tax Band B | EPC D | Excellent Local Amenities&nb...
Shortland Horne are pleased to offer to the market this lovely three bedroom family home located in Tile Hill. This offers a fantastic investment opportunity or first-time purchase. The property boasts excellent energy efficiency and currently has an EPC rating: B. This benefits fro...
"**NO ONWARDS CHAIN** A three-bedroom terraced family home located in the popular area of Eastern Green conveniently located close to Parkhill and Mount Nod Primary school, Tile Hill train station, A45, Coventry City Centre. Will make a perfect family home"
"Reeds Rains are delighted to offer this well presented and maintained DORMER STYLE BUNGALOW located in this much sought after and convenient area. The property is offered with NO UPWARD CHAIN and the accommodation offers Entrance Lobby, Entrance Hall, Living Room, Dining Room, Well Fitted Kitch..."
"**SPACIOUS TOP FLOOR CORNER APARTMENT WITH COMMANDING VIEWS OF OPEN FIELD/WOODLAND AREA**NO FORWARD CHAIN**ALLOCATED PARKING ADJACENT TO LIFT ACCESS**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS, TWO BATHROOMS** This beautifully presented, spacious apartment is now available to purchase with no forward chain. Surro..."
"*** RENOVATED THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACED HOME IN POPULAR COUNDON *** With living room, newly fitted kitchen, ground floor WC, under stairs storage, three fairly equal size bedrooms, newly fitted bathroom with shower, gas central heating and double glazing. first time buyers or investor landlords ..."
"*** TWO BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW IN QUIET CUL DE SAC OF TILE HILL *** With driveway to garage, living room, fitted kitchen, bathroom, two bedrooms and garden to rear. Gas central heated & double glazed. The property does require modernisation & is being offered for sale with no upward chain."
"A three bedroom semi-detached property in this sought after location, with so much potential"
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* Mid terrace property located within the sought after area Keresley and is conveniently located close to local amenities, popular schools and bus links to the City Centre. Briefly comprising: lounge, fitted kitchen, three bedrooms and a fitted bathroom."
**NO ONWARD CHAIN**NO STAMP DUTY**PERFECT FIRST TIME BUY**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**THREE BEDROOMS** We would like to introduce this three bedroom terraced family home to the market. The property benefits from gas central heating and double glazing (as specified) The property has the following family...
This three bedroom semi detached family home is situated in a popular residential of Coventry within easy reach of a wide variety of local amenities including the Ricoh Arena & the motorway network.
Reeds Rains Coventry are pleased to offer with NO UPWARD CHAIN AND IMMEDIATE POSSESSION this THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACED FAMILY HOME OR INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY located within walking distance to Coventry City Centre. Benefits include a Gas Central Heating System with recently installed new boile...
"**BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED EXTENDED TERRACED**KITCHEN/DINER, STUDY AND LOUNGE**GARAGE TO REAR** Up Estates are pleased to bring to the market a great example of an extended mid terraced property just off Nunts Lane and in an ideal location for road links and President Kennedy School. Briefly compris..."
"Located in the very popular area of Wyken, Parry Road is on the doorstep of nearby beautiful nature reserves, and with highly regarded schools and local amenities just a short walk away, it’s a great location for families. University Hospital is just a few minutes' drive and the property has easy..."
"This traditional improved end of terrace house is situated in a residential area 2 miles to the west of the City Centre and is to be found off Lincroft Crescent which is approached from Grayswood Avenue. A special note must be made of the double garage, with pitched roof, located at the rear of t..."
"**IMMACULATE THROUGHOUT** Bairstow Eves are delighted to offer for sale this beautifully presented three Bedroom terraced property, this is not one to be missed. This bright & airy fully renovated three bedroom terrace residence provides a spacious modern lounge with large french doors &..."
Offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this extended bay fronted terraced home in the highly popular Chaplefields Avenue. The property requires modernisation and comes with a large rear garden and garage
"Evans Estates are Proud Present this Well Presented Three Bedroom Semi Detached House Situated in Ash Green. The property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified). The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, through lounge diner, kitchen and a conservatory. T..."
"Here is a modern Centre Terraced Two Bedroom House, pleasantly situated on this established estate in Coventry, with convenient access to the city centre, shopping centres and the motorway network."
"This three bedroom, end of terrace family home has been recently extended, offering generous ground floor accommodation and open plan living. The property comprises an entrance hallway with stairs rising to the first floor, an open plan lounge/diner with modern fitted kitchen and patio d..."
"Occupying a pleasant position on a pedestrian walkway, this three bedroomed terraced house is realistically priced for an early sale. There is gas central heating and uPVC double glazing and the property must be viewed internally to be fully appreciated. Comprising entrance hall, lounge with door..."
"A SPACIOUS SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO TILE HILL TRAIN STATION AND EASY ACCESS TO GOOD SCHOOLS OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN. This extended family home comprises of an entrance porch, leading on to a 22ft Lounge with a door leading on to an extended, Kitchen/Diner wh..."
"**NEWLY REFURBISHED TWO BED BUNGALOW OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** A superbly presented two-bedroom semi-detached bungalow situated in the ever-popular area of Larchwood Road, Exhall. The bungalow has been refurbished to a very high standard and must be viewed internally to appreciate ..."
"This is a fantastic opportunity to purchase a beautifully presented 3-bedroom family home on the popular Rollason Road with no forward chain.   This is a highly convenient location, with close proximity to road and rail networks and local schools. Jubilee Crescent is literally around the corner..."
"Ideally located in the heart of Coundon is this original 1920's bay fronted home that is offered to the market for the first time in over 70 years. With great scope to create you perfect home, this property is offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN and simply must be viewed"
This traditional style double circular bayed three bedroomed terraced property represents ideal first time buy family accommodation ready to move into and to be sold with no chain. There is gas central heating and uPVC double glazing and there is direct access via a dropped kerb to a car parki...
"**NO CHAIN** This property is located in the Walsgrave area of Coventry, within walking distance to University Hospital, close to local amenities with easy access to M6 Motorway links. The property would be ideal for a first time buyer. The property comprises of two reception rooms, dining room/s..."
"**THREE/FOUR BEDROOMS**NO CHAIN**WC & BATHROOM**DETACHED GARAGE & DRIVEWAY** This is a fantastic opportunity to purchase a three/four bedroom property on the popular Telfer Road with no forward chain. Briefly comprising; driveway, entrance hall, family living room flowing through to the kitchen d..."
This traditional double bayed end of terrace house is situated to the east of Coventry with excellent access to the M6/M69/A46 junction. The entrance at Clifford Bridge Road to the UHCW Hospital is within a ¼ of a mile on foot (1 mile by road to the main hospital building) and Ansty Park is less...
"Sold by Modern Method Auction partnered with Iamsold and Ashley Would Estate Agents. This no chain two bedroom link detached bungalow has so much potential and situated amongst a beautiful plot on a private road. Benefiting from a driveway, garage and south facing garden.
"
Evans Estates are Proud to Present this Three Bedroom Family Home. The property is situated in the Keresley area of the city. The property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified) and is offered with no upward chain. The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall...
"This three bedroom semi detached family home is situated in a convenient location in Allesley Park within easy reach of the local shops and schools. The accommodation features: entrance hall, living room, dining room, conservatory, kitchen, three bedrooms and bathroom, terraced rear garden with g..."
An extended and improved 'Halls Together' semi detached home ideally located for local shops and schools. The property is well presented throughout and has the added benefit of a detached brick built garage
2 Bedroom Semi-Detached | No Chain | Attention First Time Buyers & Investors | Driveway for Two Cars | Gas Central Heating & Fully Double Glazed | Great Size Living and Bedroom Spaces | Down Stairs Bathroom & Upstairs Shower Room | Log Burner | EPC D | Tax Band B&nbs...
"A traditional mid-terrace property situated within this sought after location just off Earlsdon High Street and being ideally suited for a first time buyer. Benefitting from gas central heating and double glazing, the accommodation briefly comprises; splendid through lounge/dining room, kitchen, ..."
"Situated just off Biggin Hall Crescent this traditional style single bayed three bedroomed semi detached house is to be sold with no chain. There is gas central heating and hardwood sealed unit double glazing and the property is of a well planned design. Incorporating recess porch entrance, en..."
"Evans Estates are Proud to Present this Extended Three Bedroom Family Home. The property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified). The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, lounge, dining room and extended kitchen. To the first floor there are three bedroom..."
***CHARACTER FAMILY HOME*** Sandpits Lane leads from Tamworth Road and the property is situated within easy reach of attractive open countryside. The City Centre is approximately three and a half miles away providing comprehensive amenities and just to the south of the centre is the main line ra...
"This two bedroom single bayed mid terrace property is situated in the popular residential area of coundon, being close to local amenities, transport routes and within easy walking distance of Coventry City Centre."
"**Traditional Bay Fronted Terrace - Three Bedrooms - Garage to Rear - Close to Amenities** Fantastic oppotunity to purchase this well appointed home, which in brief comprises: Entrance hallway, lounge and kitchen/diner to the ground floor. There is a landing, three bedrooms and bathroom to the..."
"This lovely three bedroom end of terrace property is situated in the popular location of Denham Avenue, Allesley Park and is conveniently close to the A45, shops and Birmingham Airport with the ground floor offering a Storm Porch, an entrance hallway, spacious lounge, separate dining room which h..."
***3 Bedroom Houses Released on Brindley Meadows*** Would you like to own your own home but find you're struggling to afford a home on the open market? Shared Ownership could help. Apply now to avoid missing out.
"This modern built, semi detached home is nestled in a quiet, friendly, cul de sac in Walsrave. Inside, the neutral colour palette compliments the copious amounts of light which emanate through the rooms. This is a happy place which ticks all the boxes for first time buyers and someone looking for..."
"Suzanne Regan is pleased to offer, for sale, this semi detached two/three bedroom house in the sought after location of Whitley. This property offers two bedrooms, with the master boasting a superb size, due to an adjoining wall being removed. A third bedroom would be restored causing minimal ef..."
** NO UPWARD CHAIN** This three bedroom double bayed mid terrace property is situated in the residential area of Courthouse Green. EPC RATING: E
"This semi detached three bedroom family home has been refurbished and is in immaculate condition throughout. It is positioned perfectly in a quiet, private plot with a front and rear garden. Within a few minutes of local amenities and road links around Coventry and further afield. To appreciate t..."
Close to Coventry City Centre & University. A spacious Townhouse situated in the sought after area of Stoke within short walking distance to both Coventry University and the City Centre
**NO CHAIN**EXTENDED ACCOMMODATION**THREE BEDROOMS**PLUS STUDY/PLAYROOM**This end terraced property is situated walking distance to Jubilee Crescent. The property is offered with no chain and has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified) The accommodation comprises: Ha...
"**NO CHAIN**NO STAMP DUTY**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**THREE BEDROOMS**BATHROOM & SHOWER ROOM** This double bay fronted terraced property has gas central heating and double glazing (as specified) The accommodation comprises: Porch, hall, lounge, fitted kitchen, dining room and ground floor shower ro..."
"**SPACIOUS PRIVATE GARDEN**QUIET CUL DE SAC**WC & BATHROOM** This fantastic property is now available for purchase, very briefly comprising; front lawn, off road parking, entrance hall, WC, kitchen, lounge/diner, beautiful private rear garden to the ground floor. On the first floor there are two ..."
A recently redecorated three bed end of terraced house in the sought-after area of Holbrooks
"Mid terrace property situated in a popular area of Longford being close to local amenities and motorway links. The accommodation briefly comprises of ground floor w/c, through lounge/dining area, fitted kitchen, three first floor bedrooms & fitted shower room. Externally there is a rear garden."
"Whitegates are pleased to present this excellently presented three bedroom mid terrace property with easy links to the M6 motorway network and the 'University' Hospital in Walsgrave. The property benefits from having gas central heating, double glazing, an extended kitchen and a large garage to t..."
"This mid terrace property set within the popular residential area of Finham, within easy reach of Finham Park school and great road links via the A45 and A46 Offering spacious accommodation that is perfect for a family."
"This end of terrace property is located in a quiet and peaceful cul-de-sac, just off Broad Lane on the edge of Eastern Green, close to local amenities, excellent schooling and superb transport links."
Evans Estates are Proud to Present This Three Bedroom Double Bay Fronted Terraced House Situated in the Poets Corner area of the city. The property is offered with no upward chain. The property is part double glazed with electric storage heaters (as specified). The accommodation comprises of an e...
"Hr estate agents are pleased to advertise this two bedroom mid terraced property, tenanted at present for £925pcm. Located in the Stoke area of Coventry ** NO CHAIN**"
Offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this deceptively spacious period end of terrace home. Set on a quiet no through road and within easy reach of local amenities
EXTENDED FAMILY HOME / END TERRACE / THREE BEDROOMS / TWO RECEPTION ROOMS / FITTED KITCHEN / FITTED BATHROOM / LARGE REAR GARDEN / POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION / IDEAL FIRST TIME PURCHASE / DOUBLE GLAZING / GAS CENTRAL HEATING / NO ONWARD CHAIN.
"Situtated in a pleasant cul-de-sac setting just off Coombe Park Road, this attractively presented Monsell Youell built middle mews house enjoys the advantage of direct access to a brick built integral garage. There is gas central heating and uPVC double glazing and the property has been well m..."
"For sale on 30 March 2023 The National Property Auction will be broadcast live on our website and open to remote bidding online, on the phone and by proxy. Registration for bidding will close at 5pm the day before the auction. The auction will commence at 10:00. On behalf of Nicholas Humphreys..."
"Evans Estates are Proud to Present this Three Bedroom Semi Detached Family Home. The property is situated in the Radford area of the city and has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified). The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, lounge and kitchen diner. To th..."
"Located on the to the east of Coventry city centre, close to local amenities, the ring road, A444 and the motorway network. This is a good size mid terrace property. The property has been used as a HMO previously and a family rental in the past. The property briefly consists of an entrance hall..."
"Reeds Rains Coventry are now pleased to offer with NO UPWARD CHAIN and IMMEDIATE POSSESSION this well maintained and presented three bedroom middle terraced family home. Located in this sought after popular area which is within easy reach of Coventry University Hospital and Caludon Castle School,..."
"Purplebricks are proud to present this well presented three-bedroom semi-detached family home, with early viewing is highly recommended!  On entering the property there is an entrance hall giving access on the ground floor to a lounge area with bay window to the front. To the rear is a separate..."
This is a double bay three bedroom terraced house with no onward chain and is located to the east of Coventry. With access to major motorway links. Briefly comprises UPVC double glazed windows and gas centrally heated radiators. Access to the rear with a concrete garage. Currently tenanted until ...
"Wonderfully presented 4 bed detached house located in Coventry Comprises of: Warm and welcoming entrance hallway Well appointed, recently renovated kitchen with base and wall units Spacious and cosy living room Master bedroom Three additional good sized bedr..."
Three bedroom modern end of terrace property situated on the popular Stoke village development which would be an ideal first time home or investment opportunity.
"Evans Estates are Proud to this Two Bedroom End of Terrace House Offered with No Upward Chain. The property is situated in the Keresley area of the city in a cul de sac location. The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, lounge and an extended refitted kitchen diner. To the first floor the..."
Superb End Of Terrace Home - Set In The Popular Location Of Potters Green - 3 Bedrooms - Shower Room - Lounge - Kitchen / Diner - Conservatory - Drive - Rear Garden - Modern UPVC Windows - Modern Gas Central Heating - NO CHAIN - Check Out My Floor Plan - Call Today To View 
Attention First Time Buyers & Buy To Let Investors - Close To Many Excellent Facilities This Traditional Style Double Bay Terrace Home Is Offered With No Upward Chain And Comprises Entrance Hall - Lounge With Bay Window- Further Reception Room Which Has Previously Been Used As A Bedroom With A Fully
"Evans Estates are Proud to present this three bedroom end of terrace house offered with no upward chain and is situated in the Coundon area of the city. The property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified). The accommodation comprises of a lounge, and kitchen. To..."
"** GREATLY REDCUED BY £15,000 FOR A QUICK SALE ** A conveniently located, single bayed, mid-terraced property situated within the heart of Wyken. Offered with immediate vacant possession, the property has both gas heating and double glazing together with a longer than average rear garden, featuri..."
***BTL INVESTORS - IMMEDIATE RETURN ON INVESTMENT WITH SITTING TENANCY EXPIRING MARCH 2024*** MODERN 2 BEDROOM HOUSE WITH PARKING at desirable 'New Stoke Village' in prime location CV3 synonymous with professionals and families and boasting exceptional amenities. ***Contact MAISON Estates***
"** STARTING BID £205,000 ** Offered for sale at a reduced asking price to facilitate a speedy and secure sale!! With three good size bedrooms, driveway, garage and close to a local primary school, this property really must be viewed to appreciate what's on offer."
"Suzanne Regan is pleased to offer for sale this extended two bedroom semi detached house in Hall Green Road. In brief this property has off road parking, a spacious open plan lounge/dining room, recently re-fitted kitchen, re-fitted bathroom, downstairs bedroom and conservatory, two double bed..."
This well presented three bedroom End terrace with gated off road secure parking at the rear is now available. House is located in the Stoke Heath Area of Coventry. Being close to the A444 this property has excellent transport links. This would make an ideal family home. The...
~ Beautiful 2 bedroom semi-detached home. Recent modernisation throughout. Located in the popular and attractive development within the heart of Holbrooks. ~ 
"A prominent and traditional three/four-bedroom end terraced house on Ball Hill, ripe for improvement and investment or alternatively, a spacious family home."
"Evans Estates are Proud to Present this Two Bedroom Terraced Terraced House Situated in The Coundon area of the city. The property has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified). The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, lounge and kitchen. To the first floor the..."
"**OFFERED WITH NO CHAIN** FULL WIDTH EXTENSION AT THE REAR**REAR ACCESS** This semi-detached home has the benefits of double glazing and gas central heating (as specified) The accommodation comprises: Hall, through lounge and fitted kitchen diner. On the first floor there are three bedrooms and ..."
"** NO CHAIN! ** Deceptively Spacious Semi Detached Set In Willenhall. Accommodation Boasting Impressive Living Room, Full Width Kitchen/Diner, Three Well Proportioned Bedrooms And A Three Piece Family Bathroom/W.C. Off Road Parking With Side Garage And A Delightful Rear Garden. Book Your Apt Online!"
Investment and development opportunity - close to Warwick University - FREEHOLD
"Looking for your first home? This spacious home is well presented throughout, meaning you can simply move in and enjoy. Ideally located for local amenities and the City Centre and with plenty of character. Like what you see? Call Haart NOW to book your viewing"
Suzanne Regan is pleased to offer for sale this immaculately presented two bedroom mid terraced house in Earlsdon. With no upward chain this is an ideal first time or investment purchase.
"Superb mid-terraced character property, conveniently located for access to Warwick and Coventry University, Coventry Centre, with access to road, bus, and rail networks. Accommodation comprises 2 double bedrooms, lounge with open fire, dining room, fitted kitchen, ground floor bathroom, rear garden."
THREE BEDROOM / TERRACED FAMILY HOME / THROUGH LOUNGE DINING ROOM / REAR GARDEN / GARAGE AT REAR / GAS CENTRAL HEATING / DOUBLE GLAZING / FAMILY BATHROOM / CLOSE TO AMENITIES / POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION
"Offered to the market with no onward chain is this well presented and deceptively spacious home, ideally located for local parks, schools and amenities"
A STUNNING TWO BEDROOM END TERRACED PROPERTY IN GREAT CONDITION
A much improved and beautifully presented semi detached home located in a quiet cul de sac and benefiting from a generous rear garden
"Nestled in a quite cul de sac in this popular Binley location is this well presented Scandinavian style bungalow, offered to the market with no onward chain"
"A very well presented mid-terraced home, located very conveniently for a range of shops, pubs, the City Centre, both Warwick and Coventry Universities as well as the major road network."
A THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACED PROPERTY IN THE RADFORD AREA OF COVENTRY
" A mid terrace property, offering lavishly proportioned rooms ideal for a DIY buyer wishing to add value to this property ."
"This three bedroom semi-detached home is within easy reach of the motorway network, university hospital & local amenities and is offered with no upward chain. In brief the property comprises of a spacious entrance hall with stairs to the first floor, good size lounge/diner & a fitted kitchen wit..."
"Reeds Rains Coventry are pleased to offer with NO UPWARD CHAIN this three bedroom mid terraced family home located in this popular area. The accommodation offers Entrance Porch, Hall, Dining Room, Living Room, Kitchen, Three Bedrooms and Bathroom. To the front there is a Front Garden, Driveway, G..."
"Viewing is highly recommended for this deceptively spacious semi detached home in a sought after and convenient location. The property is ideally suited to professional couples and families alike and is available with no upward chain. There is an entrance hall with ground floor cloakroom off, mo..."
"Reeds Rains are pleased to offer this THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME located in this sought after and convenient area. The accommodation offers lounge, Fitted Kitchen, Three Bedrooms , and Bathroom. There is a good size Garden to the rear. An early viewing is highly recommended. EPC Band D Coun..."
"*Offers in Excess of £200,000 - £220,000 +* Wonderfully presented 2 bedroom terraced home in Coventry Comprises of: Warm and welcoming entrance hallway with original Minton tiling Bright and airy front reception room with bay window and feature fireplac..."
"*** TO BE SOLD WITH TENANT IN SITU - INVESTORS ONLY *** A three bedroom terrace family home in a great location, great school catchment, great amenities and road links. The garden is huge and the rooms are all a good size too, the property has great potential for improvement both cosmetically and..."
